<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47602 </DOCNO>
<HT>  "cr00000025094001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<H2>   May Reports </H2>
<DATE1>  3 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOUO -- DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS, THE 
FOLLOWING ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS 
FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY--WEST EUROPE 
<H3> <TI>      FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY--FB PSE 94-017--WEST EUROPE </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY--FB PSE 94-017--WEST EUROPE </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
Europe      Economic Review:  WESTERN EUROPE Vo1. III, No. 17, 02 May 
1994 

   Notice To Readers:  FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY is a series published by 
FBIS Europe/Lat in America Group featuring brief summaries of 
foreign 
media reports on topical issues, compiled from the most recent 
sources available to FBIS. 

   Europe Economic Review (EER) is a subseries of FOREIGN MEDIA 
SURVEY published by the West and East European Divisions of 
Europe/Lat in America Group with contributions from FBIS overseas 
bureaus.  The EER is intended to supplement coverage of European 
economic issues by the FBIS Daily Report for West and East Europe, 
and other FBIS publications.  Foreign news, feature, and editorial 
reports selected for summary in this publication normally do not 
appear in other FBIS publications. 

   The EER is published in two editions, one for West Europe (also 
including media coverage of Canada and Turkey), and the other for 
Eastern Europe.  Drawing primarily from domestic media sources of 
these countries but also using other foreign media where 
appropriate, the EER focuses on national and regional economic 
issues, such as economic competitiveness, regional economic 
integration, economic reforms and other changes in economic 
policies, and foreign trade and investment. 

   FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY is a U.S. Government publication.  Its 
contents in no way represent the policies, views, or attitudes of 
the U.S. Government.  All comment or analysis contained herein is 
attributable to the cited media source, unless otherwise indicated. 
   TABLE OF CONTENTS 

   INTRODUCTION 

   PARLIAMENT 

   THE COMMISSION 

   THE COURT OF JUSTICE 

   EUROPEAN INVESTMENT BANK 

   UNICE 

   EUROPEAN SPACE AGENCY 
   CEDEFOP 

   THE DUBLIN FOUNDATION 

   EUROSTAT 

   Part I: Impact of EU Institutions on European Business 

   INTRODUCTION 

   This special issue of the West Europe Economic Review summarizes 
a series of articles appearing in the Paris business daily LES ECHOS 
from 5 January to 23 March 1994.  The articles discuss the main EU 
institutions which affect the conduct of business in Europe, either 
through their regulatory, advocacy, or consultative functions.  The 
articles include interviews conducted by the authors with special 
interest group spokespersons commenting on the advantages and 
problems inherent in dealing with these institutions. 

   According to the articles, the Treaty of Rome, which founded the 
European Community, largely ignored the business community--with the 
exception of the steel, aircraft, and agriculture industries. 
During the 1960's and 1970's the Community focused almost entirely 
on agriculture.  However, with the advent of the Single Market in 
January 1993, the Community made European industry a priority and 
set out to coordinate and merge the various member state regulations 
and laws which govern its conduct.  Moreover, the EU is now trying 
to go a step further by providing national companies a means to 
incorporate on a European level.  When the Maastricht Treaty was 
ratified at the end of 1993, the authors claim the EU finally "put 
business in its rightful place, neither forgotten nor privileged." 
It made the European company one of the major components of European 
Union, either directly through social welfare decisions, the 
development of vocational training, and Community industrial policy 
or indirectly in changing the framework of economic policy to 
coordinate EU fiscal legislation in preparation for a single 
currency. (Dian I. x733-6286) 

   EUROPEAN PARLIAMENT 

   Following the ratification of the Maastricht Treaty in 1993, the 
European Parliament has increased its scope of responsibility, 
extending its ability to participate in legislative decisionmaking, 
budget control, and oversight duties--a fact European companies are 
poised to take advantage of, according to Strasbourg special 
correspondent Jacques Docquiert in the 26 January edition of LES 
ECHOS.  These companies are intensifying their lobbying efforts in 
the halls of Parliament and a representative of a large European 
company claims it is more and more often in Strasbourg, seat of the 
Parliament, that future EU regulations are made or unmade.  This 
company representative argues that for European business to ignore 
Parliament, "which is still too often the case, is to misunderstand 
the Community decisionmaking process and to deprive oneself of the 
opportunity to influence Eurodeputies, who are often more sensitive 
to the interests of public opinion than of the Eurocrats" in 
Brussels. 

   Interview With Bruno Dupont, President of Euralia 

   Bruno Dupont, CEO of small business lobbying group Euralia, notes 
that the extension of Parliamentary authority after Maastricht 
Treaty ratification included the oversight of EU industrial policy. 
He maintains that while most companies have not yet realized this, 
it is fundamental for those firms which want not only to anticipate 
regulatory changes but also to evaluate their impact on company 
plans, to make discussion with EU deputies integral to their 
interaction with the Community.  British companies have already 
largely taken into account Parliament's increased power over issues 
as sensitive as financial services, technology, and the environment. 
Dupont additionally suggests that all EU medium- and large-sized 
companies should make their views known to Parliament independently 
from their professional federations and associations, which can only 
act in consensus on issues. 

   Asked about Parliament's current priorities that affect EU 
companies, Dupont made the point that EU deputies are distributed 
among 10 policy groups and 18 permanent commissions.  The priorities 
of each deputy will depend on which group or commission he is a 
member of.  Additionally, each deputy must be accountable to his own 
member state and priorities will be influenced by the diversity of 
these representatives.  Traditionally, Dupont states, consumer 
protection and the environment have always been two permanent 
priorities of the Parliament which directly concern companies. 

   In Dupont's view, the major issue today for the Parliament which 
will affect companies is unemployment.  He sees the Parliament as 
being called on to foster an improved business climate by changing 
direct and indirect taxation, clarifying competition policy, 
providing transparency in EU legal coordination, and making such 
coordination profitable for companies.  On the other hand, the 
Parliament will be asked to integrate further small business into 
the Community by opening government markets to them and allowing 
them wider participation in EU programs. 

   THE COMMISSION 

   According to Jacques Docquiert, writing on 12 January, the 
Commission is the key institution of the European Union and has a 
long tradition of contacts with businesses.  He points out that the 
Maastricht Treaty has not changed the Commission's scope of 
authority or its relationship with professional federations.  Its 
mission under the Treaty of Rome is intact: to propose legislation 
and regulations to the Council of Ministers to provide for the 
smooth functioning and the development of Community policies.  The 
Commission is supported by a strong bureaucracy of some 16,700 
employees coming from each member state and divided into 23 General 
Directorates.  These "Eurocrats" and their institution have for some 
years been accused of usurping power, overregulating EU business, 
and "all sorts of evils" by adversaries of the Brussels technocracy. 
The reality is different, Docquiert claims.  Although the 
Commission, in addition to the 726 bills it had written since its 
inception to the end of 1990, had to submit 380 supplementary bills 
to the Council of Ministers for consideration between 1989 and 1992 
to prepare for the Single Market, it is in fact, only the Council of 
Ministers that has decisionmaking authority in 80 percent of 
Community matters.  Moreover, the Maastricht Treaty's new concept of 
subsidiarity, under which legislation is handled at the member state 
level and only reaches the Community level if it cannot be resolved, 
should put an end to this "Eurocratic regulatory bulemia," Docquiert 
claims. 

   The Commission and Business 

   "The dialogue between the Commission and the business community 
functioned well before the Maastricht Treaty," notes Riccardo 
Perissich, director general of the Industrial Affairs and Internal 
Market Directorate, the DG3, "and should continue to function 
smoothly."  However, Perissich points out that there is no model to 
follow and no single office to go to to have action taken on an 
issue.  A company representative arriving in Brussels where the 
Commission is located and can be derailed by the number of actors 
and directorates working on the same directive proposal, Perissich 
acknowledged. 

   Companies or professional groups which are just starting to lobby 
the Commission must first learn where to go and whom to approach. 
The Commission has traditionally dealt with EU federations or 
industry associations, which cooperate to defend a common position 
with varying success depending on the industry.  The chemical, 
pharmaceutical, and steel industries for example, rely on old 
traditions "perfectly broken in."  In other industries, such a 
tradition does not exist and national federations or individual 
companies must seek out Eurocrats to lobby in order to change 
opinions or push a certain agenda.  This lobbying can take three 
forms: appoint a European representative within the company, open a 
bureau in Brussels, or use a legal firm or consultants on an ad hoc 
basis.  The choice often depends on the financial means of the 
company.  Perissich contends that small and medium-sized companies 
are disadvantaged in this effort and must often rely on national 
industrial federations to plead their cases.  Docquiert notes that 
French companies have been late to open bureaus in Brussels, doing 
so only at the end of the 1980's, considerably later than their 
counterparts in Germany and in Britain. 

   Interview With Etienne Crespel, Director of the Permanent 
Representative Office of Alcatel-Alsthom 

   Etienne Crespel, head of lobbying efforts for France's 
electronics firm Alcatel-Alsthom, points out that computer and 
telecommunications manufacturers have for several years met together 
in a round table, with the approval of the Commission, to consult 
and devise strategic policies.  He refutes those who say French 
companies began lobbying "a little too late," noting that before the 
Single Market Act was signed in 1986, EU regulatory evolution was 
slow and not sufficient to closely monitor the Commission's work. 
However, with the advent of the Single Market in 1991, the pace of 
regulation and EU directives has picked up to the extent that large 
French industrial companies have decided to establish bureaus in 
Brussels. 

   THE COURT OF JUSTICE 

   Isabelle Graviere writes on 19 January that the Court of Justice, 
which was created in 1952 and oversees EU treaties and the 
harmonization of Community legislation, arbitrates disputes between 
EU companies and the Commission, a member state, or a competing 
company.  The Court meets every Tuesday, Wednesday, and Thursday to 
hear cases--on agriculture, competition, social policy, taxes, 
transportation, labor issues--many of which directly concern 
European companies. 

   The growth of the court's casework has grown parallel to that of 
the Community itself.  It has heard 7,000 cases since 1952, covering 
400 issues since 1978.  To cope with this flood of work, the Court 
asked the Council to establish an additional court, which they did 
in 1988.  The new court which aids the Court of Justice is called 
the High Court. 

   Development of the High Court 

   The High Court, which had 635 pending cases at the end of 1993, 
is also swamped, according to Graviere, and the length of 
deliberations and the difficulty of agreeing on a final opinion 
among judges of different countries, education, and languages may 
discourage companies from bringing grievances to it.  French 
companies, however, often bring cases before the High Court, 
according to the French High Court judge Jacques Biancarelli, in 
part because they have a more internationally driven corporate 
strategy than do German and British companies.  However, German 
companies traditionally have called on both the Court of Justice and 
the High Court for issues such as taxation and the free movement of 
companies. 

   The High Court is composed of 12 magistrates, each assisted by 
one public auditor (soon two).  At the Court of Justice there are 13 
judges, one per member state plus the president.  Each is assisted 
by three public auditors and by six general attorneys.  In both 
cases, the judges are named for a term of six years by common 
agreement by the member states.  These terms are renewable. 
Governmental agreement on judicial appointments, however, is no 
guarantee of ultimate judicial consensus on different issues. 
Disagreement often adds to the length of deliberations. 

   Interview With Hugues Calvet, Sales Vincent Georges &amp; Associates 

Attorney 

   Hugues Calvet, refuting Biancarelli, claims that French companies 
are not very active before the Court.  It is not that they have no 
legal differences to settle, Calvet states, but that they are 
"underdeveloped" when it comes to managing their legal affairs. 
They tend to consider being contentious as being "parasitic" and 
consequently a company legal strategy rarely exists to the extent it 
does in Anglo-Saxon countries or even in Germany and the 
Netherlands. 

   Nonetheless, the Community legal system represents a way for 
companies to obtain a fair competitive environment.  Moreover, 
Calvet notes, Court decisions which have declared French business 
regulations as incompatible with European law have produced "attacks 
of conscience" within the French Government.  One such case was when 
the Court declared France could not forbid women from working at 
night.  As a result of successfully challenging this French law, 
companies realize that at the European level they can change the 
legal framework within which they conduct business.  More often, 
however, companies are concerned with integrating Community law into 
their corporate practices in order to "avoid surprises" and 
litigation. 

   In Calvet's view, the Court is very accessible.  He points out 
that litigation before the Court is free, although the company must 
support the cost of its lawyers.  Even though the duration of legal 
procedures has lengthened over the last few years, it is comparable 
to an equivalent litigation in national courts, and perhaps less 
time-consuming.  Calvet adds that over the years, a number of 
individuals and very small companies have won their cases from the 
Court. 

   Cases Heard by the Courts 

   High Court: 

   --All cases brought against the Commission by "physical or moral 
persons (particularly companies)," with the exception of antidumping 
cases. 
   --CECA: cases brought against the Commission by virtue of the 
Community Steel and Coal Treaty. 

   Court of Justice: 

   --Antidumping cases. 
   --Cases brought because of nonobservance of Community law by 
member states. 
   --Incompetency cases: Cases brought before the Court because of 
legal omissions by Community institutions. 
   --Prejudicial dismissals: National judges, in case of doubt about 
the interpretation of Community law, can ask the Court for legal 
interpretation. 
   --Appeals: Can be brought against any decisions handed down by 
other courts. 

   EUROPEAN INVESTMENT BANK 

   Isabelle Graviere in the 2 February edition characterizes the 
European Investment Bank (EIB) as the "first among European banks." 
Indirectly for the small- and medium-size company projects, directly 
for larger ones, the EIB contributes to financing an important share 
of EU company investments.  As Europe's financial arm, the EIB is 
without doubt one of the EU institutions with the most immediate 
impact on EU companies.  This is the case, Graviere points out, 
because the EIB loaned 19.6 billion European Currency Units (ECU's) 
last year and 1.895 billion ECU's the year before for projects 
involving EU firms. 

   The EIB's mission obligates it to finance investments which help 
the Community realize its economic objectives: development or 
"reconversion" of poor regions, which applies to nearly 40 percent 
of its loans; loans to assist company competitiveness; support for 
small- and medium-sized companies; development of trans-European 
transportation, telecommunications, and energy networks; 
environmental protection and improvement of the quality of life; 
reduction of energy dependence; and the rational utilization of 
natural resources.  To do this, the EIB uses several financial 
"tools," which Graviere details below. 

   Individual Loans and Global Loans 

   The EIB directly funds up to 50 percent of the total loan 
requirement for projects costing 17 million ECU's or more.  It also 
provides lines of credit to financial organizations which in turn 
lend to small- and medium-sized businesses or to local governments. 
Such loans are under the supervision of the EIB.  Last year, 5,351 
small- and medium-sized companies and 783 public works projects 
initiated by local governments benefited from such credit for a 
total of 2.6 billion ECU's loaned at competitive rates, made 
available because the EIB takes no commission and is deemed to be a 
AAA borrower by rating agencies.  According to EIB information 
officer Henri Marty-Gauquie, France makes the most use of EIB loans. 
To date, the EIB has made loans to 2,985 small French businesses and 
480 French infrastructure projects. 

   Following the December 1992 European Council in Edinburgh, the 
EIB created an additional funding pool of 5 billion ECU's which was 
to be loaned out in 1993 and 1994.  In December 1993 the fund was 
increased to 8 billion ECU's: 7 billion are destined for financing 
investments for the trans-European transportation, 
telecommunications, and energy networks and 1 billion for small 
businesses at a preferred loan interest rate of 2 percent.  Of the 8 
billion ECU's, 4.5 billion have been disbursed.  Graviere notes that 
while politicians find this amount too small, EIB Vice President 
Alain Prate defends the sum as a significant contribution to 
investment effort. 

   Finally, the EIB is helping to establish the European Investment 
Fund (EIF).  The ElF, which was created by the Council of Edinburgh 
to guarantee infrastructure projects and small business investment, 
will be a separate entity from the EIB.  It is currently being 
ratified in Italy and in Greece and will become operational this 
summer.  A team has begun to define the EIB's priorities and its 
loan selection criteria, following methods practiced by the EIB. 

   The EIB employs 800 employees, split between a team of some 50 
engineers who study the technical feasibility of projects, a 
research department with 50 economists who verify their economic 
viability and appropriateness for EIB funding, and some 100 
financial experts in a dozen geographic teams who control the bank's 
financial arrangements. 

   Interview With Patrice Compin, Caisse Centrale des Banques 
Populaires 

   Patrice Compin, responsible for EIB relations at France's Caisse 
Centrale des Banques Populaires, states that the EIB provides his 
company an opportunity to take part in a European initiative. 
Furthermore, the EIB guarantees the Caisse the ability to diversify 
its debt structure and offers financing compatible with loans the 
Caisse offers companies.  The EIB also allows the Caisse to borrow 
at a cost 10 to 15 percent below that of the market.  Compin noted 
that 14 of 30 regional banks in his group have agreements with the 
EIB dating from 1992 which involve a total lending amount of 750 
million francs (Fr).  To date, the EIB has dispersed Fr500 million 
of that amount to finance some 986 projects. 

   Compin, in detailing the criteria for EIB financing, stated that 
the size of the company must not surpass 500 employees and those 
with less than 100 are a priority.  The cost of the project also 
must not be more than 25 million ECU's to be eligible for loans 
valued between 20,000 ECU's and 12.5 million ECU's.  Geographic 
location is also a criteria since the EIB targets certain less- 
developed regions or those in the process of converting their 
industries.  Finally, the industry is important.  Currently the EIB 
gives priority to industries which can save energy or preserve the 
environment. 

   UNICE 

   Isabelle Graviere, writing on 5 January, describes the Union of 
Industrial and Employers Confederations of Europe (UNICE) as a 
representative body for employer organizations from 22 European 
countries.  Since the Single Market was established, it has become 
an active lobbyist at the EU Commission.  With the Maastricht Treaty 
now ratified, along with its social agreement concluded by 11 of the 
12 EU member states (Britain excepted), Graviere anticipates that 
UNICE will have wider latitude to carry on a "social dialogue" with 
other EU organizations. 

   The mission of UNICE today is essentially one of communication 
and lobbying.  It must in effect inform its members of Community 
projects, laws, and directives.  It must also present employers' 
concernsto EU legislators before any definitive decision is made on 
economic, fiscal, social, or legal matters which concerns its 
members' companies or industries.  UNICE primarily lobbies the EU 
Commission but also holds discussions with the Council, the 
Parliament, and the Economic and Social Committee, which has 
codecisionmaking authority on certain issues.  UNICE also deals with 
EU institutions which are more specialized such as the Patent and 
Trademark Office. 

   Working Practices 

   Headquartered in Brussels not far from the Commission, the small 
40-odd permanent staff of UNICE organizes working meetings nearly 
daily.  Twice a year the presidents of the member federations and 
five UNICE vice presidents work out priority issues to be addressed. 
The issues are then referred to any one of five commissions- 
-economic and financial, foreign relations, social affairs, 
industrial affairs, and company affairs--which meet three times a 
year, and to more than some 50 technical groups which meet from two 
to seven times a year according to the importance of each issue. 

   The permanent representative of some employers groups, such as 
the National Confederation of French Employers (CNPF), also have 
representative offices in Brussels to lobby for large national 
industries, also participate in UNICE meetings.  Occasionally member 
states send their own specialists to participate in certain issues. 
For the past six years, UNICE has scrutinized 300 EU directives 
adopted for the Single Market, some of which are still under 
discussion.  According to the UNICE secretary general, consensus 
among the membership is generally arrived at quickly despite their 
varying interests.  More difficult is influencing EU decisionmaking. 
However, hard work pays off, Graviere notes, and cites the example 
of UNICE successfully putting all its weight behind preventing the 
adoption of a EU tax on carbonic gas. 

   To more effectively represent EU companies and to increase its 
budget, UNICE established a support committee of some 20 large EU 
companies, including IBM Europe, Unilever, Shell, British Petroleum, 
Veba, and Iveco.  No large French company is represented since the 
large computer company Bull withdrew because of budgetary problems. 
Neither are small- and medium-sized companies represented.  They are 
represented by default through their national federations.  UNICE 
meets with these federations once or twice a year. 

   Interview With CES Deputy Secretary General Jean Lapeyre 

   Deputy Secretary General of the European Confederation of Unions 
(CES) Jean Lapeyre, who points out that the Maastricht Treaty called 
for EU social partners to consult regularly, states that, 
unfortunately, dialogue has not intensified between the CES and 
UNICE since the treaty's adoption.  He adds that UNICE does not want 
to increase social dialogue with unions until the treaty is fully 
implemented.  Lapeyre stated that the CES would have liked UNICE, 
which agreed approved the text of the treaty, to have taken the 
initiative to foster such dialogue, especially on major issues such 
as vocational training.  However, Lapeyre criticizes employers for 
doing nothing and not being ready for economic crises that may 
occur. 

   While Lapeyre has not given up on UNICE, he argues that only 
through social dialogue can the EU take qualitative steps to produce 
laws which address general economic problems, a harder task than 
confronting objectionable individual company practices.  However, 
Lapeyre contends that UNICE has not supported the establishment of 
European group committees which would provide a forum for such 
social negotiation.  He concludes that only when EU employers become 
serious in proposing social dialogue and have a more constructive 
attitude will social partners find themselves around a negotiating 
table. 

   EUROPEAN SPACE AGENCY 

   Denis Fainsilber writes on 16 March that the European Space 
Agency (ESA), which was established 20 years ago and is noted for 
successfully developing the Ariane missile and for having put into 
orbit some dozen scientific probes and satellites since 1975, has an 
"industrial mission" to fulfill by providing R&amp;D opportunities to 
member state aerospace companies.  However, ESA is facing a budget 
crisis brought about by Europe's recent economic recession and has 
had to put its space ambitions on hold for the next two years as it 
tries to find a market niche between the equally tight-budgeted 
Russian and U.S. space programs.  ESA must wait to find out its 
place in the joint Russia/U.S. Columbia space platform project and 
is on "standby" status until the discussions over the project's fate 
are concluded, probably late in 1995.  ESA in the meantime is trying 
to improve its current operations by obtaining a budget based on 
ECU's by 1 January 1997.  The agency points out that each ECU 
invested in its contracts generates 3.2 ECU's for EU industries and 
that 20 percent of these benefits come directly from ESA's space 
sector.  However, ESA member states acknowledge that ESA undertook 
too many projects during the late 1980's and that in the future the 
agency must reverse this trend.  As a result, the 1994 budget, which 
is Fr16.67 billion, is 10 percent lower than 1993, after having 
increased each year prior.  It is expected to remain the same for 
the next five years. 

   Guarantee of Industrial Return 

   According to Winfried Thoma, chief of ESA contracts, the agency's 
guarantee to provide "industrial returns" on EU investment in the 
agency's projects limits the agency's freedom of action.  While the 
agency must find for each program the best cost/benefit industrial 
relationship, it must also assure each member state benefits 
equivalent to its financial contribution.  When contracts are let 
out to bid, ESA cannot allow the free market to work or else the 
large manufacturers from France, German, or Italy would consistently 
be awarded the agency's contracts, leaving the smaller EU countries 
"in the dust."  For the agency to function as an EU institution, it 
must encourage competition and allow smaller member states, which 
are dependent on EU programs, to share in the work.  For example, 
the XXM satellite and the earth stations for the Envisat satellite 
were handled this way, according to Fainsilber, who cited sources at 
ESA as confirming the program was not controlled by large 
industrialists. 

   However, it is becoming more and more difficult for smaller 
companies to compete, Fainsilber claims.  The European space 
industry is in the process of restructuring, with five of the 
largest companies--Germany's DASA, France's Aerospatiale and 
Arianespace, Italy's Matra Marconi Space and SEP--monopolizing 74 
percent of the business, compared to 57 percent in 1984.  Fainsilber 
cites industry experts as predicting that the consolidation of the 
industry will continue because of the current decrease in market 
potential. 

   Another form of ESA's "industrial return" and of subtle balance 
among member states is its 2,000 member workforce, which is 
recruited in part on criteria of nationality and national financial 
contribution.  While ESA's headquarters are in Paris, its research 
center, the European Research and Space Technology Center (ESTEC), 
is in Noordwijk in The Netherlands.  ESTEC has 1,200 employees and 
manages most of ESA's programs.  The rest of the agency is in 
Darmstadt, Germany and in Frascat, Italy. 

   Because of the constraints of balancing these "returns" among 
member states, the agency, which manages some 60 programs, has had 
trouble completing programs in a timely manner, Fainsilber claims. 
The Hermes program, for example, used up enormous sums of money and 
time but in the end was never completed and was cancelled.  The 
agency has viewed its cancellation as "therapeutic," however, and 
has since turned to space programs that are sharply less expensive 
for space transport. 

   ESA Budget Weakness 

   One of ESA's main weaknesses, according to Fainsilber, is its 
budget system, which is the reason for it trying to obtain an ECU- 
based budget by 1997.  Critics of the system, "which has poisoned 
the life of the organization for years," according to ESA Budget 
Chief Jean Vuagnat, question how the agency has held together for 20 
years.  The system converts member states' contributions in national 
currencies into a unit of account whose conversion rates are 
determined when the budget is passed.  The rate is largely 
artificial.  Two years later, the Agency retroactively adjusts the 
conversion rates with some countries receiving a credit, others a 
bill.  In the future, the ESA would like to use the ECU as the basis 
of contributions and contract prices, to correct the artificiality 
of the current system.  According to Vuagnat, after the EU currency 
crises in 1993, there are few real opponents to the change. 

   (The hard copy version of this Review includes a graph of ESA's 
1994 budget, a pie chart on how it is allocated, and a breakdown of 
member state financial contributions) 

   Interview With Marc Giget, Director General of Euroconsult 

   Euroconsult head Marc Giget contends that ESA has a significant 
role to play in relation to U.S. and Russian space programs, as well 
as an independent role in space development, and thus will continue 
to provide Europe an industrial return.  Giget notes that NASA's 
budget is 4.8 times larger that ESA's but claims the difference is 
essentially due to the absence of "autonomous access programs" for 
flights based in Europe, which are very costly and absorb the 
majority of civilian space budgets for the United States and Russia. 
In other areas such as satellites, ground observation units, and 
missiles, ESA programs are very comparable to its competitors, Giget 
claims.  Furthermore, future large infrastructure programs will be 
developed with international cooperation, in which ESA will be a 
major partner.  Neither NASA, whose budget has been reduced, nor the 
Russian RKA, in full budgetary crisis, can alone finance these 
projects, which are no longer political priorities. 

   To compete, Giget concludes that Europe's space industry must 
reorganize as did Europe's civilian aircraft industry before merging 
into Airbus Industrie.  Fainsilber points out that while NASA's 
budget is less than five times that of ESA, it has 25,000 employees 
compared to ESA's 2,000.  Nonetheless, he argues, ESA operations are 
complex, linked to its role in coordinating space policy for 13 
member states whose views are sometimes very different.  While the 
EU Commission has criticized ESA for managing this role in a 
"pragmatic" way in order to fulfill its mission of providing an 
"industrial return" for large and small companies alike, Giget notes 
that the Commission also manages its own R&amp;D programs with a 
"political return" in mind and with a "systematic salting" of 
benefits--a  more perverse system in its dilution of Single Market 
goals than ESA's.  In any event, Giget claims there is no European 
R&amp;D program that has found a better solution in the current state of 

European integration and that if change is desirable, "it is not 
necessary to throw the baby out with the bathwater," since ESA is 
one of the rare examples of real scientific and technical European 
cooperation with a world reputation. 

   CEDEFOP 

   Isabelle Graviere's article on 23 March states that the European 
Center for Development and Vocational Training (CEDEFOP) promotes 
close social welfare coordination among member states, especially in 
the domain of vocational education.  To fulfill its mission during 
its 20 years of existence, CEDEFOP has developed its research and 
information capabilities and coordinated them with European 
employers and labor unions for the EU Commission.  In fact, the 
Commission is CEDEFOP's primary consumer, ordering research from the 
organization and using it for policy decisionmaking.  The center, 
explains Ernst Piehl, its director since 1984, is at the source of 
numerous Community initiatives, such as the Erasmus European 
Exchange Program and the Regional Training and Development Program, 
which was launched by CEDEFOP before subsequently becoming the 
responsibility of the directorate for regional development and 
policy, DG16. 

   Industry Colloquiums 

   One of CEDEFOP's greatest contributions to coordinating EU social 
welfare policy is that it provides a venue where representatives of 
member state governments, the Commission, and EU labor and 
employment unions can discuss and negotiate common social policy. 
This three-party function is played out at the Administrative 
Council three times a year.  Additionally, CEDEFOP organizes 
colloquiums, both institutional and industrial, where 
representatives can meet.  A colloquium was organized for the retail 
industry three years ago, for example, which resulted in 
negotiations to coordinate and define European job skill 
descriptions.   For 1994, CEDEFOP plans to have colloquiums for the 
textile and naval construction industries.  Additionally, CEDEFOP 
organizes meetings among Community advocates of various EU programs 
such as the continuing education FORCE program or COMETT, which 
promotes links between companies and university.  Research and 
publications from CEDEFOP's work is distributed freely, such as in 
its quarterly bulletin, "CEDEFOP Flash." 

   Graviere notes that CEDEFOP has been criticized for its 
centralized study and research approach to its mission.  A recent 
audit of CEDEFOP activity recommended that CEDEFOP "mobilize the 
research centers in member states rather than endowing itself with a 
heavy research structure at the European level."  However, with its 
76-person staff and a budget limited to 12 million ECU's, the Center 
is limited.  Moreover, its imminent move to Thessalonica, Greece, 
from Berlin will have a "revolutionary" impact on the institution, 
according to Graviere, who, however, did not explain further. 

   Study Visits 

   Among the activities of CEDEFOP, study visits are one of the most 
efficient means of creating industry networks among member states 
and diffusing information.  Such visits are intended to provide 
training to EU companies in "performance systems" or new ideas, such 
as the German apprenticeship system which has been often cited 
during the current period of high EU unemployment as a good example 
of labor management.  The networks established through these study 
visits are crucial to the "real convergence" of European business 
methods, Graviere concludes. 

   Interview With Marie-Odile Paulet, UCC-CFDT Secretary General 

   Paulet contends that the tripartite nature of CEDEFOP is the 
reason the organization works so well.  As the head of a major EU 
labor union, Paulet sees CEDEFOP as having allowed the principal 
actors in vocational training to exchange ideas and decide policies 
together, facilitating the coordination and convergence of European 
union. 

   However, Paulet notes that CEDEFOP has three main weaknesses. 
First, the time it takes each of the 12 member states to 
sufficiently recognize and understand the needs of vocational 
training throughout the Community, a slow but indispensable task to 
Europeanize training.  Secondly, CEDEFOP's use of nine languages, 
which burdens its work and lengthens the time to publish study 
results.  Lastly, the change over the last 20 years which has 
required the EU to reposition the organization as the needs for 
training and EU institutions have changed. 

   In Paulet's opinion, CEDEFOP's most exemplary accomplishment is 
its documentation of different professional training systems in each 
of the 12 member states.  She characterizes such work as 
indispensable to European construction and praises CEDEFOP for the 
studies it has done on defining professional qualifications, for 
providing comparative data on most of the basic occupations within 
the EU, and its continuing work on defining job skills for new EU 
occupations.  These studies, Paulet claims, have already been used 
by labor and employer unions during industry negotiations. 

   THE DUBLIN FOUNDATION 

   In the 16 February LES ECHOS, Isabelle Graviere notes that the 
Foundation for Improvement of Living and Working Conditions--most 
often called the Dublin Foundation--is one of two EU organizations, 
the other being CEDEFOP, which allow three-party dialogue on 
subjects which concern industry productivity and labor issues.  Each 
member state is represented by officials from government, labor, and 
management.  Created in 1975 to help the Commission in research, the 
Dublin Foundation helps formulate EU policy on issues such as access 
to employment, organization of work, health and security, 
participation of employees, role of public services, and 
environmental protection.  The Foundation conducts polls, 
colloquiums, and studies on these issues, analyses the findings, and 
publishes the results.  Its conclusions, sometimes accompanied by 
recommendations, are provided to the Commission as well as member 
state governments, employers, employee organizations, and to the 
general public. 

   Recent, Current Studies 

   The Foundation's priority is to study the link between better 
work conditions and company profitability and then to influence EU 
legislation.  Below are examples of past and future Foundation 
studies: 

   * Studied construction worksites to determine the causes of 
worksite deaths.  Resulted in a Community directive on construction 
worksite safety in 1992. 

   *  Published a study on workplace stress in 1993.  Has initiated 
a study to rethink the traditional organization of companies and to 
increase the importance of training and quality of operators. 

   * Published a "Glossary of Industrial Relations" to compare 
industrial terminologies and practices in the different member 
states. 

   *  Will participate in the Community's white paper on employment. 
It will study the issues brought up by each member state about their 
employment policies. 

   * In 1994 the Dublin Foundation will conduct the second EU study 
on the work environment to verify improvements or degradations in 
work conditions in the EU. 

   *  Additional studies frequently requested by companies include 
problems with unskilled labor, lack of appropriate equipment, 
occupational rigidities, noise and air pollution, and night work. 

   Interview With Jacques Combe, CNPF Representative 

   Combe, who represents France's Confederation of French Employers 
(CNPF) at the Dublin Foundation, points out that the Foundation's 
difficulty in translating its findings into concrete actions in the 
workplace is its major weakness.  Moreover, he notes that it is 
difficult for it even to formulate recommendations if they will in 
any way constrain member states.  Combe claims this weakness is 
because the Foundation is not well known.  Unlike agencies created 
to oversee the coordination of Community regulations, such as the 
Patent Office, the Dublin Foundation is an "upstream" organization 
whose task is to define what exists and to determine what is needed 
in the EU workplace. 

   EURO STAT 

   Eurostat has seen its functions expand greatly over the last few 
years in response to the increased pace of European union, evolving 
from an in-house body concerned with gathering data on EU policies 
to the Community's premiere statistical watchdog which supplies 
companies and governments with all EU statistics, not only those 
linked closely to EC policies.  It's priority, according to Isabelle 
Graviere writing in the 9 February edition of LES ECHOS, is to 
furnish its consumers with all statistical information useful to 
analyze and make decisions.  A "satellite" General Directorate under 
the Commission, Eurostat has developed its analytical tools over the 
last few years to include Community industrial activity.  It has 
reformed its methods, increased its investment in people, and 
expanded its cooperation with professional organizations.  It will 
soon add new fields to its repertoire, including providing 
statistics for service industries, construction and public works, 
and small businesses. 

   Eurostat, located in Luxembourg, has six departments, five of 
which are "operational" and are organized around economic activity 
sectors: economic and monetary convergence, foreign and inter- 
Community trade, companies and energy, social and regional 
statistics, and agriculture, fishing, and the environment.  Eurostat 
coordinates and cooperates with other Commission directorates, 
Community organizations, and with EU companies and professional 
organizations to determine their statistical needs.  It holds an 
annual meeting with the 12 representatives of national statistical 
organizations to coordinate policy and it is developing a dialogue 
for this purpose with EU companies. 

   Expansion has brought some problems to Eurostat.  It has gone 
from 12 to 18 members, including those countries in the European 
Economic Area, and is developing an interest in East Europe.  This 
geographic enlargement, according to Yves Franchet, Eurostat 
director since 1987, has raised the question as to whether Eurostat 
should be more independent as well as whether it should do more to 
apply the principle of subsidiarity, contracting work to national 
organizations. 

   Some economic sectors remain less covered than others. 
Manufacturing (where a majority of large companies are concentrated 
which are easiest to gather data on) has seen real progress, 
Graviere writes.  This is not the case with services, construction 
and public works, and small businesses.  However, when the Community 
adopts the Special Nomenclature of Activities of the European 
Communities (NACE) and establishes company catalogs which contain 
polling information, Eurostat will then be able to increase its 
reporting in these sectors. 

   Interview With Yvonick Renard, CNPF Statistical Study Group Head 

   Renard remarked that, unfortunately, little of the data from 
Eurostat is usable in industrial matters, principally for reasons of 
detail and timeliness.  While the economic polls Eurostat conducts 
with company panels for the Economic and Financial Affairs 
Directorate, DGII, are certainly useful, Renard points out that they 
lack a common statistical reference base and therefore lose a large 
part of their viability. 
   Renard notes that Eurostat underwent a "quiet revolution" when it 
changed the EU's official list of products and businesses to comply 
with consolidated customs offices' lists, or Intrastat lists, in 
January 1993.  This change has affected the statistical management 
of companies, Renard claims.  It allowed economic information to be 
much more comparable than in the past.  However, the operational use 
of these Intrastat lists is weak and needs to be quickly improved in 
such areas as orders, investments, cost of production, and cost of 
employment. 

   Equally positive, according to Renard, is the increased 
cooperation among EU statistical organizations and EU professional 
organizations.  The latter, both on the EU and the national levels, 
constitutes a very dense network of industrial data.  Within the 
framework of the DEBA group, established to promote cooperation 
among EU professional organizations, this data is synthesized in up- 
to-date economic studies and reports on the Single Market and shared 
with the public. 

   Renard concludes that the importance of viable Community data for 
all the member states was evident when the Maastricht Treaty was 
negotiated.  However, the data should not be at the exclusive use of 
the Community and its dialogue with professional groups should be 
increased, he argues.  Technically, coordinating statistics 
throughout the Community remains difficult as witnessed in the 
reticence of certain member states to establish a common 
classification of company activities. 

   Eurostat Publication 

   Eurostat publications are listed in "Catalogue Eurostat - 
Publications and Electronic Services" under nine principal themes. 
Below are six of the themes most relevant to businesses: 

   General Statistics:  The most popular in this group is "Europe in 
Numbers" and "Basis Community Statistics," in which data is compared 
to Europe's major economic partners. 

   Economy and Finance: Eurostat publishes country statistics, such 
as on the Russian economy, and sector analyses, such as on consumer 
prices in the EU. 

   Population and Social Conditions: Consists of statistical data on 
unemployment. 

   Energy and Industry: These publications have the largest 
audience, especially the one entitled "Panorama of Community 
Industry," which is published every two months in coordination with 
the DG3. 

   Foreign Trade and Balance of Payments: Consists of a monthly 
publication. 

   Services and Transportation: Among its works is "Retail Trade in 
the Single Market in 1993." 

ELAG/02 MAY/ECONF/WED/GSP 02/1938z MAY 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47603 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000025194001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   4 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-03MAY94-EGYPT 
<H3> <TI>      Government Combating Extremism on the Cultural Front </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Government Combating Extremism on the Cultural Front </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                              The Mubarak regime has launched an unprecedented proactive 
campaign against extremist groups in government-controlled 
television and the semi-independent film industry by airing and 
encouraging productions--including a TV serial, an interview 
with a ''repentant'' extremist and a movie starring a popular 
Egyptian actor--that openly address the issue of Islamic 
militancy.  Editors and columnists of the government-owned news 
media have effectively built on the campaign by lavishly 
praising the government's efforts and calling for more, while 
Islamist opposition writers have predictably expressed cynicism 
over the productions.  The campaign's success has been somewhat 
undermined by al-Azhar's strong criticism of the TV serial's 
handling of an otherwise arcane issue of religious doctrine- 
-criticism that appears to have been intended in part to win the 
institution greater censorship authority over artistic 
productions. 
                        END SUMMARY 
   Government Press Lends Support to "The Family" 
   Cairo's pro-government press offered strong support for the 
government effort through its strong expressions of approval of 
"The Family" and published little negative commentary.  The 12 
March issue of the government-owned weekly Akhbar Al-Yawm 
conducted a "man-on-the-street" survey to assess reaction to 
"The Family."  The article claimed that the series caused "a 
tremendous uproar" among Egyptians who identify and sympathize 
with the central character's efforts to protect his family from 
extremist influence.  Mothers, professionals, and retired civil 
and military workers expressed "shock," the paper maintained, at 
the series' portrayal of extremist recruitment and operational 
activities, and demanded more air time for similar programming. 
One mother from Upper Egypt, for example, was quoted by Akhbar 
Al-Yawm as lamenting that "The dangers shown by 'The Family' 
still surround us in the real world."  She stressed that mothers 
"live in utter fear for their children who are at the vulnerable 
primary and secondary school years.  After they are pulled into 
following the extremist groups, hundreds of them live in 
numerous mosques pretending to be devout Muslims, having left 
school and home.  No one knows what happens to them after that!" 
Also interviewed was Major General Sa'd al-Jayyar, former head 
of the Police Narcotics Department, who said that with the 
'shocking TV showing of loathesome extremist ideas on 'The 
Family'" he felt "for the first time that all of Egypt will 
confront terrorism." 
   Clerics Criticize Program 
   Islamic leaders, both establishment and opposition, took 
Egyptian TV to task for allowing actors instead of Islamic 
scholars to deal with religious issues.  Traditionally sensitive 
to the public release of any Islamic ideas without its blessing, 
the al-Azhar establishment followed up its complaints by 
repeating persistent demands on the government for a greater 
role in sanctioning Islamic-oriented programming.  Muhammad al- 
Ghazali, an independent shaykh who has at times supported and at 
times undermined government efforts against extremism (see note 
1) simply deemed television drama a non-venue for an anti- 
terrorism campaign.  He stressed in the anti-government biweekly 
Al-Sha'b, organ of the Socialist Labor Party and principal 
mouthpiece for its ally the Muslim Brotherhood, that "if the 
culture of some religious people is faulty,  it is established 
scholars, and not farcical artists, who can correct it"  (5 
April). 
   (Note 1)  Al-Ghazali, who has at times joined in government 
efforts to preach Islamic moderation, sent shockwaves through 
Egypt last June when in court testimony he appeared to justify 
the killing of secularist writer Faraj Fudah by implying that 
Islamic law prescribes no punishment for an individual who kills 
an apostate (Al-Jumhuriyah, 23 June 1993). 
   According to Akhbar Al-Yawm, many Egyptian clerics were abroad 
"directing missionary activities" for Ramadan and, therefore, 
did not watch the series (12 March).  Al-Azhar officials 
nonetheless voiced strong theological objection to one episode's 
treatment of the Islamic concept of "torture in purgatory" 
['Adhab al-Qabr].  Mufti of Egypt Shaykh Muhammad Sayyid 
Tantawi, who was in Egypt during the program's airing but said 
he had not watched it, told Akhbar Al-Yawm that he "received 
thousands of phone calls and letters at his home and office from 
people complaining that the series causes them to doubt their 
religious beliefs" and "mocks and denies the existence of 
torture in purgatory."  Supporting al-Azhar's denouncement of 
"The Family," he added, "I believe religious doctrinal issues 
must not be shown on television."  When asked why he did not 
watch the series to verify the complaints he had received, the 
mufti responded, "Unfortunately I do not have free time to watch 
TV but I will try to watch in order to form an opinion." 
   The debate between al-Azhar officials and the Ministry of 
Information over treatment of Islamic issues on television 
continued in late March.  In a 19 March interview with weekly TV 
magazine Al-Idha'ah Wa Al-Tilifisiyun, Information Minister al- 
Sharif said in defense of "The Family": "Egyptian media have 
bravely probed various problems through their presentation of 
the extremism issue.  'The Family' is not a religious series but 
a social one which treats many different issues and problems." 
He emphasized, "The only goal of 'The Family' was to deal with 
issues through a multi-faceted approach." 
   However, al-Azhar rector Jad al-Haqq 'Ali Jad al-Haqq announced 
that "al-Azhar is officially responsible for reviewing TV 
scripts whose episodes discuss religious affairs" (Al-Siyasi Al- 
Misri, 20 March).  Jad al-Haqq stressed that al-Azhar is 
protesting that "television broadcasted episodes of 'The Family' 
without its review," particularly in the case of the "torture in 
purgatory" episode.  Al-Siyasi Al-Misri also reported that some 
telephonic wrangling subsequently occurred between the al-Azhar 
shaykh and information minister over the shaykh's demands for 
script review and editorial privileges for religious-oriented 
texts before and during productions, as well as an al-Azhar- 
approved revision to the final episode of "The Family" to 
"change people's understanding of the 'torture in purgatory' 
concept."  Although maintaining his earlier defense of the 
program, Information Minister al-Sharif acquiesced to Jad-al- 
Haqq's demands and revised the final episode of the program. 
   Several columnists in the government-owned press, all of whom 
praised "The Family" for its handling of extremism, took issue 
with al-Azhar clerics for their "unwarranted" preoccupation with 
this seemingly minor theological detail in view of "The 
Family"'s greater goal.  For example, Al-Ahram columnist Salamah 
Ahmad Salamah, who has at times criticized the government for 
its handling of Islamic extremism (see note 2), addressed the 
controversial discussion of "torture in purgatory" between "The 
Family"'s main character and a young boy, asking, "In view of 
the real problems and concerns which the Islamic World faces, 
couldn't the questions in this dialogue have passed unnoticed?" 
(Al-Ahram, 13 March).  Al-Jumhuriyah's chairman of the board 
Samir Rajab criticized the program's detractors, writing on 14 
March, "They have found in the series an opportunity to strike 
at future TV productions instead of commending television for 
making superior achievements." 
   (Note 2) For example, Salamah criticized the government early on 
in the current wave of Islamic violence for blaming Islamic 
extremism entirely on outside sources and ignoring the internal 
societal and economic roots of the problem (Al-Ahram, 3O June 
1992). 
   Television Interview 
   In addition to "The Family," Egyptian television aired in Egypt 
and regionally via satellite on 27 March an interview with 'Adil 
'Abd-al-Baqi, a defector from the Islamic extremist group al- 
Shawqiyun.  Several prominent Al-Ahram columnists praised 'Abd- 
al-Baqi's detailed account of the group's philosophy, 
recruitment practices, and criminal misdeeds as a "coup" for the 
Egyptian media war on extremism.  Al-Ahram editor-in-chief 
Ibrahim Nafi' described the televised interview as "a success" 
which "probably enjoyed the highest viewership in recent years" 
(1 April).  Nafi' thanked and praised Egyptian TV for taking 
this "wise step . . . without attempting to steer 'Abd-al-Baqi 
toward denouncing this way of thinking and these crimes, relying 
instead on his earnest desire to atone for his former role with 
these groups."  In Al-Ahram of 4 April, Salamah Ahmad Salamah 
described the interview as "perhaps the first time that TV has 
dared to put a personality like this in a question-and-answer 
setting before millions of eyes."  The columnist deemed the 
interview a success "in giving broad graphic insight to viewers 
who base their attitudes about terrorism on what goes on in dark 
corridors,"  adding, "This interview is an example of what 
'intelligent media' can do to expose some of these misguided 
people."  Columnist Salah Muntasir on 6 April countered the 
anti-government biweekly Al-Sha'b's claims that 'Abd-al-Baqi was 
a government spy (Al-Sha'b, 1 April), suggesting that Al-Sha'b's 
condemnation of the terrorist's defection but not his story 
lends credence to the visual images of extremism he conveyed in 
the interview:  "'Adil 'Abd-al-Baqi may be an agent for the 
authorities, but does this deny the ugly picture of extremist 
groups which he has drawn?" 
   Film Angers Militants 
   Finally, a newly released film, "The Terrorist," is a 
controversial portrayal of the violent life of an extremist, 
played by popular Egyptian actor 'Adil Imam, who ultimately 
renounces militancy.  The film has thus far provoked commotion 
at the nine heavily guarded movie theaters where it is being 
shown.  Scriptwriter Lenin al-Ramli in an 8 April interview with 
weekly magazine Al-Musawwar claimed that the movie is not about 
terrorism, nor is it a "propaganda film to mobilize people 
against terrorism."  Nonetheless, various press reports indicate 
that the movie has angered Islamic militant groups.  Several 
papers reported the arrest of terrorists heading for Cairo to 
blow up several theaters showing the movie (Al-Akhbar and Al- 
Wafd, 18 March; Al-Ahrar, 21 March).  The Arabic London-based 
daily Al-Hayah on 26 March reported from "a security source" 
that at the Normandy Theater "a dispute broke out between some 
moviegoers and security guards," ending in "the two sides 
clashing" and "one guard wounded." 
   Implications 
   The recent productions dealing with Islamic extremism represent 
a clear milestone in the government's attempt to use the media 
against the militants.  While the government will probably make 
good on Interior Minister al-Alfi's promises to forge ahead on 
the media battleground, the effectiveness of its campaign will 
largely be determined by how honestly it confronts the broader 
issues surrounding extremism--including its societal and 
economic roots and the government's past mistakes in addressing 
the problem--and how much credibility any future productions are 
likely to enjoy.  As it has previously done, the government will 
likely further appease al-Azhar clerics by allowing them to 
review future programs that address religious issues, but only 
to the extent that anti-terrorism campaign objectives are still 
achieved. 
   (AUTHOR:  SARTOR.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
AFRICA/LEVANT BRANCH, (703) 733-6408) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/ta 03/1424z may 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47604 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000025294001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   5 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
VIENNA PLEASE PASS TO STEVE FLEISCHMANN 
WARNING: DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-04APR94-DPRK-IAEA 
<H3> <TI>      Pyongyang Threatens to Refuel Reactor Without IAEA Presence </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Pyongyang Threatens to Refuel Reactor Without IAEA Presence </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                              Seeking to pressure the International Atomic Energy Agency (IAEA) 
into accepting limited inspection of upcoming refueling 
activities at Yongbyon, Pyongyang has threatened to proceed with 
the replacement of  fuel rods for its 5-megawatt reactor without 
an international presence.  At the same time, Pyongyang seemed to 
be hinting at the possibility of some sort of compromise with the 
IAEA. 
                         END SUMMARY 
   Pyongyang used the authoritative vehicle of a Foreign Ministry 
spokesman's statement on 4 May to reiterate the position laid out 
on 27 April that the IAEA will be permitted only to verify non- 
diversion of spent fuel so as to ensure the continuity of nuclear 
safeguards (Pyongyang radio, 4 May).  Claiming that for 
unspecified "technical and security" reasons the refueling of the 
reactor can "no longer" be delayed, the statement warned that 
unless the IAEA accepts Pyongyang's terms for inspection, North 
Korea will have "no alternative" but to proceed with the 
refueling "according to [its own] operational plan."  Clearly 
seeking to prevent the matter from being referred to the UN 
Security Council, the statement maintained that even without the 
presence of IAEA inspectors on the spot, the refueling activities 
will technically be conducted "under thorough IAEA surveillance," 
since IAEA-installed monitoring devices and equipment will still 
be operating to monitor the refueling. 
   Possible Compromise     Although couched in its standard self- 
righteous tones, Pyongyang's latest pronouncement on the 
limitations of IAEA activities appeared designed to leave North 
Korea some maneuvering room to avoid a showdown with the agency. 
While the statement complained that the IAEA is demanding the 
"selective preservation and measurement" of spent fuel rods after 
they are replaced, it seemed to focus its objection on the 
measurement portion of the IAEA's demand, saying that "selective 
measurement" cannot be allowed.  By avoiding an explicit 
prohibition on "selective preservation" of fuel rods, Pyongyang 
may be leaving the door open to allowing segregation of sample 
rods for later measurement--a formulation that could prevent the 
issue from being referred to the Security Council.  In fact, the 
statement went on to suggest that such measurement would be 
possible once the IAEA discards its "unfair attitude" toward the 
DPRK and as part of a "package deal" to be worked out at future 
DPRK-U.S. high-level talks. 
   Further seeking to project an image of reasonableness, the 
spokesman's statement claimed that North Korea had already 
acceded to IAEA demands for additional inspections of the 
Yongbyon reprocessing plant following the incomplete IAEA 
inspection last March, but that the agency has so far failed to 
send inspectors for this purpose.  Pyongyang had previously 
claimed only that it was "studying" the IAEA demands on this 
matter. 
   Implications     Pyongyang's latest authoritative pronouncement 
on the refueling issue suggests that the North Korean leadership 
is once again testing the limits of its strategy of minimalist 
accommodation in resolving the nuclear issue. 
   (AUTHOR:  YIM.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6534.) 
EAG/HEBBEL/PF 04/2244z May 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47605 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000025394001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   5 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS--04MAY94-Japan 
<H3> <TI>      Automakers Seek Cheaper Steel Supplies </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Automakers Seek Cheaper Steel Supplies </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Japan's      prolonged economic slump may be playing a role in 
changing archetypical Japanese business practices such as 
maintaining long-term supplier-buyer relationships between 
materials producers and manufacturers.  Recent Japanese press 
reports suggest that a number of Japanese automakers have decided 
to emphasize economic rationality over stable business 
relationships with Japanese steelmakers.  Reflecting this trend, 
the 21 April Nikkei Sangyo Shimbun quoted Mitsubishi Motors 
executives as stating that from now on they would buy steel from 
"any domestic or foreign supplier that can supply appropriate 
quality steel at a lower price."  A day earlier, Nihon Keizai 
Shimbun reported that Mitsubishi Motors estimated that it could 
cut total car production costs by at least 10 percent if it used 
South Korean steel.  The paper also reported that Mitsubishi 
Motors has for the first time begun testing the quality of cold 
rolled steel sheet made by South Korea's Pohang Iron and Steel 
Company for use in its cars.  The paper also noted that all 
Japanese automakers except Toyota are discreetly considering the 
use of South Korean steel to cut costs. 
   (AUTHOR:  INNES.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6534.) 
EAG/HEBBEL/PF 04/2249z May 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47606 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000025494001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   5 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-06MAY94-JAPAN-U.S. 
<H3> <TI>      Agriculture Ministry Moves To Limit Rice Imports </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Agriculture Ministry Moves To Limit Rice Imports </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                               In an apparent effort to limit the amount of rice imported into 
Japan and keep rice prices high, Japan's Ministry of Agriculture, 
Forestry and Fisheries (MAFF) seems to be taking steps to 
restrict competition in the country's rice trade, including 
limiting the number of companies that can trade in imported rice 
and cracking down on growing imports of rice through the 
international mail.  MAFF may try to use similar tactics to limit 
rice imports after Japan formally opens its rice market in 1995. 
                          END SUMMARY 
   Recent Japanese press reports suggest that MAFF is attempting to 
restrict both competition in the rice trade and the quantity of 
rice that will be imported into Japan after the country opens its 
rice market by allowing only a limited number of companies to 
handle imported rice.  According to the 25 April Asahi Shimbun 
and the 26 April editions of Nihon Keizai Shimbun and Yomiuri 
Shimbun, MAFF's Food Agency rejected the applications of all of 
the more than ten new companies that applied to handle imported 
rice in Japanese fiscal year 1994.  This decision leaves the 
importation of rice in the hands of 20 companies that have been 
registered to handle emergency imports or restricted imports for 
special purposes in the past, Asahi Shimbun and Nihon Keizai 
Shimbun reported. 
   Judging from press reporting, MAFF may have deliberately excluded 
the new companies by setting vague or arbitrary requirements for 
handling rice imports that they could not meet.  The 26 April 
Nihon Keizai Shimbun quoted Kyuzo Saito, the chief of the Food 
Agency's Import Division, as saying that none of the firms met 
the standards for "experience and credibility" set by the agency 
for importers.  Among these standards, according to Nihon Keizai 
Shimbun, are requirements that a company be capitalized at over 
100 million yen and have an unspecified amount of "experience" in 
the rice trade.  In addition,  Nihon Keizai Shimbun reported that 
some firms claimed not even to have known that the Food Agency 
was accepting applications for additional government-approved 
rice importers. 
   MAFF may also try to limit rice imports and maintain high rice 
prices by cracking down on the reportedly booming imports of rice 
through the international postal service.  According to the 26 
April Nihon Keizai Shimbun, Japanese consumers have been 
increasingly taking advantage of a loophole in Japan's food 
control regulations that allows individuals to import up to 100 
kilograms of rice a year through the mail.  The major attraction 
of this arrangement, judging from various press reports, is that 
rice purchased through such channels is significantly cheaper 
than rice available on the domestic market.  According to the 26 
April Nihon Keizai Shimbun, Chinese rice imported by mail through 
one consumer cooperative cost 3,500 yen per 10 kilograms, 
including postage and taxes.  By contrast, according to a 27 
April Kyodo report, the average price of top-quality domestic 
rice was 6,365 yen per 10 kilograms in February, while Chinese 
and California rice imported through regular channels cost 
between 4,100 and 4,300 yen per 10 kilograms in March. 
   Suggesting that MAFF may crack down on such ventures, the 26 
April Nihon Keizai Shimbun reported that the ministry's Food 
Agency has  described the increasing import of rice through the 
mail as "problematic."  The paper speculated that questions might 
be raised about the lack of health inspections on rice imported 
through the postal system and about the possibility that such 
rice might be contaminated by excessive pesticides or mold- 
-arguments that MAFF has used to bar imports of other items, such 
as U.S. apples, in the past. 
   Outlook 
   MAFF's efforts to restrict competition in the rice trade may help 
to keep the price of imported rice on the Japanese market 
relatively high, thus limiting its appeal to Japanese consumers 
and keeping high-cost Japanese rice growers in business.  MAFF 
may attempt to use similar tactics to limit imports starting in 
1995, when Japan is scheduled to partially open its rice market 
as part of an agreement reached in the recently-concluded Uruguay 
Round of international trade talks. 
   (AUTHOR:  BOUNDS.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703)-733-6534.) 
EAG/HEBBEL/PF 04/2314z May 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47607 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000025594001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   5 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-062--Mongolia 
<H3> <TI>      MONGOLIA:  KEY APPOINTMENTS, No 3, 1994 </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       MONGOLIA:  KEY APPOINTMENTS, No 3, 1994 </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
This      FMN reports the names of one newly appointed ambassador, 
three appointees to key government positions, two judges and two 
officials released from their positions, and the signatory of an 
agreement to be concluded with the UN. 

   P.  Ochirbat, President of Mongolia, appointed Terbishiyn 
Chimiddorj Mongolian ambassador extraordinary and plenipotentiary to 
India.  (Ulaanbaatar ARDYN ERH in Mongolian 8 Feb 94 p 1) 

   Based on the recommendation of the General Council of the Court, 
the President relieved T. Dash and A. Dulmaa from their positions as 
judges of the Dzabhan Aymag District People's Court.  (ARDYN ERH 26 
Mar 94 p 1) 

   Due to the modifications in government structure and organization 
the Government took the following personnel actions: 

   A.  At its 4 February meeting, relieved T. Galdan of his 
responsibilities as first deputy director of MONTSAME and T. Abirmed 
as MONTSAME deputy director; appointed N. Tumendelger MONTSAME 
deputy director and editor-in-chief; and authorized First Deputy 
Minister of Foreign Relations J. Choynhor to sign the new Children's 
Fund Agreement with the UN  (ARDYN ERH 8 Feb 94 p 2); and 

   B.  In March in compliance with the Law On the Leadership, 
Structure, and Organization of the Government appointed B. Tsend- 
Ayuush director of the Mongolian State Statistical Office and B. 
Batmonh deputy chairman.  (ARDYN ERH 26 Feb 94 p 2) 

(AUTHOR:  MIAB/CISD.  OUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
MILITARY/INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS BRANCH, CIS DIVISION (703) 733-6375.) 
ENEAG/O4 MAY/POLCHF/CIS DIVISION/PF 04/2323z May 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47608 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000025694001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   5 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-4MAY94-CHINA 
<H3> <TI>      Beijing Announces Establishment of New Policy Banks </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Beijing Announces Establishment of New Policy Banks </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                                China's leadership is moving ahead with its strategy of creating 
"policy banks," recently establishing a State Development Bank 
and an Import and Export Bank as the first step in implementing 
banking reforms endorsed at the Third Plenum of the 14th Central 
Committee last fall.  Although PRC media reports of the change 
have emphasized the use of bond issues to fund the State 
Development Bank, the leadership nevertheless appears not to have 
departed far from traditional financial practices in setting up 
the banks.  PRC media, however, have failed to signal movement on 
another goal of banking reform, the transformation of state-owned 
specialized banks into market-oriented "commercial" lending 
institutions. 
                           END SUMMARY 
   A Xinhua report of 13 April announced the establishment that day 
of the State Development Bank, describing it as a "policy- 
oriented" financial institution directly under the State Council. 
Consistent with previous media reporting on the purpose of the 
bank, the report said it will be responsible for the "overall 
regulation and control" of investment funds for "key state 
projects" and was established to "further deepen" reform of the 
investment system.  On the 28th, Xinhua reported that a second 
policy bank--the Import and Export Bank of China--had been 
established on 27 April and claimed that the establishment of the 
bank was a "clear gesture" by the government to give "strong 
support" to foreign trade, in particular financing the "import 
and export of capital goods." 
   First Step in Reform 
   The creation of the two policy banks indicates that Beijing is 
moving ahead on the banking reforms approved by the Third Plenum 
of the 14th Central Committee last fall that called for 
separating more traditional "policy banks" from market-oriented 
"commercial banks."  As envisioned by the plenum, commercial 
banks were to serve as the core of a risk-based investment 
system, granting loans on the basis of market assessments of 
project viability, while policy banks were to ensure funding for 
less profitable infrastructure projects deemed necessary by the 
state (Xinhua, 16 November 1993). 
   Beijing's decision to move ahead first with the establishment of 
the State Development Bank appears to reflect in part the 
leadership's determination to impose central control over the 
unbridled investment that has resulted from senior leader Deng 
Xiaoping's fast growth policies and that the media have blamed 
for inflationary pressure and economic overheating.  For example, 
the 13 April Xinhua report stated that, among the bank's other 
duties, it will "control and regulate" fixed asset investment and 
create a "responsible system" in the socialist market economy to 
"rein in excessive investment."  Similarly, Premier Li Peng had 
linked the bank to what he said was the pressing need for 
regulation of investment in his Government Work Report to the 
National People's Congress on 10 March.  He stated that the 
reform of the investment system this year "mainly involves" the 
State Development Bank, which will "check inflation and 
investment expansion" through the "balancing of capital" (Xinhua, 
23 March). 
   Mixed Financing 
   Although Chinese media have reported that the new policy banks 
will raise capital both through direct state funding and the sale 
of bonds--an approach consistent with the reform postulates of 
the authoritative "decision" of the Third Plenum--they have 
attempted to give the impression that the issue of market-based 
bonds will be the major source of financing.  For example, the 28 
April Xinhua report declared that the sale of 20 billion yuan 
worth of bonds issued by the State Development Bank was a 
"success" and quoted bank president Yao Zhengyan as saying that a 
total of 65 billion yuan worth of three-year and five-year bonds 
will be issued this year. 
   Despite efforts to emphasize reliance on this market-based 
approach to capital accumulation, PRC media have hinted that the 
purchase of the bonds by major state-owned financial institutions 
may not have been voluntary and that the leadership will continue 
to rely heavily on direct transfers from the state treasury to 
subsidize the development of the bank's operations.  The 28 April 
Xinhua report, for example, quoted Yao as stating that the bonds 
will be purchased by state commercial banks and non-bank 
financial institutions "under quotas" set by the central bank. 
In addition, it noted that the treasury had issued a one billion 
yuan grant to the State Development Bank to subsidize the low- 
interest loans it had already extended to state projects. 
Similarly, Beijing's English-language paper China Daily reported 
that the "national treasury" had promised 50 billion yuan of 
registered capital to the State Development Bank "over the next 
four years" (24-30 April).  Further demonstrating the new policy 
banks' dependence upon state appropriations, a 27 April Xinhua 
report said that the Import and Export Bank will depend upon 
"state financial appropriations" for its capital needs, issuing 
bonds only to "raise enough money" for the bank's "daily 
operations." 
   Delays for Commercial Banks 
   Despite these initial changes in the banking system, Chinese 
media have not been observed to report that the leadership is 
moving forward in remolding China's four "specialized" state 
banks into commercial banks along Western lines--the heart of the 
reformers' efforts to establish a risk-based investment system 
based on market principles.  The China Daily report, for example, 
referred to such specialized state banks as the Bank of China, 
the Agriculture Bank, the Construction Bank, and the Industrial 
and Commercial Bank as purchasers of State Development Bank bonds 
but gave no indication that their status has been changed.  The 
lack of progress in reforming these banks may reflect their heavy 
debt burden.  In a speech at a national financial work conference 
in January, Politburo Standing Committee member and central bank 
chief Zhu Rongji had hinted that the specialized banks' bad loans 
to unprofitable state enterprises had delayed this reform.  Zhu 
declared that specialized banks can only "begin their transition" 
toward commercial banks "once their policy-oriented businesses 
are divested" (Xinhua, 19 January). 
   Implications 
   Although Beijing has made a modest beginning in implementing 
plenum-endorsed banking reforms designed to move China closer to 
a market economy, the establishment of the two new policy banks 
appears designed as much to strengthen central control over 
investment through the traditional direct channeling of treasury 
funds as to allocate investment capital through market-based 
incentives.  Possibly fearful of exacerbating current 
inflationary pressures, the leadership appears to have put the 
more risky banking reforms--the establishment of a market-driven 
commercial banking sector--on hold. 
   (AUTHOR:  VOSS.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
CHINA ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6097.) 
EAG/HEBBEL/PF 04/2339z May 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47609 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000025794001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   5 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY-FBPSP 94-09-ASIA 
<H3> <TI>      PACIFIC RIM ECONOMIC REVIEW -- 4 MAY 1994 </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       PACIFIC RIM ECONOMIC REVIEW -- 4 MAY 1994 </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
Table      of Contents 

   JAPAN:  Economic Trends - Japanese Manufacturers React to Higher 
Prices of Imported Pulp 

   Financial Issues - Securities Industry, MOF Encouraging Asian 
Equity Investment; Nippon Trust Bank:  Introducing New Type of 
Financial Restructuring; FTC To Promulgate Stockholding Guidelines 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - CHINA:  Iwatani International To 
Expand Industrial Gas Production Network; Mikuni, NORINCO Subsidiary 
Establish Motorcycle Carburetor Company 

   VIETNAM:  Keidanren Group Attends Joint Economic Conference; NEC 
To Build Communications System Linking Four Airports 

   Japan-U.S. Trade Issues - Draft of MITI Report on Unfair Foreign 
Trade Practices Revealed; BOJ Governor Mieno's Concern Over 
'Positive' Macroeconomic Policies; Matsunaga Recommends Government 
Change Tactics in Trade Talks 

   Machine Tools/Robotics - FEATURE:  JMTBA Creates New Machine Tool 
Market Forecast Model; Toyo Seimitsu Entering Korean Gear-Cutting- 
Machine Market 

   Semiconductors/Computers/Electronics - FEATURE:  Nikon, Canon 
Dominate World Stepper Market; NEC, Fujitsu To Build Supercomputers 
With CMOS Processors; Cray Research Japan Sells Mini-Supercomputers; 
Hitachi To Market Massively Parallel Processing Supercomputer 

   CHINA:  Domestic Developments - New Regulations Issued on Rural 
Enterprise Income Tax; Sichuan To Focus on Developing Products 
Promising Quick Results; Electronics Industry Output Up 35.4 Percent 
in First Quarter 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - Hong Kong Exports, Re-exports Said 
To Reflect Mainland Economic Slowdown; Hong Kong Firms See 
Opportunity in PRC Funding Cutback; China Credit Squeeze Causes Hong 
Kong Firm To Scale Back, Shift Investment; Hong Kong Executive Sees 
Limited Impact of PRC Land Tax; Guangzhou Closes loo Foreign- 
Invested Firms Breaking Contracts; Fujian Initiates Inspection of 
Foreign-Funded Firms' Contracts; Canadian Telecom Firm Launches 
Five-Year, $130-Million Program; Heilongjiang Imports Tire 
Production Line From Italy; Shandong's Yantai City Reports Foreign 
Investment Projects; Heilongjiang, ROK Jointly Invest in Sanjiang 
Plain; Beijing-Japanese Electronics Joint Venture Established; 
Shenzhen Stock Exchange Now Open to Individual Japanese Investors; 
Malaysian, Singapore Firms Invest in Xiamen Steel Company; Malaysian 
Company, Guangdong Sign Expressway Construction Contract; Swiss 
Pesticide Company Invests in Qingdao Farm Chemicals Joint Venture; 
Taiwan Industrial Village Established in Haikou Development Zone; 
Industrial and Commercial Bank of China Sets Up Branch in Alma Ata; 
Beijing Reports Quarterly Statistics on Foreign-Invested 
Enterprises; Fujian Encourages Foreign Businesses To Develop Power 
Projects; Guangdong First-Quarter Industrial Output Increases 21.08 
Percent; PLA-Run Enterprises in Shenzhen Make Profits; Nearly 10,000 
Foreign-Funded Enterprises Operating in Shenzhen; Guilin Liangjiang 
Airport Listed as National Key Project; First Privately Operated 
Airport Begins Operation in Hainan; Hunan To Import 110,000-Set 
Program-Controlled Switchboards; Shanghai Exports Increase 22 
Percent in First Quarter; Jiangsu County Promotes Investment From 
Hong Kong; Hong Kong Bank Shifting Data Processing to Guangdong; 
Hong Kong Manufacturing Sector Continues To Shrink 

   Taiwan:  Cross-Strait Trade Slows in Wake of Boat Incident; 
Budget Frozen for Third Phase of Six-Year Plan Transportation 
Projects; Low Growth of First Quarter Exports 'Surprises' Economic 
Council 

   NORTH KOREA:  Mt. Paektu Development Plan Experiences 
Difficulties 

   SOUTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  Cooperation Between Rival Enterprises 
Booming; FEATURE:  KAERI Head Calls For Restructuring ROK's Nuclear 
Industry; KIST Develops Super-Smooth Automated Metal Grinder; 
Corporate Technical Colleges 'Rapidly Increasing'; ROK Chip Makers 
Shifting R&amp;D to Non-Memory Devices; ROK Government Body Facilitating 

Transfer of Advanced U.S. Technology; KTB, SSTC Set Up Joint-Venture 
Consulting Firm in Beijing; Samsung Aerospace Establishes Research 
Center in Moscow; Researchers Develop Scanning Ion Microscope; 
Researchers Develop Semiconductor for Mobile Telephones; Hanil 
Scientists Develop Anti-Cancer Protein; Ssangyong Exports Mini- 
Diesel Generators to Philippines; Second Daewoo Mart Opens in 
Rangoon; Hanil Synthetic Fibers To Operate Plant in Shandong; 
Samsung To Export Mobile Telephone System to Russia; Daelim Receives 
New Overseas Construction Orders 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA - INDONESIA:  Oil Investment Continues Despite 
Falling Prices; Textile Exports Increase; Value Declines; Export, 
Import of Electronic Goods; Two-Way Trade With PRC Increases; 
Taiwanese To Develop Petrochemical Plant; Mitsui Petrochemical To 
Establish Manufacturing Plant; Open Bidding Expected for Power Plant 
Construction 

   LAOS:  Norway Grants Aid for Hydropower Project; Swedish 
Organization Provides Development Loan 

   MALAYSIA:  Trade, Investment With Sri Lanka Noted; NEC Wins Fiber 
Optic Cable Contract 

   PHILIPPINES:  Trade Agreements With Vietnam Signed 

   SINGAPORE:  Japanese Firms To Expand Petrochemical Complex 

   THAILAND:  Car Makers Get Export, Domestic Sales Incentives; 
Minister Comments on Energy Reserves; Burma Buys Electricity for 
Border Town; Firm To Open Cement Plant in Cambodia 

   VIETNAM:  FEATURE:  Mekong Delta Paddy Prices Decline Steadily; 
Foreign Investment Projects Licensed in First Quarter; Prospects for 
Coffee Exports; Sugar Production Down; Imports Authorized; French 
Firm To Build Mill, Export Processed Rice; Peugeot Prepares to Build 
Assembly Plant; Joint Venture With ROK in TV Assembly; Foreign Loans 
Guaranteed by State Banks; Vietcombank Signs Credit Line With Korea 
Eximbank 

   (Pacific Rim Economic Review FBPSP 94-09) 

   JAPAN:  Economic Trends - Japanese Manufacturers React to Higher 
Prices of Imported Pulp -- Major Japanese paper manufacturing 
companies have "voiced their disapproval" over announcements by 
several North American and European pulp companies that pulp export 
prices for May will rise about 13 percent higher than April prices, 
according to the 6 April NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI).  Japanese 
paper companies will most likely "accept the situation" because 
securing raw materials such as pulp is a major priority for them. 

   According to NIKKEI, Japanese paper companies reported that the 
U.S. firms Georgia-Pacific and Stone Container Corporation were the 
first to announce higher prices.  The U.S. firms are raising prices 
on leaf-bleached kraf t pulp to $490 or $500 a ton and on needle- 
bleached kraf t pulp to around $520 a ton.  NIKKEI added that one 
European pulp company, Enso-Gutzeit, has also announced that May 
prices for both types of pulp will be 12 to 13 percent higher than 
April prices. 

   NIKKEI noted that international pulp prices remained at depressed 
levels until late last year, while declining industry profits 
resulted in reduced production levels worldwide.  Since supply has 
fallen to match depressed demand, consumers are rushing to buy pulp 
for fear of rising prices.  This in turn has rapidly pushed market 
prices back up. 

   The 10 April NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN reported that Japanese paper 
manufacturers are "objecting" to the 10 percent price rise for June 
pulp exports announced by major Canadian pulp companies.  According 
to Japanese industry circles, the Harmac Division of Macmillan 
Bloedel and the Avenoir Co., a company spun off from Canadian 
Pacific Forest Products, have announced June prices for needle- 
bleached kraf t pulp of $560 per ton, $50 higher than May prices. 
NIKKEI SANGYO noted that Canadian pulp prices overall have risen 47 
percent since the end of last year. 

   Canadian pulp companies currently account for 40 percent of 
Japan's pulp imports, the highest share among foreign countries, 
according to NIKIEI SANGYO.  Canada has already reduced pulp 
processing activities because of the slump in the pulp market, and 
impending labor strikes in the Canadian paper industry could result 
in higher pulp prices. 

   According to NIKKEI SANGYO, some Japanese industry officials 
believe that higher prices for raw materials such as pulp will push 
up the domestic prices of paper products, although they believe the 
rise will not be as rapid as the increase in pulp prices. 

   Daishowa Paper To Import More Pulp From Canada - Despite the 
higher price of imported pulp, according to the 13 April NIKKEI, 
Daishowa Paper Manufacturing, Japan's second largest paper 
manufacturer, plans to rely on imported pulp from its Canadian joint 
venture company, the Kennel River Pulp Co.  This is because the 
domestic price of pulp is considerably higher even than imported 
pulp and because the high costs of processing have dramatically 
reduced the operational efficiency of Daishowa's Fuji plant, which 
is in Shizuoka Prefecture.  The company will gradually close down 
and eventually sell off the western block of its Fuji plant to 
reduce its debt obligations, as part of a restructuring program 
which was announced in March.  Beginning in June, the company will 
suspend pulp processing activities in the western block, which 
produces medium-grade and dyed paper products.  Daishowa will then 
suspend and transfer paper production operations in the western 
block to another plant. 

   NIKKEI reported that the price gap between imported and domestic 
pulp has widened further with the yen's appreciation.  By importing 
30,000 tons of pulp annually, Daishowa can save an annual 1 billion 
yen ($9.7 million) in total processing costs and 600 million yen 
($5.8 million) annually on the costs of raw materials alone. 

   Financial Issues - Securities Industry, MOF Encouraging Asian 
Equity Investment -- The Japan Securities Dealers Association has 
decided to register China's Shenzhen Stock Exchange as a "designated 
foreign securities exchange," according to the 19 April NIKKEI KINYU 
SHIMBUN.  The move will allow individual Japanese investors to begin 
trading stocks of Chinese state-run companies listed on the Shenzhen 
exchange through Japanese securities companies on Japan's over-the- 
counter market.  The association's decision closely follows a 
similar decision in March to register the Shanghai Stock Exchange as 
the first designated foreign securities exchange in China. 

   Previously, Chinese stocks could be purchased in Japan, but only 
if they were listed on a "designated" exchange in Hong Kong or New 
York, according to the 4 March MAINICHI SHIMBUN.  The move opens the 
way for Chinese state-run companies to list their stocks on domestic 
Japanese exchanges, MAINICHI reported, because the Ministry of 
Finance (MOF) will consider listing Chinese stocks on the Tokyo and 
Osaka exchanges once a performance track record on the over-the- 
counter market has been established.  Designating the Chinese 
exchanges increases opportunities for Japanese investment in Chinese 
equities. 

   On the domestic front, the Tokyo Stock Exchange is considering 
relaxing listing standards on its foreign section to encourage Asian 
firms to list there, according to the 21 April NIKKEI KINYU.  Issues 
the exchange must address include:  revising net asset requirements 
to allow the small-capital Asian firms to list and alleviating the 
cost of submitting Japanese-language documents required for listing, 
such as annual reports.  The amount of time a firm must be listed on 
its home exchange before it can list in Japan is also being 
reconsidered, according to the 5 April NIKKEI KINYU.  To this end, 
the exchange dispatched two teams to Asia in March to study local 
regulations, such as accounting and oversight systems. 

   To facilitate direct Japanese investment in South Korean stocks 
and bonds, the MOF has decided to make an exception to Japan's 
foreign currency exchange controls, according to the 9 April NIHON 
KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI).  Previously it was all but impossible for a 
Japanese investor to trade South Korean stocks directly from Japan 
because of a discrepancy in Japanese and Korean currency exchange 
policies--Japan's policy does not allow direct yen transfers abroad, 
while Korean policy is to allow yen into the country through direct 
transfers.  As a result, direct Japanese investment in South Korea 
has been limited and has always been channeled through a third 
country. 

   The MOF will make an exception by allowing domestic Japanese 
investors who have opened yen-won accounts at Korean banks to send 
funds from an account at a domestic foreign exchange bank to a South 
Korean yen account  through a securities company to clear the funds. 
The MOF will authorize two securities companies with branches in 
Seoul to handle these transactions, and a system is expected to be 
in place for brokering Korean equity investments by the beginning of 
May.  With this MOF initiative, the NIKKEI observed, capital will be 
allowed to flow between the two countries and "the way toward 
investment in South Korea will be opened." 

   Meanwhile, the Nihon Keizai Shimbun Co. has for the first time 
granted a license to a foreign stock exchange which authorizes that 
exchange to list futures and options based on its new Nikkei 300 
Stock Index.  The index is based on 300 representative issues listed 
on the Tokyo Stock Exchange.  The newly licensed foreign exchange, 
the Singapore International Monetary Exchange (SIMEX), will begin 
listing Nikkei 300-based instruments within the next few months, 
according to the 7 April NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN.  SIMEX already lists 
futures and options based on the Nikkei 225 Stock Index. 

   In this connection, Tomomitsu Oba, president of the Japan Center 
for International Finance, has been appointed an "outside advisor" 
to SIMEX to enhance the exchange's relationship with the MOF and the 
finance and securities industries in Japan, according to the 31 
March NIKKEI.  Oba was formerly vice minister of finance for 
international affairs and still has strong connections with the MOF 
and financial circles in Japan. 

   Nippon Trust Bank:  Introducing New Type of Financial 
Restructuring -- An analysis in the 21 April NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 
(NIKKEI) reported that Mitsubishi Bank, Japan's fifth largest 
commercial bank, has begun "comprehensive assistance" to Nippon 
Trust Bank, the smallest of Japan's seven trust banks.  It stated 
that the commercial bank's assistance to the trust bank could be the 
harbinger of a new type of financial restructuring because it may 
entail reorganization through one of two new methods in the 1993 
Financial System Reform Law that have not been used to date--a 
merger of a commercial and a trust bank, or having an existing trust 
bank become a subsidiary of a commercial bank. 

   Nippon Trust Bank has been weakened by nonperforming assets that 
amounted to 85.2 billion yen ($811 million) as of the end of 
September 1993 and by "irretrievable assets" that totaled 14 billion 
yen ($133 million) by the end of FY93.  Given the close ties between 
Mitsubishi Bank and Nippon Trust, the Ministry of Finance (MOF) and 
Mitsubishi Bank began deliberating assistance to Nippon Trust late 
in 1993, and came up with a plan that included dispatching 
Mitsubishi personnel to Nippon Trust.  Four consecutive Nippon Trust 
presidents have come from Mitsubishi and Mitsubishi is Nippon 
Trust's second largest stockholder.  Currently, the MOF is 
conducting an audit of Nippon Trust, and an assistance plan will be 
finalized in mid-May. 

   One proposal for assistance that is gaining strength is for 
Mitsubishi to provide Nippon Trust with deposits for an initial 
period, and then, if necessary, make Nippon Trust a subsidiary by 
purchasing additional stock.  A variation on this proposal would 
entail Mitsubishi purchasing new Nippon Trust stock immediately, 
without extending deposit assistance.  Whether Mitsubishi purchases 
Nippon Trust immediately or not will depend upon the results of the 
MOF audit and an agreement between the MOF and Japan's Fair Trade 
Commission. 

   The analysis observed that the Financial System Reform Law, which 
allows banks and securities companies to establish subsidiaries to 
enter financial sectors previously closed to them, enables Nippon 
Trust to restructure by becoming the subsidiary of Mitsubishi Bank, 
and that this will be the first example of this type of 
restructuring.  While commercial banks have been preparing to 
establish trust banking subsidiaries, Mitsubishi is said to have 
cancelled plans to do so since it is in the midst of providing 
assistance to Nippon Trust.  If Mitsubishi were to establish an 
entirely new trust banking subsidiary, as other commercial banks are 
doing, it would not be able to engage in the lucrative pension fund 
business itself.  However, by holding more than 50 percent of Nippon 
Trust's stock, Mitsubishi would control a subsidiary that could 
engage in the full range of trust banking operations, including 
pension fund management. 

   The NIKKEI analysis observed that Mitsubishi's approach could 
spawn a restructuring of Japan's beleaguered financial system that 
breaks down barriers between commercial, trust, and other financial 
operations and could "influence future strategies of commercial 
banks" as they prepare to establish trust subsidiaries. 

   FTC To Promulgate Stockholding Guidelines -- Japan's Fair Trade 
Commission (FTC) is currently devising criteria for screening the 
amount of stock a bank can hold in another company.  Under the 
Antimonopoly Law, a financial institution cannot hold more than 5 
percent of another company's stock, and must obtain FTC approval to 
hold a higher percentage.  Banks and financial institutions are 
urging the FTC to disclose its criteria for permitting stockholding 
in excess of 5 percent as they prepare to establish trust and 
securities subsidiaries in diversifying their operations. The FTC 
has decided to clarify these standards and will announce them in the 
summer of 1994. 

   As a rule, the FTC will allow banks to hold stock in excess of 5 
percent when it determines that no concerns exist that the financial 
or other markets will be "dominated" by them.  Specifically, it will 
disclose its criteria for such authorizations when a financial 
institution establishes a subsidiary either to enter a completely 
separate financial sector or conduct business that is ancillary to 
its core lending business, such as branch management or electronic 
clearing systems.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 15 Apr 94 p 7) 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - CHINA:  Iwatani International To 
Expand Industrial Gas Production Network -- Iwatani International, 
Japan's largest LPG dealer, and the Shanghai Petrochemical 
Industrial Co., China's largest producer of industrial gases, will 
establish a joint venture company in Shanghai to produce carbon 
monoxide and propane.  The new company, Shanghai Petrochemical 
Iwatani Gas Development Co. Ltd., will be capitalized at $3.59 
million, with Iwatani International and Shanghai Petrochemical each 
contributing 40 percent and Iwatani Gas and Shanghai Jindong 
Petrochemical Industrial Development Co., a subsidiary of Shanghai 
Petrochemical, each investing 10 percent.  The joint venture company 
will build a plant in Shanghai by the summer of 1995 with a 
production capacity of 3,600 tons of propane and 30,000 tons of 
carbon monoxide annually, making it China's largest manufacturer of 
carbon monoxide. The carbon monoxide will be used to refrigerate 
food and the propane sold for household use. 

   Iwatani has also decided to form joint ventures in Daqing, 
Heilongjiang Province, and Shenyang, Liaoning Province to produce 
industrial gases. It hopes to build a gas production network with 
annual sales of 20 billion yen ($190 million) by the year 2000. 
(Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 9 Apr 94 p 9) 

   Mikuni, NORINCO Subsidiary Establish Motorcycle Carburetor 
Company -- Mikuni, an independent carburetor manufacturer, has 
signed an agreement with the Southwest Optical Instrument Factory, a 
precision instrument company belonging to the arms manufacturing 
conglomerate China North Industries Group (NORINCO), establishing a 
joint venture company to produce and market motorcycle carburetors. 
The joint venture firm, Sanguohong Optical Industry Co. Ltd., will 
be located in Chengdu, Sichuan Province, and will be capitalized at 
$8.6 million, with Mikuni investing 55 percent and Southwest Optical 
45 percent.  This is the first time a Japanese company has invested 
over 50 percent in an "automobile related" joint venture in China. 

   Total initial investment will be $20.5 million.  A new plant will 
be completed in mid-1995, and should begin operations in 1996 with 
about 60 employees producing 750,000 carburetors valued at 2 billion 
yen ($19 million) in the initial fiscal year. Plans are for the 
workforce to expand to 400 and production to increase to 1.5 million 
carburetors valued at 4 billion yen ($38 million) annually by the 
year 2000. 

   Southwest Optical already makes automobile and motorcycle 
carburetors for Honda Motor, Yamaha Motor, and Suzuki using 
production technology provided by Mikuni in 1992.  (Tokyo NIKKEI 
SANGYO SHIMBUN 18 Apr 94 p 11) 

   VIETNAM:  Keidanren Group Attends Joint Economic Conference -- On 
6 April a Japan Federation of Economic Organizations (Keidanren) 
delegation attended the second "Japan-Vietnam Joint Economic 
Conference" held in Ho Chi Minh City, according to the 7 April NIHON 
KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI).  The delegation, consisting of 117 
officials representing 60 corporations, was headed by Akira Nishio, 
chairman of Keidanren's Japan-Vietnam Economic Committee and 
president of the general trading company Nissho Iwai.  The 
Vietnamese delegation of 140 government and business leaders was 
headed by Deputy Prime Minister Tran Duc Luong, and included Do Quoc 
Sam, chairman of the State Planning Committee. 

   The aim of the Japanese side was to urge Vietnam to improve its 
investment climate so as to promote Japanese investment, NIKKEI 
observed.  Do Quoc Sam requested expanded Japanese investment, to 
which Chairman Nishio replied: "The reason for the small size of 
Japanese investment is due to problems in Vietnam's business 
climate." 

   In the conference proceedings, Keidanren reportedly spelled out 
improvements that must be made in five areas of Vietnam's economy in 
order to increase Japanese investment: 1) improvements in 
electricity supply, transport, communications, and other areas of 
the infrastructure; 2) improved commercial laws and development of 
the country's financial and capital markets; 3) simplified 
administrative procedures and making government approval and 
supervision standards more precise; 4) revealing information 
concerning the management situation of Vietnamese joint venture 
partners; and 5) improving macroeconomic statistics. 

   According to the 6 April ASAHI SHIMBUN, Nishio and the Keidanren 
delegation paid a call on Do Muoi, general secretary of the 
Communist Party of Vietnam, on 5 April in Hanoi.  Do Muoi 
specifically requested Japanese investment in Vietnam's machinery 
industry, the transfer of advanced Japanese technology, and the 
provision of business management know-how.  Nishio replied: "Japan's 
investment in Vietnam lags behind that of other countries, but Japan 
will be the largest investor." 

   The third joint conference will be held in Tokyo in 1995, NIKKEI 
reported. 

   NEC To Build Communications System Linking Four Airports -- NEC, 
a major manufacturer of communications equipment, has won a $1.9 
million contract from the Vietnamese Government to build a dedicated 
communications system linking Vietnam's four major airports. 
Kanematsu, a general trading company, will be the main contractor 
for the project.  NEC beat out France's Alcatel and other 
"influential" telecommunications companies in winning the contract. 

   The project will link Vietnam's four major airports--Hanoi (Noi 
Bai), Qui Nhon, Da Nang, and Ho Chi Minh City (Tan Son Nhat)--by 
installing two-way voice and data links for air traffic control via 
Indonesia's Palapa satellite.  The system will also incorporate low- 
noise amplifiers, ground communications equipment, multiplex 
equipment, and a command and control system. 

   Building on this contract, NEC will attempt to win other 
contracts in Vietnam as the country develops its transportation and 
communications infrastructure.  In the past, European firms such as 
Alcatel were strongest in Vietnam's telecommunications sector, but 
NEC has taken various steps, including opening a resident office in 
Hanoi, to develop business in Vietnam.  Two particular areas NEC 
will target are supplying PBX equipment and fiber optic 
communications systems.  (Tokyo NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 18 Mar 94 p 11) 

   Japan-U.S. Trade Issues - Draft of MITI Report on Unfair Foreign 
Trade Practices Revealed -- The 1 April NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 
(NIKKEI) has reported on the contents of the draft of the Ministry 
of International Trade and Industry (MITI) FY94 Report on Unfair 
Foreign Trade Practices, which is Japan's counterpart to the United 
States Trade Representative's (USTR's) annual report on foreign 
trade barriers.  The draft report was prepared by MITI's Industrial 
Structure Council.  The final report is due in May.  According to 
NIKKEI, the draft classifies the unfair trade practices and policies 
of Japan's major trade partners into thirteen categories, such as 
quantitative import restrictions, anti-dumping measures, and export 
subsidies.  The draft cited the United States as having unfair trade 
practices and policies in nine categories, South Korea in five, and 
the European Union (EU) in four.  According to NIKKEI, the 
Industrial Structure Council judged the "unfairness" of specific 
trade practices based on the agreement resulting from the GATT 
Uruguay Round negotiations and "basic principles of international 
law." 

   According to NIKKEI, the draft emphasized problems associated 
with U.S. trade policies, such as unilateral actions, "abuse of 
anti-dumping measures," and "buy-American policies" in government 
procurement.  In particular, the draft "strongly criticized" 
reinstitution of the Super 301 provision in the U.S. Omnibus Trade 
Law and the financial retaliation bill currently being debated in 
Congress.  The draft went on to criticize the U.S. practice of 
demanding that its trade partners set numerical import targets for 
lacking "economic rationality and violating the spirit of the GATT." 

   According to the 5 April YOMIURI SHIMBUN, MITI has decided to 
include in the FY94 Report on Foreign Unfair Trade Practices the 
U.S. Government's practice of using the multinational corporation 
clause of the U.S. Customs Law to charge foreign firms with dumping. 
The decision was in reaction to the U.S. Department of Commerce's 
(DOC's) recent charge that the Dutch subsidiary of Japan's Fuji 
Photo Film was dumping color photo paper on the U.S. market. 
According to YOMIURI, the DOC cited the multinational corporation 
clause as its rationale for using the production cost of Fuji Photo 
Film in Japan rather than that of the company's subsidiary in the 
Netherlands in imposing a high tariff rate of 321.23 percent on the 
Dutch subsidiary's shipments to the United States. 

   The 1 April NIKKEI added that the draft urged the Japanese 
Government to utilize GATT, or its successor, the World Trade 
Organization, to counter U.S. unilateral actions and numerical 
targets.  To prevent the United States from resorting to such trade 
measures or policies, the draft also urged the Japanese Government 
to make its own procurement process transparent, remove nontariff 
barriers, and promote further deregulation in Japan. 

   Concerning China and Taiwan, which are preparing to join GATT, 
NIKKEI reported that the draft requests China to make its trade 
systems and laws "internally consistent and transparent" and to 
lower tariff rates and quantitative import restrictions.  The draft 
requests Taiwan to lower tariff rates and to reduce its export 
subsidies. 

   BOJ Governor Mieno's Concern Over 'Positive' Macroeconomic 
Policies -- In a speech at the Foreign Correspondents Club of Japan 
on 19 April, Bank of Japan (BOJ) Governor Yasushi Mieno expressed 
concern that pressure to reduce Japan's large current account 
surplus may lead the Japanese Government to adopt looser 
macroeconomic policies, in particular, a more expansive fiscal 
policy and a more relaxed monetary policy, according to the 20 April 
ASAHI SHIMBUN.  Mieno argued that because Japan's large current 
account surplus is a "reflection of the high saving rates" of the 
Japanese people, "macroeconomic policies alone cannot reduce the 
surplus."  Instead, Mieno continued, "overly positive" macroeconomic 
policies tend to "cause inflation."  He also said that adoption of 
"short-sighted" means, such as increased government spending or a 
lower official discount rate, is a "very questionable approach" to 
reducing Japan's surplus. 

   The 20 April YOMIURI SHIMBUN reported that, in his speech, Mieno 
rebutted foreign criticism that Japan's large current account 
surplus is bad for the world by stating that a current account 
surplus or deficit had "nothing to do with virtue or vice."  Mieno 
stated that the important factor is whether a "country with a 
current account deficit can control its cash flow and eliminate its 
deficit based on a rational repayment schedule."  Mieno cited the 
example of some East Asian countries to show how Japan's surplus has 
been constructive.  He said that those East Asian countries which 
have had current account deficits imported Japanese capital in the 
1980's to promote investment and technical innovation and have been 
able to continue developing their economies in the 1990's. 

   Mieno concluded it will be difficult to reduce Japan's current 
account surplus in a short time period, according to the ASAHI 
article.  Mieno stated that "steady" efforts, such as "proper 
management of macroeconomic policies, improving market access, 
deregulation, and improving infrastructure," were needed to reduce 
Japan's surplus, even though such efforts might take a long time to 
produce results. 

   Matsunaga Recommends Government Change Tactics in Trade Talks -- 
In recent comments, a prominent Japanese official has urged Japan to 
take a more proactive approach in working out its trade differences 
with the United States.  Speaking at the Asia Institute, a private 
research organization he heads, on 20 April, Nobuo Matsunaga, the 
Japanese Government Representative for External Economic Affairs and 
former ambassador to the United States, urged the Japanese 
Government to "change its tactics to take the initiative to persuade 
the United States of Japan's positions," rather than responding to 
the United States in the Japan-U.S. framework talks, according to 
the 21 April ASAHI SHIMBUN.  Matsunaga emphasized voluntary efforts 
on Japan's part to open its markets and reduce its trade surplus 
with the United States.  Specifically, according to ASAHI, he urged 
the government to include "solid" economic structural reform plans 
and market opening measures in the package it plans to announce by 
the end of June.  Matsunaga visited Washington in early April to 
meet United States Trade Representative (USTR) Mickey Kantor, 
National Economic Council Chairman Robert Rub in, and National 
Security Council Chairman Anthony Lake to informally explore ways to 
reopen the framework talks. 

   According to the 21 April MAINICHI SHIMBUN, Matsunaga attributed 
the breakdown of the framework talks in February, at least in part, 
to "misjudgment" on the part of the Japanese Government.  According 
to Matsunaga, the Japanese Government "judged that the U.S. 
Government in the end would favorably evaluate the Japanese 
Government's efforts to resolve trade frictions with the United 
States," and did not actively try to persuade the United States of 
Japan's positions. 

   Regarding U.S. strategies in the framework talks, Matsunaga 
provided his assessment that the U.S. Government is "shifting the 
focus of the framework talks from sector-specific issues to 
macroeconomic policies," according to the 21 April YOMIURI SHIMBUN. 
To support his assessment, Matsunaga quoted USTR Kantor as saying 
that Japan-U.S. relations would "not escape gridlock unless Japan 
takes macroeconomic measures and sustains economic growth led by 
domestic demand."  The paper reported that Matsunaga added that it 
was his perception that U.S. negotiation strategies had been "firmed 
up to center on macroeconomic policies."  According to Matsunaga, 
USTR Kantor told him that "sector-specific issues must be resolved, 
but that negotiations on macroeconomic policies were most 
important." 

   The 21 April SANKEI SHIMBUN also reported that based on USTR 
Kantor's remarks, Matsunaga urged the Japanese Government to include 
income tax cuts and additional public works spending in the June 
package of economic structural reform plans and market opening 
measures.  Matsunaga implied that Japan "needs to make concessions" 
in the macroeconomic realm in order to resolve the framework talks 
successfully without committing to numerical targets.  He said 
"Japan should reject numerical targets, but rejection alone could 
not conclude diplomatic negotiations."  At the same time, Matsunaga 
also expressed his concern that the new government may not have 
enough time to formulate macroeconomic policies centering on income 
tax cuts and additional public works.  Matsunaga pointed out that 
the new government must first deliberate and pass the overdue FY94 
budget bill. 

   Machine Tools/Robotics - FEATURE:  JMTBA Creates New Machine Tool 
Market Forecast Model -- SUMMARY:  The Japan Machine Tool Builders' 
Association (JMTBA) has created a mid-range market forecasting model 
for machine tools to measure progress in reforming the industry's 
"supply and demand structure," according to press reports.  The 
JMTBA's other forecasting model, the machine tool recapitalization- 
cycle model, indicates that domestic demand will double in 1994, a 
trend not supported so far this year by actual market data. 

   According to the 25 March NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN, the JMTBA has 
compiled a five-year forecast for machine tool orders to serve as an 
index for gauging progress in "reforming supply and demand" in the 
machine tool industry.  Data for this model comes from intermediate 
range economic forecasts by the Nomura Research Institute, the 
Research Institute on the National Economy, Mitsubishi Research 
Institute, as well from private capital investment and mining and 
manufacturing indices.  The 25 March NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN added 
that the forecast uses theoretical macroeconomic values from a 
multiple regression analysis model to establish the upper limit of 
domestic demand, and then subtracts the standard deviation from 
these values to obtain the lower limit. 

   According to NIKAAN KOGYO, the model projects that domestic 
machine tool demand will increase between 5.0 and 80.3 percent, or 
between 341.1 billion yen ($3.25 billion) and 585.9 billion yen 
($5.58 billion) in 1994, and to between 522.1 billion yen ($4.97 
billion) and 800 billion yen ($7.62 billion) by 1997.  For the five- 
year period 1993-1997, cumulative domestic demand is forecast to be 
2.1278 trillion yen ($20.26 billion).  To reach this total, yearly 
averages must be between 425.6 billion yen ($4.05 billion) and 611.5 
billion yen ($5.82 billion). 

   NIKKEI SANGYO contrasted these figures with projections using the 
JMTBA's machine tool recapitalization-cycle model, which assumes a 
replacement period of 8.5 years.  This model predicts that domestic 
demand--production minus exports and adding imports--will double 
from the 1993 level of 311 billion yen ($2.962 billion) to 631.9 
billion yen ($6.02 billion) in 1994 and reach 774.1 billion ($7.372 
billion) in 1997.  JMTBA-compiled figures, however, show that 
domestic orders were down 28 percent and 24 percent in January and 
February 1994, respectively, and in the industry the prevailing 
opinion is "the first half of 1994 will be about the same as the 
second half of 1993, with orders finally picking up a little in the 
second half." 

   Toyo Seimitsu Entering Korean Gear-Cutting-Machine Market -- Toyo 
Seimitsu Kogyo, a machine tool and auto parts manufacturer 
affiliated with the Toyota Motor Group, has signed a contract with 
the U-Sin Machine Industry Company, a machinery manufacturer in the 
Hyundai Group that specializes in hypoid-gear-cutting machines, to 
provide it with Toyo Seimitsu's manufacturing technology for gear 
tooth chamfering machines.  U-Sin will use this technology to 
manufacture chamfering machines for Hyundai Motor Company.  Toyo 
Seimitsu will also hold technical exchange meetings with Korean auto 
companies. 

   Toyo Seimitsu decided to expand into the Korean market, where 
auto sales are spurring capital investment, because its high 
reliance on the domestic market caused it to be hit hard by the 
slump in domestic auto sales.  However, because the U.S. company 
Gleason Corporation has a large share of the Korean gear-cutting- 
machine market, Toyo Seimitsu chose to begin by providing technology 
to U-Sin and holding technical exchange meetings with Korean auto 
companies, such as Hyundai Motor and Daewoo Motors.  Toyo Seimitsu 
hopes to use these meetings to stimulate deeper technical 
cooperation and gain good "PR" for its technology.  The first 
technical exchange meeting was held in Korea and the second meeting 
is scheduled to be held this fall in Japan in conjunction with the 
Japan Machine Tool Exhibition.  (Tokyo NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 14 Apr 
94 p 13) 

   Semiconductors/Computers/Electronics - FEATURE:  Nikon, Canon 
Dominate World Stepper Market -- SUMMARY:  Nikon Corp. and Canon 
Inc., which together control 90 percent of the world's market for 
stepper equipment used to manufacture semiconductors and liquid 
crystal displays (LCDs), are strengthening their technological 
domination of the industry, according to media reports.  In the race 
to develop next-generation steppers, however, one competitor could 
be Matsushita Electric Industrial Co., which has developed an 
excimer laser stepper it feels is more efficient than similar 
steppers developed by Nikon and Canon. 

   Two Firms Dominate 'Critical' Stepper Market -- Nikon and Canon 
control nearly 90 percent of the 100 billion yen ($1 billion) annual 
world market for stepper lithography equipment, according to the 30 
March NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI).  Nikon has about a 70 percent 
share of Japan's market and Canon the remainder.  According to the 
12 February NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN, steppers, used to print circuit 
patterns on silicon wafers, are "critical" to the manufacture of 
semiconductors and LCDs.  For the most part, semiconductor 
manufacturers currently use "i-line" steppers to produce 4, 16, and- 
-soon--64 megabit (M) dynamic random-access memory (DRAM) chips. 

   The 16 March NIKKAN K0GYO SHIMBUN stated that the stepper market 
in reality is an "oligopoly" of Nikon and Canon.  The paper 
explained that the cost of stepper development has mushroomed while 
economic recession has hit the semiconductor manufacturing equipment 
industry particularly hard.  Until last year Hitachi was the only 
Japanese semiconductor manufacturer to also produce and sell 
steppers, but it had to "withdraw" from stepper operations because 
it could not make a profit.  (For reporting on Hitachi ending its 
stepper production, see the 31 June 1993 Pacific Rim Economic 
Review, Vol 2, No 13, page 15.)  According to NIKKAN KOGYO, this has 
left the domestic market "monopolized" by Nikon and Canon and has 
made it "very difficult" for new entrants. 

   In addition, there is little international competition.  The 16 
February NIKKEI SANGYO reported that an American firm, GCA, which 
was a leading stepper maker in the 1980s, dropped out of the market 
last year.  Further, the 16 February NIKAAN KOGYO reported that the 
only remaining U.S. manufacturer, SVG Lithography Systems (SVGL), 
has agreed to sell Canon the rights to manufacture and sell its most 
advanced equipment in Japan.  According to the paper, SVGL could no 
longer cope with its huge research and capital investment costs, so 
it approached Canon for a deal that also includes joint research and 
development.  This agreement occurred despite SVGL's membership in 
Sematech, the U.S. Government-sponsored consortium that helped SVGL 
develop its technology, NIKKAN KOGYO observed. 

   Recovering Demand Boosting Stepper Sales -- The 30 March NIKKEI 
reported that Nikon and Canon will greatly expand stepper production 
in FY94.  Demand has been brisk in the United States and South 
Korea, and it appears to be recovering in Japan.  In FY93 Nikon 
registered an 80 percent increase in stepper sales to more than 350 
units, of which 215 were for LCD production.  According to NIKKEI, 
this was Nikon's first sales increase in five years, and its Kumaga 
plant in Saitama Prefecture has been running at "full capacity" 
since last summer.  Nikon expects a 20 percent sales increase in 
FY94 to over 420 steppers, of which over 60 percent will be 
exported. 

   According to NIKKEI, Canon has not revealed the number of 
steppers sold in FY93, but its Utsunomiya plant in Tochigi 
Prefecture is also running at full capacity and Canon is projecting 
increased sales of between 50 to 60 percent in FY94.  Due to 
"delivery lead times" of between six to eight months for steppers, 
Canon's sales plans "for the most part" have been set until 
December, with nearly 70 percent destined for export, NIKKEI stated. 

   Taking Steps To Mitigate Next Downturn -- Despite increases in 
FY93 and expectations of higher sales in FY94, both Nikon and Canon 
are taking steps to protect themselves from the "ups and downs of 
the silicon cycle," in which stepper demand "crashes" until the 
semiconductor companies are ready to invest in the production of 
next-generation chips, the 21 February NIKAAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 
reported.  "To maintain cash flow stability and operational 
continuity," Nikon and Canon are preparing to offer stepper "make- 
over" services which will allow semiconductor makers to upgrade 
steppers already in use on production lines.  Thus, the paper 
stated, the two firms will have a source of regular income during 
the "down" years in the silicon cycle, while semiconductor makers 
will be able to improve "investment efficiency." 

   According to NIKI&amp;AN KOGYO, Nikon plans to begin its "function 
upgrade operations" this autumn.  The company plans to create a menu 
of over 20 "services" it can perform on a variety of models, such as 
revising the stepper's management software, reducing exposure 
irregularities, and speeding up reticle alignment.  The paper 
reported that Nikon has sold over 3,000 steppers, nearly all of 
which can be "targeted" for upgrade.  Consequently, Nikon hopes to 
earn over 3 billion yen ($28.5 million) from upgrade services in 
FY94. 

   Canon is also preparing to offer similar upgrade services as part 
of its sales-and-service contracts, according to NIKKAN KOGYO. 
Previously, service contracts were merely a guarantee to fix 
problems, but now Canon plans to include a menu of upgradable 
functions for existing steppers.  A Canon official stated that their 
service menu options should be comparable to Nikon's upgrade 
services. 

   Moving Fast To Remain Technologically Competitive -- Since i-line 
steppers have nearly reached their technological limit, Nikon and 
Canon are moving quickly to develop new stepper technologies.  The 
12 February NIKKEI SANGYO reported that the miniaturization of 
semiconductors is proceeding rapidly, so it is "crucial" for Nikon 
and Canon to introduce new technologies as soon as possible to 
remain competitive. 

   According to the February 1994 issue of NIKKEI MICRODEVICES, 
Nikon has developed and is preparing to market a krypton-fluoride 
(KrF) excimer laser stepper that can print circuit patterns at a 
width of 0.32 microns, which is suitable for mass producing 64M 
DRAMs.  The magazine reported that Nikon's "NSR-2005EX10B" stepper 
might also be used to produce 256M DRAMs if its resolution is 
increased by the "SHRINC" illumination-modification method.  Nikon 
hopes the machines will be used to produce the "second generation" 
of 64M DRAMs, but according to NIKKEI MICRODEVICES, some 
semiconductor makers complain that the price--between 400 and 450 
million yen ($3.9 and $4.3 million)--is too high compared to current 
i-line steppers, which are 30 to 50 percent cheaper. 

   Another article in the same issue of NIKKEI MICRODEVICES reported 
that Canon has delayed the commercialization of its "advanced KrF 
stepper."  The firm would not comment on the reason for the 
postponement, but instead revealed its pending agreement with SVGL 
to develop "mirror-scan" steppers that use reflections from mirrors 
to form circuit patterns.  According to the 16 February NIKKAN 
KOGYO, Canon has already developed a stepper that can be used to 
produce 64M DRAMs, but the company has decided that SVGL's mirror- 
scan stepper could become the principal stepper used in 256M DRAM 
production.  In addition to its ability to print extremely minute 
circuit patterns, SVGL's stepper can be used on larger sized wafers 
that are expected to be used in production soon.  In Japan this 
stepper will sell for 450 million yen ($4.3 million). 

   MEIC Plans To Market New Excimer Stepper Laser -- A great deal of 
research and development is still required for equipment to mass 
produce 256M DRAM chips and even more advanced chips, according to 
the 12 February NIKKEI SANGYO.  Thus, it is not clear which stepper 
technology will emerge as the "mainstream."  One new competitor 
could be Matsushita Electric Industrial Co. (MEIC), one of the core 
companies of the Matsushita Group, according to the 16 March NIKKAN 
KOGYO.  MEIC plans to enter the market for KrF excimer laser 
steppers that will be used to produce 256M DRAMs.  On 15 March, the 
group's research subsidiary, Matsushita Giken, announced that its 
Osaka Semiconductor Research Center bad completed development of a 
KrF excimer laser stepper capable of printing circuit patterns as 
narrow as 0.25 microns.  While Nikon and Canon purchase their 
excimer lasers from a U.S. firm, Cymer Laser Technologies Corp., 
Matsushita Giken claims that its internally developed lasers have 
greater stability and a longer life span, the paper reported. 
NIKKAN KOGYO observed that MEIC's stepper could pose a threat to 
Nikon's and Canon's hold on the market.  It quotes an industry 
analyst as saying that if MEIC does sell steppers outside the 
Matsushita Group, it could "blow a hole" in Nikon and Canon's 
monopoly. 

   NEC, Fujitsu To Build Supercomputers With CMOS Processors -- NEC 
Corp. and Fujitsu Ltd. are making "drastic" changes in the basic 
design of their supercomputers.  As a result of corporate downsizing 
efforts, both companies have decided to build new supercomputers 
with "inexpensive" complementary metal oxide semiconductor (CMOS) 
processing chips that will be compatible with existing equipment and 
software.  NEC and Fujitsu expect this move alone to improve cost 
efficiency by more than five times.  Both firms plan to introduce 
next generation machines based on the new designs by mid-1995. 

   NEC and Fujitsu are changing their designs because they realized 
that their current supercomputers which use bipolar-based processors 
cannot compete with U.S.-made parallel processing supercomputers 
with RISC-based processors and extremely efficient UNIX servers. 
Consequently, both firms are developing new parallel processing 
supercomputers loaded with "dozens" of CMOS processors.  CMOS chips 
are attractive because they can be made to be both small in size and 
energy-efficient, while their development and manufacturing costs 
can be tightly controlled. 

   NEC will load CMOS processors on all succeeding models of its 
current SX-3R series supercomputer.  Using the "close coupling 
method," NEC will be able to load up to 32 CMOS processors for a 
maximum vector processing speed of 2 billion floating point 
operations per second.  Fujitsu will load CMOS processors on all its 
lower- and middle-end VPP5OO series supercomputers, but will 
continue to equip its higher-end VPP500s with gallium arsenide 
large-scale integrated circuits.  (Tokyo NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 1 Apr 
94 p 1) 

   Cray Research Japan Sells Mini-Supercomputers -- Taisho 
Pharmaceutical Co.--Cray Research Japan has delivered an EL92 mini- 
supercomputer to Taisho Pharmaceuticals.  It is the first Cray 
supercomputer ordered by a Japanese pharmaceutical company.  Taisho 
will use the supercomputer as a high-speed server in the research 
and development of new drugs at its general research center in Omiya 
City, Saitama Prefecture. 

   At the low-end of Cray's supercomputer series, the EL92 system 
delivered to Taisho has two processors, each capable of running at 
133 million floating point operations per second, and possesses a 
512-megabyte memory capacity.  The value of the order was not 
revealed, but base EL92's usually sell for about 33.5 million yen 
($320,000).  (Tokyo NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 14 Apr 94 p 8) 

   Chiba University--Cray Research Japan won a bid from Chiba 
University for a computer education system that includes eight EL92 
mini-supercomputers.  Canon Sales and Cannon Supercomputing S.I. 
were co-bidders with Cray.  The contract is worth about 500 million 
yen ($4.75 million) and will be paid with funds from the Japanese 
Government's second FY93 supplemental budget. 

   The university is in the process of building a new computer 
system and by FY95 plans to require all 2,800 incoming freshmen to 
take a course in computers and information processing.  This is the 
first time Cray supercomputers will be used in a university-based 
"information processing" education system.  The order includes eight 
EL92 mini-supercomputers, one CS640O UNIX-based computer for 
information management, and 211 terminals.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI 
SHIMBUN 14 Apr 94 p 12) 

   Hitachi To Market Massively Parallel Processing Supercomputer -- 
Hitachi is planning to introduce a massively parallel processing 
(MPP) supercomputer equipped with "general purpose" reduced 
instruction set computer (RISC) processors by mid-1995.  The new 
supercomputer will meet the growing need for faster processing 
speeds while improving cost efficiency "well above" existing models. 
Although U.S. firms lead the field of MPP supercomputers, Fujitsu 
and NEC are close behind.  With Hitachi's entry into the market, 
competition should intensify. 
   The company plans to market an MPP supercomputer that will 
contain more than 1,000 Hewlett-Packard PA-RISC processors and can 
achieve operating speeds of 300 billion floating point operations 
per second, a ten-fold increase over the firm's current S-3000 
series supercomputers. 

   Hitachi also plans to commercialize a mini-supercomputer equipped 
with 128 PA-RISC processors and a parallel processing mainframe 
computer holding up to 128 CMOS processors.  These developments are 
a part of the firm's plans to "rapidly expand" its range of parallel 
processing computers to meet both scientific and business needs. 
(Tokyo NIKAAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 14 Apr 94 p 8) 

   CHINA:  Domestic Developments - New Regulations Issued on Rural 
Enterprise Income Tax -- The State General Administration of 
Taxation has issued new rules regarding rural enterprise income tax. 
Income tax on new rural enterprises will be reduced or remitted for 
one year.  New enterprises that engage in feed production or 
processing are exempt from income tax for three years.  Rural 
enterprise income tax will be calculated based on an eight-grade 
progressive tax rate.  Income from sales of rural enterprises 
engaged in feed processing and income from electric power sales by 
small hydropower stations are exempt from income tax.  Enterprises 
that produce products directly serving the fertilizer or pesticide 
industry are exempt from income tax for three years.  (Harbin 
HEILONGJIANG RIBAO 24 Mar 94 p 8) 

   Sichuan To Focus on Developing Products Promising Quick Results 
-- In the next four years, Sichuan will focus its efforts on 
developing eight major competitive products, including steel 
products, color television sets, videocassette recorders, and 
telecommunications equipment, which require more extensive use of 
technology and promise quick results and which will generate one 
billion yuan or more in profits and taxes on a total sales income of 
over 10 billion yuan.  The provincial party committee and government 
have decided that the provincial plan will emphasize the use of 
technological transformation loans of various financial institutions 
to develop such products.  Efforts should be made to attract more 
foreign investment to develop these products, and the establishment 
of processing factories and shops for such products overseas is 
encouraged.  (Chengdu Sichuan People's Radio Network 1100 GMT 14 Apr 
1994) 

   Electronics Industry Output Up 35.4 Percent in First Quarter -- 
Electronics industry output reached $4.1 billion in the first 
quarter, up 35.4 percent over last year, while sales rose 38.5 
percent to $3.2 billion, according to the Ministry of Electronics 
Industry.  In 1993 expansion was 26.4 percent.  Consumer electronics 
products output, stimulated by booming sales, rose 27 percent, and 
product investment rose by 21.5 percent.  In January and February 
output of color televisions rose 77.8 percent to 1.6 million, while 
output of videocassette recorders and radio and tape recorders 
increased by 35.7 and 15.6 percent respectively.  Foreign-funded 
enterprises grew 75.7 percent, exceeding state firms' 28.2 percent 
gain.  However, there are some problems that may have negative 
consequences.  Many businesses are short of capital.  Costs are 
rising, mostly caused by more expensive imported components and 
devaluation of the yuan.  The new tax system has placed a heavier 
burden on most electronics enterprises, and the number of 
enterprises in the red is rising.  (Beijing CHINA DAILY 26 Apr 94 p 
2) 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - Hong Kong Exports, Re-exports Said 
To Reflect Mainland Economic Slowdown -- Re-exports rose 12 percent 
to HK$71.1 billion last month, compared with March last year, 
government statistics show, but over the same period, the trade 
deficit rose more than HK$3 billion to HK$9.2 billion.  Domestic 
exports fell HK$1.4 billion, or 8.2 percent, to HK$15.9 billion 
during the month.  Total exports--re-exports and domestic exports- 
-increased HK$6.2 billion, or 7.7 percent, to HK$87.1 billion. 
Economists attribute the decline in domestic exports chiefly to the 
slowdown in the mainland economy.  Hong Kong Bank economic adviser 
Jim Wong said:  "These results are continuing the trend we have seen 
since the fourth quarter.  China's export performance in January and 
February was not very good and there was a time lag before it 
influenced Hong Kong's domestic exports.  We have seen a major 
slowdown in exports to China."  Domestic exports to China dropped 14 
percent during the first two months of this year compared with the 
same period last year.  The rate of increase in China's trade also 
slowed during the period.  In U.S. dollar terms, trade rose 19.2 
percent in the fourth quarter of last year compared with only 16.9 
percent in the first two months of this year.  (Hong Kong SOUTH 
CHINA MORNING POST (BUSINESS POST) 29 Apr 94 p 1) 

   Hong Kong Firms See Opportunity in PRC Funding Cutback -- 
According to a report by Peggy Sito, "China's decision to stop 
injecting capital into struggling mainland businesses" has opened up 
a "treasure chest of bargains" for Hong Kong-listed companies, which 
have been the first to spot buying opportunities.  Nick Ni, 
economist and associate director at stockbroker Nomura International 
(Hong Kong), said state companies had been actively courting funds 
from overseas firms as well as Hong Kong-listed, China-funded firms 
to make up a funding shortfall caused by Beijing's latest clampdown 
on bank lending.  Zhaoyuan Electronic Materials in Shandong was 
saved from bankruptcy when China Merchants' investment fund stepped 
in to form a $23.5-million joint venture.  Guangdong Enterprises has 
also taken advantage of the government's squeeze on cash by 
investing in Foshan Transformer Works, a voltage transformer 
company, and in Xinhui New Building Material, a ceramics 
manufacturer in Guangdong.  (Hong Kong EASTERN EXPRESS 25 Apr 94 p 
36) 

   China Credit Squeeze Causes Hong Kong Firm To Scale Back, Shift 
Investment -- China's credit squeeze has caused Hong Kong-listed 
Guangdong Investment to scale back real estate development 
activities there.  Although the group expects to see its future 
earnings boosted by hotels and tourism in Hong Kong and China, the 
company said that due to "the changing demand for property in China, 
the group has toned down the scale of its non-core property 
development."  Instead, the company was shifting its focus to 
Thailand.  The group expects stable income growth from 
infrastructure projects, such as the company's investments in the 
Zhongshan Power Station, the Shiqi section of the Guangzhou-Zhuhai 
Highway, and the New Pak Kong Bridge in Qingyuan.  Stable recurring 
income is also expected from the acquisitions earlier this month of 
the Guangdong Hotel in Tsim Sha Tsui and the Wharney Hotel in Wan 
Chai.  (Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST (BUSINESS POST) 29 Apr 94 
p 3) 

   Hong Kong Executive Sees Limited Impact of PRC Land Tax -- A 
director of Hong Kong's New World Development Limited has said that 
China's purpose in drawing up a land value-added tax is to curb real 
estate speculation.  New World has many real estate development 
projects in China, which involve capital worth several billion Hong 
Kong dollars.  According to the executive, the implementation of the 
land value-added tax will only slightly affect the company's 
investments in China.  He indicated that returns on real estate 
generally amount to 50 percent, which he said was reasonable.  Some 
people expected an 80-percent return, but this could not be achieved 
in other countries.  (Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE 1206 GMT 25 Apr 
94) 

   Guangzhou Closes 100 Foreign-Invested Firms Breaking Contracts -- 
Guangzhou has closed over 100 overseas-invested firms which failed 
to meet their financial commitments.  Of investments worth a 
contracted $80 billion, only $29.5 billion has been injected.  Most 
of the firms had partners in Hong Kong, Macao, or Taiwan.  These 
places account for over 85 percent of overseas funds.  Unfunded, 
suspended operations were among those closed; and foreign partners 
who failed to leave when their joint-venture contracts came to an 
end also had their licenses revoked.  Chinese partners who failed to 
keep their end of bargains were responsible for some closures. 
Guangzhou, Shenzhen, and Zhuhai special economic zones have also 
cracked down on overseas cheats.  The 113 revoked licenses account 
for about 2 percent of overseas-funded firms in Guangzhou.  Only 30 
percent of the contractual foreign capital in Guangdong has been put 
into use.  The province has approved 47,000 overseas-funded 
enterprises, and half have begun operating.  (Beijing CHINA DAILY 22 
Apr 94 p 2) 

   Fujian Initiates Inspection of Foreign-Funded Firms' Contracts -- 
Commencing this year, Fujian's Foreign Economic and Trade Commission 
will annually inspect the implementation of the contracts and rules 
of foreign-funded enterprises.  Fujian is the first province to take 
this action, which is aimed at protecting the legitimate rights of 
various parties and promoting the growth of foreign-funded 
enterprises.  Of the 13,000 foreign-funded enterprises approved by 
the provincial authorities in the past 15 years, some 5,800 have 
gone into operation.  Xiamen Special Economic Zone started 
inspections early this year.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 0925 GMT 
21 Apr 94) 

   Canadian Telecom Firm Launches Five-Year, $130-Million Program -- 
Northern Telecom of Canada has agreed to a five-year, $130-million 
investment program establishing three joint ventures and a high-tech 
laboratory in research and development, manufacturing, and sales and 
servicing of telecommunications switching products, semiconductors, 
and other technologies.  The agreement was finalized between Vice 
Premier Zou Jiahua and Canadian Trade Minister Roy Maclaren in 
Toronto.  Formal contracts should be signed late this summer. 

   This is the first phase of a memorandum of understanding signed 
by Northern Telecom and the State Planning Commission in June 1993 
covering a broad range of manufacturing, research and development, 
technical, and training projects to help modernize China's 
telecommunications infrastructure.  Northern Telecom will hold 40 
percent of the stake of a manufacturing joint venture with Chinese 
partners in Shunde, Guangdong.  It will undertake the design, 
engineering, manufacturing, service, marketing, sale, and 
installation of switching products.  A research and development 
center will be set up to develop advanced hardware and software 
products related to telecommunications switching.  Northern Telecom 
will hold 55 percent of a very large scale integrated (VLSI) circuit 
joint venture in Shanghai with Shanghai IC Design Corporation, which 
will design and supply integrated circuits for the Shunde venture 
and other electronics manufacturers in China.  The third project 
will be another VLSI circuit manufacturing project in Shanghai. 
Northern Telecom will purchase a 25-percent direct equity stake in 
the existing joint venture, Philips Semiconductor Corporation of 
Shanghai.  The plant will provide VLSI circuits to Northern 
Telecom's joint venture in Shanghai.  (Beijing CHINA DAILY 25 Apr 94 
p 2) 

   Heilongjiang Imports Tire Production Line From Italy -- The 
Hualin Industrial Group of Heilongjiang Province on 22 April signed 
a contract with an Italian company in Harbin to import a tire 
production line.  The project, involving both technology and 
equipment, has been approved by the State Council.  It is estimated 
that by 1997, this industrial group will produce an annual tire 
output of 4 million tonnes and create 400 million yuan in profits 
and taxes and $40 million in foreign exchange.  (Harbin Heilongjiang 
Radio 2200 GMT 22 Apr 94) 

   Shandong's Yantai City Reports Foreign Investment Projects -- 
Yantai city in Shandong Province has made marked progress in opening 
to the outside world.  As of now, the city has introduced 101 large 
projects, each of which involves more than $10 million, and 154 high 
and new technology projects.  Since the beginning of 1993, Yantai 
has signed contracts on building 142 projects with foreign 
investments worth $340 million, accounting for 25.9 percent of the 
total foreign capital brought into the province during the year. 
(Jinan Shandong Radio 2300 GMT 22 Apr 94) 

   Heilongjiang, ROK Jointly Invest in Sanjiang Plain -- The 
Continent General Development Corporation of Korea, the Heilongjiang 
Government, and Heilongjiang Sanjiang Plain Agricultural Development 
Company Limited formally signed an agreement on taking a loan in 
U.S. dollars equivalent to 131.59 million yuan from the Korean side 
on 4 April.  The funding for carrying out the largest Sino-ROK 
joint-investment agricultural comprehensive development project is 
now in place.  Sino-ROK Heilongjiang Sanjiang Plain Agricultural 
Development Company was established on 17 April 1992; its 
subordinate enterprise, Touxing Farm, is located in Fujing City and 
covers an area of 570,000 mu.  This project includes the development 
of 200,000 mu of land in 1993, another 200,000 mu of land in 1994, 
and the rest of the land by the end of 1996.  The total investment 
is 227 million yuan, 170 million yuan of which will come from loans. 
The Chinese side is responsible for raising a loan worth 31.59 
million yuan, and the Korean side is responsible for raising a loan 
in U.S. dollars equivalent to 131.59 million yuan.  The annual 
interest rate for the loans raised by both sides will not be higher 
than 3 percent.  The loan period is 20 years and the loans will be 
evenly repaid within 15 years, starting on the sixth year after the 
loans have been granted.  The rest of the funds for this joint 
venture will come from bank loans.  (Harbin HEILONGJIANG RIBAO 5 Apr 
94 p 1) 

   Beijing-Japanese Electronics Joint Venture Established -- Beijing 
No. 3 Radio Equipment Plant and Murada Corporation of Japan recently 
signed a contract to form the Beijing-Murada Electronics Company 
Limited in Beijing.  With a total investment of $30 million, this 
company will mainly produce high-grade multilayered ceramic 
condenser sheets for various kinds of electronic machines.  It is 
expected that this company will go into production in the second 
half of 1994.  (Beijing BEIJING RIBAO 12 Apr 94 p 1) 

   Shenzhen Stock Exchange Now Open to Individual Japanese Investors 
-- The Shenzhen Stock Exchange was officially opened to Japanese 
retail investors on 20 April, becoming the 37th stock exchange to be 
endorsed by the Japanese Securities Dealers Association.  The 
Shanghai Exchange was approved by the association on 10 March.  The 
Shanghai and Shenzhen exchanges were previously open to Japan's 
corporate and institutional investors, but individual investors will 
now be able to invest directly in B-share stocks listed on both 
exchanges, or indirectly through investment trusts.  Shenzhen hopes 
to recruit major U.S. and Japanese investment houses to its trading 
floor as part of its plan to catch up with Shanghai.  Japanese 
brokers believe Shanghai is likely to keep most of the business. 
(Hong Kong EASTERN EXPRESS 20 Apr 94 p 26) 

   Malaysian, Singapore Firms Invest in Xiamen Steel Company -- 
Malaysian, Singapore, and Chinese enterprises have jointly invested 
$150 million in building a steel company in Xiamen, Fujian Province. 
The signing ceremony was held in Xiamen on 15 April.  The company, 
which will have a production capacity of 500,000 tonnes of smelted 
steel and 500,000 tonnes of rolled steel, will go into operation in 
July next year.  (Hong Kong WEN WEI PO 16 Apr 94 p a6) 

   Malaysian Company, Guangdong Sign Expressway Construction 
Contract -- A contract was signed in Guangzhou on 21 April by 
Guangdong and a Malaysian company for the construction of a 180-km 
expressway from Yangjiang's Yangxi to Zhanjiang's Suixi, a section 
of the Foshan-Zhanjiang Expressway.  The Malaysian company is 
responsible for raising the total investment of 6.68 billion yuan. 
Construction will start in the second half of 1995, and the project 
will be completed in 1998.  (Hong Kong WEN WEI PO 22 Apr 94 p a3) 

   Swiss Pesticide Company Invests in Qingdao Farm Chemicals Joint 
Venture -- Qingdao Pesticides Factory has signed an agreement with 
Ciba-Geigy AG to set up an $11.6-million joint venture in Qingdao. 
The Swedish company will hold 55 percent of Qingdao Ciba Agro, which 
will produce highly efficient farm chemicals.  The joint venture is 
expected to begin operation in 1996 and will employ about 180 
people.  This is Ciba-Geigy's 11th investment in China.  (Beijing 
CHINA DAILY 27 Apr 94 p 2) 

   Taiwan Industrial Village Established in Haikou Development Zone 
-- A Taiwan industrial village covering an area of 2,000 mu was 
established in the Yonggui Industrial Development Zone of Haikou 
City on 7 April.  The zone has good access roads and an adequate 
power supply.  A 16-kilovolt-ampere special power transmission line 
will be installed by the end of April, along with a 120-gate 
program-controlled telephone capacity.  Projects to be built in this 
industrial village include electronics, bioengineering, precision 
equipment, machinery, plastics, clothing industry, hydropower, 
medicine, and food projects.  (Hong Kong WEN WEI PO 18 Apr 94 p a6) 

   Industrial and Commercial Bank of China Sets Up Branch in Alma 
Ata -- The Industrial and Commercial Bank of China announced in 
Beijing on 20 April the official inauguration this month of a branch 
in Alma Ata City of the Kazakhstan Republic.  This is the third 
subsidiary set up by the bank abroad, following the establishment of 
its Singapore branch and Seoul representative office.  The bank 
plans to open branches and representative offices this year in Hong 
Kong, New York, Tokyo, and London.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 
0912 GMT 20 Apr 94) 

   Beijing Reports Quarterly Statistics on Foreign-Invested 
Enterprises -- By the end of March, Beijing Municipality had 
approved the establishment of 8,158 foreign-invested enterprises, 
with a total direct foreign investment of $11.229 billion.  An 
official from the Beijing Municipal Foreign Economic Relations and 
Trade Commission revealed that the number of foreign-invested 
enterprises that had started production had increased to 418, or 5.5 
times the number in the same period last year.  Foreign-invested 
enterprises are playing a more important role in Beijing's economic 
development.  In the first quarter of this year there were more than 
200,000 employees in foreign-invested enterprises, which produce an 
aggregate output value of 2.78 billion yuan.  More foreign companies 
have established headquarters in Beijing, such as the U.S. General 
Motors Corporation, the Swedish ABB, and the German Siemens Company. 
Major projects, including the fifth route of the Beijing subway, 
have drawn the interest of foreign investors.  In the first quarter 
of this year, Beijing's exports amounted to $558.97 million, an 
increase of 35.6 percent over the same period last year.  Its 
imports and exports were basically in balance.  (Hong Kong TA KUNG 
PAO 19 Apr 94 p 29) 

   Fujian Encourages Foreign Businesses To Develop Power Projects -- 
Fujian has adopted a preferential policy encouraging foreign 
businesses to develop power projects.  To guarantee reasonable 
returns, the terms for project development can follow international 
practice.  Foreign power projects can be designed and managed by 
investors themselves, or the electricity authorities of Fujian can 
contract to build or manage them.  The enterprise income tax for 
foreign power projects will be 15 percent.  If a foreign business 
runs a Sino-foreign project for 15 years or more, it can, upon 
approval by the tax authorities, be exempted from the enterprise 
income tax in the first five years beginning from the year it begins 
to make profits and be exempted from half the enterprise income tax 
in the next five years.  Where a Sino-foreign cooperative enterprise 
or a foreign-funded enterprise has difficulty paying tax after its 
two years of exemption from the enterprise income tax or after its 
three years of half-exemption from the enterprise income tax, it 
can, upon approval by the taxation authorities, have its period of 
tax exemption appropriately extended.  All foreign electricity 
projects are exempt from local income tax.  (Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO 
22 Apr 94 p 21) 

   Guangdong First-Quarter Industrial Output Increases 21.08 Percent 
-- Guangdong's gross industrial output value totaled 105.128 billion 
yuan for the first quarter, 21.08 percent higher than for the same 
period last year, according to the Guangdong Industrial Production, 
Marketing, and Major Product Output Monthly Bulletin.  First quarter 
export value accounted for 26.99 percent and new product output 
value for 2.42 percent of gross output value.  In the first quarter 
both the gross output value and the sales of heavy industry grew 
faster than those of light industry, while the gross output value 
and sales of the state-owned and collective-run industrial sectors 
grew slower than those of other economic sectors.  There were 25- 
percent increases or decreases in fully 50 percent of the product 
categories compared with the same period last year, which indicates 
a readjustment of the province's industrial product mix. (Beijing 
ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 1332 GMT 10 Apr 94) 

   PLA-Run Enterprises in Shenzhen Make Profits -- The 192 
enterprises in Shenzhen run by the People's Liberation Army last 
year had a total turnover of 3.19 billion yuan, turning over 460 
million yuan in profits and taxes and earning $33.394 million in 
foreign exchange.  The most successful, Sanjiu Enterprise Group, 
which is run by the General Logistics Department, had a turnover of 
2.45 billion yuan and made a profit of 320 million yuan.  Another, 
Nanfang Pharmaceutical Plant, made a profit of over 100 million 
yuan.  The following enterprises made a profit of more than 10 
million yuan each:  Jiuxing Printing and Packaging Center; Sanjiu 
Travel Service Company; Sanjiu Real Estate Development Company; Heli 
Science and Technology Development Company, run by the Commission of 
Science, Technology, and Industry for National Defense; and Great 
Wall (Huihua) Enterprise Group, run by the 42d Group Army.  (Hong 
Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE 0700 GMT 16 Apr 94) 

   Nearly 10,000 Foreign-Funded Enterprises Operating in Shenzhen -- 
A Shenzhen City report said that by March this year the number of 
registered foreign-funded enterprises in Shenzhen had reached 9,676. 
Of the newly registered foreign-funded enterprises, 60 have 
registered capital of over 10 million yuan each, including nine with 
registered capital of over 100 million yuan each.  In the first 
quarter, 36 Hong Kong, Macao, and foreign enterprises set up offices 
in Shenzhen, and 31 foreign-funded enterprises set up subsidiaries 
in the city.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 1217 GMT 21 Apr 94) 

   Guilin Liangjiang Airport Listed as National Key Project -- The 
State Planning Commission has officially listed the Guilin 
Liangjiang International Airport project as a national key project 
this year.  This project, with an investment budget of more than 1.4 
billion yuan, is designed to serve large airliners such as Boeing 
747's.  The project began last July.  The work done so far includes 
the movement of more than 3.06 million cubic meters of earth and 
stone, equivalent to 30.8 percent of the total site-leveling work. 
Meanwhile, the roadbed of the 25.6-km airport road system has been 
completed.  The project is expected to be completed by October 1995. 
(ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 0711 GMT 13 Apr 94) 

   First Privately Operated Airport Begins Operation in Hainan -- 
China's first privately operated airport, Chuncheng Airport in 
Tongza City of Hainan Province, started operation on 13 April after 
a successful test flight.  The airport, built by a Macao businessman 
with capital of 88 million yuan, is five km to the northwest of 
Tongza City and covers 1,980 mu.  Phase one of the airport project, 
which has been completed, includes a helicopter landing field.  The 
airport is expected to accommodate four small airplanes and eight 
helicopters by late 1995, when phase two of the project is 
completed.  (Beijing ZH0NGGUO XINWEN SHE 1231 GMT 13 Apr 94) 

   Hunan To Import 110,000-Set Program-Controlled Switchboards -- 
The Hunan Post and Telecommunications Bureau will spend $10 million 
in low-interest loans on importing automated switchboards with a 
110,000-set capacity from Germany's Siemens Company for rural 
telephone development.  The contract was signed in Changsha today. 
Since the 165 Telecommunications Project was launched, rapid 
progress has been made in Hunan's rural telecommunications 
undertakings.  Now the rural areas have switchboards with a total 
capacity of 280,000 telephones, of which automated switchboards are 
capable of handling 100,000.  However, the present rural 
telecommunications sector is far from meeting social demand.  The 
bureau raises funds using such methods as payment by installments 
and low-interest loans to develop rural telecommunications 
undertakings.  (Changsha Hunan People's Radio Network 2300 GMT 14 
Apr 94) 

   Shanghai Exports Increase 22 Percent in First Quarter -- An 
official of the Shanghai Municipal Foreign Economic Relations and 
Trade Commission said Shanghai's export volume totaled $1.748 
billion in the first quarter, an increase of 22 percent over the 
same period last year, with  machinery enjoying the widest growth 
margin.  He said Shanghai's foreign trade will keep growing this 
year, as the in-depth development of reform and the introduction of 
a uniform exchange rate for the RMB have offered enterprises the 
opportunity of fair competition and will in turn favor export trade. 
He also noted that Shanghai's export volume in 1993 totaled $7.38 
billion, an increase of 12.68 percent over the previous year.  (Hong 
Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE 1010 GMT 20 Apr 94) 

   Jiangsu County Promotes Investment From Hong Kong -- A 
representative of Jiangsu's Wuxi County says that Hong Kong's Ryoden 
Group will invest $25 million to build an air conditioner factory 
there.  In November last year, CITIC Hong Kong, a subsidiary of 
China International Trust and Investment Corporation (CITIC), 
invested 220 million yuan to merge the shares of three industrial 
enterprises in Wuxi County: the Wuxi County special steel tube 
factory, the postal and telecommunications cable factory, and the 
Huada electrical machinery factory.  CITIC Hong Kong holds more than 
51 percent of each of the three factories.  The county has 50 
investment projects for foreign investors to select from, including 
industrial projects, infrastructure projects, and real estate.  So 
far, the county has signed six contracts in Hong Kong involving a 
total investment of $12.55 million.  (Hong Kong WEN WEI PO 13 Apr 94 
p C3) 

   Hong Kong Bank Shifting Data Processing to Guangdong -- Hong Kong 
Bank is to shift much of its data processing to Guangdong Province 
to escape high labor costs and a serious shortage of clerical 
workers in the territory.  About 200 staff will be employed in the 
first phase of the project, and the move is expected to take place 
within the next two months.  Hong Kong Bank has already imported 
mainland Chinese staff to work as tellers in Hong Kong.  Citibank 
moved some clerical operations to Shenzhen in 1991, but 
"bureaucratic difficulties" forced it to move the operations back to 
Hong Kong shortly thereafter.  (Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA SUNDAY MORNING 
POST (SUNDAY MONEY) 17 Apr 94 p 1) 

   Hong Kong Manufacturing Sector Continues To Shrink -- Providing 
further evidence of Hong Kong's shrinking manufacturing sector, 
government figures show that industrial production and employment in 
manufacturing both fell last year.  The index of industrial 
production in 1993 fell by 0.8 percent from 1992, with the largest 
decline registered in the chemicals, rubber, and plastics sector, 
which fell 9.9 percent.  Production of metals and fabricated metal 
products was down 9.4 percent.  However, the output of the printing 
and paper products sector rose 12.8 percent and the production of 
machinery, parts, and components rose 12.7 percent.  Employment 
figures showed that 483,000 persons were employed in the 
manufacturing sector in December 1993, 14.4 percent fewer than last 
year, while factory workers average earnings fell 5.3 percent.  By 
contrast, employment in finance, insurance, real estate, and 
business services grew by 7.5 percent to 338,100, and earnings rose 
9.7 percent. (Hong Kong EASTERN EXPRESS 16-17 Apr 94 p 27) 

   Taiwan:  Cross-Strait Trade Slows in Wake of Boat Incident -- In 
the wake of the Chien-tao Lake (Qiandaohu) incident, which claimed 
the lives of 24 Taiwan tourists, the Ministry of Economic Affairs 
(MOEA) on 19 April decided to temporarily slow the import of semi- 
finished products and agricultural and industrial raw materials from 
the mainland.  The Ministry of Finance will also take measures to 
control cross-strait commercial exchanges.  According to the MOEA, 
1,788 kinds of mainland semi-finished goods and raw materials are 
currently allowed to be imported to Taiwan, and Taiwan had 
originally planned to deregulate the import of 2,500 more items this 
year.  That goal seems unattainable now because of the incident. 
(Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 20 Apr 94 p 1) 

   Budget Frozen for Third Phase of Six-Year Plan Transportation 
Projects -- Because construction of principal transportation 
projects under the Six-Year National Development Plan has seriously 
fallen behind schedule, the Directorate General of Budget, 
Accounting, and Statistics under the Executive Yuan has decided not 
to budget for the third phase of these projects for the time being 
to avoid expanding government debt.  According to the Finance 
Ministry, the Central Government's outstanding loans totaled $24.1 
billion by the end of March 1994, but it has only issued bonds worth 
$15.35 million so far.  Among the unissued bonds, $7.9 million is 
allotted to the first and second phases of the aforementioned 
projects. (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 14 Apr 94 p 1) 

   Low Growth of First Quarter Exports 'Surprises' Economic Council 
-- To the surprise of the Council for Economic Planning and 
Development, Taiwan's exports in the first quarter of this year grew 
by only 0.4 percent amid global economic recovery.  It seems that 
Taiwan's competitiveness in exporting to developed countries has 
also declined.  Exports to the United States, Japan, and Europe 
dropped by 5 percent, 0.7 percent, and 8.3 percent respectively in 
the first quarter.  Machinery imports in the first quarter were down 
2.6 percent from the same quarter of last year.  However, the export 
structure has continued to improve.  Exports of heavy chemical- 
industrial products accounted for 53.8 percent of the total, and 
exports of electronics and electric appliances rose by 10.8 percent. 
Shoe exports suffered the hardest blow, with a decline of 48.4 
percent.  A researcher from the council said that Taiwan's poor 
export results could be attributed to competition from Mexico and 
mainland China or because exports from a third location have 
increased.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 17 Apr 94 p 5) 

   NORTH KOREA:  Mt. Paektu Development Plan Experiences 
Difficulties -- According to a South Korean government publication, 
North Korea has launched a study to turn the country's scenic Mt. 
Paektu region into a modern tourist attraction, but the actual 
development of the site has not advanced very far because of a lack 
of investment and technology, the country's isolation, and 
international tension due to the nuclear problem.  A comprehensive 
study on the Mt. Paektu project reportedly began in 1988, when the 
DPRK government apparently conceived of the project as a way of 
earning foreign currency with relatively little investment and of 
bolstering the legitimacy of the regime by playing up Kim Il-song's 
and Kim Chong-il's links to the site. 

   As part of the development plan, the government has reportedly 
paved roads leading to the mountain, has been installing cable cars, 
and has begun the construction of tourist villages in nearby areas. 
However, progress at these sites has been slowed by a shortage of 
resources.  Log cabin-style hotel construction at various sites 
around Mt. Paektu has also reportedly advanced slowly, and so far 
only a 47-room hotel on the mountain and a small tourist village 
have been completed.  Total lodging capacity for tourists in the 
nearby towns has reportedly reached about 8,800 people.  (Seoul 
NAEWOE TONGSIN 7 April 94 pp C8-C13) 

   SOUTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  Cooperation Between Rival Enterprises 
Booming -- SUMMARY:  According to ROK press reports, South Korean 
enterprises are increasingly entering into cooperative agreements 
with their domestic rivals.  Through such agreements, both parties 
can gain access to each other's technologies and expertise, reduce 
duplication of effort in developing new technologies, and move 
toward developing new technologies and products.  According to one 
source, cooperation even extends to joint research efforts between 
civilian firms and government research institutes. 

   The 6 April CHUGAN MAEGYONG reported that recently there has been 
a "boom" in cooperation between "rival" ROK enterprises.  The 
journal cited a university professor's comment that in the past 
coalitions had centered around production, while today's coalitions 
center more and more on sharing marketing and technology.  Indeed, 
cooperation between competing enterprises has spread from simply 
buying each other's parts or sharing certain tasks to jointly 
developing core technologies.  Examples of cooperation can involve 
ROK firms operating in the domestic market, ROK firms working 
together overseas, or even ROK firms teaming up with government 
research institutes to develop new technologies. 

   There are many cooperative arrangements between firms operating 
within South Korea itself, according to CHUGAN MAEGYONG.  For 
instance, Samsung Group and Kia Group are cooperating on a concrete 
pumping vehicle and an eight-ton hydraulic truck crane.  Samsung 
Heavy Industries will continue to maintain cooperative relations 
with Kia for commercial and technological reasons, even as it begins 
producing commercial vehicles in May.  In the airline industry, 
rivals Korean Airlines (KAL) and Asiana Airlines have agreed to use 
a joint ticketing system.  In addition, KAL has moved some offices 
into the city air terminal in Seoul, even though it is owned by 
Kumho Group, the parent organization of Asiana Airlines.  There is 
cooperation of a different sort in the petrochemical industry.  In 
order to shake off the recession that followed excess production of 
petrochemicals, producers are working on an agreement to halt 
excessive competition and to cut and regulate production.  Heavy 
machinery manufacturers are also cooperating by purchasing each 
other's domestically made parts.  By using these parts instead of 
imported Japanese- or German-made ones, the firms can effectively 
cut their components costs by more than 30 percent. 

   The electronics sector is where cooperation between firms has 
flourished most, CHUGAN MAEGYONG reported.  Thanks to a cross- 
licensing agreement between Samsung Electronics and Goldstar, the 
two companies can use each other's patented television technologies 
without compensation.  The journal commented that this is of 
symbolic" importance,  because it has allowed the firms to stop 
investing in redundant technology development and move ahead with 
other developments.  Last year Goldstar Industrial Systems and Kia 
Machine Tools used their core technologies to jointly develop an 
indigenous robot.  Also, in a technology-sharing agreement between 
Haitai Electronics and Samsung, Samsung supplies product ideas and 
technology to Haitai, which commercializes and sells the new 
product.  For its part, Haitai disburses to Samsung 1 billion won 
($1.25 million) annually in technology fees.  According to CHUGAN 
MAEGYONG, this is the first agreement in which domestic firms share 
product ideas rather than manufacturing technology.  The journal 
opined that in the future there would be additional strategic 
coalitions of various types between ROK firms. 

   The 8 March HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN reported an increase in 
manufacturers' efforts to cooperate on technology development. 
According to the daily, materials producers and consumers are 
working together to develop new materials or new products that use 
new materials.  For example, Pohang Iron and Steel (POSCO), Pusan 
Pipe, Kohap Steel, and Kyongan Industries are cooperating on 
materials development.  HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN noted that thus far 
they have developed a material called 304N1 that is stronger and 
more corrosion resistant than existing stainless steels.  Another 
example of such cooperation is Taehan Aluminum and Sam-young 
Electronics' success in developing an aluminum that is 99.999- 
percent pure.  In addition to working to develop new materials, 
firms also often work to find uses for their discoveries.  For 
example, Taehan Aluminum and Sam-young Electronics are working with 
electronics firms to develop manufacturing technologies for 
semiconductor components that would use their ultra-pure aluminum. 
In the steel sector, Kyoryang Housing plans to work with 
construction firms to develop strong structural materials and 
construction technologies, and thus increase the use of steel in the 
construction industry. 

   ROK firms are not just cooperating in the domestic arena.  They 
are also working together to build a "common front" overseas, CHUGAN 
MAEGYONG explained.  In these cases, firms feel they must cooperate 
to compete against foreign firms in overseas markets.  According to 
the journal, there are more and more examples of domestic firms 
"clearing away" foreign firms and accepting joint orders for ships 
or construction projects.  For example, in June 1993 Hyundai Heavy 
Industries and Samsung Heavy Industries joined forces to win a $260- 
million bid to build four oil tankers for India's state-run shipping 
company.  Hyundai Construction and Ssangyong Construction joined 
hands and won a bid for a $620-million building project in 
Singapore.  In Europe, ROK TV manufacturers are working with ROK 
parts manufacturers. 

   In addition to citing examples of cooperation between civilian 
firms, CHUGAN MAEGYONG reported on cooperation between civilian and 
government entities.  The journal cited the development of HDTV, one 
of South Korea's so-called G7 projects, as an example.  In this 
case, the Korea Academy of Industrial Technology (KAITECH) worked 
with three civilian firms--Samsung Electronics, Goldstar Micronics, 
and Orion Electronics--to develop a 34-inch braun tube for use in an 
HDTV set.  The development of the TDX is another example of 
civilian-government cooperation, according to CHUGAN MAEGYONG.  The 
government's Electronics and Telecommunications Research Institute 
(ETRI) has worked with four firms over a long period to develop a 
TDX that could both satisfy domestic demand and be exported 
overseas.  The government did so in order to set up a domestic 
telecommunications industry that would be self-supporting, the 
journal noted. 

   The following is a list of current cooperative arrangements 
between ROK firms, as reported by CHUGAN MAEGYONG. 

                      Technical Cooperation 

   1.  Goldstar-Samsung Electronics (patent 
sharing):  share about 2,000 TV-related patents. 

   2.  Goldstar Electronics-Kia Machine Tools (joint development): 
development of  an indigenous robot. 

   3.  Orion Electronics-Korea Tungsten Mining (joint development): 
development of rhemium tungsten wire. 

   4.  Samyang-Pusan Pipe (joint systems management):  set up and 
management of a computer system (set up, manage Korea ICM) 

                     Production, Sales Cooperation 

   5.  Samsung Electronics-Goldstar-Daewoo (joint production, 
sales):  production and sales of large home appliances. 

   6.  Samsung Heavy Industries-Daewoo Heavy Industries (parts 
purchases):  purchases of each other's key machinery components. 

   7.  Hwasung-Kukje-Kolon (joint marketing):  set up shared 
salesrooms overseas, joint marketing. 

                     Overseas Cooperation 

   8.  Hyundai-Daewoo-Samsung (international bidding):  joint order 
for Saudi crude oil tanker. 

   9.  Hyundai Construction-Ssangyong Construction (overseas 
construction):  joint order for Singaporean construction project. 

   10. TV manufacturers-TV parts producers (moving into European 
market):  strengthened cooperation between parts producers, supply 
parts to TV makers. 

                      Civilian-Government Joint Research 

   11. KAITECH-Samsung-Goldstar-Orion Electronics (joint 
development):  development of braun tube for HDTV's. 

   12. ETRI-businesses (civilian-government joint development): 
development of TDX 

   FEATURE:  KAERI Head Calls For Restructuring ROK's Nuclear 
Industry -- SUMMARY:  The director of South Korea's Atomic Energy 
Research Institute (KAERI) complained in a recent press article 
about the possible impact of Uruguay Round (UR) limits on the ROK's 
nuclear industry and what he perceives as the "advanced countries'" 
efforts to restrict "proliferation" of nuclear technology.  These 
potential foreign challenges must be met, in his view, by taking a 
fresh look at the structure of South Korea's nuclear industry from R 
and D to management, and by greater efforts toward indigenous 
nuclear development. 
   Sin Chae-in, director of KAERI, stated his views in the February 
Seoul WONJARYOK SANOP on how the "new international rules" could 
affect South Korea's nuclear development.  According to Sin, the 
"Uruguay Round in part reflected the intention of the advanced 
countries to perpetually maintain the present system of advanced and 
backward nations."  The new world arena, according to Sin, though 
called "equitable" and "cooperative," is really a "gruesome game in 
which people without power are forced to submit" to those with 
power, particularly to those who possess advanced technology.  With 
the limitations created by the UR on the ability of less advanced 
countries to subsidize their own industrial technologies, and with 
other new "rounds" looming, "the most important thing for South 
Korea is to read the winds of change correctly" and act to protect 
itself. 

   Sin predicted that the December 1993 UR agreement would erode 
"the ROK government's ability to defend the country's beginning 
stage technology." According to Sin, special government subsidies to 
industry are to stop, with subsidies for technical development 
reduced from 100 percent of R and D costs to 75 percent.  Although 
such restrictions do not apply to the nuclear industry as yet, Sin 
observed, their scope will probably expand, making it "urgent" for 
the ROK to work out "countermeasures" to protect its developing 
nuclear technology.  South Korea has also signed the Government 
Procurement Agreement which requires companies located in signatory 
states, such as the Korea Electric Power Corporation (KEPCO), to 
open equipment and construction bids to foreign companies.  The 
United States and Canada's "insistence" on opening South Korea's 
markets, Sin asserted, is a "sure sign" these countries plan to 
compete with South Korea in the domestic nuclear power market. 
Thus, not only is the ROK's "technical independence" in nuclear 
power threatened, so is its "nuclear infrastructure." 

   The KAERI director also expressed his dissatisfaction with 
efforts being made by the "advanced countries" to limit the spread 
of nuclear technology.  In his view, "the moves t9ward strengthening 
the international nuclear non-proliferation system going on now in 
international atomic energy circles can also be seen as part of the 
tendency" of advanced countries to "control" those less advanced. 
In this "David vs. Goliath" world, &amp;outh Korea must rethink all 
"pending problems" that pertain to nuclear power from a fresh 
perspective, including nuclear power administration, the "direction 
of R and D," and securing of nuclear materials.  The strength to 
survive in today's world must come through technology based on 
indigenous R and D.  According to Sin, "The era when technology 
could be copied from other countries has already passed." 

   KIST Develops Super-Smooth Automated Metal Grinder -- The Korea 
Institute of Science and Technology's (KIST) electromechanical 
research division has developed a high-speed intelligent robot 
system able to finish-grind metal materials three times faster than 
existing equipment with double the smoothness.  Instead of using a 
conventional zigzag motion, KIST's device uses a computer-controlled 
"directionless grinding pattern" that increases surface smoothness 
from 9 to 4 microns (one micron = one millionth of a meter).  The 
system reportedly functions exceptionally well in corners "and on 
curved surfaces." 

   KIST claims the robot performs better than competitive machinery 
made in Japan, which reportedly is mechanically controlled, requires 
more manual operations, and can be used with only a limited number 
of shapes.  KIST, a government-funded institute within the Ministry 
of Science and Technology, recently contracted to transfer the 
technology to the South Korean firm Hwacheon Machinery Works, for 
which KIST will receive a two percent royalty on earnings until 
2001.  (Seoul HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN 22 Mar 92 p 17) 
   Corporate Technical Colleges 'Rapidly Increasing' -- The number 
of colleges established within ROK industrial enterprises is rapidly 
increasing, as South Korean companies seek to train a cadre of 
professionals able to deal with the challenges of 
internationalization.  At present, 29 such facilities are offering 
undergraduate and graduate level programs to some 3,000 employees; 
another 4,000 have already graduated.  Instruction is practically 
oriented with an emphasis on technologies of interest to the 
company.  Although graduates do not receive degrees honored by 
society, they are treated within the company the same as employees 
with regular diplomas.  College and junior (technical) college level 
programs running one to four years are offered by 25 major South 
Korean firms.  Four companies--Samsung, Hyundai, Korea Telecom, and 
the Korea Electric Power Corporation--offer two-year graduate 
programs with courses in foreign languages, computers, factory 
automation, management, information science, communications, and a 
wide selection of engineering courses.  Faculty are drawn from 
nearby colleges and are supported by employees with advanced 
degrees.  (Seoul CHUGAN MAEGYONG 13 Apr 94 pp 44-47) 

   ROK Chip Makers Shifting R and D to Non-Memory Devices -- South 
Korea's three major semiconductor manufacturers are pressing ahead 
"full-scale" with plans to become world class producers of non- 
memory chips.  Samsung Electronics is investing 96 billion won ($120 
million) in non-memory R and D this year, doubling last year's 
amount.  The company will use its Kihung laboratory exclusively for 
application-specific integrated circuit (ASIC) research, and is 
setting up its Suwon lab as a "design research facility for high 
value-added set ASIC's."  Gallium-arsenide and special purpose chips 
are being developed through Samsung's U.S.-based subsidiary 
(formerly Harris Microwave Semiconductor) and through a joint 
venture with the U.S. firm Array.  Samsung expects to increase its 
ratio of non-memory to memory chip sales from 20 percent at present 
to 40 percent by 1996. 

   Hyundai Electronics will dedicate its No. 2 laboratory at Inchon 
to non-memory semiconductor research, and devote "most of its 
efforts" to developing high value-added products, such as chip sets 
for computers, reduced instruction set computing chips, and 
semiconductors for use with optical-electronic devices.  Domestic 
research will be enhanced by the transfer of personnel from the 
company's U.S.-based facility in Silicon Valley.  Hyundai is also 
setting up non-memory design centers in the United States and 
Taiwan, and plans to expand "exchanges" with foreign technical 
personnel.  Goldstar Electron, for its part, has raised its non- 
memory semiconductor sales target 300 percent over 1993.  Production 
will be facilitated by the introduction of inspection equipment 
worth 50 billion won ($62.5 million) by the end of April.  (Seoul 
HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN 3 Mar 94 p 10) 

   ROK Government Body Facilitating Transfer of Advanced U.S. 
Technology -- South Korea's Small and Medium Business Promotion 
Corporation is helping transfer advanced U.S. electrical, 
electronic, and computer technology to ROK firms by acting as an 
intermediary for Silicon Valley-based U.S. companies "looking for 
overseas partners."  The ROK government-affiliated corporation 
recently received information through "a U.S. organization 
specializing in technology evaluation and technology transfer" about 
seven Silicon Valley firms that are seeking foreign cooperation on a 
number of high-tech projects.  These projects include joint 
investment on a device to detect impurities in liquids; technical 
partnership or joint investment in a phone system that combines 
automatic answering and voice mail for private telephone exchanges; 
and technical partnerships for the following:  wireless data 
communications for new, low-cost personal computers; a commercial 
sprayer for high-density coatings on automobiles; a remote control 
switch for household electrical appliances; a computer main disk; 
and a high-resolution projection display.  The corporation expects 
to receive 5-6 references per month from the U.S. organization, 
which it will match up U.S. firms with the appropriate small and 
medium-size South Korean manufacturers.  (Seoul HANGUK KYONGJE 
SINMUN 2 Apr 94 p 10) 

   KTB, SSTC Set Up Joint-Venture Consulting Firm in Beijing -- KTB 
Consulting and China's State Science and Technology Commission 
(SSTC) are setting up a joint-venture consulting firm in Beijing. 
The venture will be called the Longhan High Tech Development 
Consulting Ltd. and will be capitalized at $1 million.  KTB will 
have a 60 percent interest in the venture and hold the managing 
rights, while Sinotechmart, an affiliate of the SSTC, will have a 40 
percent interest.  There are plans for 24 small and medium ROK 
businesses to invest $600,000 of KTB's investment share.  Longhan 
will help arrange Sino-ROK joint ventures, technology transfers, 
trade mediation, and market surveys.  KTB Consulting is also 
considering setting up a joint venture consulting company in 
Vietnam.  (MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 21 Mar 94 p 10) 

   Kim Chang-tal, the head of Longhan, noted that the consulting 
firm will give ROK small and medium businesses a route by which to 
move into the Chinese market.  He commented that previously these 
businesses had to depend upon their connections, and that their 
investments in China were of a piecemeal nature.  Now, with the help 
of Longhan, they will be able to systematically assess the 
commercial soundness of their investment plans.  This will help 
reduce investment risks and costs.  The joint-venture consulting 
firm will work to find superior Chinese technologies and guide ROK 
small and medium businesses toward commercializing these 
technologies.  In the long run, Longhan will set up a database which 
will include information (business and technological) on Chinese 
enterprises that could be potential cooperative partners for such 
ROK businesses. (HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN 28 Mar 94 p 10) 

   Samsung Aerospace Establishes Research Center in Moscow -- 
Samsung Aerospace Company has set up an ultramodern technology 
research center in Moscow, Russia.  The center, located at the 
Moscow Institute of Physics and Technology, began full operations on 
26 April.  The center will employ 1,300 researchers, and bring 
together Russia's advanced technology in various industrial fields. 
With the establishment of the center, Samsung Aerospace will 
accelerate its technology development in advanced fields.  (Seoul 
MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 27 Apr 94 p 9) 

   Researchers Develop Scanning Ion Microscope -- A Kwangwoon 
University research team has developed the ROK's first "scanning ion 
microscope," used to make semiconductors, medical micro-robots, and 
other advanced products.  The instrument, also called a "focused ion 
beam (FIB) system," has the functions of an electron microscope and 
microscopic processing equipment.  The research team began the 
project in 1988 with 800 million won ($1 million) in university and 
government support.  Advanced nations first developed the microscope 
in the mid-1980's.   Currently there are only about 300 in use 
worldwide, nine of them in South Korea, although next year ROK 
demand is expected to reach 20 microscopes.  If South Korea can 
produce the instruments domestically, it will be able to save about 
20 billion won ($25 million) in import costs annually.  (Seoul 
YONHAP 0213 GMT 21 Apr 94) 

   Researchers Develop Semiconductor for Mobile Telephones -- After 
two years of research, a semiconductor research team at the 
Electronics and Telecommunications Research Institute (ETRI) has 
developed a GaAs (Gallium Arsenide) powered MESFET (metal 
semiconductor field effect transistor), a key component in making 
super-lightweight mobile telephones.  The GaAs MESFET works on 3.3 
volts, has a maximum output capacity of 1.6 watts, and has a power 
converting efficiency of 64 percent.  Mobile phones currently on 
sale are equipped with 5.8- or 4.7-volt MESFET's.  While the United 
States and Japan have developed integrated circuits for ultra-light 
cellular phones, they have been slow in their research of 3.3-volt 
MESFET's.  The new MESFET will reduce the weight of a mobile phone 
battery to 30 grams, compared to current weights of 100 grams. 
Samsung and Hyundai Electronics will start manufacturing mobile 
phones equipped with the new MESFET in the latter half of 1994. 
(Seoul YONHAP 0514 GMT 21 Apr 94) 

   Hanil Scientists Develop Anti-Cancer Protein -- South Korean 
scientists have unveiled an anti-cancer mutant protein, which they 
call Tumor Necrosis Factor (TNF) alpha mutein.  The protein is the 
product of a three-year study on biotechnology applications by the 
Hanhyo Institute of Technology, which was set up in 1991 by the 
Hanil Synthetic Fiber Industry Co. to promote biotechnology and 
chemistry.  Unlike other anti-cancer agents, the TNF protein causes 
no side effects, because it attacks cancer cells without harming 
normal tissue.  Researchers claim the product is over 30 times more 
effective than existing tumor necrotizing factors.  Laboratory tests 
on animals show the product is effective against breast, uterine, 
and larynx cancer.  Hanil obtained an ROK patent for TNF last year 
and has filed for patents in the United States, Britain, Germany, 
France, and Japan.  (Seoul YONHAP 0531 GMT 14 Apr 94) 

   Ssangyong Exports Mini-Diesel Generators to Philippines -- 
Ssangyong Heavy Industries recently exported mini-diesel power 
generators to the Philippines.  The company has supplied 3,500- 
kilowatt diesel power generator facilities, worth 2.4 billion won 
($3 million), to the Philippine company Paper City.  Installation is 
scheduled to be completed by the end of June.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE 
SINMUN 24 Apr 94 p 6) 

   Second Daewoo Mart Opens in Rangoon -- Daewoo Corporation, the 
trading arm of the Daewoo Group, recently opened its second 
department store in Rangoon, Burma.  The company opened its first 
store there in February.  The new department store, "Daewoo Mart," 
was built at a cost of $200,000.  Myanmar Daewoo International, a 
textile maker set up by Daewoo, covered the cost.  Daewoo, which 
opened its first office in Burma in 1985, exported $16 million worth 
of products to the country last year.  (Seoul THE KOREA TIMES 24 Apr 
94 p 8) 

   Hanil Synthetic Fibers To Operate Plant in Shandong -- The 
Qingdao Hanil Spinning Co., Ltd., a joint venture between Hanil 
Synthetic Fibers and the Qingdao Number One Fiber Spinning Plant, 
will soon begin operations.  Hanil placed two conditions on its 
agreement to provide the $5 million plant for the venture.  First, 
it would be the sole provider of raw material to the Qingdao Number 
One Fiber Spinning Plant.  Second, it would receive royalties equal 
to 4.5 percent of the new plant's sales profits for the next 10 
years.  The plant is expected to earn $19 million annually from 
sales.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 21 Apr 94 p 10) 

   Samsung To Export Mobile Telephone System to Russia -- Samsung 
Electronics will export a mobile telephone system to Tumen, Russia. 
The system will include 6,400 lines of TDX-1B time division exchange 
and 1,600 lines of its modified TDX-10, developed with Samsung's own 
technology.  It will also include a microwave transmission system 
and private switchboards.  Samsung Electronics received the $20 
million order in April 1993, and hopes to export more mobile 
telephone systems to Russia in the future.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE 
SINMUN 21 Apr 94 p 21) 

   Daelim Receives New Overseas Construction Orders -- Daelim 
Industries recently received three overseas construction orders 
worth a total of $130 million.  These include a power plant in 
Egypt, a gas processing facility project in Saudi Arabia, and a 
construction project in Brunei.  The power plant order from the 
Egyptian Government is worth $63 million, and the project will last 
for 40 months.  The gas project in Saudi Arabia is a joint venture 
with a U.S. company.  The project will take 30 months.  Daelim has 
also received an order to renovate a Shell company building in 
Brunei.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 18 Apr 94 p 29) 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA - INDONESIA:  Oil Investment Continues Despite 
Falling Prices -- The director of exploration and production for 
Pertamina says that investment in oil exploration has continued 
despite declining prices over the past few months.  The government 
has introduced new incentives for foreign contractors to develop new 
fields in the frontier regions.  Pertamina's 1994 target is to 
secure $600 million worth of investment in the oil and gas 
exploration industry.  (Jakarta SUARA PEMBARUAN 30 Mar 94 p 4) 

   Textile Exports Increase; Value Declines -- Department of Trade 
data shows that exports of fabric, yarn, and other textiles 
increased in volume by 20 percent to 441,240 tons last year from 
367,560 tons in 1992, but a 22.5 percent decline in prices caused 
the export value to decrease 7 percent to $2.63 billion.  Exports of 
garments rose 17.8 percent to 227,690 tons, but a 6.1 percent 
decline in prices caused their value to increase by only 10.6 
percent to $3.5 billion.  Revenue from the export of textiles and 
textile products increased by 2.2 percent to $6.13 billion. 
(Jakarta THE JAKARTA POST 8 Apr 94 p 8) 

   Export, Import of Electronic Goods -- Department of Industry data 
shows that the export value of electronic goods rose by an average 
of 82 percent per annum from 1989 to 1992.  Between January and 
November 1993, export value reached $1.083 billion.  The import 
value of electronic components between January and November 1993 
increased to $838.74 million compared to $261.75 million during the 
same period in 1989.  (Jakarta SUARA PEMBARUAN 18 Mar 94 p 4) 

   Two-Way Trade With PRC Increases -- Minister of Trade Satrio 
Budiarjo said that two-way trade between Indonesia and the PRC 
increased from $1.14 billion in 1990 to $2.18 billion in 1993. 
Indonesia's trade surplus with the PRC grew from $182.1 million in 
1990 to $313.5 million in 1993.  (Jakarta THE JAKARTA POST 6 Apr 94 
p 9) 

   Taiwanese To Develop Petrochemical Plant -- A 45-member Taiwanese 
consortium has agreed to build a petrochemical plant in Tuban, East 
Java with a $1 billion investment.  (Jakarta KOMPAS 4 Apr 94 p 2) 

   Mitsui Petrochemical To Establish Manufacturing Plant -- Mitsui 
Petrochemical Industries, Ltd. recently announced plans to construct 
a high-grade terephthalic acid manufacturing plant in Merak, West 
Java.  The plant, which is expected to start operations in early 
1997, will have an annual capacity of 350,000 tons.  Mitsui 
Petrochemical will have a 45-percent share in this plant, the 
Chicago-based Amoco Chemical Co. 50 percent, and Nitsui and Co. the 
remaining 5 percent.  (Jakarta KOMPAS 5 Apr 94 p 5) 

   Open Bidding Expected for Power Plant Construction -- Samsudin 
Warsa, officer-in-charge of the East Java state-owned power company 
PLN stated that the government intends to use several contractors 
for the construction of the 800-MW thermal power plant in East Java. 
Samsudin said the company will soon open the bidding for the 
project.   (Jakarta KOMPAS 24 Mar 94 p 3) 

   LAOS:  Norway Grants Aid for Hydropower Project -- A Norwegian 
Government representative recently signed an agreement with Lao 
Deputy Industry and Handicraft Minister Khammon Phonkeo, to provide 
Laos with $5.5 million in aid for the construction of the Nam Theun- 
Hin Boun Hydropower Project. (Vientiane KPL English 0911 GMT 20 Apr 
94) 

   Swedish Organization Provides Development Loan -- Swedish Charge 
D'Affaires Rolf Carlman, representing the Nordic Fund,  and Lao 
Deputy Finance Minister Kikham Vongsai recently signed a $6.3- 
million loan for infrastructure projects, such as airport 
improvements, in Laos.  The loan carries a low interest rate and a 
long-term repayment plan.  (Vientiane KPL English 0800 GMT 27 Apr 
94) 

   MALAYSIA:  Trade, Investment With Sri Lanka Noted -- The 
Malaysian Chamber of Commerce and Industry reported that bilateral 
trade with Sri Lanka reached $135 million last year.  Malaysia 
exported $130 million in goods and services to Sri Lanka and 
imported only $5 million.  The Chamber of Commerce also reported 
that, to date, 15 companies have invested a total of $50 million in 
Sri Lanka.  These investments have been in the manufacturing, 
textiles, telecommunications, hotel, and catering sectors.  (Kuala 
Lumpur UTUSAN MALAYSIA 31 Mar 94 p 2) 

   NEC Wins Fiber Optic Cable Contract -- The Malaysian 
Telecommunication Company has awarded a $170.4 million contract to 
Japan's NEC Corporation to install a high-capacity fiber optic 
submarine cable system linking peninsular Malaysia with Labuan, 
Sabah, and Sarawak.  The 2,332-km link, called the Malaysian 
Domestic Submarine Cable System, will utilize the latest optical 
amplifier technology.  (Kuala Lumpur NEW STRAITS TIMES 16 Apr 94 p 
13) 

   PHILIPPINES:  Trade Agreements With Vietnam Signed -- President 
Ramos recently signed five trade agreements with Vietnam, two of 
which are expected to generate $110 million in bilateral trade, 
covering imports such as rice, nuts, corn, and anthracite coal, and 
exports such as agricultural equipment, fertilizer, garments, 
construction material, and motorcycles.  The other agreements 
involve infrastructure projects in Vietnam, joint-venture 
engineering-consultancy services, and a joint organic fertilizer 
research agreement between the Philippine Phosphate Fertilizer Corp. 
and the Vietnamese Institute of Agricultural Sciences.  (Manila 
BALITA 31 Mar 94 pp 1, 2) 

   SINGAPORE:  Japanese Firms To Expand Petrochemical Complex -- 
Three Japanese companies have secured $1.2 billion in contracts from 
companies who are expanding Singapore's petrochemical complex.  The 
contracts cover the engineering, procurement, and construction of a 
second ethylene plant by Petrochemical Corporation of Singapore 
(PCS) on Pulau Ayer Merbau and the construction of a new styrene 
monomer and propylene oxide complex--to be finished by mid-1997--on 
neighboring Pulau Seraya by Seraya Chemicals Singapore.  PCS will 
supply feedstock to Seraya Chemicals, which is a 70:30 joint venture 
between Shell and Mitsubishi.  The contracts, worth more than $600 
million, are for the construction of an ethylene plant by JGC 
Corporation, offsite facilities and utility plants by Chiyoda 
Corporation, and plants to produce aromatics, methyl-tertiary-butyl- 
ether, and butene-1 by Mitsui Engineering and Shipbuilding.  Shell 
has awarded the construction of the Seraya Chemicals complex to 
Chiyoda Corporation at a cost of over $600 million.  Using mainly 
Shell technology, the complex is expected to be ready for start-up 
in the second quarter of 1997.  (Singapore THE STRAITS TIMES 16 Apr 
94 p 47) 

   THAILAND:  Car Makers Get Export, Domestic Sales Incentives -- 
The Board of Investment (BOI) has decided to spur the auto industry 
by extending promotional privileges to factories--not in Bangkok or 
its immediate environs--that produce cars for export and domestic 
sales.  Plants in Zone 2 would receive a 50 percent tax reduction on 
machinery and a seven-year exemption from corporate tax on exported 
products.  Zone 3 factories would be exempt from import duties on 
machinery.  They would pay no corporate taxes for eight years and 
would get a 50 percent corporate tax exemption for an additional 
five years.  They would also enjoy a 25 percent reduction in costs 
related to transportation, electricity, and water supply. 
Additional privileges would be given to companies exporting over 
1,000 cars a year, including a tax reduction on local spare parts 
used to produce them.  The B0I reiterated a pledge to encourage 
relocation of industries to the provinces.  Auto plants doing so 
will receive corporate tax exemptions if they export products. 
(Bangkok BANGKOK POST 19 Apr 94 p 19) 

   Minister Comments on Energy Reserves -- Industry Minister Sanan 
Khachonprasat said that the discovery of 42 petroleum deposits will 
enable Thailand to produce crude oil for the next 20 years and 
natural gas for the next 44 years. These reserves are worth $36 
billion.  (Bangkok Radio Thailand Network 0000 GMT 25 Apr 94) 

   Burma Buys Electricity for Border Town -- Chunlaphong Chunlaket, 
governor of the Provincial Electricity Authority (PEA), disclosed 
that on 25 April the PEA signed a five-year agreement with the Shan 
State of Burma on the sale of electricity to Thachilek.  The Burmese 
will pay what Thai consumers do--about 10 cents per unit. The 
agreement will be renewable on a year-to-year basis.  Chunlaphong 
said that the PEA received permission from the cabinet on 22 April 
to sell electricity to border towns in Burma, Cambodia, Laos, and 
southern China.  The volume for each sale will range between 500 and 
2,000 kilowatts.  (Bangkok PHUCHATKAN 26 Apr 94 p 4) 

   Firm To Open Cement Plant in Cambodia -- Siam Cement Co will open 
its ready-mix concrete plant in Phnom Penh in the next two months 
according to Wira Phatanaphan, managing director of Concrete 
Products and Aggregate Co (CPAC) Ltd, a unit of Siam Cement.  The 
plant has a production capacity of 60,000 cubic meters per year and 
will cost $800,000.  CPAC Ready-mixed Concrete Co. Ltd. will own 40 
percent of the project with another 40 percent owned by Cambodian 
banks.  Annual demand for cement is -forecast to rise by 15 percent 
annually.  (Bangkok THE NATION 28 Apr 94 p B1) 

   VIETNAM:  FEATURE:  Mekong Delta Paddy Prices Decline Steadily -- 
SUMMARY:  Press articles report a steady decline in, paddy prices in 
the Mekong Delta.  The government has implemented 'emergency 
measures" to assure funding for rice purchases.  Prices are below 
production costs. 

   The 17 March THOI BAO KINH TE SAIGON reported that since mid- 
February, Delta paddy prices have been declining steadily and "will 
continue to do so."  In Vinh Long Province prices plunged from $2 to 
to $1.50 per bushel.  The 6 April THOI BAO KINH TE VIET NAM 
published in Hanoi stated that by 5 March, prices had declined to 
less than $2 per bushel for good quality paddy and had fallen to 
$1.40 or lower in Dong Thap and An Giang Provinces.  It was also 
reported that buyers are taking advantage of the situation to demand 
that peasants provide 22-kilo rather than the usual 20-kilo bushels. 
The paper stated that the winter-spring crop in the Delta's 11 
provinces will yield 4.5 million tons or six metric tons per hectare 
according to Agriculture Ministry estimates.  The paper reported on 
30 March that despite some improvement in prices, they are still 
lower than production costs. 

   The 17 March THOI BAO KINH TE SAIGON reported that farmers claim 
the winter-spring crop this year has been the best so far, but 
buyers are scarce.  State-run companies are short of funds to make 
purchases.  THOI BAO KINH TE VIET NAM on 23 March called the Delta 
price decline "alarming" and noted that the government had decided 
to intervene. 

   The 23 March SAIGON GIAI PHONG reported that the Prime Minister 
had already issued an order for "the banks the finance sector to 
urgently act so that state enterprises in the south can obtain 
suficient loans to buy paddy from farmers."  However, the article 
commented that, to date, nothing has been done. 

   In an effort to help the country's rice farmers, the government 
has also stepped in to assist rice exporters in purchasing rice. 
The 6 April THOI BAO KINH TE VIET NAM reported that the government 
had introduced a series of "emergency" measures.  According to the 
paper, the government will allow the use of a price stabilization 
fund to partially subsidize interest costs for rice exporters.  The 
level of support is the difference between the bank loan interest 
rate and the one percent per month interest the businesses have to 
pay on their loans.  In addition, the government has ruled that the 
14 major rice-exporting organizations in the South may use 70 
percent of 1994's export quota.  The remainder will go to lesser 
rice-export organizations.  If these organizations find new 
customers and business conditions are good, then the Trade Ministry 
will issue export permits.  The problem now, continued THOI BAO KINH 
TE VIET NAM, is to find enough cash to buy up the 2 or 3 million 
metric tons of paddy (about $300 million).  Many rice exporters are 
already in debt to the banks, having suffered severe losses in 1993- 
-some as much as $5.8 million--and it remains to be seen if the 
banks will make new loans.  Reflecting the rice exporters' problem, 
the 23 March THOI BAO KINH TE VIET NAM had noted that as of mid- 
March, Vietnam had exported only 66 percent of 1993's totals for the 
same period. 

   Foreign Investment Projects Licensed in First Quarter -- In the 
first quarter of 1994, 61 foreign investment projects capitalized at 
$707 million have been licensed.  Since the promulgation of the 
Foreign Investment Law, the State Commission for Cooperation and 
Investment has licensed 908 foreign investment projects with a total 
capital of $8.311 billion.  (Hanoi Voice of Vietnam 2300 GMT 17 Apr 
94) 

   Prospects for Coffee Exports -- Vietnam has exported more than 
100,000 metric tons (MT) of coffee in the first five months of the 
financial year, indicating that last year's exports of about 128,000 
MT will be exceeded.  The 1993-94 crop is expected to yield about 
135,000 MT, an increase of 5,000 MT over last year.  (Hanoi VNA 1421 
GMT 19 Apr 94) 

   Sugar Production Down; Imports Authorized -- Due to a poor 
harvest, the production of sugar for 1994-95, including reserves, 
may only reach 85,000 metric tons (MT). The total demand is 
estimated at 25,000 MT per month.  In the first quarter of 1994, the 
Ministry of Trade issued permits to import about 70,000 MT, half of 
it raw sugar.  By October, sugar imports may rise to 80,000 MT. 
(Hanoi Voice of Vietnam 1100 GMT 18 Apr 94) 

   French Firm To Build Mill, Export Processed Rice -- Aruco 
International, a French grain company, plans to build a $3 million 
joint-venture grain processing mill outside Ho Chi Minh City with a 
capacity to export 30,000 tons of processed rice annually.  Aruco 
will contribute 50 percent of the capital to build the plant through 
its Singapore subsidiary, and "local capital" from My Tho, on the 
outskirts of Ho Chi Minh City, will make up the other half.  The 
plant will be completed in May 1994. 

   The processing plant will parboil unhulled rice, which retains 
the nutrients, and then package it for export.  While there is 
little demand in Asia for parboiled rice, there are good markets in 
southern Africa, Saudi Arabia, and Europe. (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO 
SHIMBUN 14 Apr 94 p 3) 

   Peugeot Prepares to Build Assembly Plant -- Peugeot's 
representative for Indochina and Myanmar said the auto manufacturer 
will build an assembly plant in Hanoi.  Investment is in the build, 
operate, transfer form.  Investment capital will be $30 million, 63 
percent of it will be supplied by Peugeot.  Initial production is 
planned at 1,000 vehicles per year.  Peugeot has been working with 
the Vietnamese company Formach on the project for more than a year. 
(Hanoi THOI BAO KINH TE VIETNAM 1994 special edition p 15) 

   Joint Venture With ROK in TV Assembly -- Thang Loi Joint Venture 
Company (a joint venture between between ROK's Seyong and the Thang 
Loi company in An Giang Province) have entered into a television 
assembly joint venture with the Gold-Star group.  The joint venture 
will start operations in April.  It is capitalized at $6 million, 
and is expected to produce more than 100,000 units per year.  (Ho 
Chi Minh City THOI BAO KINH TE SAIGON 26 Mar 94 p 3). 

   Foreign Loans Guaranteed by State Banks -- The Governor of the 
Vietnam State Bank on 21 Feb 1994 signed Decison No. 23/QD-NH14 to 
guarantee capital loans made from foreign countries, in order to 
attract foreign investment and promote development of the country's 
capital market. 

   From now on, Vietnamese businesses will borrow foreign capital by 
getting and repaying their own loans.  Businesses receiving foreign 
investment capital in accordance with the Foreign Investment Law 
will have their loans guaranteed by the State Bank and others 
authorized to engage in foreign operations.  These are state-owned 
commercial banks, joint stock commercial banks, joint-venture banks, 
branches of foreign banks, and investment/development banks. 

   When a loan is reguaranteed by a second bank, there is a 
guarantee of full implementation of the original guarantor's 
commitment.  Should the latter not fulfill its commitment, the loan 
will be repaid by the second bank.  Businesses with a guarantee pay 
the guarantor banks a maximum of 1 percent per year of the covered 
amount.  The fee to a second guarantor bank would be no more than .5 
percent per year. 

   According to THOI BAO KINH TE VIET NAM--published by the Vietnam 
Economic Association--acting as a guarantor for foreign loans is an 
entirely new function in Vietnamese banking.  It will help 
Vietnamese banks increase their competitiveness vis-a-vis the 
increasing number of foreign banks in the country.  (Hanoi THOI BAO 
KINH TE VIET NAM 9 Mar 94 p 1) 

   Vietcombank Signs Credit Line With Korea Eximbank -- The Bank for 
Foreign Trade of Vietnam (Vietcombank) and the Export-Import Bank 
(Eximbank) of Korea have signed a $10-million credit line, enabling 
Vietnamese businessmen to draw dollar credit from Vietcombank to 
purchase Korean capital goods.  Repayment ranges from 3 to 10 years, 
with an interest rate of 5.95 percent.  (Hanoi VNA 0604 GMT 27 Apr 
94) 
EAG/4May94/ECONF/TECHTF/East Asia Group/PF 05/0016z May 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47610 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000025894001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   6 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-062-SO. KOREA 
<H3> <TI>      SOUTH KOREA:  Concern Over Rapidly Growing Drug Smuggling </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       SOUTH KOREA:  Concern Over Rapidly Growing Drug Smuggling </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY:       The South Korean press has recently carried numerous 
reports pointing to growing drug problems in the country.  While 
large quantities of Chinese-manufactured, nearly 100% pure philopon 

(crystal methamphetamine) have reportedly been smuggled into South 
Korea, but the South Korean Government is even more concerned about 
the increased flow of heroin and raw opium from Southeast Asia and 
China. 

   According to the 26 March KYONGHYANG SINMUN, South Korean drug 
enforcement officers arrested 6,773 persons for drug-related crimes 
in 1993, an "explosive" increase from the 1992 level of 2,968 
arrests.  The paper attributed the large number of arrests in 1993 
to a government crackdown on farmers who had backyard poppy gardens. 
At the same time, the paper noted that South Korean authorities are 
concerned over signs of increased heroin and raw opium smuggling to, 
and dealing within, South Korea.  Moreover, in addition to the 
heroin and raw opium problem, the government is once again focusing 
attention on the philopon problem.  According to the 31 March 
KUNGMIN ILBO, recent seizures of Chinese-made philopon raise 
questions about the government's claim that crackdowns over the past 
several years had brought the philopon problem under control. 

   According to the 4 April HANGUK ILBO, the Office of Drug 
Enforcement is particularly concerned about the flow of heroin into 
South Korea from the "Golden Triangle" area and the flow of raw 
opium from China.  These drugs are reportedly smuggled into South 
Korea around Inchon harbor on Korea's west coast via routes which 
South Korean authorities have come to call the "White Triangle" 
route.  South Korean authorities reportedly believe that one of 
these "White Triangle" routes is a direct one from Southeast Asia to 
Inchon, while the other passes through Tianjin, China before 
reaching the Inchon area.  According to the paper, heroin and opium 
transactions usually take place on the high seas near Inchon and the 
illicit drugs are then smuggled into the country on small boats. 
Through 1990 there were no government seizures of heroin, but, in 
1991, there were three cases involving 3.3 kilograms; in 1992, eight 
cases involving 22 kilograms; and in 1993, two cases involving 22.4 
kilograms.  In addition, two shipments of cocaine totaling 23 
kilograms were reported seized in 1993.  South Korean drug 
authorities reportedly believe that they have the problem of 
smuggling fairly good control at the airports and harbors, so they 
have shifted their main focus to the problem of coastal smuggling. 

   According to HANGUK ILBO, government drug authorities' biggest 
contemporary concern is that drug dealers who once used South Korea 
as a transit point are now distributing drugs inside the country. 
However, aside from trying to intercept drug smugglers on the 
country's coast, the paper observed that the government has not yet 
devised any remedies to resolve the problem and urged it to 
intensify anti-drug education for the general population. 

   (AUTHOR:  TOMPKINS.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL 
CHIEF, SOUTHEAST ASIA/KOREA BRANCH AT (703) 733-6522) 
EAG/04MAY94/POLCHF/ECONF/TDDF/ASIA DIVISION/JF 5/1936Z MAY 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47611 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000025994001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   6 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-063--JAPAN 
<H3> <TI>      JAPAN:  SPOTLIGHT ON JAPAN ASSOCIATION FOR TRADE WITH RUSSIA AND </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       JAPAN:  SPOTLIGHT ON JAPAN ASSOCIATION FOR TRADE WITH RUSSIA AND </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
CENTRAL-EASTERN   EUROPE 

   The Japan Association for Trade with Russia and Central-Eastern 
Europe, an industry association consisting primarily of Japan's 
large general trading companies (GTCs), acts under the supervision 
of the Ministry of International Trade and Industry (MITI) to 
promote trade with the countries of the former Soviet Union, 
Mongolia, and the former communist nations of Europe.  Much of its 
focus has been on overcoming obstacles to technology trade and 
competing against the United States and Europe to develop ties to 
the Russian Far East.  The association, as part of its goal of 
promoting technology exchange, is helping MITI's policy of offering 
Russia defense conversion aid and other technical cooperation. 

   Association Overview 

   The Japan Association for Trade with Russia and Central-Eastern 
Europe (Roshia Too Boekikai), an industry association (shadan hojin) 
of over 90 companies, promotes trade and technology exchange with 
the countries of the former Soviet empire.  According to the latest 
edition of an annual guide to MITI's public corporations 
(TSUSHOSANGYOSHO KANKEI KOEKI HOJIN BENRAN 1994 Mar 94), the 
association gathers and disseminates information on technology, 
hosts and participates in trade fairs, sends and receives survey 
missions, helps resolve trade problems, and provides the Japanese 
Government and business circles with advice on promoting trade. 
MITI's International Trade Policy Bureau oversees the organization's 
activities.  The association consists primarily of large GTCs 
(NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 8 Feb 93).  Smaller firms are grouped in the 
Japan-Russia Trade Association (Nichiro Boeki Kyokai), another 
organization under the same MITI bureau (NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 5 Sep 
92). 

   The association has enjoyed close connections to MITI and the 
business community in its nearly nearly 30 years of operation.  In 
1967, Kogoro Uemura, then chairman of the Japan Federation of 
Economic Organizations (Keidanren, another association under MITI's 
supervision), and some 20 other business leaders established the 
association to promote trade and technology exchange with the Soviet 
bloc (ASAHI SHIMBUN 3 Feb 87).  In August 1970, MITI granted the 
association, then known as the Japan Association for Trade with 
Soviet Union and Central-Eastern Europe (Soren Too Boekikai), the 
status of industry association (shadan hojin) (TSUSHOSANGYOSHO 
KANKEI KOEKI HOJIN BENRAN 1994 Mar 94). 

   The association's leadership lineup reveals its close ties to 
major Japanese companies.  The association's chairman, Toshikuni 
Yahiro, a former chairman of and current advisor to the GTC Mitsui &amp; 

Co., assumed his post during the 1987 "COCOM shock" that followed 
the revelation that Toshiba Machine Co. had exported machine tools 
to the Soviet Union against Coordinating Committee for Multilateral 
Export Controls (COCOM) regulations (HOKKAIDO SHIMBUN 5 Sep 92, 
YOMIURI SHIMBUN 19 Jul 87).  Yahiro has also served as a deputy 
chairman of Keidanren and chaired both the trade subcommittee of the 
former Japan-East Germany Economic Committee and the Japan-Poland 
Economic Committee (NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 23 Nov, 9 Aug 89, YOMIURI 
SHIMBUN 19 Jul 87).  The association's four deputy chairmen also 
hold top positions in major companies:  Takeshi Eguchi is vice 
chairman at the GTC Mitsubishi Corp.; Hiroo Kinoshita is a managing 
director at the GTC Sumitomo Corp.; Tadashi Suzuki is a vice 
president of the electronics giant NEC; and Yoshiro Sasaki is a 
former managing director of Nippon Steel Corp. (TOYO KEIZAI YAKUIN 
SHIKIHO 1994 and 1989). 

   Keeping MITI, Companies Informed 

   The association has, from the start, provided the Japanese 
Government and business community with information on technology and 
other developments.  In April 1989, the association recast and 
expanded its research department (chosabu) as the Soviet Union and 
Central-Eastern Europe Economic Institute (Soren Too Keizai 
Kenkyusho).  Hisao Kanemori, an experienced Soviet hand who had 
headed the Japan Center for Economic Research, became its chairman. 
Kazuo Ogawa, a former Japan External Trade Organization (JETRO) 
researcher who was serving as the association's managing director 
and research director, became Kanemori's deputy.  MITI launched the 
new institute, Japan's first to focus on the Soviet bloc economies, 
to gather primary information as a remedy to Japan's tendency to 
rely on secondary reports from the United States and Europe.  MITI 
then increased its annual research subsidy to the association from 
45 million yen to 80 million yen  (approximately $450,000 to 
$800,000 at current exchange rates).  MITI created the institute, 
which began with 16 staff members and was slated to grow to 50, as 
its "information center" on the Soviet bloc (NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 19 
Feb, 20 Mar 89, 4 Dec, 23 Jun 88, NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 5 Apr 89, 
NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 5 Apr 89, YOMIURI SHIMBUN 26 Jun 88). 

   Seeking To Protect Technology Flow, Develop Ties to Far East 

   The association has sought to protect Japanese technology 
exchange and trade with the former Soviet bloc and its successor 
nations against the fallout of the Toshiba incident and other 
pressures.  For example, Chairman Yahiro asserted soon after 
assuming office in 1987 that he had heard from traders that many 
U.S. products were entering the Soviet bloc via third countries and 
that it was "natural" for trading companies to overcome differences 
between East and West to "cooperate" (NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 13 Jul 
87).  In an interview one month later, he rejected the argument that 
it was "outrageous" for Japanese GTCs to trade with communist 
countries, admonished Japanese companies to refrain from "pulling 
each other down" to the benefit of the United States, and warned 
that a single-minded focus on security could impede "free trade" 
(NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 9 Aug 87). 

   The association has also focused much of its attention on 
promoting Japanese ties to the Russian Far East.  Managing Director 
Kazuo Ogawa called the region the "final frontier" in a business 
forum last year (HOKKAIDO SHIMBUN 21 Apr 93).  At times, association 
leaders have cast their arguments in terms of competition with the 
United States and Europe.  Ogawa warned an audience at a regional 
forum in 1991 that Japan was facing a threat from the United States 
and southeast Asian nations to its monopolistic position in trade 
with the Russian Far East (HOKKAIDO SHIMBUN 4 Sep 91).  He had 
earlier warned that Japan's response to Soviet perestroika was "way 
behind" that of the United States (NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 3 Jun 88). 
Chairman Yahiro, for his part, has spoken of Japan's "obligation" to 
develop Siberia east of Lake Baikal, a region "far from Europe" 
where European nations would not be able to extend their influence 
(NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 5 Sep 92, HOKKAIDO SHIMBUN 5 Sep 92).  His 
view of the region is mirrored in that of the NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 
(29 Jan 93), which has described the Russian Far East as an area 
"with longstanding close ties to Japan and where aid from the West 
has tended to be late in coming." 

   The association is also disseminating information on the region 
to Japanese officials and businessmen.  The organization, 
cooperating with a local think tank in Hokkaido and the economic 
research institute of the Russian Academy of Science's Far East 
Division, published in April 1993 the "Russian Far East Databook," 
Japan's first compendium of industrial production and other economic 
information on the region (NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 15 Apr 93).  The 
1994 edition was published in April (HOKKAIDO SHIMBUN 15 Apr 94). 

   Participating in MITI's Defense Conversion Program 

   The association has been assisting MITI with devising a program 
to promote conversion of Russian military technology and production 
facilities to civilian use.  Association members have accompanied 
MITI officials on surveys of Russian military facilities.  Takashi 
Murakami, research section chief of the association's economic 
research institute, and institute researcher Kaoru Sakurai 
accompanied an official from MITI's Aircraft and Ordinance Division 
on a tour from 23 to 30 October 1992 of five Russian shipyards, 
aircraft factories, and other military facilities in the region of 
Khabarovsk, Vladivostok, and Komsomolsk.  The survey mission also 
included aerospace and shipbuilding executives from Japan's leading 
defense companies (TSUSAN KOHO 4 Nov 92).  According to NIHON KEIZAI 
SHIMBUN (23 Oct 92), the mission was effectively the beginning of 
MITI's Conversion Model Factory program to promote defense 
conversion. 

   The association had previously joined MITI in a joint defense 
conversion survey of the Soviet Union in July 1991.  Eiichi Nakao, 
then MITI minister, passed the resulting survey report to his Soviet 
counterpart during his visit to Moscow in October 1991.  The survey 
report, which included a call for separating companies from the 
defense-industrial complex, was reportedly the first defense 
conversion proposal Moscow had received from a G-7 nation (HOKKAIDO 
SHIMBUN 21 Oct 91). 

   The association has also assisted MITI's defense conversion 
program by participating in seminars.  NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (18 May 
92) announced that the association was joining JETRO in a MITI 
industrial policy seminar featuring defense conversion.  Attendees 
for the seminar, scheduled for 25-26 May in Austria, were to be 
government officials and legislators from Russia and Eastern Europe. 
NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (12 Jan 92) had earlier announced a similar 
seminar scheduled for February 1992 in Vladivostok. 

   Other Technical Cooperation 

   The association has also been active assisting MITI's initiative 
to offer technical aid to Russian small and medium enterprises.  The 
organization is serving as the ministry's intermediary in providing 
machinery for technical training and research in marine products 
processing, metalworking, and four other fields.  In March 1994, for 
example, the association helped Taiyo, a manufacturer of marine 
products processing equipment, export 58 million yen (approximately 
$580,000) worth of its equipment to a national-level marine sciences 
university in Vladivostok (HOKKAIDO SHIMBUN 9 Mar 94).  The 
association also arranged that month to send technicians from the 
Niigata Prefectural Industrial Technology Center and four of the 
prefecture's local companies to Vladivostok to offer "technical 
guidance" to a factory attached to a technical institute there. 
Among the four companies was the prominent machine tool company Mori 
Seiki (NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 9 Mar 94).  The association is also 
working with Japan's Small Business National Corporation and local 
governments to train Russian technicians from small and medium 
enterprises in Russia and Japan (NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 16 Nov 93). 

   (AUTHOR:  MERCADO.  FOR QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL 
CHIEF, PACIFIC RIM BRANCH AT (703) 733-6346.) 
GIG/5MAY94/TECHTF/ECONF/TID JEG 05/2341Z MAY 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47612 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000026094001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   6 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-060--JAPAN 
<H3> <TI>      JAPAN:  A NEW APPROACH TO DEVELOPING A 1-TERABIT MEMORY CHIP </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       JAPAN:  A NEW APPROACH TO DEVELOPING A 1-TERABIT MEMORY CHIP </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
Two      Japanese companies have collaborated to move beyond the 
silicon age by developing a new electronic element with greater 
potential memory capacity than the conventional semiconductor chip. 
The companies, Suntory Ltd. and Mitsubishi Electric Corp. have 
succeeded in the creation of an artificial protein with a diode 
property, which can be applied to the development of semiconductor 
chips, potentially increasing their capacity to 1-terabit of memory. 
This capacity is far beyond the existing integration limit for 
silicon semiconductor chips (NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 23 Apr 94, NIKKEI 
SANGYO SHIMBUN 24 Mar 94). 

   (The hard copy version of this Foreign Media Note contains a 
diagram of an artificial protein.) 

   Artificial protein with diode property.  Electrons flow only one 
way from flavin to heme. 

   Source: NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN, 24 Mar 94. 

   The artificial protein created by genetic recombination, has the 
same basic functions as an electronic element.  According to 
Japanese press reports, this is the world's first successful 
creation of a protein that functions as a diode, allowing an 
electric current to go through it, and as a switch that controls the 
current flow.  Next, a molecular element must be developed to 
integrate the artificial proteins.  This would pave the way for 
development of a 1-terabit memory chip, which would exceed the 1- 
gigabit integration limit of a silicon semiconductor (NIHON KEIZAI 
SHIMBUN 23 Apr 94, NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 24 Mar 94). 

   The artificial protein was developed by bonding a natural 
protein, heat-resistant "cytochrome c552," to flavin, a kind of 
vitamin that is able to receive and emit electrons.  Electrons are 
exchanged between flavin and heme (hemu), a part of cytochrome c552 
that receives and emits electrons.  The method by which electrons 
are received and emitted between flavin and heme is equivalent to 
electron exchange between a p-type semiconductor that receives 
electrons and an n-type semiconductor layer that emits electrons. 
This electron exchange makes it possible to control the flow of the 
electric current.  The companies confirmed that the artificial 
protein properties are not affected even at a temperature of 100 
degrees C.  Genetic engineering was applied in the process of 
replacing an amino acid that comprised cytochrome c552 with a 
special molecule and bonding it to flavin (NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 24 
Mar 94). 

   This development has potential for various applications.  The 
width of the new protein molecule is approximately one hundredth of 
the circuit line width of a 64-megabit memory chip, which is 
approximately 0.35-0.45 micron.  If artificial protein molecules are 
integrated, a high density semiconductor element can be developed. 
If photoelectric transfer characteristics that convert light energy 
into electric energy and other functions that can detect 
temperature, pressure, and ions are added to proteins, this 
development can be applied to solar cells and image sensors of a 
camera.  Since integration of proteins is still considered 
technologically difficult, commercialization of the technology by 
its application to sensors is expected before development of a 
semiconductor (NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 24 Mar 94). 

   The two companies that developed the protein, Suntory Ltd. and 
Mitsubishi Electric Corp. teamed their expertise in different 
fields, biotechnology and electronic technology respectively.  They 
started research cooperation three years ago.  The basic research 
institute of Suntory (Teruo Amachi, Director) has conducted research 
on proteins that have heme structure and searched for opportunities 
to apply the research results to new fields outside its specialties, 
which include the production of liquor, food, and pharmaceuticals. 
The central research institute of Mitsubishi Electric (Tamotsu 
Nomaguchi, Director) has conducted research on making a molecular 
device with biomaterials since 1984.  In the future, the two 
companies plan to develop a biochip simulating information 
processing mechanism of organisms by combining molecules that have 
various functions (NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 23 APR 94, NIKKEI SANGYO 
SHIMBUN 24 Mar 94). 
(AUTHOR:  GRAY.  FOR QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL 
CHIEF, PACIFIC RIM BRANCH AT (703) 733-6346. 
GIG/4MAY94/TECHTF/TID JEG 06/0016Z MAY 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47613 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000026194001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   6 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOUO -- DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS, THE 
FOLLOWING ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS 
FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY--WEST EUROPE 
<H3> <TI>      FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY--FB PSE 94-018--WEST EUROPE </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY--FB PSE 94-018--WEST EUROPE </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
Europe      Economic Review:  WESTERN EUROPE Vol. III, No. 18, 05 May 
1994 

   Notice To Readers:  FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY is a series published by 
FBIS Europe/Latin America Group featuring brief summaries of foreign 
media reports on topical issues, compiled from the most recent 
sources available to FBIS. 

   Europe Economic Review (EER) is a subseries of FOREIGN MEDIA 
SURVEY published by the West and East Europe Divisions of 
Europe/Latin America Group with contributions from FBIS overseas 
bureaus.  The EER is intended to supplement coverage of European 
economic issues by the FBIS Daily Report for West and East Europe, 
and other FBIS publications.  Foreign news, feature, and editorial 
reports selected for summary in this publication normally do not 
appear in other FBIS publications. 

   The EER is published in two editions, one for West Europe (also 
including media coverage of Canada and Turkey), and the other for 
East Europe.  Drawing primarily from domestic media sources of these 
countries but also using other foreign media where appropriate, the 
EER focuses on national and regional economic issues, such as 
economic competitiveness, regional economic integration, economic 
reforms and other changes in economic policies, and foreign trade 
and investment. 

   FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY is a U.S. Government publication.  Its 
contents in no way represent the policies, views, or attitudes of 
the U.S. Government.  All comment or analysis contained herein is 
attributable to the cited media source, unless otherwise indicated. 

TABLE OF CONTENTS 

   FEATURE: France--Marrakesh 'Failures' Cited, U.S. Scored 

   DENMARK 

   Rapid Growth Spurring Labor Market Policy Changes; Labor- 
Management Stalemate Kills Layoff Notice Bill 

   FRANCE 

   Comments on Federal Reserve Appointees; Clinton's computer 
Industry 'Subsidies' Noted; UAP To Receive Fr3 Billion From State 
Government Gives Shipping Line Fr900 Million; Editorial on Air 
France, EU Air Route Decision; Economic Recovery Questioned; Dangers 
of Privatization Discussed 

   GERMANY 

   Trust Agency To Restructure, Downsize; Government Contracts Boost 
Eastern German Economy Wismut Uranium Damage Less Than Thought; 

   GREECE 

   Embargo Threatens Economy, Grants; Violation of Embargo Charged; 
New Tax Bill Expected; 

   ITALY 

   Farm Organizations Unhappy With GATT Accord; IRI President on 
STET, Other Privatizations; Business Views New Government With 
Optimism; Small Businesses Need 'Urgent' Assistance; SIP Accused of 
Unfair Trade Practices; 

   SPAIN 

   Banco Santander Takes Over Banesto 

   SWEDEN 

   Positive Economic Signs Seen 

   ECONOMIC BRIEFS 

   EU, France, Greece 

   FEATURE 

   France:  Marrakesh 'Failures' Cited, U.S. Scored 

   Writing on 13 April in the Paris daily LE FIGARO, Nicole Catala 
claims that the final version of the Uruguay Round of GATT 
negotiations signed in Marrakesh left many failures in its wake.  It 
did not, for example, settle the "social dumping" issue resulting 
from the disparity of workers' salaries in developed and developing 
countries.  Although developing countries will in time evolve into 
markets for European goods and services and will increase European 
employment, Catala writes, entire segments of the European 
production system may have disappeared by then because of 
competition from low-salary countries.  Despite U.S. support, France 
failed to convince Uruguay Round participants to include a "social 
clause" in the future World Trade Organization (WTO) regulations, in 
part because even some of its neighbors, such as Portugal and Great 
Britain, never ratified the similar International Labor 
Organization's child labor agreement.  Catala concludes that despite 
the successful outcome of the Marrakesh meetings, the loss of jobs 
and the competition from low-salary countries will continue. 

   According to an unattributed editorial in the 15 April Paris 
daily LE MONDE, the Marrakesh agreement also failed in other ways. 
The editorial claims the WTO cannot be considered a complete success 
because many important industries still remain outside its purview. 
Additionally, the final agreement will not be easy to implement and 
will require "singular obstinacy" to substitute multilateralism for 
the present bilateralism in a world where trade relations are 
dominated by the most powerful countries, notably the United States. 
More importantly, however, the entire Uruguay Round has been marked 
by the rapid rise of influence of developing countries, which almost 
unanimously fought the adoption of a "social clause" requiring 
workers' rights to be respected.  Despite their solidarity over this 
issue and the fact that they successfully blocked its adoption, 
developing countries will not benefit equally under the new GATT 
trade liberalization, the editorial comments.  The poorest countries 
that have been unable to attain food self-sufficiency ought to fear 
an agreement that will result in higher grain prices.  For these 
countries, the editorial concludes, despite promises from richer 
countries, "Marrakesh can only have a bitter taste." 

   Pascal Riche, writing in the 15 April Paris daily LIBERATION, 
claims that while Marrakesh marked the end of the international 
trading system in existence since the end of World War II, it also 
failed to establish fully the policy of multilaterlism in trade 
negotiations.  While multilateralism is the official rule, Riche 
points out, trade negotiations are now so difficult that countries 
can only handle them on a bilateral or regional basis.  The United 
States, for example, chose to create the North American Free Trade 
Agreement (NAFTA) and engaged in bilateral negotiations with Japan 
over market access.  Even the Uruguay Round, which was 
"theoretically" negotiated by 117 countries, was finally signed in 
bilateral fashion, the result of long discussions between Europe and 
the United States.  Market rules, Riche writes, are gradually giving 
way to "arrangements, pressure, and threats."  It is logical to 
expect that a new WTO will be able to settle differences.  However, 
the United States is intent on restraining the WTO's independence 
and development, Riche contends, since it has already announced it 
will not renounce its unilateral trade sanctions measures, the 
"Article 301 and super 301" of U.S. trade law.  Moreover, 
pessimistic Europeans recall that when the fourth round of GATT 
negotiations in Geneva in 1954 gave birth to an "international 
cooperation organization," the United States "quickly transformed it 
into an empty shell."  More optimistic observers, however, note that 
the United States "no longer rules over the world as it did 40 years 
ago' and that well-conceived institutions have their own dynamics, 
Riche concludes. (Rosa M. x36287) 

   DENMARK 

   RAPID GROWTH SPURRING LABOR MARKET POLICY CHANGES--Two articles 
in the 12 April edition of the Copenhagen BERLINGSKE TIDENDE provide 
examples of actions being taken to ease labor market rigidities as 
the economy begins to show signs of overheating.  The first article 
reports that Labor Minister Jytte Andersen has announced she is 
making contingency plans so that the government can act quickly at 
the first sign of labor bottlenecks in the private sector.  Part of 
her plan is to set aside 100 million kroner to reintroduce worker 
relocation grants for unemployed individuals willing to relocate to 
new jobs, a program discontinued in 1989 because of a drastic cut in 
job openings.  The head of Denmark's employer association backed 
Andersen's initiative and cited her pledge to plug up past loopholes 
in the program "so the unemployed will be forced to move--both 
geographically and job-wise."  A labor union leader also expressed 
support for the program but cautioned that the bottleneck problem 
had more to do with job type than geography and that more would need 
to be done to ease the pressure on wages which had undermined 
international competitiveness in the mid-1980's.  Andersen said that 
she is also looking at other measures, such as increased job 
retraining, to increase labor mobility. 

   The second article describes actions to counter labor bottlenecks 
already existing in the public sector.  Here even more, government 
policy is largely blamed for problems.  A new law granting workers 
paid leave of up to one year for training sabbaticals or child care 
has resulted in a sudden shortage in many occupations, especially 
nursing.  Currently, some 1,700 nurses are on leave, forcing 
hospitals to hire Swedish and Norwegian health workers to fill the 
gap.  There is also a danger that this situation will be repeated in 
schools and welfare offices.  As a result, emergency legislation was 
approved on 11 April to require that leave applications be submitted 
six months before the leave is to begin.  In addition, a pact signed 
by local governments and employee associations will aim at avoiding 
labor shortages.  Here too, job retraining will be implemented to 
alleviate labor bottleneck pressures which could derail recovery. 
(Roger B. x36508)  (Copenhagen BERLINGSKE TIDENDE 12 Apr 94 pp I 2, 
III 1-2) 

   LABOR-MANAGEMENT STALEMATE KILLS LAYOFF NOTICE BILL--Labor 
Minister Jytte Andersen is giving up her attempt to get the National 
Labor Confederation (LO) and the Danish Employers Association (DA) 
to agree on a legislative proposal on "mass layoff" warnings. 
According to BERLINGSKE TIDENDE reporter Peter Andersen, the labor 
movement is fighting against implementation of an EU regulation 
stipulating a 21-day notice before large-scale layoffs are effected; 
under current Danish law, employers must give 30-days notice.  In 
talks chaired by Andersen, the LO said it was willing to accept a 
21-day notice before layoffs could be officially communicated to 
workers but demanded a further 77-day delay before the action could 
be carried out.  This would entitle workers to a total of eight 
weeks' pay from the time of preliminary warning.  The Employers 
Association rejected this demand, claiming Denmark has no right to 
go beyond provisions in EU directives.  While talks will resume 
later, the article's author sees little hope of a bill emerging 
before the next election, which must be held by 10 December.  In the 
absence of new legislation, employers and unions will probably have 
to resolve the issue in individual contract agreements.  It is 
believed that labor will ultimately have to compromise heavily on 
its 77-day demand, the article reports. (Roger B. x36508) 
(Copenhagen BERLINGSKE TIDENDE in Danish 16 Apr 94 p III 1) 

   FRANCE 

   COMMENTS ON FEDERAL RESERVE APPOINTEES--Jacques Hubert-Rodier, 
writing in the financial daily LES ECHOS, noted that the two 
economists appointed to the U.S. Federal Reserve Bank by President 
Bill Clinton will probably have no effect on the bank's policies. 
Rodier describes the two, Alan Blinder and Janet Yellen, as more 
pragmatic" in fighting inflation--more like "doves" than "hawks"- 
-than those they replace.  Although their appointments may allow 
Clinton to leave his "imprint" on monetary policy at the bank since 
the two are considered close to presidential economic adviser Laura 
d'Andrea Tyson, Rodier argues it is still difficult to determine how 
they can change the balance within the bank's board.  The views of 
the head of the Federal Reserve, Alan Greenspan, who in the eyes of 
the markets really controls the central bank, remain generally 
preponderant.  Moreover, the main decisions of the bank are made by 
a larger group in the Open Market Committee which includes, besides 
the seven governors, five of the presidents of the regional Federal 
Reserve Banks. (Dian I. x36286)  (Paris LES ECHOS in French 25 Apr 
94 p 4) 

   CLINTON'S COMPUTER INDUSTRY 'SUBSIDIES' NOTED--President Bill 
Clinton's administration has confirmed its taste for industrial 
policy and close government-industry cooperation, according to LA 
TRIBUNE DESFOSSES Washington correspondent Jean-Marie Macabrey. 
Macabrey charges Clinton is subsidizing the computer industry, 
citing the announcement by the U.S. Department of Defense that it 
will supply $587 million over five years to computer companies to 
increase U.S. capacity to produce flat screens--a key computer 
component used in aircraft and portable computers and now produced 
mainly in Japan.  Furthermore, Macabrey notes that more help is 
forthcoming from the U.S. Commerce Department, which is charged with 
promoting these products abroad, and from U.S. Trade Representative 
Mickey Kantor, who is trying to force open recalcitrant markets for 
them.  To forestall criticism, the U.S. Government is justifying its 
initiative on the basis of national security, Macabrey states. 
However, the project has commercial goals: to establish a U.S. 
presence on a market 95-percent controlled by the Japanese. 

   Macabrey adds that this is not Clinton's first attempt at 
industrial policy.  Clinton has aided the U.S. military industry to 
convert to civilian production and has collaborated with U.S. auto 
manufacturers on developing an automobile by putting idle government 
laboratories at their disposal.  Macabrey concludes that if the 
flat-screen experience is any indication, Clinton will repeat the 
strategy in other industries dominated by the Japanese, such as in 
robotics and high-tech ceramics. (Dian I. x336286)  (Paris LA 
TRIBUNE DESFOSSES in French 2 May 94 p 6) 

   UAP TO RECEIVE FR3 BILLION FROM STATE--On 22 April, Economy 
Minister Edmond Alphandery confirmed that the government would 
increase the capital of the Paris Insurance Union (UAP) by around 3 
billion francs (Fr) to facilitate its privatization, according to an 
article in LES ECHOS.  The article cites unnamed banking sources as 
stating that the capital transfer will be in the form of short-term 
stock options for shareholders, allowing them to purchase new shares 
at the public offer price.  In this plan the government, which hold 
50.2 percent of the company's shares, will then cede back its 
options to members of a core shareholder group. 

   According to the article, UAP president Jacques Friedmann wanted 
around Fr5 billion to recapitalize the company.  He has said on 
several occasions that his company no longer had a margin of 
maneuver.  Friedmann also indicated that UAP still intends to 
complete its European insurance network by acquisition.  The article 
adds that the government hopes to receive some Fr20 billion from 
UAP's privatization.  Some 86 million shares will be sold on the 
market, of which 43 million will be in the form of a public purchase 
offering. (Dian I. x36286)  (Paris LES ECHOS in French 25 Apr 94 p 
25) 

   GOVERNMENT GIVES SHIPPING LINE FR900 MILLION--According to Claude 
Barjonet, writing in LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES, Transportation Minister 
Bernard Bosson has confirmed that in 1994 the government will give 
Fr900 million to General Maritime Company (CGM) in a capital 
infusion which is much larger than expected.  Moreover, for 1995 and 
1996 the government intends to give the government-owned shipping 
line even more, the sum of which Barjonet speculates will be several 
hundreds of millions of francs.  In the fall of 1993, Bosson had 
publicly confirmed that CGM President, Eric Giuily, was asking for 
Fr500 million to help his financially-strapped company.  But this 
sum would not have compensated for 1993 losses of Fr450 million 
after a loss in 1992 of Fr689 million.  Giuily therefore convinced 
Bosson that the capital infusion must be more "ambitious," allowing 
the company not only to pay off its debts but to substantially 
strengthen the company's coffers.  Barjonet concludes that Giuily 
should be very happy about the "pugnacity" with which Bosson 
defended CGM's interests within the government. (Dian I. x36286) 
(Paris LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES in French 29 Apr 94 p 7) 

   EDITORIAL ON AIR FRANCE, EU AIR ROUTE DECISION--LES ECHOS chief 
deputy editor for economics, Patrick Lamm, reacting to the recent EU 
Commission decision which requires France to allow TAT airlines to 
compete with Air France subsidiary Air Inter and operate routes out 
of Orly Airport, writes that the French Government is cornered 
between the intransigent wish of Brussels to develop airline 
competition in Europe and the necessity to maintain peace with labor 
unions at the financially troubled Air France.  Lamm notes that the 
government has once again been "nailed" by Brussels in the name of 
free markets.  He adds, however, that the French Government seems 
determined not to open its domestic air routes to competition and 
that it has already announced it would bring the issue before the 
EU's Court of Justice.  The Commission's decision could be foreseen, 
Lamm claims, and is based on former Prime Minister Michel Rocard's 
promise in 1990 to open French domestic routes to competition in 
exchange for EU Commission approval for Air France to buy UTA 
airlines.  However, the problem was when to open them.  The 
government at that time thought it could control any competition by 
authorizing small companies to operate on a few routes which would 
not challenge Air France. 

   The French Government has even more of a problem with the EU 
Commission, Lamm contends, since it must also have the Commission's 
approval for the Fr10-billion capital transfer it wants to make to 
Air France.  Although the two issues may not be linked, it is 
difficult to escape seeing one as a bargaining chip for the other. 
The government's predicament is exacerbated by the fact it must be 
played out under the  watchful eye of Air France labor unions who, 
despite the support that they recently gave to Air France President 
Christian Blanc's reorganization  plan, keep a gun to management's 
head.  Meanwhile, competition is increasing.  The French airline 
company TAT is 49-percent owned by British Airways and if allowed to 
compete out of Orly, Air Inter--now operating on these routes--would 
lose important market share on very profitable routes.  (Dian I. 
x36286)  (Paris LES ECHOS in French 28 Apr 94 p 13) 

   ECONOMIC RECOVERY QUESTIONED--In an editorial in the 28 April 
Paris weekly L'EXPRESS, Yann de l'Ecotais questions whether the 2.0- 
percent economic growth "predicted by almost all economic experts" 
for 1994 and the 2.4 percent envisioned for 1995 will ensure a 
massive economic recovery, even if they denote considerable 
improvement.  A progressive recovery will be slowed down by a number 
of factors, according to de l'Ecotais.  The first stems from the 
importance of the German economy, whose expected low 0.5-percent 
growth this year and only 1.5-percent growth in 1995 will reduce 
exports to that country and affect the French recovery.  Secondly, 
high unemployment, the reduction of public debt in a lumber of 
countries, and a very slow increase in household incomes, resulting 
in cautious consumer spending, will dampen the recovery.  Thirdly, 
economists have been too optimistic in the variables they used to 
assess future growth.  According to these economists, de l'Ecotais 
writes, oil prices will remain low, European short-term interest 
rates will further decrease, as will long-term rates after first 
registering an increase, and no international large-scale crisis 
will emerge. 

   Additionally, according to de l'Ecotais, the reaction of French 
unemployment to the economic recovery does not match that of other 
countries.  Nothing guarantees that France's GDP this year will rise 
twice as much as expected, to reach the level necessary for a drop 
in the unemployment rate.  Finally, "burdensome regulations and 
excessive compulsory withholdings" limit any benefit that France 
might obtain from an improved economic situation.  (Rosa M. x36287) 
(Paris L'EXPRESS in French 28 Apr 94 p 4) 

   DANGERS OF PRIVATIZATION DISCUSSED--While government-mandated 
privatization is by now generally accepted, opposition is slowly 
developing, according to Airy Routier writing in the 14-20 April 
Paris weekly LE NOUVEL OBSERVATEUR.  A Socialist Party (PS) leader, 
the former Prime Minister Laurent Fabius, has criticized 
conservative Prime Minister Edouard Balladur's privatizations and 
has charged that through them, he has shaped an "oligarchy" which 
would "weigh heavily" on France's future.  Additionally, Routier 
cites Elie Cohen, researcher at the National Center for Scientific 
Research, as expressing his disapproval of Balladur's privatization 
methods, despite Cohen's support for privatization itself.  Cohen 
questions the government's use of the income produced by these 
privatizations.  Rather than being used to reduce the deficit and 
aid government-owned companies, the income has been applied to 
current budget expenses.  Fabius characterizes the use of this 
revenue as a near-sighted policy that postpones problems by covering 
them up. 

   Routier charges that Balladur's method entails his choosing 
conservatives to head privatized companies and putting Socialists in 
charge of firms whose privatization is impossible in the short term. 
Additionally, he has established extensive cross ownerships in 
privatized companies--for instance, the National Bank of Paris (BNP) 
will hold 15 percent of the Paris Insurance Union (UAP), which will 
hold 15 percent of the BNP--which may create interlocking interests 
that will eventually weaken the French economy through lack of 
monitoring and absence of sanctions on the part of shareholders.  As 
a countermeasure, Routier states, the Socialist group of the 
National Assembly has asked its members to purchase shares in all 
the privatized companies, to ensure that small shareholders lead the 
fight for more transparency and equal treatment within these 
companies.  (Rosa M. x36287)  (Paris LE NOUVEL OBSERVATEUR in French 
14-20 Apr 94 pp 14-17) 

   GERMANY 

   TRUST AGENCY TO RESTRUCTURE, DOWNSIZE--Starting in January 1995, 
the Trust Agency will be split into a Federal Office for Special 
Unification Tasks (BVS) and several entities in which the Federal 
Government will hold a partial or total interest.  The BVS, the 
legal successor to the Trust Agency, will be charged with enforcing 
the terms of purchase contracts for Trust Agency holdings.  It will 
oversee what was once the GDR government's Commercial Coordination 
(Koko) foreign trade operation and administer the remaining holdings 
of the GDR's political parties.  After two years, the BVS will be 
integrated into the Federal Office- for the Regulation of Unresolved 
Public Holding Questions (BARoV).  Meanwhile, two government 
corporations, the Shareholding Management Company (BMG) and the 
Trust Agency Realty Company (TLG) will take over the Finance 
Ministry's proprietary interests.  The BMG, a holding company, will 
oversee the privatization or liquidation of the roughly 100 firms 
still held by the Trust Agency, operate the Agency's five limited 
partnerships, and help close down some firms engaged in mining and 
nuclear power production.  The TLG will administer the Trust 
Agency's landholdings in urban areas. 

   The Trust Agency anticipates needing a staff of 3,700 to operate 
these new entities, with a possible reduction to 2,000 by the end of 
1998.  The Bundestag budget committee, however, is pressing for a 
limit of 2,000 starting in 1995.  An initial post-unification plan 
to divest government holdings in Trust Agency enterprises has not 
been realized, except for the impending privatization of the Trust 
Agency East Europe Consulting Company.  (Charles W. x36473) 
(Frankfurt/Main FRANKFURTER ALLGEMEINE in German 20 Apr 94 p 17) 

   Government Contracts Boost Eastern German Economy-The Federal 
Government increased public contract awards to eastern German firms 
from 7.5 billion German marks (DM) in 1992 to DM17.5 billion in 
1993, according to a report by the Ministry of Economics.  Over 90 
percent of the Federal Government's 1993 orders for construction 
projects in eastern Germany went to firms native to the region, 
especially small- and medium-sized companies.  The government also 
provided over DM6 billion in federally-funded road and railway work. 
Federal spending on such contracts accounted for about 6 percent of 
eastern Germany's 1993 economic output. 
   According to the report, the increase in awards resulted mainly 
from the official preference given to eastern German firms in 
bidding for projects.  Under this policy, which is due to expire at 
the end of 1995, federal contracts may be awarded to eastern German 
firms even if their bids are up to 20 percent higher than those of 
their western German competitors.  The federal program, however, has 
been hindered on at least two fronts.  First, few western German 
laender have joined the Federal Government's effort to funnel 
official orders to eastern Germany: only Hesse and Berlin have done 
so thus far.  Second, eastern German firms continue to lag behind 
their western counterparts in the important information and 
communications technologies market.  Although this gap closed 
somewhat in 1993, it continues to put eastern German companies at a 
competitive disadvantage in a high-demand sector.  (Charles W. 
x36473)  (Duesseldorf HANDELSBLATT in German 26 Apr 94 p 3) 

   WISMUT URANIUM DAMAGE LESS THAN THOUGHT--According to Environment 
Minister Klaus Toepfer, the environmental damage caused by the GDR- 
Soviet uranium mining company Wismut is more limited than originally 
thought.  New federal studies estimate that only about 180 square 
kilometers of territory in Saxony, Thuringia, and Saxony-Anhalt were 
contaminated by Wismut's mining operations.  Early post-unification 
projections estimated that such contamination had affected around 
1,500 square kilometers.  The Federal Government's projection of a 
10-15 year cleanup program costing DM13 billion should nevertheless 
be regarded as a "lower limit," according to Toepfer. 

   Some DM3 billion has already been spent on projects such as 
moving uranium ore dumps and flooding abandoned mineshafts.  Clean- 
up financing is subject to revision in cases where local governments 
acquire Wismut real estate, and a complete decontamination of GDR- 
era sites is still going to take years, if not decades, in Toepfer's 
view.  Moreover, the president of the Federal Office for Nuclear 
Protection recently reported the discovery of radon contamination in 
some Wismut structures and the documentation of some 7,000 cases of 
lung cancer in one-time Wismut miners.  The government is not 
prepared to concede, however, that the radon gas in the mines, as 
opposed to the radioactivity in the ore, is the cause of the high 
lung cancer rates.  (Charles W. x36473)  (Duesseldorf HANDELSBLATT 
in German 22-23 Apr 94 p 5) 

   GREECE 

   EMBARGO THREATENS ECONOMY, GRANTS--An article in I KATHIMERINI 
claims the possibility of punitive measures against Greece by the 
European Court of Justice because of Greece's embargo against the 
Former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia (FYROM) is compounding the 
difficulties affecting the Greek economy, such as high inflation, 
huge deficits, overindebtedness, and weak productivity.  Sanctions 
could translate into fines, as well as demands for damages from the 
companies that used to export goods to the FYROM.  Worse still, 
sanctions could include withholding of EU "Delors II package" 
grants, a move with unpredictable repercussions on the Greek 
economy.  In addition, the economy could not be trusted to meet the 
standards required for EU convergence, which are based on the 
assumptions of this year's budget.  The article contends that 
Greece's relations with the EU have entered a critical period and 
that the EU will probably in the future treat Greece more with 
severity than tolerance. (Rosa M. x36287)  (Athens I KATHIMERINI in 
Greek 17 Apr 94 p 51) 

   VIOLATION OF EMBARGO CHARGED--Northern Greece customs authorities 
are conducting a detailed investigation of border crossings- 
-especially at the Promakhonas point, one of the main exits to 
Bulgaria, through which almost all Greek exports to the Balkans are 
made--after a number of exporters charged that some businessmen are 
violating the embargo Greece has imposed on the Former Yugoslav 
Republic of Macedonia (FYROM).  According to the charges, illegal 
exports to Skopje include raw materials, yarn, packaging materials, 
and metals.  Exports go through Bulgaria, where product descriptions 
are altered, reportedly with the acquiescence of Bulgarian 
authorities.  (Rosa M. x36287)  (Athens I KATHIMERINI in Greek 15 
Apr 95 p 21) 

   NEW TAX BILL EXPECTED--The new tax bill, which was recently 
submitted to the Chamber of Deputies, provoked a strong reaction 
even on the part of social and professional classes that 
traditionally support the governing Panhellenic Socialist Movement 
(PASOK), according to an article in I KATHEMERINI.  The government, 
under pressure to modify a number of the bill's provisions, such as 
raising the limit of workers and retirees' tax-free income and 
abolishing the taxation of earnings from mutual funds, is reportedly 
determined to stand its ground and is expecting to derive the 
following revenues from the bill's provisions (in drachmas): 

   1.  From businessmen and professions: 120 million 
   2.  From builders: 10 billion 
   3.  From farmers: 5 billion 
   4.  From property (cars, real estate, boats): 10 billion 
   5.  From abolishing tax-free housing loans for second residences: 
       3 billion 
   6.  From tax on incomes over 15 million drachmas: 5 billion 
   7.  From taxes levied on large companies and mutual funds: 80 
billion 
   8.  From real estate transfers: 2 billion 
   9.  From value-added taxes on certain vehicles: 13.6 billion 
   10. From tax evasion countermeasures: 170 billion 
   11. Total: 418.6 billion 

   An article in ELEVTHEROTIPIA adds that the new tax bill is not 
the best that could have been proposed.  It will not result in fair 
taxation, will not decisively stop "Greek national sports" such as 
tax evasion, and may even prove unfair in a number of cases. 
However, it does attempt to correct the tax differences that divide 
Greeks into "dumb taxpayers" and "clever tax evaders." (Rosa M. 
x36287)  (Athens I KATHIMERINI in Greek 10 Apr 94 p 1;  Athens 
ELEVTHEROTIPIA in Greek 8 Apr 94 p 6) 

   ITALY 

   FARM ORGANIZATIONS UNHAPPY WITH GATT ACCORD--The National 
Confederation of Small Farmers (Coldiretti), the General 
Confederation of Italian Agriculture (Confagricoltura), and the CIA 
(former General Confederation of Italian Farmers) expressed their 
displeasure over the GATT accord signed in Marrakesh and its 
negative effects on Italy's agricultural industry.  These 
organizations blame the Ciampi government for the GATT's total lack 
of concessions to Mediterranean products.  They claim the government 
did not want to listen to the farmers' concerns and never took the 
problem to heart, even though protecting these products would not 
have required great sacrifices since they they have small markets. 
As a result, the organizations now foresee the loss of 100,000 jobs 
over the next five years, a further drop in profits, at least a 20- 
-percent reduction in production of beef, milk, and grains and a 
further decrease--from 30 to 50 percent--in the price of farmlands. 

   Furthermore, any benefit derived from importing cheaper South 
American products will be absorbed by intermediaries such as 
processors and distributors rather than farmers and consumers.  At 
the same time, the burden of production costs remains, 
Confagricoltura General Manager Arcangelo Mafrici stated.  With 
cheaper South American products and 20-percent fewer exports to 
Third World countries imposed on Europe over five years, more 
agricultural products will remain in Europe, lowering prices and 
reducing production. 

   Coldiretti President Paolo Micolini said that to survive, Italian 
farmers must become better educated, produce high quality and fresh 
products, and raise more products indigenous to the country.  Above 
all, the agricultural industry must cut production costs.  This is 
possible, Micolini claims, despite the fact that the government 
cannot fix prices.  Instead, it can reduce indirect taxes, make 
favorable credit available, strengthen services--especially 
transportation--and invest in research. (Anilla B. x36283)  (Rome IL 
MESSAGGERO in Italian 17 Apr 94 p 16) 

   IRI PRESIDENT ON STET, OTHER PRIVATIZATIONS--In an interview 
given to the French daily LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES, Institute for the 
Reconstruction of Industry (IRI) President Romano Prodi addressed 
the privatization of the IRI's telecommunications subsidiary, the 
Turin Telephone Finance Company (STET), and other state-owned 
companies.  According to Prodi, France's telecommunications company 
Alcatel, which along with Italy's Pirelli company is interested in 
purchasing large shares in STET once it is privatized.  Prodi 
clearly stated, however, that he sees no reason why Alcatel should 
be allowed to control an Italian telecommunications company when 
Italian companies cannot do the same in France.  "I have been very 
clear on this," Prodi said, and dashed any hopes that Alcatel or 
Pirelli could gain control of STET by adding that manufacturers of 
telecommunications equipment and providers of telecommunications 
services cannot own the same company.  Although he can understand 
Alcatel's interest in STET, as well as Ericsson's and AT&amp;T's, Prodi 

said he cannot understand why they are creating such a commotion 
over Italian but not French telecommunications companies. 

   In the interview Prodi also discussed plans for other 
privatizations.  His comments are summarized below: 

   * SIP:  Italy's National Telephone Company may be dismantled, 
with part of it incorporated into STET. 

   * ILVA:  The privatization of the steel company is scheduled to 
be completed within a few weeks, since the banks have agreed to 
convert part of the credits into capital, and therefore future share 
purchasers will no longer have to purchase 100 percent of the 
company. 

   * GS-Autogrills: Privatization of the chain of highway 
restaurants and shops is expected soon because the chain has been 
opened up to new bids and Prodi expects quick and adequate bids to 
come in. 

   * Food Industry: Privatization of this sector is expected to be 
more difficult, because the just-completed privatization of the 
Cirio-Bertolli-De Rica group has been severely criticized by the 
Italian Federation of Trade Unions (UIL) for having been sold 
separately to FISVI and Cragnotti. 

   * Alitalia: The public airline company will not be privatized at 
the present time because the company has just changed management and 
is being reorganized. (Anilla B. x36283)  (Rome LA REPUBBLICA in 
Italian 19 Apr 94 p 47) 

   BUSINESS VIEWS NEW GOVERNMENT WITH OPTIMISM--Rome daily LA 
REPUBBLICA conducted a poll among businessmen what they expect of 
the economy under the new government, which will assume its duties 
within the next few weeks.  The majority was optimistic, with many 
respondents saying they would be willing to hire and invest more. 
They also stressed that the new government must quickly cut public 
expense, increase privatizations, reduce taxes, liberalize 
employment regulations, increase public administration efficiency, 
lower interest rates, and resume providing for public works.  Below 
are the responses (in percentages): 


     Interest Rates                  Inflation 
     Will decrease          85       Will remain the same   60 
     Will remain the same   10       Will increase          25 
     Will increase           5       Will decrease          15 

   Internal Demand                 Employment in Interviewee Company 
     Will increase          65       Will increase          60 
     Will remain the same   30       Will remain the same   35 
     Will decrease           5       Will decrease           5 

   How Much Will You Invest? 
     More than in the previous six months     60 
     Less than in the previous six months     20 
     The same as in the previous six months   20 

(Anilla B. x36283) 
   (Rome LA REPUBBLICA in Italian 20 Apr 94 p 43) 



   SMALL BUSINESSES NEED 'URGENT' ASSISTANCE--In an interview 
published in Milan's IL SOLE-24 ORE, Giorgio Fossa, president of the 
small business group attached to the General Confederation of 
Italian Industry (Confindustria), commented that small businesses 
need urgent government intervention to prevent many of them from 
failing.  Fossa said that during the recent electoral campaign all 
the parties promised to address the problems of small companies and 
these firms hoped the new government would not forget them.  Fossa 
was particularly impressed with Forza Italia's program to support 
small business, saying it coincided almost word for word with 
proposals contained in a document released by Confindustria in 
November. 

   Fossa listed some measures needed immediately to keep companies 
from going under.  They include extending export credit insurance to 
small companies, especially since exports seems to be the only part 
of the economy that is currently growing and small companies are not 
allowed to use the traditional channels of export credit insurance; 
removing the tax on reinvested profits; more flexibility in the use 
of labor, including short-term employment; refinancing Law 317, 
which allowed many companies to undergo technological innovation; 
shifting the indebtedness of small companies from a short to a 
medium- and long-term period "to give them a chance to catch their 
breath"; and standardizing taxes on company bonds not listed on the 
stock market. (Anilla B. x36283)  (Milan IL SOLE-24 ORE in Italian 6 
Apr 94 p 2) 

   SIP ACCUSED OF UNFAIR TRADE PRACTICES--An article in IL SOLE-24 
ORE reports that Assital, the association of commercial telephone 
switchboard installers, has accused the Italian National Telephone 
Company (SIP) of unfair competition in the sale and installation of 
commercial telephone switchboards.  Assistal, comprised of 1,200 
small- and medium-sized companies legally authorized by the Ministry 
of Posts to install and maintain commercial switchboards, complained 
to the Antitrust Commission SIP is illicitly using its position of 
strength as the sole provider of basic telephone services to keep 
out competitors.  Although the telecommunications industry has been 
completely deregulated, SIP continues to use its privileged position 
to dominate the market.  Because it is the sole provider of basic 
telephone services, SIP knows who the potential new users are and 
will explicitly tell those customers that new installations and 
maintenance "will proceed smoothly" as long as they use SIP for both 
services.  According to Assistal, SIP's behavior automatically 
excludes private companies from competition.  It believes SIP should 
act as other public utilities do, that is, provide their service "to 
the front door" of companies and then let the free market dictate 
the rest.  Only this way can companies operating in the same 
industry have a chance to compete fairly. 

   According to the complaint, SIP should be given one of two 
choices:  either it act solely as a public utility company or it 
privatizes and acts like other private companies in the 
telecommunications markets, under the same regulations.  It should 
not be allowed to do both.  Continuation of the present situation, 
Assistal stressed, will adversely affect employment in the 
telecommunications field, leading to a loss of 12,000 jobs within a 
couple of years.  SIP is slated to merge with four other public 
telecommunications companies into a single company, Telecom Italia, 
to be privatized later this year. (Anilla B. x36283)  (Milan IL 
SOLE-24 ORE in Italian 14 Apr 94 p 9) 

   SPAIN 

   BANCO SANTANDER TAKES OVER BANESTO--An article in the Madrid 
daily EL PAlS reports that Bank of Spain Governor Luis Angel Rojo 
announced on 25 April that Banco Santander has bought 73.45 percent 
of financially troubled Banesto for 313 billion pesetas.  The 
takeover means that the Santander group is now Spain's largest bank, 
placing it ahead of close competitors such as Banco Bilbao Vizcaya 
(BBV) and Banco Central Hispano (BCH).  Banco Santander President 
Emilio Botin has also announced his decision to retain Banesto 
management, currently headed by Alfredo Saenz who has been in charge 
of Banesto's reorganization during the past four months.  According 
to the article, the acquisition has meant that the Deposit Insurance 
Fund (FGD) has been able to recover 313 billion pesetas of the total 
505 billion pesetas that it will cost to financially reorganize 
Banesto.  The remainder of the cost will be picked up by the state 
through the Bank of Spain. 

   Purchasing Banesto has given Banco Santander several advantages. 
It will now have a controlling interest in Spain's media industry 
since Banesto owns part of Antena 3 TV network, the centrist daily 
newspaper EL MUNDO, and the publishing house Grupo Zeta.  In 
addition, Banco Santander will acquire Banesto's network of branches 
located in towns of fewer than 50,000 people and its participation 
in foreign investments.  Santander will also now control 2.1 
trillion pesetas from former Banesto deposits in addition to its own 
deposits of up to 4.5 trillion pesetas.  It will lead the Spanish 
banking world in terms of increased assets, which are now valued at 
17 trillion pesetas.  However, the Banesto acquisition presents 
Banco Santander's management with a more narrow margin for financial 
maneuvering and operations than before because Santander will also 
be inheriting heavier operating costs from Banesto. (Carolina H. 
x36288)  (Madrid EL PAlS in Spanish 26 Apr 94 pp 1, 41) 

   SWEDEN 

   POSITIVE ECONOMIC SIGNS SEEN--On 7 April, the Stockholm daily 
DAGENS NYHETER published a list of indicators that the economic 
recovery in Sweden has begun.  The quantity of goods transported on 
the highways and railways is increasing, as is air traffic, which, 
according to the paper, reflects an increase in exports.  According 
the Central Statistical Bureau (SCB), a record share of households- 
-40 percent of those surveyed--believe the economy will improve over 
the next few years.  In addition, more new firms are being founded 
than at any time in the last five years, and industry is producing 
more. 

   In the last year, the largest firms have gone front posting a 4 
billion-kronor collective loss to realizing a 35 billion-kronor 
collective gain.  60 percent of smaller firms are reporting an 
increase in orders as well.  Companies are planning to increase 
investment this year by 41 billion kronor, which represents a 15- 
percent jump.  Sales of large consumer goods, such as cars, 
increased by 21 percent in March.  The stock market is rising again 
too, and inflation has sunk to about 2 percent.  Although 
unemployment is still high, DAGENS NYHETER reports a 154-percent 
increase in help wanted ads and the SCB notes that there was a 0.5 
percent drop in the official unemployment rate from January to 
February.  (Wendy S. x36506)  (Stockholm DAGENS NYHETER in Swedish 7 
Apr 94 p C1) 

   ECONOMIC BRIEFS 

   EU 

   --Commission has changed certain regulations pertaining to EU- 
issued debt, loans... issuers must now inform contracting parties 
that contract currency could be replaced by EU's single currency, as 
could capital, interest repayments. . .Commission also guarantees 
continuity of loan repayments during process leading to full 
monetary union.  changes in line with principles set out in 
Maastricht Treaty on monetary union.  (Paris LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES 20 
Apr 94 p 28) 

   France 

   --SNECMA will join Germany's MTU, Italy's Fiat Avio in 
developing, producing, selling turboprop engine for future European 
military cargo aircraft...joint venture to be formed end of year. 
(LES ECHOS 20 Apr 94 p 15) 

   Greece 

   --Ministry of Finance expects reducing fines for delinquent 
taxpayers will persuade them to settle debts... calculates 
government revenues may surpass 180 billion drachmas.. .deputy 
finance minister admits to date only one in four taxpayers has come 
forward, hopes two in four will by expiration date. (I KATHIMERINI 
16 Apr 94 p 21) 
ELAG/05 MAY/ECONF/WED JEG 06/0220Z MAY 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47614 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000026294001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   9 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
(DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS, THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS) 
FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-064--IRAQ 
<H3> <TI>      IRAQ: 'Udayy's BABIL Glories In Coalition Charges Against Regime </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       IRAQ: 'Udayy's BABIL Glories In Coalition Charges Against Regime </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
Summary--Evidently      seeking to further cultivate his public 
image as a top Iraqi official and potential successor to his father, 
Saddam Husayn's son 'Udayy has continued to publish in his newspaper 
BABIL materials that are taboo for  other  Iraqi media organs.  For 
example, the 2 February 1994 issue contains copies of alleged fliers 
dropped on al-Basrah Governorate by "coalition aircraft" that depict 
'Udayy and other Iraqi officials as "wanted" by "international 
justice."  The pictures of 'Udayy and other senior Iraqi officials 
are accompanied by summaries of the individuals' alleged crimes. 

   'Udayy Saddam Husayn's newspaper BABIL has had a long history of 
publishing articles, editorials, and interviews that are 
surprisingly candid and frank in in a country with strict limits on 
freedom of the press.  'Udayy apparently has used this vehicle not 
only to portray himself as a champion of press freedom, but also to 
avenge his enemies and to advance his political career.  The fact 
that BABIL has continued to be published suggests that 'Udayy's 
enterprising approach to commenting on political and economic 
developments in Iraq enjoys, on balance, Saddam's support. 

   'Udayy may have published the fliers in question primarily to 
enhance his own political status.  BABIL's headline on the fliers 
reads: "The Greatest Honor: Serving the Homeland and the Leader." 
'Udayy's name and picture appear alongside those of Vice-President 
Taha Yasin Ramadan, Defense Minister 'Ali Hasan al-Majid, Interior 
Minister Watban Ibrahim, Revolution Command Council Member Muhammad 
Hamzah al-Zubaydi, and Ba'th Party Command Member 'Aziz Salih al- 
Numan.  The text accompanying the reproduced fliers claimed that 
they were air-dropped by the same aircraft that had dropped 
"hundreds of tons of bombs on our great people" during the Gulf War. 
But, it added, those attacks "failed to achieve the enemies' goal of 
infringing on the sovereignty, security, and renaissance of Iraq 
under its mujahid leader President Saddam Husayn, may God protect 
and preserve him."  The hardcopy version of this Foreign Media Note 
contains pictures of six individuals and a summary of the crimes 
with which their are charged. 
   (QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, PERSIAN GULF/SOUTH 
ASIA BRANCH AT (703) 733-6574) 
ENEAG/O6MAY/POLCHF/NEASA Division/ta 06/1920z may 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47615 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000026394001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   9 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-06MAY94--UKRAINE 
<H3> <TI>      Ukraine:  Officers Block Merger of Air, Air Defense Forces </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Ukraine:  Officers Block Merger of Air, Air Defense Forces </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                                         When the Ukrainian government at tempted to merge units inherited 
from the former USSR's Air Force and Air Defense Forces into a 
single service arm, it encountered potent opposition from 
officers of both services, illustrating that the officers' sense 
of service identity and concern to protect their traditional 
military missions have carried over into Ukrainian politics as 
potent forces.  Although the government retreated partially on 
the merger, postponing it at least until 1996, the government and 
Defense Minister Vitaliy Radetskyy, in particular, seem 
determined to assert their authority over the services and 
eventually to force the merger through.  The dispute over the 
merger is taking place against a background of military 
dissatisfaction over a wide range of issues, including budget 
shortfalls that the government is unlikely to be able to relieve, 
making further conflict between the government and the officers 
probable. 
                                     END SUMMARY 
   The officers waged a dogged struggle against the government's 
intention to merge units of the Air Force and Air Defense Forces- 
-separate services under the Soviet regime--into a single service 
arm.  On 6 December 1991, the Supreme Council approved a Law on 
the Ukrainian Armed Forces, which specified that the armed forces 
would consist of three services: ground forces, a navy, and a 
single "Air Force (Airspace Defense Troops)" [footnote: In both 
Russian and Ukrainian, the term "airspace defense" (oborona 
vozdushnogo prostranstva/oborona povitryanoho prostoru) clearly 
refers only to territorial airspace, and not to outer space.] 
(Narodnaya Armiya, 4 January 1994).  Perhaps in deference to to 
military opposition, the government was extremely dilatory both 
in implementing the merger and in publicly making the case for 
it.  Volodymyr Antonets, an Air Force major general, spent 
several months in 1992 drafting a plan to implement the merger 
(Narodnaya Armiya, 31 July 1992; Holos Ukrayiny, 4 August 1992); 
subsequent press reports identified him as the initiator of the 
idea for the merger (Krasnaya Zvezda, 6 February 1993 and 4 March 
1994; Kievskiye Vedomosti, 23 February 1994).  However, while 
Antonets was working on the merger implementation plan, President 
Leonid Kravchuk issued a decree on military organization which 
listed the Air Force and Air Defense Forces as separate services 
(Narodnaya Armiya, 20 May 1992) and appointed separate Air Force 
and Air Defense Forces commanders, Valeriy Vasylyev (Pravda 
Ukrayiny, 6 May 1992) and Mykhaylo Lopatin (Narodnaya Armiya, 6 
June 1992). 
   Military Opposition to Merger 
   From the beginning, there was clearly strong opposition within 
the military to the merger.  Only days after the text of the Law 
on the Armed Forces was published, Armed Forces First Deputy 
Chief of Staff Georgiy Zhivitsa told an interviewer that Ukraine 
would have separate Air and Air Defense Forces (Narodnaya Armiya, 
10 January 1992).  Shortly after his appointment as Air Force 
commander, Vasylyev openly opposed the merger, telling an 
interviewer that the two services had sharply different functions 
and that the combined service would give short shrift to the Air 
Force's function of carrying the war to an aggressor's rear areas 
and home bases, a function which he said Soviet experience in 
World War II and Afghanistan had shown to be crucial.  Vasylyev 
also called for the adoption of special emblems and other 
measures to enhance the Air Force's sense of group identity, and 
made a rather plaintive plea for the government to be more 
"solicitous" of the Air Force's needs in general (Narodnaya 
Armiya, 2 June 1992). 
   Shortly thereafter, Vasylyev's fears were indirectly 
substantiated in an article by the Air Defense Forces chief of 
staff, Vladimir Tkachev.  Tkachev seemed to envisage the merger 
as, in effect, absorption of the Air Force by the Air Defense 
Forces.  He argued that a Soviet-style, offensively oriented Air 
Force was inappropriate to independent Ukraine's purely defensive 
military strategy.  He predicted that, in the new combined air 
service, some of the Air Force regiments inherited from the 
Soviet Union would be disbanded and the remaining ones assigned 
to air defense tasks (Narodnaya Armiya, 4 June 1992).  Air 
Defense Forces Commander Lopatin, however, was reported to oppose 
the merger on grounds mirroring Vasylyev's:  He feared that the 
combined service would in wartime concentrate its assets on the 
defense of military forces in the field, ignoring the Air Defense 
Forces' central mission of protecting Ukrainian cities and 
industrial centers against enemy air attack.  Adding a note of 
national pride to the dispute, Lopatin also deprecated "blind 
copying" of Western military organizational models (Narodnaya 
Armiya, 31 July 1992). 
   Delayed Efforts To Implement Merger 
   The government persisted in its efforts to carry out the merger, 
although high level opposition within the military evidently 
slowed its progress.  A year after the Law on the Armed Services 
was enacted, Kravchuk finally appointed Antonets the first 
commander of the new combined Air Force (Airspace Defense Troops) 
in January 1993 (Holos Ukrayiny, 20 February 1993), with Vasylyev 
and Lopatin as his deputies for aviation and air defense, 
respectively (ITAR-TASS, 17 February 1993).  The Defense Ministry 
leadership also at last began to publicly answer critics of the 
merger.  Lyubomir Petriv, the new combined Air Force's first 
deputy chief of staff for aviation, assured an interviewer that 
the new service would adequately fulfill both air defense and 
offensive air combat functions.  He also argued that "world 
experience" showed that air superiority in wartime could be 
achieved only by the coordination of air defense and offensive 
operations which the merger would make possible (Demokratychna 
Ukrayina, 4 March 1993). 
   Opposition Intensifies 
   Six months after Antonets' appointment as combined Air Force 
commander, Petriv told an interviewer that unnamed officers, in 
both branches of the new service, were organizing to oppose the 
merger.  He accused them of being unpatriotic and said that they 
were opposing the merger because, by consolidating redundant 
command structures, it would eliminate a "considerable number" of 
jobs.  He concluded by calling on them to set aside "parochial 
departmental or service ambitions" (Golos Ukrainy, 8 July 1993). 
On 29 July 1993, UNIAN reported that Defense Ministry 
"discussion" of the merger--supposedly policy since December 
1991--had only just begun and that Armed Forces Chief of Staff 
Anatoliy Lopata was opposed to it.  Furthermore, UNIAN reported, 
Antonets was complaining that "military leaders" were 
"sabotaging" his directives.  In October, Supreme Council member 
Ihor Derkach claimed that the merger was going so slowly because 
Kravchuk was unable to control the military (Moloda Halychyna, 23 
October 1993). 
   Merger Called Off 
   Toward the end of 1993, the Defense Ministry appeared to 
retreating.  Although in October, the newly-appointed minister, 
Vitaliy Radetskyy, endorsed the merger (Narodna Armiya, 28 
October 1993), the next month Lopata told an interviewer that the 
merger, while still on track, would take place only "after 
diligent study and substantiation, and without any haste 
whatsoever" (Narodna Armiya, 23 November 1993).  Finally, in 
December Radetskyy "suspended" the merger and reduced the 
combined Air Force staff from 180 to 40 officers, whose only 
function would be to prepare a "feasibility study" on the merger. 
Radetskyy reportedly based the suspension on an earlier decree by 
President Kravchuk (UNIAN, 21 December 1993; Narodna Armiya, 25 
February 1994).  Plans for the Air Force/Air Defense Forces 
merger were "premature," Radetskyy subsequently said, and they 
would be carried out eventually, but not earlier than 1996 (Holos 
Ukrayiny, 20 January 1994; Ukrayinska Hazeta, 20 January-2 
February 1994; Kiev radio, 25 February 1994).  The postponement 
may have been a larger concession than Radetskyy was willing to 
admit.  In his 8 July 1993 Golos Ukrainy interview, Petriv had 
claimed that opponents of the merger hoped that, if it could be 
stalled until 1996, the separate service command structures would 
by that time be so entrenched as to make the merger impossible. 
   Military Targets Antonets 
   Two months after Radetskyy suspended the merger, Kravchuk 
outraged Air Force officers by appointing Antonets as Air Force 
commander in place of Vasylyev, who was placed "at the disposal 
of the defense minister pending future assignment" (Narodna 
Armiya, 22 February 1994; Kiev TV, 24 February 1994). [footnote: 
At the same time, Kravchuk gave Lopatin back his old job as 
commander of the separate Air Defense Forces (Narodna Armiya, 22 
February 1994).]  Seven senior Air Force generals, including the 
entire Air Force Military Council, reportedly refused to serve 
under Antonets and threatened to resign from the service unless 
his appointment was rescinded (Kievskiye Vedomosti, 23 February, 
2 March 1994; Narodna Armiya, 25 February 1994).  [footnote: 
Ukrainian media have not been observed to identify all seven of 
the generals.  Kievskiye Vedomosti on 2 March 1994 listed five of 
them: Vasylyev, Air Force Deputy Commander Ya. Skalko, V. 
Varyvoda, and N. Morokhovets--all Air Force Military Council 
members--and Gennadiy Kolodiy, commander of the 17th Air Army.] 
Ukrainian and Russian press reports attributed the generals' 
antipathy toward Antonets to his role in the merger plan, to his 
active role in the Ukrainian Officers Union (UOU) (See box), and 
to charges that Antonets was using political connections to 
displace a respected professional officer.  (Post-Postup, 2 
December 1993; Kievskiye Vedomosti, 2 March 1994; Krasnaya 
Zvezda, 4 March 1994; Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 17 March 1994).  The 
military newspaper Narodna Armiya wrote that the seven generals' 
feelings were widely shared among Air Force officers (25 February 
1994).  The Russian newspaper Kommersant-Daily commented that the 
incident was symptomatic of military unhappiness with the 
government over a wide range of issues (25 February 1994). 
Radetskyy Seeks To Soothe Feelings, Assert Authority 
   Radetskyy responded to the resignation threat by trying to 
address the officers' concerns while simultaneously reasserting 
government authority over the military and defending Antonets. 
He promptly led a delegation of top Defense Ministry officials to 
Air Force headquarters in Vinnytsya, where he "presented" 
Antonets to his subordinates and reminded the officers that 
presidential appointments were not subject to discussion by 
military officers.  During his visit, Radetskyy also fielded 
questions from Air Force officers, as well as from officers of 
the Vinnytsya-based 43rd Missile Army, on a wide range of issues 
and promised to deal with their concerns in such areas as 
shortages of fuel and spare parts and problems in discipline, 
combat readiness, safety, and living conditions.  He also 
promised the missile officers that their careers would not suffer 
as a result of Ukraine's nuclear disarmament (Narodna Armiya, 25 
February 1994; Kiev TV, 24 February 1994; Holos Ukrayiny, 26 
February 1994).  The generals were apparently persuaded to 
withdraw their resignation threat, at least for the time being 
(Kievskiye Vedomosti, 2 March 1994; Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 17 March 
1994).  Radetskyy also reportedly showed his confidence in 
Antonets by including him in a high-level group to deal with the 
crisis in Crimea (ITAR-TASS, 5 April 1994).  Deputy Defense 
Minister Ivan Bizhan also defended Antonets and confronted 
Vasylyev's supporters, saying that Vasylyev was removed from 
command of the Air Force for incompetence (Kiev radio, 6 April 
1994; Narodna Armiya, 6 April 1994). 
   Unrest in Military Widespread 
   The Ukrainian military's grievances against the government are 
long-standing and cover a wide range of issues, as evidenced by 
Vasylyev's plea for more support in his 2 June 1992 Narodnaya 
Armiya interview and by the questions which officers posed to 
Radetskyy during his trip to Vinnytsya.  There have been other 
recent manifestations of military unhappiness with the 
government: 
   -- A Narodna Armiya correspondent, Lieutenant Colonel Nykyfor 
Lysitsya, complained in an 18 December 1993 article that cutbacks 
in flight training as a result of fuel shortages had seriously 
degraded Air Force pilots' combat skills.  0n 21 February 1994, 
UNIAN reported that all Air Force combat training flights had 
been suspended for lack of fuel. 
   -- On 21 February 1994 UNIAN reported that soldiers of a combined 
arms division stationed near Odesa and an Air Force regiment in 
Ivano-Frankivsk had gone on strike because they had not been 
paid.  UNIAN also reported that officers at the Kiev Military 
Control and Communication Institute were circulating leaflets 
protesting poor living conditions. 
   -- An Air Force regiment in Chernihiv protested to President 
Kravchuk over shortages of fuel and other supplies, claiming that 
money was being wasted on non-essential items (Kievskiye 
Vedomosti, 2 March 1994). 
   -- A military columnist, Colonel Mykola Bilovil, published a 
scathing personal attack on Radetskyy, saying that the defense 
minister was lavishing luxuries on himself while the troops 
lacked basic personal and operational necessities (Ukrayinska 
Hazeta, 31 March-13 April 1994). 
   Outlook 
   The two services' success in blocking--even if only temporarily- 
-the planned Air Force/Air Defense Forces merger marks their 
emergence as a political force to be reckoned with, with a sense 
of their own institutional identity and interests and the power 
to defend those interests.  Their success evidently emboldened 
officers to press their perceived advantage by seeking to block 
Antonets' appointment as Air Force commander.  However, their 
failure to do so indicates the limits of their power for the 
moment as well as the government's determination to resist making 
any more concessions.  Ukraine's near-catastrophic economic 
situation will probably make it impossible for the government to 
assuage officers' discontent over other issues such as military 
pay and supplies, thus setting the stage for further conflict. 
The alliance--perhaps of convenience--between Radetskyy and a UOU 
activist like Antonets suggests that the defense minister may now 
see the development of the armed services into entrenched 
interest groups along service lines as a greater threat to his 
authority than the UOU's attempts to influence military policy, 
attempts he has previously opposed. 
   Box 
   Biographic Information on Antonets 
   Volodymyr Mykhaylovych Antonets is a career Air Force officer as 
well as a long-time activist in the Union of Officers of Ukraine 
(UOU).  In February 1992 he was a major general of aviation and 
commander of aviation for the Carpathian Military District 
(Krasnaya Zvezda, 25 February l992), and was then appointed 
commander of the 14th Air Army (Narodnaya Armiya, 21 March 1992). 
At a session of of the UOU oblast chairmen's coordinating 
committee, he spoke against acceptance into the armed forces of 
officers whose loyalty to Ukraine he considered suspect 
(Narodnaya Armiya, 1 May 1992; Krasnaya Zvezda, 10 June 1992). 
In a round table sponsored by Narodnaya Armiya, he defended the 
UOU's then-prominent role in military reorganization (13 June 
1992).  Critics of the UOU have accused Antonets of organizing 
medical treatment, on the UOU's behalf, for members of the 
underground armed Ukrainian Self-Defense (UNSO) organization 
(Kievskiye Vedomosti, 27 November 1993; Krasnaya Zvezda, 4 March 
1994).  On at least two occasions, Antonets has spoken publicly 
against Ukraine's nuclear disarmament (Za Vilnu Ukrayinu, 20 
February 1992; Krasnaya Zvezda, 25 February 1992).  In 1992, 
Antonets drafted a plan to implement the merger of the Air Force 
and Air Defense Forces, which the Supreme Council had decided on 
in December 1991 (Narodnaya Armiya, 31 July 1992; Holos Ukrayiny, 
4 August 1992).  In January 1993, President Kravchuk promoted him 
to lieutenant general and appointed him commander of a new 
service arm combining the Air Force and the Air Defense Forces 
(Holos Ukrayiny, 20 February 1993).  After the merger of the two 
services was called off, Kravchuk appointed him commander of the 
Air Force (Narodnaya Armiya, 22 February 1994). 
   End of Box 
   (AUTHOR:  O'LEARY.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
MILITARY/INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS BRANCH (703) 733-6375) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/CB 06/2012z May 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47616 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000026494001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   10 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-065--PALESTINIAN 
<H3> <TI>      PALESTINIANS: WEST BANK-GAZA DEVELOPMENTS #2 </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       PALESTINIANS: WEST BANK-GAZA DEVELOPMENTS #2 </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
This      Foreign Media Note series contains information on 
developments in West Bank-Gaza politics, economics, agriculture, 
education, and health care from the Arabic-language Palestinian 
press and the London expatriate press. 

   Palestine Investment Company Registered in Liberia 

   The Palestine Company for Development and Investment (PCDI) has 
been registered in Liberia with capital amounting to $200 million 
under Liberia's off-shore company law.  Its headquarters will be in 
Monrovia, and it will open branch offices elsewhere.  The company 
has been established as a holding company to work with Arab- 
Palestinian holding companies inside the West Bank and Gaza to 
facilitate economic projects there.  Its aim is to promote 
development and entrepreneurship in Gaza and the West Bank, 
providing jobs and using local talent.  PDCI will encourage 
Palestinian, Arab, and international investment and the opening of 
foreign markets to Palestinian goods. The company will invest in 
industry, agriculture, services, real estate, and tourism with the 
goal of supporting the Palestinian economy.  AL-NAHAR lists over loo 
founding members of PCDI, including companies, banks, and 
individuals. 
   The number of shareholders in PCDI will be limited to 500, with a 
subscription limit between $100,000 and $2 million, of which 20 
percent must be paid at the time of subscription.  After an 
unspecified period of time, the subscribers will be issued common 
shares.  There will be between 15 and 25 members of the board of 
directors who will be elected by the company founders.  The company 
plans to invest in an industrial company, an agricultural processing 
company, a tourism company, a real estate company, and a services 
company. 

   PCDI will give priority to projects which: 
   Use local natural resources. 
   Process raw materials for existing projects. 
   Use agricultural surplus. 
   Produce goods to replace imports. 
   Provide the most jobs. 
   Produce goods for export. 
   Add value to local products. 
   Meet the basic needs of the local population. 
(Jerusalem AL-NAHAR 24 Mar 94) 

   Fatah Candidates Win Bar Association Elections in Gaza 

   Fatah candidates won six out of seven seats in elections for the 
administrative council of the Bar Association in Gaza.  The seventh 
seat was won by Islamic Jihad partisan Nazim 'Uwaydah, who was 
elected vice-president.  For the first time, a woman, Subhiyah Abu- 
Mazid, was elected to the council.  Election results are as follows: 

   President--Fayiz Abu-Rahmah 
   Vice-President--Nazim 'Uwaydah 
   Chief Administrator--Fayiz Ziyadah 
   Treasurer--Ahmad al-Mughanni 
   Members--' Abd-al-Rahim al-Naj ar; 
   Subhiyah Abu-Mazid; 
   Muhammad al-Liddawi 
(Jerusalem AL-NAHAR 9 Mar 94) 

   Hotels, Businesses Planned for Jericho 

   Investors are planning to open several hotels in Jericho.  The 
family of the late Karim Khalif has announced that it will build a 
tourist hotel on the al-Jandul park site.  Akram Subaytani said that 
he has already spent 4 million dinars to build a hotel in Jericho 
and will spend another million to complete it.  Plans are also being 
made to reconstruct the Winter Palace Hotel on Ayn al-Sultan Street. 
Many residents of Jericho are expanding and renovating their shops, 
and residents of Jerusalem and elsewhere are buying land and renting 
shops there in anticipation of a tourism boom.  (Jerusalem AL-NAHAR 
25 Mar 94) 

   West Bank Journalists Expect Heavy Censorship Under Self-Rule 

   West Bank journalists believe that the new Palestinian authority 
will heavily censor the West Bank-Gaza press under self-rule. 
According to Al-QUDS journalist 'Ali Jiddah, "Very regrettably, I 
say that in the coming phase, the Palestinian press will not be in 
better condition than its current condition.... I say this by virtue 
of my full awareness of the Palestinian forces' miserable history of 
democratic action.  Moreover, the incoming government will focus its 
efforts on cementing and entrenching the mainstays of its rule, 
which necessarily means that it will try to curb the voice and echo 
of the forces that are likely to pose a threat to this government 
and to its authority.... especially since the statements of some 
Palestinian officials point in this direction.  I particularly note 
Hakam Bal'awi's statement on how the opposition will be dealt with 
in the future." 

   Journalist Ghazi Bani 'Awdah comments: "I don't believe that 
press conditions under the self-rule government will be 
fundamentally different from the current conditions.  All signs 
indicate in one way or another that oppression and persecution will 
be the lot of any voice or pen that writes about real issues and 
that doesn't sing the praises of autonomy....Let us learn a lesson 
from the recent expulsion of Hijazi, a journalist, from FILASTIN AL- 
THAWRAH and from numerous other incidents."  Majid 'Aruri from 
Sanabil Press Bureau in Ramallah says: "Autonomy will employ its 
authority to prevent the emergence of any voices that criticize 
autonomy.  This task will be easy in the absence of a press union 
body capable of confronting this policy.  The union body (the 
Journalists League) is controlled and dominated by the group 
supporting self-rule, even though it incorporates other parties. 
However, these parties' role is ineffective and not influential." 
According to journalist Hani al-'Isawi from AL-QUDS, "If there is a 
press under self-rule, it will be a yellow press, i.e., government 
press, solely.  It is feared that whoever violates this (rule) will 
be pursued.  Therefore, there will be no need for a special press 
censor, because all agencies under autonomy will be in the service 
of government propaganda solely."  (Jerusalem AL-BAYADIR AL-SIYASI 
26 Feb 94) 

   National Institutes Office on Merger With PLO 

   Dr. Samir al-Tamimi, head of the Office of National Institutes in 
Gaza and the West Bank, says that PLO institutions and those in the 
West Bank and Gaza Strip will merge during the transitional period. 
He listed the most difficult aspects of the merger as: 

   1) Determining the positions of local organization and their 
leadership (personality conflicts are feared). 
   2) Changing institutions from personal fiefdoms (which he says is 
predominant) to organizations of common concern. 
   3)  Financial difficulties (from which the institutions currently 
suffer). 
   4)  Proliferation of similar institutions which provide the same 
services (they must have unified national institutions). 

   Dr. al-Tamimi said that he is trying to get a study done on how 
these institutions will be merged, and he expects that his office 
will meet with the PLO to plan the merger at some point in the 
future.  He pointed out that West Bank and Gaza institutions are the 
foundational institutions, and that the external institutions are 
its branches.  He said that the idea of forming the Office of 
National Institutes sprang from the need to have a centralized 
office to oversee and organize cooperation between local 
institutions and PLO institutions.  Previously, al-Tamimi said, 
local institutes suffered from a lack of direct contact with the 
PLO.  In addition, there were many institutes doing similar work 
under different names, which he considers a waste of time and money. 
He divided West Bank-Gaza institutes into the following categories: 
cultural, authors, journalists, arts, women, students, charitable, 
teachers, clubs, youth, workers, educational, engineers, refugees, 
refugee camps.  (Jerusalem AL-NAHAR 19 Mar 94) 

   Plan for Industrial Zone in Nabulus 

   Husam Hajjawi, the head of the Nabulus Chamber of Commerce, 
announced at the Chamber's most recent meeting that steps are being 
taken to establish an industrial zone in Nabulus.  Hajjawi said that 
the need for a Nabulus industrial zone arises from the high price of 
land in the area which has hindered industrial investment, and the 
60 percent-plus unemployment rate among the city's workforce.  He 
said that the cost of constructing the industrial zone will be 
between $15 and $20 million, according to preliminary estimates, and 
that contact has been made with European and American investors. 
The European Union has said it will finance a portion of the zone's 
expenses, and American Near East Refugee Aid (ANERA) is reportedly 
prepared to offer $1 million immediately for the implementation of 
the first phase of the project. 

   According to Hajjawi, building and engineering industries are the 
most important industries for the zone in view of the anticipated 
construction activity during the transitional period, when it is 
expected that at least 150,000 to 180,000 housing units will be 
built.  This will necessitate factories for such products as 
electrical wiring, cable, aluminum, and doors.  Hajjawi acknowledged 
that there will be stiff competition from Israeli industries, and 
that Palestinian workers will need training.  He said that a plan is 
being drawn up to create specialized training institutes in 
cooperation with West Bank universities and institutions. 
   The Nabulus Chamber of Commerce has encountered some difficulties 
with the Israeli Government regarding plans for the industrial zone: 
The Israelis have required that the zone's administration be run by 
the private sector and not by the public sector, thereby delaying 
implementation of the project.  However, Hajjawi said, many 
investors have agreed to participate, and efforts continue to 
establish a zone run by the public sector.  (London AL-SHARQ AL- 
AWSAT 1 Apr 94) 

   New Director of Palestinian Housing Council 

   The new director of the Palestinian Housing Council in Jerusalem 
is Engineer Mahmud 'Abd-al-'Aziz, who has spent his career at the 
Khatib and 'Alami Engineering Consulting Company overseeing West 
Bank projects.  (Jerusalem AL-NAHAR 23 Mar 94) 

   Jordanian Employees Complain of Unpaid Salaries 

   Employees of the Jordanian Cooperation Organization in the West 
Bank have sent letters to King Husayn and other Jordanian officials 
complaining that their salaries have not been paid in nearly a year, 
causing extreme hardship for them and their families, and asking 
officials to look into their case.  Jordanian Cooperation 
Organization employees remain on the job in the West Bank, and the 
organization continues to task them with a substantial amount of 
work, which they continue to do.  (Jerusalem AL-NAHAR 22 Mar 94) 

   Population Study Compares Number of 'Martyrs,' Births in Gaza 

   According to a study done by researcher Rishad al-Madani, there 
were approximately 207,600 births in Gaza between the time the 
intifadah began in 1987 up through the end of 1993.  During the same 
period, there were 594 "martyrs" in Gaza.  The study concludes that 
for every "martyr" who died in Gaza during this period, there were 
349 births.  The distribution of births by year is as follows:  9 
December to 31 December 1987--1,470 births; 1988--27,375 births; 
1989--32,463 births; 1990--33,142 births; 1991--36,364 births; 1992- 
-37,041 births; 1993--39,745 births.  (Jerusalem AL-NAHAR 23 Mar 94) 

   Jordan Turns Away Islamic University Administrator 

   Dr. Salah al-'Awur, head of the history department at the Islamic 
University in Gaza, was turned away at the Jordanian border when he 
attempted to attend an Arab universities history department 
conference at Jordan University in Amman.  Dr. al-'Awur sent Dr. 
Salah al-Bahth to attend the conference in his place.  (Jerusalem 
AL-NAHAR 23 Mar 94) 

   (QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, AFRICA/LEVANT 
BRANCH AT (703) 733-6408) 
ENEAG/09 May/POLCH/ECONF/NEASA Division/LRT 9/1539Z MAY 94 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47617 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000026594001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   10 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
VIENNA PLEASE PASS TO STEVE FLEISCHMANN 
WARNING: DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-O8MAY94-KOREA 
<H3> <TI>      North Hints Acceptance of ROK Role in Security Setup </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       North Hints Acceptance of ROK Role in Security Setup </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
In      an apparent attempt to blunt Seoul's charge that the North is 
trying to circumvent the ROK Government's authority, Pyongyang is 
now suggesting that it would not oppose an eventual South Korean 
role in a new security setup on the Korean peninsula.  A 6 May 
Foreign Ministry spokesman's statement intimated that the North- 
South joint military committee called for by the 1991 
nonaggression pact could be revived once the armistice accord is 
replaced by a "new system of guaranteeing peace" (Pyongyang 
radio, 6 May).  In fact, the statement said, the new security 
system would "facilitate the effectuation" of the 1991 pact. 
Under the terms of the 1991 pact, the joint military committee, 
which was established in 1992 but never put into operation, was 
to deal with inter-Korean security affairs. 
  Despite its endorsement of one of the provisions of the 
nonaggression pact, the 6 May statement reiterated Pyongyang's 
contention that negotiations on the truce accord must be 
conducted bilaterally between Pyongyang and Washington (Trends of 
4 May 1994, pages).  North Korea had implicitly abandoned 
this position in December 1991, when it signed the nonaggression 
pact with the South--an agreement that treats the armistice 
question as an inter-Korean issue.  In recent months Pyongyang 
media had been claiming that the nonaggression accord was no 
longer valid (KCNA, 29 March). 
  (AUTHOR:  YIM.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6534.) 
EAG/HEBBEL/LRT 9/2100Z MAY 94 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47618 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000026694001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   12 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-11MAY94-CHINA 
<H3> <TI>      China-Central Asia-Mongolia </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       China-Central Asia-Mongolia </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
PRC      Premier's Central Asian Tour Promotes Expanded Ties 
                              SUMMARY 
   PRC Premier Li Peng's recent official visits to Mongolia and to 
the Republics of Uzbekistan, Turkmenistan, Kyrgyzstan, and 
Kazakhstan have served to underscore China's deepening ties with 
its neighbors in Central Asia.  At the same time, Beijing used 
the visit to reassure those neighbors and Russia of its peaceful 
intentions in the region.  Beijing may also hope that growing 
ties with these countries may help to limit the reemergence of 
Russian influence. 
                             END SUMMARY 
   Li Peng's 18-28 April tour of the four Central Asian republics 
was highlighted by a further expansion of China's bilateral 
economic relations with Uzbekistan, Turkmenistan, Kyrgyzstan, and 
Kazakhstan.  The 18-20 April stop in Uzbekistan, for example, was 
capped by the signing of four bilateral accords, including an 
agreement on a Chinese loan to the Uzbekistan Government and a 
pact on civil aviation (Xinhua, 19 April).  Three agreements--one 
covering a 50 million yuan PRC loan to the Turkmenistan 
Government, a protocol on regular consultations between the 
foreign ministries of the two countries, and notes on a Chinese 
grant of goods--were signed during Li's 20-22 April stay in 
Turkmenistan (Xinhua, ITAR-TASS, 22 April).  The signing of five 
intergovernmental agreements, including an accord on PRC loans to 
Kyrgyzstan and one on cultural cooperation, marked Li's 22-25 
April stay in Bishkek (Xinhua, 24 April), while three accords 
were signed during his 25-28 April visit to Kazakhstan.  Most 
notable among the economic documents signed in Kazakhstan was a 
"summary" of talks on developing railway transportation (Xinhua, 
28 April). 
   China's economic ties with the four Central Asian republics were 
also given a boost by the inclusion in the official Chinese 
Government delegation--" for the first time" according to a 13 
April Xinhua report--of a "delegation of leading Chinese business 
executives."  The delegation, which was headed by Zheng Hongyi, 
president of the China Council for the Promotion of International 
Trade (CCPIT), and made up of executives from the China National 
Construction Corporation, China National Petroleum Corporation, 
China National Textile Import and Export Corporation, and an iron 
and steel industrial and trade group, reportedly signed a number 
of contracts and letters of intent throughout the trip.  In 
Kyrgyzstan, for example, Xinhua reported that the CCPIT signed an 
accord with the Kyrgyzstan Chamber of Industry and Commerce on 
"developing cooperative ties," while representatives from the 
Textile Import and Export Corporation signed a contract to buy 
30,000 tons of chemical fertilizer (24 April).  Siniilarly in 
Ashgabat, China's National Petroleum Corporation signed a letter 
of intent with the Ministry of Oil and Gas of Turkmenistan on 
joint cooperation in developing the two countries' oil and gas 
sectors, while a Chinese trade and industry group signed a letter 
of intent with the Turkmenistan "Kuvvat" state power technology 
corporation to build an iron and steel works to process scrap 
metal and an aluminum production works (ITAR-TASS, 22 April). 
   Caution on Economic Ties 
   Although Chinese reporting indicates that Li and his Central 
Asian counterparts reaffirmed their desire to expand economic 
ties, Li's remarks to Kazakhstani entrepreneurs on 26 April 
suggests that Beijing will take a cautious approach to developing 
closer relations (Xinhua, 26,27 April).  Outlining China's 
guidelines for "developing economic cooperation and trade" with 
Central Asia, Li said that such cooperative efforts should be 
based not only on "equality" but also on "mutual benefit."  He 
stressed that "both sides" must benefit from the development of 
bilateral ties and that the "principle of exchanges at equal 
value" must be followed.  He also pointed out that any joint 
ventures must be evaluated on the basis of "market prospect and 
market demand" and that enterprises must focus on "taking 
advantage" of local resources to enable them to bring in "good 
economic returns with competitive products." 
   Li also used the occasion of his 26 April speech to warn the 
Central Asian republics that China will not fill the resource 
void in their economies left by the breakup of the former Soviet 
Union.  He pointed out that as a "developing" country itself 
China can only provide a "very small amount" of economic 
assistance as a "symbol of its friendship." 
   Resolving Border Issues 
   In addition to deepening economic ties with Central Asia, Li's 
visit showed new progress in resolving China's outstanding border 
problems with Kazakhstan and Kyrgyzstan.  Fulfilling a pledge 
made during Kazakhstani President Nursultan Nazarbayev's October 
1993 visit to China, Li and Nazarbayev signed a border agreement 
on 26 April.  According to a Xinhua report, Li described the new 
agreement as a "historic document" which "defines" the Sino- 
Kazakhstani border in a "legal form" (26 April).  With the 
signing of the agreement Kazakhstan becomes the first of the four 
former Soviet republics--including Russia, Tajikistan, and 
Kyrgyzstan--to resolve its border differences with Beijing (ITAR- 
TASS, 27 April). 
   Beijing also appears to have made some progress in overcoming its 
border differences with Kyrgyzstan during Li's visit.  According 
to a 23 April Xinhua account of their talks that day, Li and 
Kyrgyzstan President Askar Akayev "unanimously" agreed on the 
need to "expeditiously" turn "previously concluded" agreements 
into a "legal" document.  While noting that "some" issues remain, 
the two leaders reportedly said that "friendly negotiations" will 
continue, expressing the belief that the border issue will be 
resolved in the "not-too-distant future." 
   Reassurances on China's Regional Role 
   Chinese media reporting on Li's four-nation tour indicates that 
the PRC premier also used his visit to reassure the four Central 
Asian republics and Russia about Beijing's intentions in the 
region.  Laying out four principles for Sino-Central Asian 
relations in a speech to the Uzbekistan parliament on 19 April, 
Li reiterated China's standard foreign policy line underscoring 
China's desire for a "stable and peaceful" environment and 
renouncing any "hegemonistic" intent (Xinhua, 19 April; Renmin 
Ribao, 20 April).  China, he asserted, "seeks no self-interest or 
sphere of influence in the world, including this region," and 
will "always" maintain "equal and friendly" relations with its 
neighbors.  He went on to affirm that China will "respect" the 
"independent choice" of the Central Asian peoples and will "never 
interfere" in their internal affairs. 
   In his speech to the Uzbekistan parliament, Li also took 
particular pains to reassure Moscow of Beijing's peaceful 
intentions in the region.  Pointing to the need for "regional 
stability," Li said that China's relations with the Central Asian 
republics are "not directed against any third country." 
Indicating that Beijing sees a continued role for Moscow in the 
region, Li went on to say that China is "willing" to see all the 
countries in the region live "in harmony" with each other. 
Returning to these themes during his visit to Kazakhstan, Li told 
the group of Kazakhstani entrepreneurs that China "seeks no 
sphere of economic or political influence" in the region and is 
willing to participate in "equal and fair competition" with other 
countries desiring to invest and trade there.  Underscoring 
Beijing's peaceful intentions a day later at a press conference 
in Almaty, Li said that China has "no interest" in filling the 
"so-called vacuum" left by the breakup of the former Soviet Union 
(Xinhua, 27 April). 
   Nuclear and Ethnic Minority Issues 
   Li also used his stay in Almaty to address the sensitive issues 
of Kazakhstani concerns about China's nuclear testing program and 
China's concern over unrest among its Muslim minorities.  Stating 
China's longstanding position on nuclear testing at his press 
conference on 27 April, Li pointed out that China has the 
"smallest" number of nuclear weapons of the nuclear states and 
has pledged not to be the first to use such weapons.  He went on 
to reiterate Beijing's support for a "complete prohibition and 
thorough destruction of nuclear weapons" and for the realization 
of a "complete nuclear test ban in such a context" (Xinhua, ITAR- 
TASS, 27 April).  In return, Li appears to have received 
Nazarbayev's reassurances that Almaty will not allow its 
minorities, "elements of 'East Turkistan' to undertake activities 
against China from Kazakhstan to the detriment of Sino- 
Kazakhstani relations" (Xinhua, ITAR-TASS, 27 April). 
   Consolidating Relations With Mongolia 
   Reflecting the deepening ties between the two countries, Beijing 
and Ulaanbaatar used Li's 28-29 April visit--the first by a 
Chinese head of government since 1960--to put their bilateral 
relationship on a new footing, signing a treaty of "friendship 
and cooperation" to replace the treaty of "friendship and mutual 
assistance" signed in 1960.  The treaty, Li said, will provide a 
"new political basis" for the future development of relations and 
will be the "basic principle" for "standardizing" the handling of 
bilateral ties (Xinhua, 29 April).  According to the text carried 
by Xinhua, the treaty calls for the development of 
"goodneighborly and cooperative" relations on the basis of the 
five principles of peaceful coexistence, regular bilateral 
consultations, and the "steady development of equal and 
reciprocal cooperation on a long-term basis" in a number of 
areas, including trade, culture, education, science and 
technology, and environmental protection (29 April).  Reflecting 
the changed world situation, the new treaty contains no reference 
to "proletarian internationalism" as a basis for Sino-Mongolian 
relations and no longer calls for relations of "mutual 
assistance" between the two countries. 
   At the same time, Chinese concerns about Russian intentions were 
evident in the treaty.  Suggesting that Beijing is trying to 
guard against the possible reemergence of Russian influence, the 
treaty  said that "neither party shall join any military or 
political alliances targeted against the other or sign with any 
third country any treaties that infringe on the other side's 
sovereignty and security" or permit a "third country" to use its 
territory to "hurt the other side's sovereignty and security." 
   As he had during his previous stops, Li offered assurances to 
Mongolian Premier Puntsagiyn Jasray about Beijing's peaceful 
intentions in their talks on 29 April.  According to a Xinhua 
report that day, Li told Jasray that in developing relations with 
Mongolia, China will "respect Mongolia's independence, 
sovereignty, and territorial integrity" as well as the Mongolian 
people's "choice of their own path of development."  Li went on 
to express China's "appreciation and support" for Mongolia's 
determination to become a nuclear-free zone and the PRC's 
"willingness" to see Mongolia develop "friendly relations" with 
other countries. 
   Like the other stops on his Central Asian tour, Li's visit to 
Mongolia was capped by the signing of a number of economic 
agreements.  In addition to an accord on cultural, economic, and 
technological cooperation, Xinhua on 29 April reported that the 
two sides signed agreements on the "protection and utilization" 
of water in the border areas, on cooperation in the quarantine of 
animals and veterinary work, on guaranteeing the quality of 
imports and exports, and on the provision of Chinese aid to 
Mongolia. 
   Prospects 
   Driven by its desire for a stable international environment in 
which to pursue its modernization drive, Beijing is likely to 
continue to carefully nurture its relations with Uzbekistan, 
Turkmenistan, Kyrgyzstan, Kazakhstan, and Mongolia.  Judging by 
reporting on the visit, Beijing will soon resolve its border 
differences with Kyrgyzstan.  Moreover, as bilateral economic 
relations between China and each of the five countries grow each 
country will have an increasing stake in preserving those ties 
and minimizing any friction.  China may also hope that by 
strengthening trade ties and bilateral relations in general with 
these countries, it can broaden Beijing's influence in the region 
at Russia's expense. 
   (AUTHOR:  HEBBEL.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
CHINA ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6097.) 
EAG/HEIPLE/ta 11/1436z may 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47619 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000026794001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   12 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-11MAY94-POLAND 
<H3> <TI>      Former Communists Favor Austerity Policy Over Labor Demands </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Former Communists Favor Austerity Policy Over Labor Demands </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                                   Faced with a wave of Solidarity trade union strikes, the formerly 
communist Alliance of the Democratic Left (SLD) electoral bloc 
has reaffirmed its support for its governing coalition's 
austerity plan, branding the strikers as a threat to democracy 
and to free market reforms.  While the SLD's allies in the 
government have also criticized Solidarity's decision to strike, 
many coalition leaders have also expressed sympathy for 
Solidarity's demands and called for a loosening of the 
government's anti-inflation efforts. 
                             END SUMMARY 
   Seeing Solidarity's tactics as politically motivated rather than 
economic, SLD leaders have strongly denounced Solidarity's 
ongoing nationwide strikes that began on 26 April.  Sejm Speaker 
Jozef Oleksy, deputy chairman of the SLD's main party, Social 
Democracy of the Republic of Poland (SdRP), said during a meeting 
with workers from the FSO car plant that he did "not accept" any 
union that has put "overthrowing the government as its aim" (PAP, 
4 May).  He went on to accuse Solidarity leaders of playing 
"political games for their own benefit" (Warsaw TV, 4 May). 
After the strikes began, a Government Press Bureau Communique 
blasted Solidarity, saying that "unrest and tensions are what 
count" for the union and that "the content itself of the demands 
and negotiations is of lesser importance."  It further warned of 
the "danger to the security of the country" and threat to its 
"chances for economic development" posed by the strikes (PAP, 27 
April).  The SdRP's Trybuna daily echoed these sentiments in a 
front page commentary on 28 April that accused Solidarity of 
pushing for a "revolutionary change on the scale of what happened 
in the late 1980's."  The commentary unabashedly added that the 
union will likely be disappointed to find that "the majority of 
Poles don't have a willingness for a withdrawal from democratic 
law and a return to socialism." 
   Solidarity's Stance 
   In announcing the strikes, Solidarity leaders issued a number of 
demands to ease the effects of the economic reforms on its 
workers.  Solidarity's main demand is the immediate lifting of 
restrictions on wage increases in state-owned industries- 
-restrictions that were initiated with the inauguration of "shock 
therapy" in 1990 by the Mazowiecki government.  Although in March 
the new government rescinded a previous law mandating heavy taxes 
on "excessive" wage increases in state firms, a new and quite 
similar law was then proposed by the government, and the 
parliament has voted to extend the taxes until the end of the 
year.  Solidarity has also announced other demands, including 
lower taxes for workers, a reduction in the work week to 40 
hours, "social support" for poor families, and lower fuel prices 
(Gazeta Wyborcza, 5 May). 
AA 
   Coalition Partners' Position 
   While Solidarity's decision to strike has been condemned by 
virtually every political group, some SdRP allies have been 
critical of the government's labor policies and have even 
threatened to resign from the coalition.  Ewa Spychalska, head of 
the National Trade Union Alliance (OPZZ)--a union formed by the 
former communists in the 198O's as an alternative to Solidarity 
and a member of the SLD--admitted in a 26 April interview with 
PAP that although she has "doubts about the road chosen by 
Solidarity," its demands are "generally compatible with those put 
to the government by OPZZ."  According to PAP, Spychalska also 
warned the government not to "push the unions into a corner" and 
"did not rule out the possibility of the OPZZ leaving the 
coalition."  A similar sentiment was echoed by Ryszard Bugaj, 
chairman of a former Solidarity party, the small Union of Labor 
(UP), that has one member in the cabinet--Industry Minister Marek 
Pol.  Bugaj told journalists that the strikes demonstrated that 
"we are gradually beginning to pay the bills for this 
government's measures."  He further suggested that if the 
government's labor policies do not change, Pol might resign and 
the UP might "go into a definite kind of opposition" (Zycie 
Warszawy, 28 April), thus eliminating the government's only link 
to former Solidarity.  Even Prime Minister Waldemar Pawlak, head 
of the SLD's main coalition partner, the Polish Peasant Party 
(PSL), expressed sympathy for the strikers, saying that while the 
protests "are not justified on such a large scale," they are "a 
sign" for his government and "show very clearly how great the 
people's impatience is that these difficult matters be resolved" 
(Warsaw radio, 3O April). 
   Implications 
   While the SLD is experiencing the same difficulty that other 
governing parties faced before them -- maintaining a strict 
monetary and fiscal policy while attempting to limit popular 
discontent with the reforms -- it has the additional burden of 
living up to its campaign promises before the election.  Pledging 
during the campaign to soften the reform's effects on beleaguered 
workers and pensioners, the party is now facing the hard 
realities of limited funds for social spending and the need to 
retard inflation by keeping the lid on wages.  Although new 
parliamentary elections are not scheduled until 1997, the SLD may 
be hurting the chances of its candidate in the 1995 presidential 
elections by holding firm on its strong anti-inflationary stand, 
and may even be undermining its coalition with other parties and 
groups.  Faced with increasing social unrest and possible 
pressure from their rank-and-file members, its coalition partners 
may decide to leave the governing coalition and the OPZZ might 
withdraw from the electoral alliance.  Furthermore, the SdRP, the 
SLD's main party, will likely face internal pressures to moderate 
its policy, threatening the party either with a split or a forced 
withdrawal from its austerity program. 
   (AUTHOR:  MIHAILOVICH.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL 
CHIEF ANALYST, EUROPE/LATIN AMERICA GROUP, 733-6120) 
ELAG/GILISON/ta 11/1807z may 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47620 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000026894001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   12 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-11MAY94-CUBA 
<H3> <TI>      Havana Responds to Discontent Over Increased Power Outages </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Havana Responds to Discontent Over Increased Power Outages </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                            In an effort to address popular discontent over increases in 
power outages, the Cuban Minister of Basic Industry recently 
appeared on television to deliver an unusual defense of the 
regime's management of  the country's deteriorating electrical 
system.  While the minister's exposition may have answered 
Cubans' questions about the reasons for recently increased 
outages, it is unlikely that the presentation erased popular 
skepticism over official forecasts of economic recovery. 

                       END SUMMARY 

   The high-profile discussion of Cuba's energy problems by Basic 
Industry Minister Marcos Portal on 16 April suggests that the 
Castro regime was trying to defuse resentment over its inability 
to provide relief from increased power outages by showing Cubans 
that it pays close attention to their questions and concerns. 
Thus, Cuban television broadcast the minister's two-hour, 
detailed exposition of current and longer term energy problems 
after the media had made several brief announcements indicating 
that the need for power plant maintenance made it impossible for 
Havana to curtail unscheduled outages.(SEE NOTE 1)  For example, 
Radio Reloj on 13 April reported that the additional "cuts" in 
electricity will only "diminish little by little" as the 
"maintenance program" is carried out. 
   (NOTE 1) According to Havana media reporting, electricity cuts in 
April have consistently "exceeded" the "national schedule of 
outages" (Radio Rebelde, 1 April; Radio Reloj, 15 April). 
Indicating that extensive outages would continue into May, Radio 
Rebelde on 29 April reported that the "pattern" of lengthy 
outages will continue "next week." 
   In contrast, Havana's response to popular discontent last summer 
over extended blackouts was relatively low-key, perhaps because, 
at that time, the regime had sufficient reserves of oil to 
curtail unscheduled outages.  Accordingly, in early August of 
last year, some three weeks prior to an announcement of increased 
availability of domestic-produced oil, the deputy director of the 
national electrical enterprise spoke for just six minutes on the 
power situation during a regularly scheduled newscast (Radio 
Rebelde, 5 August 1993). 

   Explaining Plant Breakdowns 

   Portal used much of his presentation to explain the reasons for 
frequent power plant maintenance, apparently in an effort to 
disabuse Cubans of the notion that Havana's use of corrosive 
domestic crude oil was the major cause of equipment breakdowns. 
Responding to what he called "the people's concern" and 
"confusion" over the use of high-sulfur domestic crude--which he 
said some Cubans think is "destroying" power plants--Portal 
explained that backlogs in power plant maintenance are the 
primary reason for equipment failure.  Portal attributed the 
delays in maintenance to the shortage of spare parts from the 
former Czechoslovakia and Soviet Union--Cuba's main suppliers of 
power-generating equipment.  Portal said that needed supplies 
from these sources "stopped three years ago" and explained that 
Cuba's "difficult financial situation"--caused primarily by the 
drop in sugar and nickel earnings--made it difficult for Havana 
to obtain equipment from new sources. 

Reassurances on Economic Recovery 

   Portal also used his presentation to argue that increased power 
shortages did not signal a further deterioration of the economy- 
-which the regime has suggested will begin a gradual recovery 
this year.(SEE NOTE 2)  For example, in response to a question 
about the electrical system's impact on Cuba's "economic 
recovery," Portal's "categorical" answer was that the low 
"generating capacity" of the electrical system would "not put a 
brake on development." 
   (NOTE 2) For example, Radio Rebelde on 14 March reported that 
1994 was showing "symptoms of economic reactivation." 
   Suggesting, however, that Portal realized that his detailed 
discussion of Cuba's energy problems could in fact raise doubts 
about the country's economic future, he tried to portray as yet 
unresolved problems in the brightest light possible: 
   -- Although Portal admitted that he could not "confirm" that 
business "negotiations" with Russian and Czech officials to 
obtain needed power plant equipment would be successful, he 
maintained that the "relative newness" of Czech and Russian 
equipment provided Cuba with a "sense of sureness in overcoming 
the special [austerity] period." 
   -- While, at one point, Portal stated that the country "must be 
prepared . . . to face any difficulty" with regard to fuel 
supplies, at another point in his presentation he noted that this 
year "difficulties [in fuel availability] are being 
overcome."(SEE NOTE 3) 
   (NOTE 3) Although the deal has yet to be initialed, in several 
recent media reports Havana has suggested that it will soon be 
able to purchase small amounts of oil from Colombia.  For 
example, Radio Rebelde on 19 March reported that the Colombian 
Minister of Mines and Energy "reiterated" his government's 
"decision" to sell Cuba 15,000 to 20,000 barrels of oil daily- 
-approximately 20 percent of estimated daily consumption.  The 
report did not indicate how long the deliveries, for which 
financial "guarantees" have yet to be made, would last. 

Background 

   Judging by an unusually frank Radio Rebelde discussion of 
discontent over the increased outages on 12 April, a few days 
before Portal's presentation, the minister's exposition of Cuba's 
energy situation was probably prompted by complaints about 
sketchy information on the blackouts and worry over Cuba's 
prospects for economic recovery.  Journalists on the "Straight 
Talk" program--which often discusses everyday concerns about 
economic issues--said that the "dry, brief notes" issued by the 
national electrical enterprise under Portal's direction were 
"unacceptable" and declared that Cubans needed "better and more 
detailed" information on the reasons for the blackouts.  The 
journalists stressed that people "deserve" an explanation of the 
"economic situation," since for "many" Cubans the "the increased 
number of blackouts" could "create the false notion that the 
economy is regressing again." 
   Several Cuban media reports also suggest that Portal's address 
was prompted in particular by complaints from Havana residents. 
For example, a Radio Rebelde commentary noted that Portal's 
"detailed explanation" should have satisfied all "questions, 
doubts, criticism, and complaints" about power cuts "particularly 
in Havana City" (16 April).   While Havana residents were 
apparently annoyed over outages that at times lasted up to 20 
hours (Prensa Latina, 13 April), the 12 April "Straight Talk" 
program indicated that in addition, residents of the capital were 
"excessively irritated" over the fact that power "is turned off" 
in some neighborhoods but "not in others."  In his television 
address, Portal flatly denied the existence of "privileges or 
anything like that" with regard to outages, stating that people 
should "banish the idea."  While the minister acknowledged that 
approximately 3O percent" of Havana residences "practically 
never" experience outages, he explained that this is because they 
are in close proximity to hospitals or economically important 
tourist facilities, or, in the case of "Old Havana," because of 
"technological" considerations. (SEE NOTE 4) 
   (NOTE 4) Radio Reloj on 6 August 1993 reported that frequent 
outages in "Old Havana" and central Havana would "damage" the 
aged underground lines in those areas. 

Implications 

   The Castro regime's high-profile media response to popular 
resentment over recent increases in power outages suggests that 
as Cubans endure their third year of economic hardship, Havana is 
making an increasingly greater effort to show the population that 
it is responsive to their concerns and that it is handling the 
energy shortage competently.  Presumably, Havana is hoping that 
such efforts will improve its standing with the population and 
buy it more time to find solutions to the nation's economic 
crisis.  In the meantime, by placing top government officials out 
front to address popular complaints, presumably they, and not 
Cuban President Fidel Castro, will be associated with--and held 
accountable for--unpopular austerity measures. 
   The fact that Havana this year appears to have no solution to 
unplanned power outages other than a public relations effort 
contrasts with its ability last year to boost power output by 
using domestic oil and may indicate that power-generating 
capabilities have been reduced to a greater extent than admitted 
by the regime. 
   (AUTHOR:  ROLLINS.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF 
ANALYST, EUROPE/LATIN AMERICA GROUP, (703) 733-6120.) 
ELAG/GILISON/cs 12/0132z may 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47621 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000026994001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   12 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-11MAY94-CROATIA 
<H3> <TI>      Croatia-Slovenia-Italy </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Croatia-Slovenia-Italy </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
Croatia,      Slovenia Downplay Istrian Border Issue 

                       SUMMARY 

   Apparently hoping to calm anxieties about the possible revival of 
irredentist claims to the formerly Italian Istrian peninsula, 
Slovene and Croatian officials have minimized the significance of 
the recent victory in Italy of the center-right coalition. 

                        END SUMMARY 


While acknowledging that the victory of nationalists in recent 
Italian elections has raised apprehensions in Croatia and 
Slovenia, officials of both countries have tried to calm fears 
and offer assurances of continued neighborly relations. 
Apparently referring to calls by Italian nationalists for 
restitution of Italian assets in Istria that were seized by the 
Yugoslav Government after World War II, Croatian Foreign Minister 
Mate Granic, during a 23 April visit to Istria, said that "some 
uncontrolled post-election statements in Italy are causing 
tension and fear in Croatia, although they do not represent the 
official Italian policy." Granic assessed bilateral relations 
with Italy as "good," noting that Italy was Croatia's second- 
largest trading partner.  He emphasized that Croatia would 
respect the rights of its ethnic Italian minority "in accordance 
with the highest international standards and the Croatian 
Constitution" and said he expected that the Italian minority in 
Istria would serve as "one of the strongest links of friendship 
and cooperation" between the two countries (Vjesnik, 25 April). 
   Similarly, at a 28 April Ljubljana news conference covered by 
Ljubljana Radio, Slovene Foreign Minister Lojze Peterle was 
guardedly positive about Slovene-Italian relations.  He assessed 
cooperation with Italy "as positive on the whole," adding that in 
the future he expected good neighborly relations "that would set 
an example for others."  Peterle told reporters that minorities 
in Slovenia are protected "in accordance with the highest 
European standards."  He stressed that demands to abrogate the 
Osimo Treaty signed between Italy and Yugoslavia in 1975 and to 
revise Italy's borders with Slovenia made by "certain Italian 
politicians "--an apparent reference to Mirko Tremaglia, a deputy 
of the National Alliance/Italian Social Movement--were not the 
official position of the Italian Government.  According to 
Peterle, recently revived property claims of Italians who left 
Istria and Dalmatia after World War II had already been settled 
by the compensation agreement signed by Italy and Yugoslavia in 
1983, an agreement that Slovenia has pledged to honor.  Although 
current Slovenian law restricts the purchase of land by 
foreigners, Peterle asserted that "within the process of joining 
Europe" he saw no problem with foreign citizens buying property 
in Slovenia, "as we have never differentiated among people."   He 
expressed hope that Italy would therefore cease blocking 
Slovenia's association agreement with the EU and will finally 
withdraw its objections. 
   Echoing his stance on the issue, Peterle's political party,' the 
Christian Democrats (SKI)), adopted a declaration on bilateral 
relations with Italy at their annual conference.  According to 
the text published on 25 April by Republika, a Slovene-language 
Trieste daily, the SKI) opposes the revision of the Osimo Treaty 
and the revision of state borders, while advocating "sincere" 
cooperation between the two countries, without conditions, 
pressure or extort ion.  The SKD declaration also stated that 
Slovenia, while not yielding to threats, would seek its place in 
Europe among those nations and countries that respect "Slovene 
national independence." 
   Italian regional government leaders in the region bordering on 
Slovenia are also apparently anxious to avoid heightening 
tensions over Italian nationalist claims on Istria.  The 21 and 
25 April Republika reported that the leadership of Italy's 
Friuli-Venezia Giulia region, which borders Slovenia, supports 
cooperation with Slovenia and Slovenia's integration into the EU. 
Renzo Travanut, a Christian Democrat and chairman of the regional 
government, denounced Forza Italia's call to freeze relations 
with Slovenia and oppose Slovenia's accession to the EU.  Such 
"bombastic statements and muscle flexing", he said,  do not 
strengthen Italy's foreign policy, promote bilateral relations, 
or serve the business interests of Friuli-Venezia Giulia, and 
especially do not contribute to the protection of the Italian 
minority" in Istria.  Travanut emphasized that the border region 
wants to be involved in shaping policy toward "such a sensitive 
area" as "relations with our neighbors" (Republika, 21 April). 
   Travanut's position has been backed by the Friuli-Venezia Giulia 
trade union organizations, affiliated with center to leftwing 
parties.  The unions issued a joint statement supporting 
cooperation with Slovenia and Slovenia's integration into the 
European Union as the only means to increase economic prosperity, 
solve border issues, and protect ethnic minorities.  The trade 
union statement denounced revanchism, which causes "unnecessary 
tension," and called on the regional government to intervene at 
the national level to support Slovenia's association agreement 
with the EU (Republika, 21 April). 
   (AUTHOR:  LIND.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF 
ANALYST, EUROPE AND LATIN AMERICA GROUP, (703) 733-6120.) 
ELAG/GILISON/CS 12/0143z may 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47622 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000027094001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   13 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
(DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS, THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS) 
FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-066 
<H3> <TI>      MIDDLE EAST: CONTROLS FOR SATELLITE TELEVISION </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       MIDDLE EAST: CONTROLS FOR SATELLITE TELEVISION </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
Summary:       Amidst the growing controversy over the influence of 
satellite television on Middle Eastern opinion and public morality, 
a Saudi-owned weekly magazine has suggested a technological means 
for Saudi Arabia and other regional nations to regain control over 
the television media.  Quoting American and British experts in cable 
and microwave technology, AL-MAJALLAH suggests that the current 
system of direct satellite reception by consumers should be replaced 
by national cable television grids that will ensure quality program 
content and reduce the cost of reception equipment for the consumer. 
The hard copy version of this Foreign Media Note contains 2 cartoons 
with captions. 
   The Arab world has witnessed a rapid rise in the use and 
popularity of satellite television since the end of the Gulf War. 
The MIDDLE EAST BUSINESS WEEKLY (25 Mar 94) reported that "CNN woke 
up millions of people in the Middle East to the fact that there was 
a satellite alternative to the worthy but dull outpourings of state 
television."  The growth in Middle Eastern demand has been matched 
by rapid expansion in the supply of Arabic-language satellite 
programming to the region. 
   The Saudi-owned Arabic weekly AL-MAJALLAH of 16 April 1994 
provided a brief summary of the major Arabic-language stations: 
   Middle East Broadcasting Center (MBC):  A London-based, Saudi- 
owned, single-channel service established in 1991 that is planning 
to expand to four channels in 1994. 
   Arab Radio &amp; Television (ART): Saudi-owned and based in Italy. 
Currently broadcasting on 4 channels. 
   Egyptian Space Channel (ESC):  Egyptian-government owned station 
that benefits from an extensive archive of Egyptian movies. 
   Orbit Satellite Television &amp; Radio:  Saudi owned, Rome-based 
multi-channel television service which is due to begin operations in 
1994.  Plans call for 20 channels. 
   Dubai Satellite:  Single-channel, state-owned service that 
provides news and entertainment on a 24-hour basis.  This is 
currently the only Arab station that is available worldwide. 
   Jordan, Morocco and Tunisia have also opened satellite services. 
   Debate on the Merits of Satellites 
   The growth in satellite broadcasting has touched off a discussion 
of its merits and dangers in the Middle East press over the past few 
months.  Articles and cartoons in the government-owned Egyptian 
press, for example, have described the cultural impact and 
commercial opportunities afforded by satellite programs, while the 
opposition press is warning that satellite broadcasting will bring 
either increased political control over viewers or, if left 
uncontrolled, corrupt viewers' morals. 
   Egyptian journalist Muhammad 'Abu-al-Futuh expressed the fears of 
many concerning the impact of satellite television when he argued 
(AL-SHA'B 22 Feb 94) that the satellite dishes bring more "poison, 
immorality, and decadence" than benefits, which makes them a 
"ferocious threat that must be resisted."   He observed that the 
"obscene and homosexual programs that the dish will bring us are 
more dangerous than cancer and AIDS.  It is the intellectual and 
cultural (equivalent of) AIDS."  Exploring other negative aspects of 
satellite TV, the 1 April issue of AL-SHA'B warns that the new 
Arabic-speaking stations will simply become further instruments of 
political control designed to limit society's access to a variety of 
political opinion. 
   Another perspective is provided in the 23 March issue of Egypt's 
semi-official AL-AHRAM, which boasts that the Egyptian satellite 
channel, Egyptian Space Channel (ESC), has become an effective 
culture voice for Egypt among Arabic-speaking viewers abroad.  Under 
the headline "Egyptian Space Channel Wins First Prize During (the 
holy month of) Ramadan,"  AL-AHRAM reported that according to its 
survey, ESC's programming attracted more viewers in Paris than any 
other Arab station.  Respondents to the AL-AHRAM survey expressed 
strong appreciation for the station and requested an expansion of 
its cultural programming. 
   The commercial promise of satellite broadcasting for Arab 
business and advertisers has also attracted the attention of the 
regional press.  AL-MAJALLAH and the MIDDLE EAST BUSINESS WEEKLY, 
for example, follow media trends and report market penetration 
figures for satellite stations drawing on sources such as the 
influential media index published in February 1994 by the Dubai- 
based Pan-Arab Research Center.  Publications such as Egypt's AL- 
MUSAWWAR (1 Apr 94) have described an intense struggle among 
satellite stations for market share.  AL-MUSAWWAR's 1 April article 
introduced the topic of commercial satellite competition under the 
headline of "Satellite Channel War in the Arab Skies."  Despite the 
intensity of the competition, AL-MUSAWWAR also indicated a degree of 
common ground among Arab broadcasters.  In its interview with 'Amar 
al-Laythi, the director of the Middle East Broadcasting Center, AL- 
MUSAWWAR quoted him as saying: "All things considered we can assume 
that we (Arab broadcasters) have a common goal which is to fight 
against the foreign satellite channels and to pull Arab viewers away 
from them." 
   Controversy over the impact of satellite television is directly 
related to the vast success of satellite programming in the Middle 
East over the past two years.  The TEHRAN TIMES (FBIS NC1404125094) 
of 10 April, for example, cites another Iranian daily as estimating 
that some 400 new dishes are being installed on Tehran rooftops 
daily.  The MIDDLE EAST BUSINESS WEEKLY (25 Mar 94) referred to a 
"dish craze" in Saudi Arabia where "it is estimated that there are 
more than 150,000 dishes (installed) and that at least 1 million 
people have access to satellite television services."  Although 
specific statistics are not available, the satellite phenomenon is 
widespread throughout the Middle East, especially in circles that 
can afford the relatively expensive reception equipment. 
   Governments' Response 
   In response to the perceived threats of foreign influence and 
corruption of domestic viewers, authorities in Egypt, Saudi Arabia, 
and Iran have begun imposing varying levels of control on satellite 
viewing.  AL-HAYAH of 27 March reports that two Egyptian provinces, 
Daqahliyah and Dumyat, have ordered that satellite dishes be removed 
from the roofs of coffee shops, clubs and other public places. 
Meanwhile, the 25 March THE MIDDLE EAST BUSINESS WEEKLY reports a 
total ban on private ownership of satellite dishes in Saudi Arabia, 
and in Iran the 10 April TEHRAN TIMES announced that  "the use of 
satellite dishes is not illegal, but will need to be authorized." 
   Proposal to Counter Satellites 
   Against this backdrop of fear and controversy, the Saudi-owned 
AL-MAJALLAH devoted its 16 April cover story to discussing cable 
technology as a possible solution to the perceived threat of 
satellite broadcasting: 
   "Many specialists in worldwide satellite communications believe 
that cable systems for capturing satellite broadcast will be the 
path of the future for many Arab states.  With the increasing number 
of satellite broadcasting facilities outside the geographic confines 
of the countries, the only means to guide and control this sector is 
through national cable systems, which may later evolve into regional 
systems and nets." 
   The AL-MAJALLAH article focused specifically on a microwave 
technology known as MMDS (microwave multi-directional system), a 
point-to-multipoint broadcast system compatible with cable 
technology.  Citing American and British experts in the field, AL- 
MAJALLAH explained that MMDS can support the rebroadcast of 24 to 56 
ground and satellite channels.  Local microwave/cable operators 
retransmit the programming to subscribers who pay an annual 
subscription fee and receive the signal via a small, inexpensive 
antenna. 
   From AL-MAJALLAH' point of view, the MMDS approach has 
advantages for national authorities, advertisers, and viewers.  Its 
first advantage is the ability "to monitor the broadcast content to 
be sure it is consistent with general good taste."  The presence of 
national cable grids will also enable advertisers to better measure 
the market and adjust their programming and advertising accordingly. 
The consumers too will profit because the MMDS antennas are far 
cheaper than conventional satellite dishes, and the MMDS approach 
enables the subscriber to select and be billed for only those 
channels actually wanted. 
   Return on business investment may also represent a reason for 
introducing MMDS technology into the Middle East.  The MIDDLE EAST 
BUSINESS WEEKLY article 94) suggested that at least in Saudi Arabia 
the elimination of direct consumer access to satellite transmissions 
could create a lucrative market in retransmitting satellite 
programming for some Saudi investors: 
   "The Saudi decision (of 10 March 1994 to ban private dish 
ownership) means death to the market in satellite dishes, but not to 
satellite television.  Earlier this year, it emerged that ARA 
International Products Company of Riyadh, an affiliate of (the 
Saudi-owned) MBC, had been authorized to set up a microwave multi- 
directional system (MMDS) television service from Riyadh.  It is 
understood plans call for the new service to provide up to 15 
channels, including the two Saudi state television channels and 
MBC." 
   (QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, AFRICA/LEVANT 
BRANCH AT (703) 733-6408) 
ENEAG/12 May/POLCHF/ECONF/TTPF/NEASA Division  cka 13/2316z  may 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47623 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000027194001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   13 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-JAPAN-U.S. 
<H3> <TI>      Tokyo Makes Slow Progress on Framework Issues </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Tokyo Makes Slow Progress on Framework Issues </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                                         The recent rise in the yen appears to be putting pressure on the 
Japanese Government to step up efforts to resolve trade friction 
with the United States and take steps to reduce Japan's trade 
surplus.  However, the government appears to have no detailed 
strategy for breaking the impasse and remains firmly opposed to 
the objective criteria demanded by the United States.  Moreover, 
the weak political position of the minority coalition means that 
progress on areas of interest to Washington in the framework 
talks is likely to remain slow. 
                                 END SUMMARY 
   The ruling Japanese coalition moved swiftly in the wake of the 
recent rise in the yen to reaffirm its commitment to take steps 
to open Japanese markets, reduce Japan's trade surplus and defuse 
trade tensions with the United States.  On 30 April, two days 
after they took office, cabinet ministers in charge of economic 
affairs held an emergency meeting to discuss how to deal with the 
yen's surge, according to a Kyodo report the same day.  At the 
meeting, they reportedly agreed on the need to devise concrete 
measures to open Japanese markets and come up with tax reform 
proposals.  Chief Cabinet Secretary Hiroshi Kumagai reportedly 
told the press after the meeting that the ministers agreed that 
spurring domestic demand and reducing Japan's trade surplus, 
especially the surplus with the United States, would help 
stabilize the yen.  The 5 May Nihon Keizai Shimbun, reported that 
the new government believed that it was "essential" to implement 
"structural economic reform, including deregulation" to halt the 
yen's rise.  The article indicated that Prime Minister Tsutomu 
Hata planned to meet with administrative vice ministers in all of 
the government ministries to urge them to draw up "positive" 
steps to deregulate the economy and to meet with cabinet 
ministers responsible for economic affairs to discuss the issue. 
   Concern over the yen's rise may also be reducing--at least 
somewhat--resistance to deregulation and market opening measures 
in parts of the bureaucracy.  The 11 May Nihon Keizai Shimbun 
quoted an unnamed Ministry of Finance source as worrying that if 
the market-opening package that Tokyo has promised to compile by 
the end of June "falls short of U.S. demands," Washington might 
attempt to drive up the yen further--a move that, the source 
reportedly said, would "dampen" the Japanese economy and slow 
Japan's recovery from its current recession. 
   Continued Opposition to Targets 
   However, the government appears to have few new ideas on how to 
defuse trade tensions with Washington.  Both the cabinet and the 
bureaucracy appear to remain firmly opposed to Washington's 
demand for setting objective criteria to measure Japan's trade 
performance, especially if these criteria might be interpreted as 
numerical targets. 
   -- Minister of International Trade and Industry Eijiro Hata, for 
example, has recently spoken out against targets on a number of 
occasions.  In an interview in the 29 April Nihon Keizai Shimbun, 
he stated that the government could not set targets to reduce 
Japan's trade surplus because the surplus was "largely" caused by 
the activities of private enterprises.  During meetings with 
German Economic Minister Guenther Rexrodt on the margins of a 5-7 
May Muenster Conference on East-West Economic Relations in 
Warsaw, Hata apparently solicited Germany's support for Japan's 
stance on targets, stating that Tokyo opposed the targets because 
"they are linked to managed trade" (Nihon Keizai Shimbun, 8 May). 
Hata also reportedly alluded to Tokyo's opposition to targets 
during meetings with Commerce Secretary Ron Brown on the margins 
of the same meeting.  According to the 7 May Yomiuri Shimbun, 
Hata told Brown that while Tokyo wants to conclude the U.S.-Japan 
framework talks, it did not want to do so in a way that "could 
result in managed trade" --a formulation Tokyo uses to 
characterize the use of targets. 
   -- A 25 April Nihon Keizai Shimbun report quoted unnamed Ministry 
of Foreign Affairs (MOFA) officials as stating that Japan "has 
not changed its principle that 'numerical targets' should never 
be accepted." 
   While some senior officials have called for flexibility on the 
issue of objective criteria, they, too, appear to have no clear 
idea of how to define the criteria in ways acceptable to both 
Washington and Tokyo.  For example, Foreign Minister Koji 
Kakizawa stated in a 30 April Yomiuri Shimbun interview that it 
is "important for Japan to "flesh out the 'objective criteria' 
demanded by the United States."  He gave no details of what 
proposals Tokyo might make, indicating only that in the process 
of defining objective criteria, Japan "should not relent on its 
principle of opposing any numerical targets."  Similarly, Vice 
Minister of International Trade and Industry Sozaburo Okamatsu, 
told the 11 April Nikkei Weekly that while he remained opposed to 
the setting of numerical targets, he believed that Washington and 
Tokyo should break out of the "vicious circle" in which 
Washington demands targets and Tokyo rejects them.  He said that 
both sides should seek a "third path" somewhere between what he 
characterized as Washington's "results-oriented" approach and 
Tokyo's "process-oriented approach."  He offered no ideas, 
however, as to what this third path might be. 
   Slow Progress on Deregulation 
   The Japanese press has provided little insight into progress on 
Tokyo's promise, made in its 29 March market opening proposal, to 
deregulate portions of the Japanese economy.  Available reporting 
suggests that this progress is slow and that many plans may not 
have progressed beyond the study stage.  A 4 May Nihon Keizai 
Shimbun article reported that the government had drawn up a 
"guideline" for the deregulation measures it has committed itself 
to draw up by the end of June.  According to the article, this 
guideline calls for the "review" of 51 regulations in 16 separate 
areas, including a proposal for abolishing, in stages, the Large- 
Scale Retail Stores Law which limits the operations of larger 
retail stores.  The report indicated that this guideline was only 
the "foundation" for intra-governmental discussions of specific 
measures.  It added, without providing details, that many of the 
specific measures were likely to encounter opposition from the 
bureaucracy. 
   Among the deregulation measures that have been announced are some 
that are likely to have little effect on increasing Japanese 
imports.  For example, according to an 11 May Kyodo report, the 
Ministry of International Trade and Industry (MITI) decided on 11 
May to abolish regulations requiring Japanese exports to be 
inspected for quality before being shipped overseas. 
   Opposition to New Stimulus Measures 
   At the same time, portions of the Japanese bureaucracy, 
especially the Ministry of Finance (MOF), appear to be gearing up 
to resist any new U.S. or European pressure for Tokyo to 
implement additional measures to stimulate the Japanese economy 
and promote domestic demand beyond those incorporated in the 
fiscal year 1994 budget now before the Japanese Diet. 
   -- Vice Minister of Finance Jiro Saito reportedly told a 21 April 
news conference that Japan would respond to an International 
Monetary Fund report calling for additional Japanese measures to 
stimulate its faltering economy by taking "continued measures and 
not additional ones" (Kyodo, 21 April). 
   -- The 21 April Nihon Keizai Shimbun quoted unnamed Finance 
Ministry sources as expressing concern that Washington might ask 
Japan to draw up additional measures to stimulate the Japanese 
economy that MOF did not consider necessary. 
   -- Governor of the Bank of Japan Yasushi Mieno argued, during a 
speech on 19 April, that additional macroeconomic measures will 
not help Japan curb its trade surplus, but might overheat the 
Japanese economy, according to a Kyodo report that day.  He 
reportedly argued that if Japan adopts an "overly ambitions 
macroeconomic policy to rectify its external imbalances, this may 
well result in inflation and overheated economic activity." 
   -- Ryutaro Komiya, a professor at Aoyama Gakuin University with 
close ties to the government--he is director general of the 
Research Institute of International Trade and Industry, a 
research arm of MITI--appeared to agree with Mieno's line of 
argument.  In an interview in the 19 April Asahi Shimbun, he 
stated that further fiscal measures may "destabilize" rather than 
stimulate the Japanese economy. 
   Tax Reform 
   The ruling coalition appears to have no clear strategy to deal 
with the opposition that any tax reform proposals it puts forward 
will probably encounter in the Diet, especially from the Social 
Democratic Party of Japan.  Speaking about tax reform in his 
policy speech before the Diet on 10 May, Prime Minister Hata 
appeared to go no further than the vague wording of the policy 
agreement hammered out by the ruling coalition parties, including 
the SDPJ, before the SDPJ seceded from the coalition.  Hata spoke 
of the need to institute "sweeping tax reform" in order "to 
actively develop welfare policies" to support an "aging society," 
while at the same time "giving consideration to improving the 
fiscal structure . . . and ensuring fiscal sources to support tax 
reduction."  The 11 May Nihon Keizai Shimbun reported that the 
Tax System Research Council was studying possible compromise 
reform proposals that might gain SDPJ support, including a plan 
that would incorporate both an income tax and a system of 
selected increases in the consumption tax.  Under this plan, 
according to Nihon Keizai Shimbun, the consumption tax on food 
would remain low in accordance with proposals supported by the 
SDPJ. 
   Outlook 
   The minority coalition's political weakness will probably prevent 
it from taking any bold steps or making any substantial progress 
in any of the areas of interest to the United States in the 
framework talks--especially on the more controversial issues, 
such as tax reform.  At the same time, however, the coalition 
will probably be under some political pressure to take steps to 
address trade friction with Washington.  Failure to do so would 
give the opposition parties, particularly the Liberal Democratic 
Party, additional ammunition to attack the coalition in the Diet. 
(AUTHOR:  BOUNDS.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703)-733-6534). 
EAG/HEBBEL  cka 13/2335z  may 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47624 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000027294001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   14 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
VIENNA PLEASE PASS TO BOSNIA 
WARNING: DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-13MAY94-BOSNIA-YUGO 
<H3> <TI>      B-H--Yugoslavia:  Karadzic as a Threat to Milosevic's Power </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       B-H--Yugoslavia:  Karadzic as a Threat to Milosevic's Power </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
A      recent interview with a Serb regional leader from Herzegovina 
has revealed the potential for a rift between Serbian President 
Slobodan Milosevic and Bosnian Serb leader Radovan Karadzic.  In 
the interview published in the independent Montenegrin weekly 
Monitor on 6 May, Bozidar Vucurevic, mayor of Trebinje and 
virtual warlord of eastern Herzegovina, acknowledged that he has 
promoted the idea that Karadzic should become president of "all 
the Serbs."  After demurring that he had intended the suggestion 
as a "joke," Vucurevic immediately contradicted himself--and 
alluded to other supporters of the idea--by declaring that, "if 
it comes to an alliance of all Serbian countries, we shall 
propose" that Karadzic be its president.  While heaping praise on 
Milosevic, Vucurevic insisted that he only represents a part of a 
Serbian leadership triumvirate that includes Karadzic and Bosnian 
Serb Assembly President Momcilo Krajisnik.  Of Karadzic, 
Vucurevic opined that he is a "great politician" whom "God 
himself sent to the Serbian people."  Vucurevic apparently is not 
alone in his opinion that Karadzic should supplant Milosevic: 
The results of a poll published in Belgrade last year claimed 
that Karadzic was the most popular politician in the Federal 
Republic of Yugoslavia (Serbia and Montenegro), even at the time 
of the supposed "rift" between the two after the Bosnian Serb 
assembly rejected the Vance-Owen peace plan in May 1993 (Nedeljna 
Borba, 5-6 June 1993). 

   Milosevic, who is promoted by the dominant Belgrade media that he 
controls as the preeminent leader of the Serbs of former 
Yugoslavia, is likely to be infuriated by the suggestion that 
Karadzic should supplant him as leader of the Serbian cause. 
While Karadzic often defers to Milosevic as acknowledged leader 
of the Serbs of former Yugoslavia, at a time when Karadzic is 
demanding the eventual creation a unitary Greater Serbia (Borba, 
4 May), Milosevic is likely to view Vucurevic remarks as a bid by 
Karadzic for recognition as chief Serb leader and spokesman for 
the Serbian cause.  Although it is unlikely that Milosevic would 
withdraw his support of Karadzic as he has with others who 
challenged his authority such as Krajina Serb leader Milan Babic 
and former Yugoslav President Dobrica Cosic, he may well seek to 
undermine Karadzic's support among the Serbs to help create the 
appearance that his own political base remains solid. 
   (AUTHOR:  NASH.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF 
ANALYST, EUROPE AND LATIN AMERICA GROUP, (703) 733-6120.) 
ELAG/GILISON/CL 13/1854Z MAY 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47625 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000027394001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   14 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-13MAY94-IRAQ 
<H3> <TI>      Baghdad Media Modify Tactics, Retain Hostility to Kuwait </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Baghdad Media Modify Tactics, Retain Hostility to Kuwait </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                              Iraqi media, evidently with an eye to future UN Security Council 
reviews of the sanctions against Iraq, have avoided since mid- 
March some of the most flagrant express ions that they had 
previously used to convey Baghdad's nonrecognition of Kuwait. 
Nevertheless, Iraqi officials and media have continued to express 
hostility to Kuwait in other terms. 
                           END SUMMARY 
   Since 11 March, monitored Iraqi media have not been observed to 
refer to Kuwait as "the 19th governorate" or to use other 
expressions, such as calling the Kuwaiti Government "the rulers 
imposed on Kuwait," that until then had appeared frequently in 
the media, especially in the daily Babil, which is owned by 
President Saddam Husayn's son 'Udayy.  The last monitored use of 
such an expression occurred in a 10 March Babil article by 
Saddam's press secretary 'Abd-al-Jabbar Muhsin, in which he 
repeatedly referred to Kuwait as "Kazimah," the name Iraqis gave 
to Kuwait City during the period of Iraqi occupation. 
   Nevertheless, Iraqi media have continued to indicate 
nonrecognition of Kuwait and contempt and hostility toward its 
leaders in other terms. 
   -- With one notable exception, Iraqi media have not been observed 
to refer to the Kuwaiti Government as "the Government of Kuwait" 
since August 1990.  Instead, they have been observed to refer to 
the Kuwaiti amir and heir apparent nearly always without their 
titles and by their first names only, and to treat "the Kuwaiti 
rulers" with consistent disdain, in accordance with Saddam's 
declaration that these rulers have "lost every legitimate right 
to rule" (INA, 18 January).  The exception was a statement made 
last month by National Assembly Speaker Sa'di Mahdi Salih, who 
used the expression "the Government of Kuwait," but only in a 
negative context of charging this government with failing to 
convey Iraqi proposals to the Kuwaiti parliament (Iraqi News 
Agency [INA], 16 April). (See Note 1) 
   (Note 1) In a transparent propaganda move, National Assembly 
Speaker Sa'di Mahdi Salih said that the Iraqi National Assembly 
is ready to discuss "all outstanding issues" with a delegation 
from the Kuwaiti parliament and to convince it that the charges 
that Iraq holds Kuwaiti nationals captured during the occupation 
are 'exposed lies and fabrications."  Apparently seeking to drive 
a wedge between the Kuwaiti Government and parliament, Salih 
proposed that an Arab mediator conduct "shuttle tours" between 
the Iraqi and Kuwaiti parliaments "so as not to allow the 
government officials in Kuwait to drive things toward the worst, 
as they did before 2 August 1990" (Iraqi News Agency [INA], 16 
April).  The offer was roundly rejected by the speaker of 
Kuwait's National Assembly (Kuwait radio, 19 April). 
   -- On 11 April, an article in the Ba'th Party daily Al-Thawrah 
accused "the al-Sabah [the Kuwaiti ruling family surname] rulers" 
of "squandering wealth, mortgaging sovereignty, and doing away 
with security."  It castigated them for making military 
agreements with an "enemy" [presumably the United States, 
although Kuwait has also signed agreements with Russia, the 
United Kingdom, and France], failing to "atone for their great 
sins," and "being hostile to Iraq and buying other people's 
hostility to Iraq." 
   -- On 21 April, an Al-Thawrah editorial characterized past and 
present stands of "the Kuwaiti rulers" as "selfish, mean, 
introverted, incomprehensible, and arrogant."  It urged "honest 
men in Kuwait" to "confront the Kuwaiti rulers' suspect course" 
because they allegedly "continue to be the ones who determine 
when and how to provoke or permit the provocation of wars and 
seditions and guarantee placing the region into the wolf's mouth, 
as leader President Saddam Husayn said on 17 July 1990." (See 
Note 2) 
   (Note 2) In a speech broadcast by Baghdad radio that day, Saddam 
said that "the United States wants an increasing strategic 
reserve . . . primarily to control the instigation of wars, 
strife, and all that would put the wolf at the region's throat" 
   -- In the same context, as recently as 8 May, the Information 
Ministry's English-language daily Baghdad Observer accused "the 
Kuwaiti regime" of working together with the United States and 
Saudi Arabia "to destabilize the security and political situation 
in Yemen" (INA). 
   Dual Line 
   Illustrating Baghdad's equivocation on Kuwait's status, Iraqi 
officials occasionally have made statements implying that Iraq no 
longer claims Kuwait, but these have appeared only in foreign 
interviews and press conferences, not in domestic media.  For 
example: 
   -- According to a Jordanian paper, Iraqi Information Minister 
Hamid Yusuf Hammadi said at a press conference in Yemen on 16 
April that "Iraq has long dropped its claim to sovereignty over 
Kuwait as the 19th governorate" (Al-Dustur, 17 April).  Monitored 
Iraqi media merely quoted Hammadi as saying it was a "distortion 
to link the sanctions to the issue of Kuwait" (INA, 16 April). 
   -- According to the text of an interview with an Austrian daily, 
Deputy Prime Minister Tariq 'Aziz said that "for the [Iraqi] 
government, the Kuwait issue is finished," but insinuating that 
the Iraqi people will continue to view Kuwait as part of Iraq, he 
added, "one cannot stop people from thinking whatever they want 
to think" and "one cannot erase historical facts" (Der Standard, 
11-12 May). 
   Even when addressing foreign audiences, however, Iraqi leaders 
have never recognized the UN demarcation of the Iraq-Kuwait 
border.  Asked in an interview with Paris Radio Monte Carlo 
whether Iraq will recognize the border with Kuwait if the embargo 
is lifted, Speaker Salih said:  "Until 2 August 1990, we 
considered Kuwait a state . . . .  When we accepted Resolution 
660, I think that implicitly meant recognition.  But, if we are 
asked, after all that happened to our people, to be lenient to 
our people's enemies -- who insist on harming us -- of course, 
this puts us in an embarrassing position" (25 March). 
   Background 
   Since the spring of 1991, the Iraqi regime has been maneuvering 
between two incongruous positions, claiming on the one hand that 
it is fulfilling the terms of the UN resolutions while, on the 
other hand, condemning these resolutions as unfair and defending 
as legitimate and proper the policy course that led it to invade 
Kuwait.  Thus, in June 1991, Hammadi stated that Iraq's 
acceptance of UN Security Council Resolution 686 -- which 
requires Iraq to immediately rescind its annexation of Kuwait -- 
"has not changed" (INA, 3 June 1991).  Hammadi was seeking to 
minimize the damage of a statement by Vice President Taha Yasin 
Ramadan that it is "still our opinion" that Kuwait is "part of 
Iraq" and that "if history repeats itself, we will still act in 
the same way" (interview in Amman Sawt Al-Sha'b, 27 May 1991). 
   Baghdad has never accepted UN Security Council Resolution 833, 
which requires it to recognize the UN-demarcated border between 
Iraq and Kuwait.  In a letter to the UN secretary general on 21 
May 1992, then Foreign Minister Ahmad Husayn laid the foundation 
for Baghdad to contest the boundary at an opportune moment by 
declaring that the UN demarcation deprived Iraq of its 
"historical and geographical rights," harmed its "vital 
interests," and was "imposed" on it by "force and political 
blackmail" (INA, 1 June 1992).  He added that "the people of Iraq 
will never accept" the demarcation and cited with approval claims 
in non-Iraqi media that the demarcation decision is a "time bomb" 
that contains "the seeds of another war."  Responding to demands 
by UN Security Council members that Iraq announce its recognition 
of the UN-demarcated border, Deputy Prime Minister 'Aziz 
implicitly rejected Resolution 833 by stating in a letter to the 
UN Security Council that only if the sanctions and the no-fly 
zones are removed, will it be possible for Iraq to discuss its 
border with Kuwait "in accordance with the rules regulating 
relations among states as cited in the UN Charter and the Arab 
League Charter," but obviously not in accordance with Resolution 
833, which requires acceptance of the demarcation precisely to 
avoid any further dispute (Baghdad radio, 17 March). 
   Implications 
imply Iraqi nonrecognition of Kuwait is aimed at further eroding 
international support for the sanctions.  Nevertheless, the 
expression of hostility toward Kuwait in other ways, as well as 
Iraq's failure to accept Resolution 833 and repeatedly voiced 
claim that the issue of Kuwait has nothing to do with lifting 
sanctions, suggest that the present Iraqi regime does not intend 
to recognize the UN-demarcated Iraq-Kuwait boundary and hopes to 
challenge it at an opportune moment.  Recent media treatment of 
Kuwait also suggests that Iraq will not recognize the Kuwaiti 
Government so long as it believes that its strategy to lift the 
sanctions can succeed without such recognition. 
   (AUTHOR: BUDER.  QUESTIONS AND/OR C0MMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
NEAR EAST ANALYSIS BRANCH (703) 733-6094.) 
JEG 13/2257Z MAY 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47626 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000027494001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   17 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-16MAY94-DPRK-IAEA-U. S. 
<H3> <TI>      Pyongyang Starts Refueling Reactor, Seeks Talks With IAEA </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Pyongyang Starts Refueling Reactor, Seeks Talks With IAEA </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                                  Ratcheting up its confrontation with the International Atomic 
Energy Agency (IAEA) and the United States to a brinksmanship 
level, Pyongyang has announced that it has started the refueling 
of its 5-megawatt reactor at Yongbyon without an international 
monitoring presence.  At the same time, North Korea hinted at the 
possibility of some sort of compromise by proposing negotiations 
with the IAEA on this matter. 

                            END SUMMARY 

   Apparently seeking to force the IAEA's and Washington's hand, a 
14 May Foreign Ministry spokesman's statement announced that 
replacement of fuel rods at the Yongbyon reactor has begun 
(Pyongyang radio, 14 May).  Reiterating Pyongyang's earlier claim 
that the timing of the refueling activities is being determined 
by "technical" factors, the statement sought to place the onus 
for the absence of IAEA inspectors at the scene on the IAEA.  It 
claimed that on 19 April Pyongyang informed the agency of its 
refueling plan and requested the presence of observers, and that 
Pyongyang had requested the presence of observers four more times 
subsequently and had issued visas for agency inspectors. 

Hints of Compromise 

   The statement seemed to take pains to avoid ruling out the 
possibility of delaying some of the refueling activities.  It 
consistently used the term "fuel rod replacement activities" to 
denote its current operation, thus leaving it unclear whether the 
actual unloading of spent fuel rods has begun.  In addition, the 
statement said that, while the refueling activities could not be 
stopped without "the possibility of raising a new danger" to 
operational safety, there "still remain possibilities to resolve the 
problem," since these activities have "just begun."  The statement 
called on the IAEA to negotiate with Pyongyang on the "practical 
matters" of defining the IAEA's role in the refueling operation. 
   Moreover, although the statement reiterated Pyongyang's earlier 
rejection of an IAEA request to "select and preserve" spent fuel 
rods for later measurement, it retained ambiguities that could 
enable Pyongyang to eventually accommodate the IAEA's position. 
The current statement again ruled out the "measurement" of 
replaced fuel rods--an activity that could reveal any past 
nuclear material diversions--but not their segregation, pending 
the outcome of future high-level talks between Pyongyang and 
Washington. 

Rhetorical Restraint 

   Clearly signaling Pyongyang's continued interest in dialogue with 
Washington, the statement avoided extreme anti-U.S. rhetoric.  In 
the first reference to Defense Secretary Perry's remarks reported in 
Western media in recent weeks about the increased gravity of the 
North Korean nuclear problem, the statement criticized "some 
quarters" in Washington for spreading "rumors" that Pyongyang is 
bent on extracting enough plutonium for "manufacturing four or five 
nuclear bombs." However, it characterized these "rumors" relatively 
mildly, calling them a "sinister" attempt to intensify pressure on 
North Korea.  In a more conspicuous example of rhetorical restraint, 
the North Korean news agency KCNA on 7 May reported on President 
Clinton's 3 May international news conference on CNN, but totally 
ignored the President's remarks criticizing Pyongyang's nuclear 
program. 

Implications 

   The 14 May Foreign Ministry spokesman's statement illustrates 
Pyongyang's ongoing desire to retain as much bargaining power on the 
nuclear issue for as long as possible.  Pyongyang is clearly 
signaling that while it is willing to allow international 
verification of the nondiversion of nuclear materials produced by 
the current refueling activities, it rejects IAEA activities that 
could disclose any past diversions of such material, pending the 
outcome of future U.S.-North Korea high-level talks.  The North 
Korean leadership seems to be betting that there are enough 
incentives in this formulation for the IAEA to be present at the 
refueling and for Washington to start negotiating with Pyongyang. 

   (AUTHOR:  YIM.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6534.) 
EAG/HEBBEL/sdj 16/1859Z MAY 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47627 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000027594001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   19 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-067--Mongolia 
<H3> <TI>      MONGOLIAN PRESS NOTES No 3 -- 1994 </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       MONGOLIAN PRESS NOTES No 3 -- 1994 </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
I.       ECONOMIC 

   JOINT VENTURES 

   Status at End of 1993--Of the 155 joint ventures registered at 
the Mongolian State Registry by the end of 1993, four have been 
dissolved:  the Mongol-China "Togos," Mongol-Canada "Moriny 
shandas," Mongol-Switzerland-Russia "Mongol Treyd," and Mongol-Japan 
"Shilen International" Company.  An additional two, the Mongol- 
Uruguay "Bayan-Erdene" and Japanese "Gao Yaa," were scrubbed from 
the State Registry in compliance with the law, since both joint 
ventures had ceased operations one and half years after their 
respective registration dates.  (Ulaanbaatar ARDYN ERH in Mongolian 
28 Jan 94 p 4) 

   New Joint Venture--The "Al tan shagay" Company and the Hong Kong 
"Bellful" have jointly organized the new "Huch-Bellful" Enterprise. 
This enterprise will employ more than 1,000 garment workers and 
produce outdoor clothing for both the domestic and foreign markets. 
A completely equipped cleaning establishment will also operate at 
the enterprise.  Future annual profits of the joint venture are 
estimated at $1,000,OOO.  (ARDYN ERH 28 Jan 94 p 1) 

   Canadian Partner at Bumbat Gold Deposit--Mongolian and Canadian 
partners will jointly engage in prospecting and mining at the main 
Bumbat Gold deposit.  (ARDYN ERH 28 Jan 94 p 1) 

   FOREIGN ASSISTANCE 

   Hungarian, WHO Assistance--The Hungarian "Medimpeks" Cooperative 
has delivered critically needed medicines valued at $56,998 to 
Mongolia.  Over the years, the World Health Organization has been 
underwriting the costs of the medicine and the Hungarians the 
transportation costs.  (ARDYN ERH 14 Jan 94 p 1) 

   Italian Assistance--The Government of Italy has shipped 1,992 
tons of flour and 900 tons of rice to Mongolia as humanitarian 
assistance.  A. Kolleoni, consular representative and chairman of 
the Italian-Mongolian Friendship Association, disclosed that 
additional commodities will be given to Mongolia.  (ARDYN ERH 27 Jan 
94 p 1) 

   AID Agency to Support Power Sector--On 27 January 1994 Minister 
of Power, Geology and Mining B. Jigjid and US Ambassador to Mongolia 
Donald Johnson signed an assistance agreement, valued at $7,000,000 
to support the Mongolian power sector.  Mongolian and American 
specialists have jointly prepared a plan, during the first phase of 
which, money will be used for the repair of equipment at the Sharyn 
gol and Baganuur coal mines and the larger power enterprises and 
Electric Power Stations Nos 3 and 4 and the purchase of spare parts 
for them.  (ARDYN ERH 29 Jan 94 p 1) 
   MINING 

   "Mongol alt" Corporation--The "Odod," "Mongol tulhuur," "Gangar," 
"Dzolboo" BBHK (expansion not given), and the Haylaast Gold 
Enterprise have merged to form the "Mongol alt" Corporation.  This 
corporation is expected to implement the Government's "Alt (Gold)" 
Program, to direct its resources and efforts to fairly large 
projects and deposits, and to mine large amounts of gold.  Equipment 
is scheduled to be brought in, and several deposits are to be mined. 
(ARDYN ERH 28 Jan 94 p 1) 

   COMMUNICATIONS 

   Brief History of MONTSAME-- On 18 March 1921 the ROSTA 
information Agency of the Soviet Union issued the report "People's 
Rebellion in Mongolia," which was published in VOSTOCHNAYA SIBIR. 
This report was based on the first telegraphic message from Mongolia 
and the start up of the Mongolian news agency.  After the Government 
established itself in Niyslel Hureen, it convened its sixth meeting 
on 19 July 1921 during which it organized the Mongolian General 
Telegraph Committee.  The committee was called MONTA, a derivation 
from the first letters of the Russian phrase Mongolskoye 
telegrafnoye agenstvo.  Until World War II MONTA issued regular 
reports.  During the war period it translated TASS reports and 
disseminated these over the radio and in newspapers. 

   After the war, the Mongolian Telegraph Agency (Mongolyn 
Tsahilgaan medeegiy agentlag) was independently organized, 
subordinated to the Council of Ministers, and renamed MONTSAME. 
Since then its operation has been expanded to include radio and 
television, and MONTSAME was designated as a state committee.  In 
199O it became a "statistically independent organization" 
subordinated to the Government and called the MONTSAME agency.  In 
accordance with Government Resolution No 40 of 1991, MONTSAME became 
an official central organization of the Mongolian State and 
Government.  (ARDYN ERH 13 Jan 94 p 3) 

   FINANCE 

   Bank Branch Dissolved in China--The directors of the People's 
Bank dissolved its branch in Ereen City, China because of poor 
profits.  This branch had been opened in 1993 to service Mongolian 
businessmen.  (ARDYN ERH 18 Jan 94 p 1) 

   Chingeltey Bank--The Chingeltey Bank was established in February 
1993, has eight branches and approximately 130 workers and is 
subordinate to the People's Bank.  It provides all kinds of 
accounting services to  approximately 2,000 regular customers, 
including various ministries, special offices, and large enterprises 
of Ulaanbaatar, economic establishments, firms, cooperatives, 
private businesses and savings account holders.  The bank handles 
almost 10 percent of all the savings accounts of the citizens of 
Mongolia and 41 percent of the savings accounts of the People's Bank 
network.  The bank's address is Ulaanbaatar-11, Chingeltey District, 
Hudaldaany gydamj 6. 

   The following are locations of the branch banks in Ulaanbaatar: 

   No  1:  Northwest of the Ministry of Fuel and Power; 

   No  4:  South side of Urt Tsagaan; 

   No  5:  In District No 18 of Chingeltey Suburb; 

   No 8:   North of the Office of the Chingeltey Suburb 
Administrator; 
   No 23:  Next to the Senior Citizens' Store; 

   No 25:  At the Harny titem store; and 

   No 96:  At School No 50. 

(ARDYN ERH 1 Feb 94 p 4) 

   II. SOCIOLOGICAL 

   HOUSING 

   Housing--In 1993, 428 dwelling were released for use.  Of these 
362 were sold to economic organizations, and 66 were distributed to 
residents.  (ARDYN ERH 14 Jan 94 p 1) 

   PUBLIC HEALTH 

   Private Dental Clinic--The private "Tsagaan tsogts" dental clinic 
has commenced operations.  Doctor Kote Sanikidze from Greece will 
make false teeth from materials procured from Germany and Russia. 
One tooth is priced at $7-8, whereas a similar tooth in Russia costs 
$50.  (ARDYN ERH 27 Jan 94 p 1) 

   PUBLICATIONS 

   New Publication--The first issue of the periodical PATENTYN 
MEDEELEL (Patent Information), sponsored by the Patent Office, has 
been published.  (ARDYN ERH 28 Jan 94 p 1) 

   EDUCATION 

   English, Japanese Requirement--The Businessmen's Center announced 
that it is hiring university-educated individuals who know English 
and Japanese.  (ARDYN ERH 28 Jan 94 p 4) 

   Labor Institute Courses--The Labor Institute announced: 
"Instruction in the 45-day intensive courses in English and German 
will start on 7 February 1994.  American teachers will teach the 
classes and appropriate study materials will be provided. 

   "Instruction for the advanced month-long course in labor 
management will begin on 21 February 1994 and certificates will be 
awarded.  American scholars and teachers will teach English, 
computer, labor market and  business economy, and management 
classes."  (ARDYN ERH 29 Jan 94 p 2) 

   III.  ASSOCIATIONS 

   Mongolian Association of Agrarian Workers--The researchers and 
mechanizers of the Darhan City Land Cultivation Department agreed to 
establish the Mongolian Association of Agrarian Workers. Its 
objective is to protect the rights of agrarian workers.  D. Tsedeb, 
doctor and professor, was elected chairman of the organizing 
council.  (ARDYN ERH 18 Jan 94 p 1) 

   Mongolian National Association of Company Directors--The 
objectives of the Mongolian National Association of Company 
Directors include the following: 

   1.  Intensification of the activity related to influencing the 
state and government policy with respect to providing an environment 
conducive to renewing and developing national production; 

   2.  Active participation in developing legal protection for the 
activity of members of the council representing the company 
directors and in preparing and ratifying laws and legal documents; 
and 

   3.  Organization of all aspects of training necessary for 
successfully carrying out the basic work of the members of the 
association. 

   S. Bayarbaatar, adviser to the prime minister, is president of 
the association's Guiding Councils  (ARDYN ERH 13 Jan 94 p 4) 

   Mongolian-Turkish Friendship Association--The Mongolian-Turkish 
Friendship Association was organized to assist in developing 
friendship and cooperation between the Mongolian and Turkish 
peoples.  At the organizational meeting of the association J. 
Erdenenbat, general director of the "Shinechlel" Building Repair, 
Production and Trade Company, was elected president, 0.Dechingombo, 
writer and journalist, vice president, and T. Sosorbaram secretary. 
(ARDYN ERH 28 Jan 94 p 4) 

   IV.   BIOGRAPHICS 

   BAATAR, D.--President of the Academy of Sciences  (ARDYN ERH 28 
Jan 94 p 3) 

   BANDZRAGCH, S.--Director of the Seal Office of the Ministry of 
Demographic Policy and Labor   (ARDYN ERH 27 Jan 94 p 2) 

   CHULUUBAT, 0.--First vice-president of the Mongolbank  (ARDYN ERH 
28 Jan 94 p 1) 

   ENEBISH, B.--Economic consultant to the Ministry of Development 
of the Infrastructure (ARDYN ERH 1 Feb 94 p 1) 

   JAB, B.--Chairman of the Mongolian Association of Obstetricians; 
professor  (ARDYN ERH 12 Jan 94 p 1) 

   JAMIYANSENGEE, T.--Colonel; director of the Criminal Police 
Section of the Militia Office  (ARDYN ERH 28 Jan 94 p 1) 

   JANTSANDORJ, G.--Director of the Transportation Organization 
Service of the Ulaanbaatar Railroad Administration  (ARDYN ERH 29 
Jan 94 p 1) 

   MANDALSUREN, B.--Deputy minister of trade and industry  (ARDYN 
ERH 28 Jan 94 p 2) 

   PUREB, B.--Major general; director of the Militia Administration 
(ARDYN ERH 15 Jan 94 p 1) 

   SANDAGDORJ, E.--Director of the Trade and Development Bank 
(ARDYN ERH 

   SANDALHAN, R.--Minister of development of infrastructure  (ARDYN 
ERH 29 Jan 94 p 2) 

   SANJMYATAB, Y.--Secretary general of the Mongolian Committee for 
Youths  (ARDYN ERH 29 Jan 94 p 2) 

   SUBD, N.--Director of the Cultural Relations Department of the 
Ministry of Culture  (ARDYN ERH 29 Jan 94 p 3) 

   TSENDBAYAR, S.--Chairman of the Association for the Defense of 
the Rights of Mongolian Consumers  (ARDYN ERH 15 Jan 94 p 1) 

(AUTHOR:  MIAB/CISD.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
MILITARY/INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS BRANCH, CISD (703) 733-6375.) 
ENEAG/17 MAY/ECONF/CIS DIVISION/SDJ 17/1805Z MAY 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47628 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000027694001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   19 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-18MAY94-JAPAN-U.S. 
<H3> <TI>      Tokyo Perceives U.S. Stance on Trade Talks Moderating </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Tokyo Perceives U.S. Stance on Trade Talks Moderating </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                              The Japanese Government appears to be entering discussions with 
the United States about resuming the stalled U.S.-Japan trade 
talks under the impression that Washington is softening its 
stance toward Japan on a number of key issues.  Tokyo also seems 
to believe that the U.S. Government is divided over its policy 
toward Japan, and that those favoring a more accommodating 
approach may have, for the time being, gained the upper hand. 

                      END SUMMARY 

   In recent comments to the Japanese press, a number of senior 
Japanese government officials have indicated that they see a 
softening in Washington's trade policy toward Japan. 

   -- According to the 8 May Asahi Shimbun, Foreign Minister Koji 
Kakizawa told reporters on 6 May that he believed that Washington 
was backing off from its demand for numerical targets to measure 
the openness of the Japanese market.  The paper quoted Kakizawa 
as saying that he thought "the United States is beginning to 
realize that such a demand will not win the support of 
international opinion." 

   -- The 12 May Asahi Shimbun quoted unnamed Japanese officials 
connected to the U.S.-Japan framework talks as citing a number of 
recent examples of a softer U.S. line toward Japan.  Among these 
examples were U.S. Trade Representative Mickey Kantor's decision 
to delay citing Japan under the Omnibus Trade Act for 
discriminating against U.S. products and services;  President 
Clinton's 3 May statement, during a 3 May television press 
conference, that Washington will not seek numerical market shares 
or managed trade; and the President's reported comment, during a 
9 May telephone conversation with Prime Minister Tsutomu Hata, 
that both Japan and the United States need to work to restart the 
framework talks. 

   Commentary in the Japanese press, which maintains close ties with 
Japanese Government officials through the Japanese press club 
system, has also recently portrayed Washington's stance toward 
Japan as moderating.  A 3 May article in the influential, 
business-oriented Nihon Keizai Shimbun argued that the U.S. 
Government "has come to feel strongly the importance of Japan- 
U.S. interdependence and realizes that excessive pressure on 
Japan will . . .undermine U.S. interests as well."  Similarly, a 
13 May Mainichi Shimbun article cited a number of examples of the 
changed U.S. position, including statements by U.S. Trade 
Representative Kantor that the United States is not seeking any 
numerical market share in its talks with Japan;  President 
Clinton's comments during his 9 May telephone conversation with 
Prime Minster Hata, and comments by U.S. Ambassador to Japan 
Walter Mondale, during meetings with Foreign Minister Kakizawa 
and Minister of International Trade and Industry Eijiro Hata, 
that the United States was prepared to be flexible on the issue 
of objective criteria.  Japan's two other major national 
newspapers, Asahi Shimbun and Yomiuri Shimbun, have also carried 
similar articles (Asahi Shimbun, 12 May; Yomiuri Shimbun, 17 
May). 

Causes of Change 

   Japanese officials appear to believe that what they see as 
Washington's softer stance stems from several factors.  One of 
these is the recent sharp fall in the value of the dollar. 
According to the 12 May Asahi Shimbun, one reason for the change 
has been the recent sharp fall in the value of the dollar and the 
negative impact this could have on the U.S. economy.  Suggesting 
that the United States is reassessing its policy of pressing for 
an appreciation of the yen, it quoted unnamed Japanese officials 
in charge of the framework talks as saying that "the U.S. 
Government has been concerned with the dollar's devaluation and 
the fall in the stock market and bond prices." 

   Japanese officials also appear to believe that Washington does 
not want to take any steps that might imperil the weak ruling 
coalition government of Prime Minister Tsutomu Hata.  The 12 May 
Asahi Shimbun quoted unnamed Japanese officials in charge of the 
framework talks as arguing that the U.S. Government was softening 
its position toward the talks "out of consideration for the new 
government in Japan." 

   In addition, Japanese officials apparently believe that these 
concerns have strengthened the hands of those within the U.S. 
Government that favor a more accommodating approach to Japan. 
For example, according to the 12 May Asahi Shimbun, unnamed 
Japanese officials in charge of the framework talks told the 
paper that "the mood may be building within the U.S. Government 
to alter the hardline trade policy upheld until now by the U.S. 
Trade Representative. "  Similarly, the 3 May Nihon Keizai Shimbun 
asserted that in recent "heated debate" over U.S. policy toward 
Japan, officials in the National Economic Council and the 
Departments of Treasury and Commerce favoring a more moderate 
policy had won out over the U.S. Trade Representative's office, 
which supported a continuation of the hardline approach.  The 17 
May Yomiuri Shimbun argued that one of the reasons for 
Washington's changing position was the impact of a letter sent by 
U.S. Assistant Secretary of State for East Asian Affairs Winston 
Lord to Secretary of State Warren Christopher criticizing the 
Clinton Administration's policy toward East Asia and calling for 
less emphasis on economic issues in U.S. policy toward Japan. 

Possibilities for Compromise 

   The perception that Washington is softening its stance toward 
Japan appears to be encouraging some Japanese officials to 
moderate Japan's stance in the talks and seek an accommodation 
with Washington.  A number of senior officials have recently been 
quoted in the press as proposing compromises on some of the major 
outstanding issues in the framework talks. 

   -- The 18 May Nihon Keizai Shimbun quoted Foreign Minister 
Kakizawa as calling for "some kind of quantitative criteria which 
would not lead to actual numerical targets" as a way to settle 
the dispute over setting objective criteria to measure Japan's 
trade performance. 

   --  According to the 21 April Nihon Keizai Shimbun, after a 
meeting with U.S. Trade Representative Kantor, the Japanese 
Government's special envoy for economic affairs, Nobuo Matsunaga, 
called for both Tokyo and Washington to "make arduous efforts" to 
devise objective criteria that do not involve numerical targets. 
The paper also reported that Matsunaga stressed that both sides 
needed to compromise. 

   -- The 18 May Nihon Keizai Shimbun reported that Ministry of 
International Trade and Industry (MITI) Vice Minister Sozaburo 
Okamatsu and Deputy Foreign Minister Sadayuki Hayashi would 
probably carry compromise proposals for "a step-by-step approach" 
to setting objective criteria for measuring progress in opening 
the Japanese insurance, automobile, and auto parts markets to 
meetings in Washington beginning 19 May. 

   -- In an interview in the 11 April Nikkei Weekly, MITI Vice 
Minister Okamatsu argued that both Japan and the United States 
should seek a "third path" between Washington's "results-oriented 
policy" and Tokyo's "process-oriented" one. 

Continued Resistance 

   However, some senior officials, especially in the bureaucracy, 
appear to continue to be wary of compromise with Washington--a 
factor that could dampen the prospects for achieving a 
breakthrough in the stalled negotiations.  The 3 May Nihon Keizai 
Shimbun cited unnamed Japanese bureaucrats as being resentful 
over reports that the United States had decided to soften its 
approach for two months to see how Japan would respond. 
According to the paper, the officials argued that Washington had 
"no right to press Japan to respond by imposing a deadline."  The 
13 May Mainichi Shimbun quoted an unnamed senior MITI official as 
expressing skepticism that the Unites States was prepared to 
compromise, stating that he did "not expect the United States to 
drop its proposal for objective criteria so easily."  Other 
senior officials have been quoted as making statements suggesting 
that they anticipate that the United States will have to make 
most, if not all, of the concessions if the framework talks 
resume.  For example, according to the 12 May Asahi Shimbun, an 
unnamed senior MITI official told the paper that the softening of 
Washington's position indicated that "at long last the United 
States Government has realized that no matter how hard it presses 
Japan, it cannot wring concessions for . . . numerical targets." 
The same article quoted another unnamed official as asserting 
that in future negotiations, the two countries would have to 
"reach a set of agreements that will allow the United States to 
save face." 

Outlook 

   Japan's ruling minority coalition would probably welcome the 
opportunity to achieve a breakthrough in trade talks with 
Washington that might reinforce its shaky political standing. 
The coalition could also use such an achievement to bolster its 
appeal in elections that will probably be held in the near 
future.  The perception that Washington is softening its line 
could play into the hands of those Japanese officials who are 
seeking such a breakthrough. However, continued resistance within 
parts of the bureaucracy to significant compromises in the 
framework talks and the coalition's limited leverage within the 
bureaucracy suggests that progress toward a compromise in the 
talks will be slow.  Opponents of accommodation with Washington 
may use reports of divisions within the U.S. Government over 
Japan policy and of U.S. concern about the falling dollar to 
argue that the United States may eventually be forced to soften 
its position even further. 

(AUTHOR:  BOUNDS.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, 703-733-6534.) 

EAG/HEBBEL/JF 19/0031Z MAY 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47629 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000027794001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   20 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY-FBPSP 94-10-ASIA 
<H3> <TI>      PACIFIC RIM ECONOMIC REVIEW -- 18 MAY 1994 </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       PACIFIC RIM ECONOMIC REVIEW -- 18 MAY 1994 </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
Table      of Contents 

   JAPAN:  Auto Industry - Record Number of Auto Industry Firms 
Receive Employment Subsidies; Honda To Begin Auto Exports From 
Canada 

   Aviation Industry - FEATURE:  Airlines Restructuring To Break 
Even 

   Economic Trends - FEATURE:  MOF, MHA Fight Over Introduction of 
Local Consumption Tax; JAIDO Program To Ship Excess Equipment to 
Developing Countries 

   Financial Issues - FEATURE:  Regional, Trust Banks Facing 
Difficulties; Initial Performance of New Securities Subsidiaries 
Unremarkable 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - CHINA:  FEATURE:  Trade Promotion 
Association Activities in China; Plastic Manufacturers Increasing 
Presence in Shenzhen 

   VIETNAM:  Nichimen Purchases 15 Percent Stake in Vietnam Motors; 
Mitsubishi Motors Requests Permission To Assemble Commercial Vans; 
Suzuki, Indonesia's Salim Group Begin Assembling Motorbikes; Freight 
Company Forms Joint Venture With Two State-Owned Firms; Firm 
Shifting Some Manufacturing Operations to Ho Chi Minh City;  JTB To 
Initiate Tours for Japanese Industry Groups 

   Machine Tools/Robotics - Citizen Watch To Market New CNC Lathe 
Series in Asia 

   Petroleum/Energy - Mitsubishi Oil Begins Offshore Exploratory 
Drilling in Vietnam 

   Semiconductors/Computers/Electronics   Japanese Government To 
Procure Nine Supercomputers in FY94 

   CHINA:  Domestic Developments - FEATURE:  Social, Economic Impact 
of Rural Labor Migration 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - Foreign-Funded Holding Companies 
Seen As Rising Trend; Almost 12,000 Foreign-Funded Enterprises 
Approved in First Quarter; Power Sector Official on Foreign Funding 
Needs, Limitations; Australia's National Mutual Insurance Sets Up 
Office in Beijing; German, Dutch Companies To Build Oil-Gas Storage 
Facility in Zhuhai; Taiwan Group Invests $150 Million in 
Semiconductors, Other Areas; Record Number of Contracts Signed at 
Guangzhou Export Fair; Haikou City Seeks Foreign Capital To Build 
New International Airport; Malaysian Group Interested in Nanjing 
Infrastructure Projects; Foreign-Invested Firms Key Players in 
Shenyang Development Zone; Foreign Investors Now Free To Form Real 
Estate Companies in Shanghai; Hong Kong Company Claims Mainland 
Investments of HK$30 Billion; Sun Hung Kai Adopts 'Prudent Strategy' 
on Mainland Investment; Hong Kong, UK Investors Set Up Guangzhou 
Electronics Plant; Beijing Municipality Brings in $2 Billion in 
Foreign Investments; Beijing Makes $225 Million in Export Deals at 
Guangzhou Trade Fair; Dalian's Achievements in Economic Opening; 
Qingdao Reports Volume of Foreign Capital Over Last 10 Years; 
Shandong Chemical Company Forms Joint Venture With German Firm 

   Taiwan:  Economics Minister Proposes Method To Protect Investment 
in Mainland; Growth in Exports to PRC Via Hong Kong Slow; Ban on 
Imports of Japanese Wine, Cigarettes May Be Lifted for GATT; Tariffs 
on 758 Products Being Reduced or Eliminated 

   SOUTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  Supreme Court, Patent Office Propose New 
Patent Trial System; FEATURE:  76 Core Companies Exempted From 
Credit Restrictions; FEATURE:  ROK Public Database Project Moves 
Forward; FEATURE:  ROK High-Speed Information Highway Project 
Described; KAIST Establishes Optical-Electronics Research Center; 
ROK Restructuring State-Funded S&amp;T Research Institutes; ROK 
Scientific and Technological Research 'Stagnating'; Government Views 
Post-"G7" Advanced S&amp;T Projects; ROK Government Biotech Research 
Funding for 1994; MOST to Oversee Patent Applications for Affiliated 
Institutes; High-Level 'Semiconductor Equipment Council' Formed; 
ROK-PRC 'Technomart' Held in Beijing; ROK Third Country Exports 
'Frustrated' by Quotas; Seoul District Civil Court Sets Up 
International Trade Court; ROK Becoming World's Top Cathode-Ray Tube 
Producer; Korea Heavy Industries To Build Thermal Power Plant in 
India; Anam To Supply Semiconductors to Japan's NEC; Hyundai Steel 
Pipe To Build Plant in Vietnam; Mando Machinery To Manufacture 
Caliper Brakes in China; Samsung To Export TDX to Russia; Kia 
Motors, UK's Rover To Develop Car Engines 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA - INDONESIA:  FEATURE: Impact of Industrial Growth 
on Rice Production; Pulp Joint Venture With Japan Announced; 
Daihatsu, Other Foreign Auto Production Growth; State Bank Obtains 
$87-Million Loan; Contract For Digital Telephone System Signed; 
Pertamina Begins Gas Production in South Sumatra; Hong Kong Bank 
Opens Branch in Semarang; Firms To Participate in New Power 
Projects; Government Allocates $1 Billion for Oil Refinery Projects 

   MALAYSIA:  Petronas To Supply Petroleum Products to Zimbabwe; 
South Korea Emerges as Seventh Foreign Investor 

   PHILIPPINES:  Singapore Firm To Build Port, Industrial Complex in 
Iloilo; Board of Investments Approves PVC Resin Venture 

   SINGAPORE:  American, Japanese Firms Open Disk Drive Facility; 
Government Plans To Lower Corporate Tax Rate 

   THAILAND:  Cabinet Authorizes Additional Telephone Circuits; PTT, 
Total Company To Establish Gas Venture in Vietnam; Joint Venture 
With PRC Firm in Asian Oil Projects 

   VIETNAM:  Japanese Ministry To Help Establish Postal Savings 
System; Resolution Highlights City's Growth, Development Objectives; 
Malaysian Company Upgrades Rice Mill for Exports; French Company to 
Produce Beer, Soft Drinks; State Bank to Invest $73 Million for 
Automation; Rice Export Earnings Lower, Processing Methods Poor; 
French, Norwegians in Harbor Construction Project; British Petroleum 
in Lubricant Plant Joint Venture; Rubber Industry Seeks Foreign 
Partners 
   (Pacific Rim Economic Review FBPSP 94-10) 

   JAPAN:  Auto Industry - Record Number of Auto Industry Firms 
Receive Employment Subsidies -- Due to Japan's prolonged economic 
slump, the auto industry still remains in "serious condition" 
because of excess labor problems.  According to statistics compiled 
by the Ministry of Labor (MOL), a record number of petitions for 
"employment adjustment subsidies" used to pay for "one-time layoffs" 
were filed by car manufacturers and auto parts makers in FY93. 
Furthermore, after a two-month decline, the number of petitions 
filed in March 1994 was higher than in February, which is an 
"indication" that both the economy and auto demand will probably not 
recover until the second half of FY94. (For previous reporting on 
the auto industry's employment subsidies, see the 9 March 1994 
Pacific Rim Economic Review, pages 1-4). 

   In April 1993, the Japan Automobile Manufacturers Association 
(JAMA) and the Japan Auto Parts Industries Association (JAPIA) 
separately petitioned the MOL for "industry designation" so that 
member firms would be eligible for employment adjustment subsidies. 
The first car maker to apply for subsidies did so in October 1993, 
after which five applied in November, 21 in December, 15 in January, 
13 in February, and 16 in March for an total of 71 separate 
petitions.  An aggregate of 126,028 employees were affected 
involving 241,862 work-days.  Based on a monthly average, 1,750 
employees from each of 12 firms were "laid-off" for 3.3 days in each 
of five months. 

   The auto parts industry, which is composed of many small and 
medium sized firms, has been even more seriously affected by the 
economic downturn.  Auto parts makers began petitioning for 
subsidies as early as May 1993.  From that time to March 1994, a 
total of 1,990 petitions were filed, from an average of 180 firms a 
month, and subsidies were paid covering 225,787 people and 441,532 
work-days, which is nearly double that of finished car makers. 
Based on a monthly average, 114 employees from each of 180 firms 
were furloughed for two days in each of 11 months.  (Tokyo NIKKEI 
SANGYO SHIMBUN 9 May 94 p 9) 

   Honda To Begin Auto Exports From Canada -- Honda Motor Co. will 
begin exporting "Civic" sub-compact cars manufactured in Ontario, 
Canada by the end of May.  The company plans to export over a 1,000 
slightly modified three-door hatchback and the two-door coupe Civics 
to Taiwan and Brazil by yearend and plans to "further increase" the 
number of autos and their destinations in 1995.  Honda already sells 
Canadian cars in the United States, but this will be the first time 
that Canadian-made cars will be exported to other countries.  Honda 
is looking to establish its North American plants as "export bases," 
so long as currencies remain stable in both Canada and the United 
States. 

   Honda began manufacturing cars in Canada in 1988 and now produces 
100,000 Civics annually, of which 80 percent are exported to the 
United States.  The company decided to begin exporting from Canada 
because appreciation of the yen has made Canadian-made Civics more 
price competitive, and the three-door hatchback model is not 
produced in the United States.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 5 May 94 
p 6) 

   Aviation Industry - FEATURE:  Airlines Restructuring To Break 
Even -- SUMMARY:  Japan's three major airlines--Japan Air Lines 
(JAL), All Nippon Airways (ANA), and Japan Air System (JAS)--have 
projected "all-around deficits" for FY93 after final accounting is 
completed, and all three have frozen new hiring for 1994, according 
to press reports.  JAL is undertaking large-scale voluntary 
retirement efforts, and ANA and JAS are trying to come up with new 
staffing levels and wage structures. 

   JAL Attempting To Downsize To Regain Profitability -- In January 
1993, JAL predicted it would begin turning profits in FY94 after 
having implemented emergency measures in FY93, according to the 18 
April NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN.  However, JAL has suffered a decline in 
international business operations, which account for 70 percent of 
its revenues, and a drop in revenues from first class and business 
class fares because of Japan's prolonged recession.  In mid-January, 
JAL announced a medium-term restructuring plan to reduce its main 
office staff of 22,000 to 17,000 by the end of 1997.  It also 
announced plans to reduce FY94 costs by 100 billion yen ($980 
million), cut back considerably on capital investment, and shrink 
basic wage raises and bonuses. 

   On 19 April, in a further step to downsize, JAL disclosed an 
initiative to lower the qualifying age for voluntary retirement to 
30 years of age, according to the 20 April YOMIURI SHIMBUN. 
Consequently, 72 percent, or 15,000 of JAL's employees have become 
eligible for voluntary retirement.  JAL hopes to retire 550 
employees this year under this initiative and plans to solicit 
candidates to retire during two window periods, from May to June and 
from September to October 1994.  JAL will offer 1.9 times the 
"standard retirement pay" to those applying to retire in the May- 
June window and 1.7 times the amount in the September-October 
window.  In general terms, YOMIURI noted, employees could receive 
between 10 and 16.2 million yen ($98,000-158,000) in retirement pay 
if they apply during the May-June window and between 8 and 13.5 
million yen ($78,000-132,000) during the September-October window 
period. 

   YOMIURI noted that JAL registered a FY92 current loss of 53.8 
billion yen ($528 million) and expects a deficit in FY93--for the 
third consecutive year--of 30 billion yen ($294 million) after final 
accounting is completed.  The 20 April NIKKEI SANGYO also observed 
that because of the yen's rapid appreciation, JAL "will be no 
competition" against foreign airlines unless it reduces personnel 
costs to 15 yen per available-payload-ton-kilometer (ATK).  In FY93, 
JAL's personnel costs were 20 yen per ATK.  One yen in personnel 
costs per ATK is equivalent to 10 billion yen ($98 million), which 
means that JAL will have to reduce its personnel expenses by 50 
billion yen ($490 million) in order to remain globally competitive. 

   In other restructuring projects, JAL is considering variations in 
job contracts such as rotating groups of employees or distributing 
work among employees by consignment (19 April NIKKEI SANGYO).  It 
has formed a nine-member project team to design a new merit-based 
wage system by the end of May (20 April NIKKEI SANGYO) and a JAL 
subsidiary which offers vocational classes for flight attendants is 
grooming its students for jobs with foreign airlines (25 April 
ASAHI). 

   JAL has also decided to purchase seven 150-passenger Boeing B737- 
400 airplanes by 1997 for 30 billion yen ($294 million) in an effort 
to boost its share of the domestic air travel market to 40 percent, 
according to the 29 April NIKKEI.  JAL currently uses B747s, DC10s, 
and B767s on its domestic routes, but has decided the smaller B737- 
400's are better suited for the considerably lower volume of 
travelers on domestic routes between regional airports.  The B737- 
400 also requires less fuel and is less noisy than current planes. 

   ANA Experiencing 'Worst Crisis' in Its History -- The 5 May ASAHI 
SHIMBUN reported that ANA, Japan's second largest airline, expects 
to turn a profit of 3 billion yen ($29 million) in FY93.  However, 
ASAHI explained ANA is actually operating at a loss because the 
revenues that pushed it into the black came from selling its planes 
to a leasing company.  Now, however, ANA must lease back its planes. 
According to the 18 April NIKKEI SANGYO, ANA is in the midst of "the 
worst crisis since it was established." 

   The 20 April NIKKEI SANGYO reported that ANA recently eliminated 
two departments and 11 sections at its main office as part of 
restructuring measures decided in February.  ANA President Seiji 
Fukatsu is seeking reforms to "create a structure that endures even 
if the slow growth trend in the industry continues."  Specifically, 
according to ANA's personnel director, "personnel expenses will have 
to be restrained" because competition is expected to become more 
severe. 

   NIKKEI SANGYO reported that, in early May, a project team of six 
to seven ANA pilots will begin working on a new personnel wage 
system to replace the "65-hour guarantee system" ANA currently uses 
to pay its pilots and flight attendants.  This system, a "company 
relic" from 30 years ago, guarantees pilots and attendants a minimum 
of 65 flight hours each month.  ANA management has determined that 
the average actual time spent in flight is 55 hours for pilots and 
60 hours for attendants and believes it is "irrational" to guarantee 
hours not spent in actual flight.  ANA plans to present a new wage 
structure to its labor unions for negotiation by this fall. 

   JAS Trying To Balance Personnel Expenses, Staffing Requirements 
-- According to the 22 April NIKKEI, Japan's third largest airline, 
JAS, announced that its FY93 current loss of 12.6 billion yen 
($123.5 million) was 4.4 billion ($43 million) less than its FY93 
mid-year forecast because of an unexpected 2.2 percent rise in the 
number of passengers during the second half of FY93.  JAS is 
striving to break even in FY94 by shrinking its staff down to 5,500 
and by reexamining operations on "inefficient routes." 

   The company's personnel director believes, according to the 19 
April NIKKEI SANGYO, that a new employment system must be created 
quickly to deal with the fewer number of employees resulting from 
the company's freeze on hiring and other streamlining efforts.  The 
paper noted about 8 percent of the 1,300 JAS attendants retire each 
year.  The company will cover this year's staffing requirements by 
increasing the number of flights per attendant per day, and by 
utilizing the 30 attendants who will be available after JAS suspends 
its Narita-Honolulu flight in late May.  There is an "urgency" 
within JAS to review its current employment structure in order to 
balance staffing requirements and control personnel expenses, NIKKEI 
SANGYO noted. 

   Economic Trends - FEATURE:  MOF, MHA Fight Over Introduction of 
Local Consumption Tax -- SUMMARY:  The Ministry of Home Affairs 
(MHA) and the Ministry of Finance (MOF) are expected to clash over 
the MHA's proposal to introduce local consumption taxes, according 
to press reports.  While the MHA asserts that local consumption 
taxes are necessary to enhance local autonomy, the MOF argues that 
the current system of sharing nationally collected tax revenues with 
local governments is sufficient for their needs. 

   The 20 April NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI) reported that on 19 
April the MHA presented a plan to the Local Tax Subcommittee of the 
Tax Commission, an advisory council to the prime minister, on the 
introduction of local consumption taxes.  According to the MHA plan, 
local consumption taxes would be collected by manufacturers, 
wholesalers, and retailers,and paid to the relevant prefectures.  If 
a manufacturer or seller has branches in several prefectures, its 
headquarters could pay the company's entire bill to the prefecture 
where it is located or each branch could pay its portion--which 
would be calculated based on the number of employees--to each 
prefecture.  The MHA has not disclosed any specific tax rate as yet, 
but is expected to seek one half of the anticipated "increase" of 
the current national consumption tax. 

   The 17 April NIKKEI predicted that the MOF and the MHA will 
engage in a "fierce battle" over the introduction of local 
consumption taxes.  The Tax Commission, which deliberates on various 
proposed changes in the tax system, plans to submit its own 
recommendation to the prime minister by the end of June as part of 
Japan's macroeconomic package to expand domestic demand.  While the 
MHA hopes to strengthen the tax revenue bases of local governments, 
the MOF wants to retain leadership in the taxation field.  The 
article explained that some Tax Commission members would represent 
the MOF and others the MHA in fighting an "MOF-MHA battle" at 
commission meetings.  The article added that Tax Commission Chairman 
Hiroshi Kato is "skeptical" of local consumption taxes. 

   MHA's Arguments for Local Consumption Taxes -- According to the 4 
May NIKKEI, the MHA presented the following reasons for the 
introduction of local consumption taxes: 

--Increased local autonomy was one of the policies emphasized by the 
Hosokawa administration, and, now by the Hata administration.  To 
realize increased local autonomy, MHA argued, local governments must 
broaden their sources of tax revenue. 

--Local governments spend 64 percent of Japan's total public 
expenditures, but collect only 35 percent of total tax revenues. 
Local governments should increase their tax revenues to match 
expenditures. 

--Local governments need to balance the ratio of local direct and 
indirect taxes to be consistent with the goal of the current tax 
reform, which is to correct imbalances in the current ratio of 
direct and indirect taxes.  The ratio of local direct taxes to local 
indirect taxes is currently nine to one, while the ratio on the 
national level is seven to three.  Moreover, the MHA argued, direct 
taxes tend to be largely affected by ups and downs in business 
conditions, while social welfare expenditures of local governments 
tend to be fixed. 

--Local governments need to broaden their tax revenue bases. 
Seventy percent of Japan's welfare expenditures are shouldered by 
local governments, and these expenditures are expected to increase 
as the number of elderly increases as a percentage of the total 
population.  Local governments' public works investments are also 
1.7 times higher than those of the central government. 

   The 4 May NIKKEI explained that the MHA supports local 
governments which hope to broaden their own tax revenue bases in 
order to prepare for increasing social welfare costs and public 
works investment.  Under the current consumption tax system, which 
gives 39.2 percent of consumption tax revenues collected by the 
National Tax Administration Agency to local governments, the local 
government share would not increase unless the central government 
increases the tax rate.  According to the NIKKEI article, local 
governments hope to have "independent" consumption taxes, which they 
could raise to meet their future needs. 

   MOF's Arguments Against MHA's Proposal -- According to the 4 May 
NIKKEI, the MOF argued as follows: 

--The MHA's proposal would "complicate" the consumption tax system. 

--The proposal would create more paperwork for companies and 
wholesale and retail stores, who would have to pay the taxes, since 
they would have to pay two government entities. 
--The current system whereby central and local governments share 
consumption tax revenues--39.2 percent of total consumption tax 
revenues is transferred to local governments--is sufficient to meet 
local government needs. 

--The proposal would be contrary to the principle that the place 
where a tax is assessed should also receive the benefit of the tax 
revenue.  Manufacturers, wholesalers, and retailers of a product, 
who must pay consumption taxes at each stage, are not necessarily 
located in the same prefecture where final consumption occurs. 

   MHA's Dilemma on Uniform Local Tax Rate -- The 8 May NIKKEI 
reported that there would be no easy way for the MHA to make the 
proposed local consumption taxes consistent with its assertion of a 
desire to increase local autonomy.  The NIKKEI article quoted an 
influential member of the Tax Commission, who is "neutral between 
the MOF and the MHA," as saying that local consumption taxes as 
proposed by the MHA could not qualify as independent local taxes, 
because each prefecture would not be allowed to set its own tax rate 
according to its needs.  On the other hand, NIKKEI added, imposition 
of a same tax rate in all prefectures would be the only way to 
prevent corporations from moving their operations from one 
prefecture to another in pursuing the lowest tax rate. 

   Consumption Tax Increase -- According to the 4 May NIKKEI, the 
MHA plans to propose that 2 percent of the anticipated "increase" in 
the consumption tax be collected by local governments.  The MHA 
assumes that the Tax Commission would recommend a raise from the 
current 3 percent to 7 percent, and the MHA hopes to gain control of 
half, or 2 percent, of the increase in the form of a local 
consumption tax. 

   The 4 May NIKKEI reported that the MOF was particularly concerned 
about the MHA's assumption of a consumption tax increase.  The MOF's 
position is that since the consumption tax increase is a very 
sensitive issue, the MHA should not talk about it as if it were 
already granted.  The MOF is concerned, the article continued, that 
there is sufficient opposition to an increase, and arguments over 
how much of the "increase" should go to local governments would 
further complicate the MOF's advocacy of a consumption tax rate 
increase.  The MOF is also worried that opposition to local 
consumption taxes may lead to a smaller increase in the consumption 
tax rate. 

   Uncertainty on Outcome of Tax Commission Debates -- According to 
the 10 May SANKEI SHIMBUN, current political uncertainties make the 
outcome of Tax Commission debates uncertain.  The Tax Reform Council 
of the coalition parties has not reconvened since the inauguration 
of the Hata Cabinet due to the Social Democratic Party of Japan's 
(SDPJ's) departure from the coalition.  Even though the Tax 
Commission and the Tax Reform Council could agree on the consumption 
tax increase, they may decide not to go so far as to specify the 
rate of increase, since the SDPJ, now an opposition party, is 
expected to oppose an increase in consumption tax rates. 
Consequently, SANKEI concluded, the introduction of a local 
consumption tax "may not necessarily be decided" by the end of June, 
but the battle will continue. 

   JAIDO Program To Ship Excess Equipment to Developing Countries -- 
The Japan International Development Organization (JAIDO) and Toho 
Rayon, a medium-sized producer of acrylic fibers, rayon, and cotton, 
have agreed to ship Toho's surplus cotton spinning equipment to 
Uzbekistan and to establish a joint venture company there in 1994, 
according to the 2 May NIKKEI BUSINESS.  This is the first project 
in a new program JAIDO initiated in March 1993 to facilitate the 
shipment of surplus Japanese industrial production equipment to 
areas like the former Soviet Union, Southeast Asia, and South and 
Central America and to initiate joint manufacturing projects.  The 
cotton spinning equipment to be sent to Uzbekistan will come 
primarily from Toho mills in Tokushima and Gifu Prefectures, where 
roughly 10 percent of the company's annual production capacity was 
idled in FY93. 

   An Uzbek delegation visiting Japan agreed to the transfer of the 
facilities after inspecting Toho's mills in March.  The details of 
the joint venture company, such as the precise value of the deal, 
how much Japan will contribute, and who will have managing rights to 
the facilities, have not been finalized.  However, the project is 
expected to be in the range of between 1 and 2 billion yen ($9.5-19 
million).  JAIDO will solicit capital participation from Japanese 
trading companies and European and U.S. investment funds and 
companies.  Uzbekistan will obtain the funds to buy the equipment 
through cooperative financing from private banks and international 
financial institutions. 

   JAIDO was established in 1989 by the Overseas Economic 
Cooperation Fund, an organ of the Japanese Government, and 112 
member firms of the Japan Federation of Economic Organizations 
(Keidanren), to promote investment and economic cooperation by 
Japanese private enterprise in developing countries, according to 
the 1993 KAIGAI KEIZAI KYORYOKU BENKAN (Guide to Overseas Economic 
Cooperation).  To date, JAIDO has contributed 3 billion yen ($28.6 
million) for 40 joint venture projects in developing countries, 
according to NIKKEI BUSINESS.  In addition to the textile industry, 
JAIDO is seeking cooperation projects involving other Japanese 
industrial sectors, such as steel, electronics, and automobiles. 

   Financial Issues - FEATURE:  Regional, Trust Banks Facing 
Difficulties -- SUMMARY:  Recent press reporting on developments in 
the Japanese banking industry indicates that problems in the 
regional and trust bank sectors are leading to consolidation. 

   Regional Banks Merging -- The 20 April ASAHI SHIMBUN reported 
that three second-tier regional banks will merge in January 1995. 
Kita-Nippon Bank, Tokuyo City Bank, and Shokusan Bank will merge to 
become the "Heisei Bank." The new bank will be the fifth-largest 
second-tier regional bank in Japan.  The merger was reported by the 
21 April Asahi to have been a bailout "orchestrated" by the MOF for 
Tokuyo which posted losses in FY91 and FY92.  There are 
approximately 130 regional banks in Japan, but this will be the 
first merger of regional banks to create a base of operations beyond 
their prefectural boundaries.  The merger may usher in a new type of 
''super-regional bank," the 21 April NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI) 
reported.  Finance Minister Hirohisa Fujii welcomed the merger, 
saying that it was in line with the MOF's monetary policy, according 
to a 20 April NHK NEWS report carried on the Nikkei Telecom 
Database. 

   The 6 April NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN (NIKKEI KINYU) reported that 
several other regional banks are also experiencing difficulties and 
have had to cut dividends to preserve their internal financial 
resources and to give priority to writing off bad loans.  Ashikaga 
Bank, the leading regional bank, cut its dividends effective with 
the September 1993 midyear earnings report.  Hyogo Bank, the largest 
second-tier regional bank, and Taiheiyo, Hanwa, and Osaka Banks 
either stopped paying dividends altogether or cut them as of FY92. 

   The 21 April ASAHI article observed that regional banks are 
facing competition from the more powerful commercial banks, which 
have been aggressively establishing branches in the areas 
traditionally served by  the regional banks.  An article in the 10 
May EKONOMISUTO observed that commercial banks are now allowed to 
engage in a broader range of banking operations and have a greater 
capacity for raising funds than regional banks.  It anticipated 
intensified competition for regional banks as financial 
liberalization unfolds--particularly the liberalization of interest 
rates on demand deposits, which will occur in October.  Commercial 
banks have an advantage over regional banks because the size and 
scope of operations allows them to absorb the increased cost of 
paying higher interest on demand deposits, according to the 4 
November 1993 NIKKEI. 

   Trust Banks To Merge With Commercial Banks -- Japan's seven trust 
banks are in particularly serious condition, according to another 
article in the 10 May EKONOMISUTO.  The article observed that 
through mergers and bailouts by Japan's more powerful commercial 
banks, the current seven trust banks could shrink to as few as four. 
Toyo Trust and Banking, Chuo Trust and Banking, and Nippon Trust 
Bank will have to be merged with their main commercial banks to 
survive at all.  This will leave only four of the "original" trust 
banks including Mitsubishi Trust, Sumitomo Trust, Yasuda Trust, and 
Mitsui Trust.  The competition posed by the establishment of trust 
subsidiaries by the major commercial banks under the Financial 
System Reform Law enacted in FY93 makes the future of the trust 
banks "dim," the article reported.  The Bank of Tokyo and Industrial 
Bank of Japan have already set up trust subsidiaries, and the 
remaining commercial banks plan to establish them by 1995.  The 
existing trust banks would be forced to merge as a result of this 
increasing competition, according to the article. 

   The EKONOMISUTO article observed that Nippon Trust Bank, the 
smallest of Japan's seven trust banks in terms of assets, is 
''particularly shaky."  It has the highest percentage of 
nonperforming assets to total loans of all seven trust banks, 
according to the 13 April ASAHI SHIMBUN.  Already, Mitsubishi Bank, 
the fifth largest commercial bank, has decided to provide 
comprehensive assistance" to Nippon Trust, which could entail a 
merger, according to the 21 April NIKKEI.  This is possible under 
the Financial System Reform Law that enables an existing trust bank 
to become a subsidiary of a commercial bank.   If Mitsubishi were to 
make Nippon Trust a subsidiary, rather than establish an entirely 
new subsidiary like the other banks, it would control a subsidiary 
able to engage in the full range of trust banking business, 
including the lucrative pension fund business.  If this happens, the 
NIKKEI article observed, it would influence the strategies of other 
major commercial banks as they plan their own trust subsidiary 
businesses.  (For previous reporting on the Nippon Trust merger see 
the 4 May 94 Pacific Rim Economic Review, pages 3-4). 

   Initial Performance of New Securities Subsidiaries Unremarkable 
-- The five securities subsidiaries that were newly established by 
banks in 1993 as a result of the Financial System Reform Law have 
announced their FY93 profits, according to the 11 May NIKKEI KINYU 
SHIMBUN (NIKKEI KINYU).  The law allows the "mutual entry" by banks, 
trust banks, and securities companies into one another's sectors 
through subsidiaries, according to the 20 January NIKKEI KINYU.  To 
date, five banks have established securities subsidiaries.  In July 
1993, the Industrial Bank of Japan established IBJ Securities, Long- 
Term Credit Bank of Japan established LTCB Securities, and the 
government-affiliated Central Bank for Agriculture and Forestry 
established Norinchukin Securities.  Two trust banks, Mitsubishi 
Trust and Sumitomo Trust, followed in November 1993, with Mitsubishi 
TB Securities and STB Securities, respectively. 

   IBJ Securities, LTCB Securities, and Norinchukin Securities, all 
posted ordinary profits of 500 million yen ($4.76 million), 200 
million yen ($1.9 million), and 200 million yen ($1.9 million) 
respectively as of the fiscal year ending March 1994, while 
Mitsubishi TB Securities and STB Securities recorded ordinary losses 
of roughly 500 million yen ($4.76 million), according to the 11 May 
NIKKEI KINYU.  The article attributed the discrepancy to the fact 
that the two trust bank subsidiaries were "unprofitable" in the bond 
trading area, which, the article observed, would be the main source 
of profits for the subsidiaries in the future. 

   The poorer performance on the part of the trust bank subsidiaries 
was due to their inability to cover stock market losses incurred 
early in 1994 with profits from operations during 1993, the NIKKEI 
KINYU reported.  The Ministry of Finance requires that the 
subsidiaries show a "current surplus," which does not include net 
bond sales, for three years after beginning operations.  The only 
subsidiary to do so was the government-affiliated Norinchukin 
Securities, with a current surplus amounting to 100 million yen 
($952 thousand).  Norinchukin's profits were bolstered by 
commissions it received on the sale of investment trust funds of a 
co-affiliate in the Norinchukin group, Norinchukin Investment Trust 
Management Co. 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - CHINA:  FEATURE:  Trade Promotion 
Association Activities in China -- SUMMARY:  Recent press articles 
have reported on the activities of the Association for the Promotion 
of International Trade of Japan (APITJ), a group of 750 companies 
formed to promote trade relations with China. APITJ's chairman is 
Yoshio Sakurauchi, former speaker of the Diet House of 
Representatives. 

   Trade Mission to Three Gorges Hydroelectric Project -- According 
to the 16 April ASAHI SHIMBUN, the APITJ will organize a trade 
mission to China in mid-July to seek opportunities for Japanese 
companies to participate in construction of China's 1.16 trillion 
yen ($11.6 billion) Three Gorges hydroelectric project.  The 
mission, comprising representatives from about 20 financial, heavy 
electric, and construction machinery companies, is scheduled to meet 
with the Three Gorges Project Construction Committee, the Ministry 
of Water Resources, and the China Three Gorges Project Development 
Corporation, and to visit the construction site.  The 13 April 
NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN noted that the mission will be in China from 
11 to 17 July. 

   ASAHI observed that the Japanese companies are interested because 
international bidding for the purchase of construction equipment and 
generators, "which will use foreign capital," has already begun. 
The contract for the design and manufacture of 12 of the 26 700,000- 
kw generators has already been let to a group that includes Harbin 
Electrical Machinery, Dongfang Electric, and their foreign 
subcontractors. 

   APITJ Establishes Financial Investment Cooperation Division -- 
According to the 18 April NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN, the APITJ, which has 
about 750 member companies--including the major city banks, long- 
term credit banks, trust banks, and major life insurance companies- 
-has recently established a Financial Investment Cooperation 
Division to assist banks, life insurance, and securities companies 
with investment in China.  The new division will have a staff of 
four and will provide broad support ranging from negotiations to 
feasibility studies, contracts, and procuring capital, to Japanese 
power generation, transportation, and communications companies 
investing in China. 

   APITJ To Provide Credit Investigation Services -- According to 
the 23 March NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN, the APITJ will initiate a 
service to provide market surveys and credit investigations of 
Chinese companies for Japanese firms.  The credit investigations 
will be consigned to the Huaxia Company, a credit investigation 
company established in 1993 by the APITJ and the China International 
Trust and Investment Corporation (CITIC).  Huaxia is jointly funded 
by the People's Bank of China, the State Administration of Taxation, 
and the State Administration for Industry and Commerce, and has as 
its objective the "promotion of the development of a market economy 
by disclosing company information," according to the NIKKEI SANGYO. 

   The credit reports will include the company's name and address, 
names and areas of responsibility of its executives, whether the 
company has export authorization, the condition of its plants and 
production facilities, its major banks, the status of the company's 
collateral, and its financial situation.  They will also assess the 
abilities of the companies' managers and future prospects, according 
to NIKKEI SANGYO.  The 25 March ASAHI noted that the credit 
investigations will cost 20,000-100,000 yen ($200-$1,000) for 
association members and 30,000-150,000 yen ($300-$1,500) for 
nonmembers. 

   According to NIKKEI SANGYO, the proliferation of small, private 
Chinese companies and the "deeply rooted tendency" on the part of 
both state-owned companies and small private enterprises to refuse 
disclosure of company information, which they regard as "state 
secrets," is a "major headache" for smaller Japanese companies 
considering investing in China.  To help resolve this problem, the 
APITJ has also "obtained the cooperation" of the Ministry of Foreign 
Economic Relations and Trade, the State Planning Commission, the 
Ministry of Machine-Building, and the Ministry of Agriculture, 
"which controls the rapidly expanding township enterprises under its 
agriculture department." 

   Reports on Direct Investment in China -- According to the 15 
April ASAHI, a report released by the APITJ showed that in 1993 
there were 3,488 cases of Japanese direct investment in China, an 
increase of 1.93 times over 1992.  This amount nearly equals the 
total of 3,694 direct investment deals made between 1976, when China 
instituted its policy of opening to the outside world and 1992. 

   In 1993 the value of contracts was $2.96 billion, an increase of 
36.2 percent over 1992.  As a result, the cumulative value of 
contracts from 1976 through 1993 was $8.86 billion.  Japan's share 
of worldwide investment in China in both number and contract volume 
is about 4 percent, ASAHI reported. 

   Plastic Manufacturers Increasing Presence in Shenzhen -- Furukawa 
Kasei, a manufacturer of molded plastic products, has begun a 5 
million yen ($50,000) expansion of its wholly owned Shenzhen plant 
because of increasing demand from its two primary customers in 
China, Canon and Matsushita Electric Industry.  The Shenzhen plant 
was completed at the end of 1993, at which time it had 20 injection 
molding machines and employed 75 workers.  The expansion, to be 
completed by the end of 1994, will add 25 350-ton injection molding 
machines and increase the workforce to 150. 

   Furukawa will also build a new metal-mold plant to manufacture 
gears, small metal parts, and cases for computers and printers.  The 
plant is scheduled to begin operations in mid-1994.  (Tokyo NIKKEI 
SANGYO SHIMBUN 6 Apr 94 p 26) 

   MG, a plastics manufacturer based in Miyazaki Prefecture, in 
conjunction with Technoplas, a local plastics maker, has set up a 
joint venture company in Shenzhen to manufacture and assemble 
consumer electronics and office products.  The new company, 
Technopower, is capitalized at HK$3 million ($390,000), with MG 
contributing 30 percent and Technoplas 70 percent.  Its new 6,500- 
square-meter, four-story plant was scheduled to be completed by mid- 
April.  The injection molding machines will be imported from Japan. 
Initially the plant will employ about 300 workers.  MG expects sales 
of about 100 million yen ($1 million) in FY94.  In conjunction with 
this move, MG will reduce production at its Iwasa City plant, which 
will be used to develop and design new products and for OEM 
(original equipment manufacturing) production of new products such 
as water coolers and mobile telephones.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 
12 Apr 94 p 15) 

   Riccheru, a major manufacturer of plastic household products 
based in Toyama City, Toyama Prefecture, will establish a joint 
venture company in Shenzhen in 1994.  The partner, an unidentified 
Hong Kong plastic-products manufacturer, will build a plant by the 
middle of the year on a 1,600-square-meter site in the Shenzhen 
Special Economic Zone.  The plant, scheduled to begin operations 
next year, will produce about 200-300 million yen ($2-3 million) 
worth of products in the first fiscal year.  Initially the products 
manufactured in Shenzhen will be sold in Japan, which will reduce 
Riccheru's export ratio by about 50 percent.  Riccheru plans to have 
three plants in China within five years.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI 
SHIMBUN 9 Apr 94 p 8) 

   VIETNAM:  Nichimen Purchases 15 Percent Stake in Vietnam Motors 
-- Nichimen, Japan's eighth largest general trading company, has 
purchased a 15 percent stake in Vietnam Motors, the joint-venture 
auto assembly company based in Hanoi, for $1.5 million.  When the 
investment is finalized in May, Nichimen will dispatch personnel to 
Vietnam Motors to assist company management. 

   Vietnam Motors requested the investment from Nichimen, since it 
wanted to increase its capital base from $7.65 million to $10 
million in order to strengthen its management and undertake various 
projects, such as setting up after-sales service centers in Hanoi. 
Nichimen will assist Vietnam Motors in securing funds to import 
essential assembly machinery and equipment and in procuring auto 
parts. 

   Vietnam Motors was established in 1991 under the Vietnam 
Government's policy of encouraging joint-venture auto assembly 
operations.  Columbian Motors of the Philippines joined the Hoa Binh 
Company, a firm "under the umbrella" of the Ministry of 
Transportation and Communications, in the joint venture.  Actual 
auto assembly operations began in 1992, and in 1993, 800 passenger 
cars and commercial vehicles were produced using parts supplied by 
Mazda and South Korea's Kia Motors.  Vietnam Motors plans to 
assemble 3,000 units in 1995.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 27 Apr 94 
p 11) 

   Mitsubishi Motors Requests Permission To Assemble Commercial Vans 
-- Mitsubishi Motors has applied to the Vietnamese Government for 
permission to begin assembling its "Delica" commercial vans in 
Vietnam in a four-way joint venture with Mitsubishi Corp., 
Malaysia's Proton Motors, and Viettrans Shimex, Vietnam's state- 
owned shipping company.  While waiting for government approval, 
Mitsubishi Motors is thoroughly assessing the local auto parts 
industry and replacement parts market and aims to have a "smooth" 
start to its production operations by contributing to the 
development of Vietnam's auto parts industry. 

   Mitsubishi has sent inspection teams to visit some twenty local 
parts companies, including car seat manufacturers and machine tool 
firms, to assess quality, costs, production levels, and parts supply 
systems.  One problem is that since Vietnam's auto manufacturers 
have production systems focused on the country's military vehicle 
production, only a few parts manufacturers have worked with auto 
companies.  However, Mitsubishi feels it will be possible to procure 
some parts by using firms that specialize in auto repair and 
maintenance. 

   Mitsubishi feels it essential to raise its local parts content 
ratio early on and to develop a replacement parts supply system 
after actual production begins.  Thus, it intends to help the parts 
manufacturers upgrade their operations.  (Tokyo NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 
25 Mar 94 p 12) 

   Suzuki, Indonesia's Salim Group Begin Assembling Motorbikes -- 
Suzuki, Japan's largest manufacturer of minicars and the world's 
third ranking producer of motorcycles, the Salim Group, Indonesia's 
largest conglomerate, and "a company affiliated with the Vietnamese 
Army" will form a joint venture company to assemble Suzuki two- 
wheeled vehicles in Vietnam.  While Suzuki and the Salim Group have 
reached agreement on the project and have already begun assembling 
Suzuki motorbikes, negotiations are still in progress with the 
Vietnamese company over investment ratios and other matters.  When 
agreement is reached, a basic production and sales structure will be 
developed.  Suzuki is the first Japanese motorcycle company to begin 
actual production in Vietnam, beating out Honda, which is in the 
planning stage for a production plant in Vietnam. 

   Early this year the Salim Group began assembling Suzuki 
motorbikes in Ho Chi Minh City through one of its affiliated 
companies in Hong Kong.  The assembly plant was built by an 
Indonesian subsidiary of Salim.  Prior to this, Suzuki and the Salim 
Group's automobile division, the Indomobil Group, had formed an 
Indonesian joint venture company, "Indomobil-Suzuki Indonesia," that 
also will supply the assembly equipment and parts for the Vietnam 
assembly operation and will dispatch technicians to train the 
Vietnamese employees. 

   The joint venture company plans to assemble 7,500 units in 1994. 
With the installation of a painting line this summer, total 
production capacity will be more than 60,000 units annually.  In 
1995 the company projects sales of 20,000-30,000 units.  (Tokyo 
NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 2 May 94 p 3) 

   Freight Company Forms Joint Venture With Two State-Owned Firms -- 
Nihon Rojitemu (Japan Logistic Systems), a Tokyo-based freight and 
warehousing company not listed on Japan's stock exchanges, has 
entered into a joint venture agreement with two Vietnamese state- 
owned companies to establish a passenger service and freight 
delivery company in Hanoi, according to the 28 April NIKKEI RYUTSU 
SHIMBUN.  The 16 April NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN noted that this is the 
first joint venture between Japanese and Vietnamese companies in the 
transport sector.  The agreement has been signed and actual 
operations have begun, according to NIKKEI RYUTSU. 

   The new company, "Rojitemu-Vietnam Corp.," will be capitalized at 
320 million yen ($3.66 million), with Nihon Rojitemu's subsidiary, 
Rojitemu International, contributing 60 percent and the Vietnamese 
firms 20 percent each.  Part of Rojitemu's investment entails 
purchasing and shipping small buses and commercial trucks to Vietnam 
for use by the joint venture.  A total of 74 vehicles will be 
supplied over 5 years.  The NIKKAN KOGYO article reported that Nihon 
Rojitemu will begin by shipping two trucks, 18 small buses, and four 
passenger cars. 

   NIKKAN KOGYO noted that the Vietnamese joint venture partners are 
the No. 14 Passenger Transport Company and the No. 2 Freight 
Transport Company, both of which are "directly under" Vietnam's 
Ministry of Transportation and Communications.  The chairman of 
Rojitemu-Vietnam's Higher Management Council is Hironori Nakanishi, 
a managing director of Nihon Rojitemu, and the company's president 
is the deputy chief of Nihon Rojitemu's International Development 
Department. 

   The new company will use the buses in the Hanoi area, 
particularly for chartered service for foreign tourists, NIKKAN 
KOGYO stated.  The trucks will be used to deliver freight in Hanoi 
and in northern Vietnam.  The company also will operate an auto 
repair and parts supply service.  It anticipates earnings of 
$500,000 the first year of operation, a figure it anticipates will 
grow to $1.75 million annually as its freight operations expand. 

   The joint venture is Nihon Rojitemu's fifth operation in Asia, 
following the establishment of subsidiaries in Taiwan, Singapore, 
Hong Kong, and Thailand, NIKKEI RYUTSU noted.  With the entry of 
more Japanese companies into Vietnam, the company plans to expand 
its scope of operations to include building "exclusive use" 
warehouses and processing goods for shipment. 

   Firm Shifting Some Manufacturing Operations to Ho Chi Minh City 
-- Organ Needle Co., a Nagano-based manufacturer of precision 
machinery and Japan's leading producer of all types of sewing 
machine needles, is shifting some of its production operations to 
Vietnam because the appreciation of the yen and higher production 
costs are making its products uncompetitive internationally.  In 
mid-May Organ Needle and its subsidiary, Organ Kyushu, will 
incorporate a company, "Organ Needle Vietnam," in Ho Chi Minh City. 
The total investment amount, the investment ratio between the two 
companies, and who will be the new company's president have not yet 
been decided.  The new company has signed an agreement with a Ho Chi 
Minh City export promotion zone to build a production plant, will 
begin production there in April 1995, and by 1996 will have shifted 
all production of home sewing machine needles to its Vietnam plant. 

   Organ signed a lease agreement to build a plant on a 1.3 acre 
site in the Tan Thuan Export Processing Zone on the outskirts of Ho 
Chi Minh City.  (For information on the Tan Thuan zone, see the 23 
February 1994 Pacific Rim Economic Review, pages 40-41). 
Construction of the plant, which will cost 400 million yen ($3.9 
million), will begin in July.  Some 160 Vietnamese workers will be 
employed, and when the plant achieves full production it will 
produce 100 million sewing machine needles annually for export, 
mainly to China and Southeast Asia. 

   At present all home sewing machine needles are produced at the 
Organ Kyushu plant, which has 170 workers.  But when this production 
is shifted to Vietnam, the Kyushu plant will convert to producing 
some of the industrial sewing machine needles currently manufactured 
at Organ's five plants in Nagano Prefecture, which have 880 
employees.  The company's president states that 150 of the Nagano 
employees will retire within 3 years, so that further employment 
reductions will not be necessary. 

   In the future, Organ is considering the establishment of 
"multiple" overseas production bases, given the yen's appreciation 
and the company's worsening export profit situation.  (Tokyo NIKKEI 
SANGYO SHIMBUN 2 May 94 p 8) 

   JTB To Initiate Tours for Japanese Industry Groups -- Japan 
Travel Bureau (JTB), the country's largest tour company, will begin 
offering Vietnam "inspection tours" to Japanese companies that are 
investigating the possibility of setting up operations in Vietnam. 
The tours will be conducted monthly, beginning in late May, and will 
be organized by industry, such as textiles, food products, household 
electrical goods, electronic parts, and so forth.  The first tour 
will be for executives of major companies in Japan's uniform 
manufacturing industry. 

   The tours will feature visits to the Ho Chi Minh City offices of 
the Vietnam Chamber of Commerce and Industry and the State 
Commission for Cooperation and Investment for briefings on Vietnam's 
economic conditions and its legal and tax systems.  Groups will also 
visit factories with the potential for meeting the contracted 
production needs of Japanese firms, in addition to visits to port 
facilities and container yards and "first-hand observations" of 
Vietnam's distribution infrastructure. 

   After the tours, companies wanting to link up with Vietnamese 
firms will work through Hori and Co., a Tokyo-based consulting firm, 
which will help finalize actual arrangements.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO 
SHIMBUN 19 Apr 94 p 19) 

   Machine Tools/Robotics - Citizen Watch To Market New CNC Lathe 
Series in Asia -- Citizen Watch, which manufactures precision 
machine tools in addition to time pieces, will introduce a new, 
lower-cost series of computer numerically controlled (CNC) lathes 
for the Asian market in June.  Its Cincom Basic Series consists of 
three models which have 55 percent fewer parts, are equipped with 
Fanuc numerical controllers, and have thermal-expansion compensation 
mechanisms to allow for precision processing over extended periods. 
The lowest price model will cost 5 million yen ($50,000), the mid- 
range model 7-13 million yen ($70,000-130,000), and the top of the 
line machine, which will be able to process prototypes and multiple 
workpieces, will cost 18-22 million yen ($180,000-220,000).  To make 
the lathes more user-friendly in the China market, Citizen will 
develop machine readouts and displays that use Chinese characters. 

   To market this series in the Asia, Citizen will expand its 
Singapore service base and establish a second base either in Hong 
Kong or China's coastal area.  Citizen hopes to increase its 
overseas machine tool sales by about 13 billion yen ($130 million), 
or about 30 percent, in three years.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 
20 Apr 94 p 15) 

   Petroleum/Energy   Mitsubishi Oil Begins Offshore Exploratory 
Drilling in Vietnam -- Mitsubishi Oil Company, which has rights to 
explore for petroleum in Vietnam's offshore areas, began exploratory 
drilling in the third week of April.  The drilling is being 
conducted in the 15-2 oilfield, a 3,370 square kilometer block 
located about 80 kilometers southwest of Ho Chi Minh City, using the 
No. 5 White Dragon Maru, owned by the Japan Ocean Drilling Company. 
A minimum of three wells will be drilled by next year.  The first 
will be sunk to a depth of 3,000-4,000 meters, and Mitsubishi Oil 
should be able to determine "by early summer" whether it was 
successful. 

   To support its drilling operations, Mitsubishi Oil will establish 
bases in Ho Chi Minh City and Vung Tau and dispatch 13 employees 
from Tokyo.  This is said to be the first time a Japanese primary 
petroleum distribution company has acted as an oil field operator. 
(Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 26 Apr 94 p 13) 

   Semiconductors/Computers/Electronics - Japanese Government To 
Procure Nine Supercomputers in FY94 -- The Japanese Government 
revealed on 25 April that it will procure nine supercomputers for 
eight government-related organs with funds from the FY94 regular 
budget.  Three bids involve "new purchases," while the other six 
will be upgrades to existing machines.  Following budget 
deliberations in the Diet, bidding should begin in July.  During the 
FY93 procurement period, the government increased the number of 
supercomputers it planned to buy from four to 15 due to demands for 
more social infrastructure spending and concern over "Japan-U.S. 
(trade) friction."  Consequently, the number of supercomputers 
procured during FY94 "will likely increase as well." 
   A breakdown of the organizations involved is as follows: 

Ministry of Education 

National Laboratory for High Energy Physics          Hitachi Upgrade 
Hokkaido University Computer Center                  Hitachi Upgrade 
Tokyo Institute of Technology Computer Center   Control Data Upgrade 
Kyoto University Computer Center                     Fujitsu Upgrade 
Tohoku University Institute of Fluid Sciences           Cray Upgrade 
University of Tokyo Institute for Solid State Physics        New Bid 

Science and Technology Agency 

Japan Atomic Energy Research Institute (JAERI)       Fujitsu Upgrade 
      "                      "                               New Bid 

Special Public Corporation 

Electric Power Development Corp.                             New Bid 

   At least two of the nine units will be massively parallel- 
processing supercomputers (MPP).  JAERI plans to purchase a new MPP 
supercomputer as well as upgrade its vector-processing unit, and the 
High Energy Physics Laboratory is looking to switch from a vector 
supercomputer to an MPP machine.  (Tokyo NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 26 Apr 
94 p 1) 

   CHINA:  Domestic Developments - FEATURE:  Social, Economic Impact 
of Rural Labor Migration -- SUMMARY:  An increasing number of 
surplus rural laborers are migrating to large cities to look for job 
opportunities every year.  While township enterprises have until 
recently absorbed most of the floating population, the pressure on 
China's more prosperous cities is growing and expected to become 
worse by the end of the century.  Recent articles in the PRC and 
Hong Kong press have discussed the social and economic impact of 
this trend. 

   According to an article in the 4 April issue of the PRC-owned 
weekly CHING CHI TAO PAO (ECONOMIC REPORTER), published in Hong 
Kong, there are currently 120 million surplus rural laborers in 
China, and the number is expected to reach 140 million by the year 
2000.  Township enterprises, which provided 75 million jobs from 
1978 to 1992, are now "saturated" with rural laborers.  According to 
an article in the 16 February issue of the Hong Kong monthly KUANG 
CHIAO CHING (WIDE ANGLE), the migration started in the mid-l980s 
when the authorities relaxed controls on population mobility, 
allowing peasants to work in urban areas.  The number of peasants 
traveling to cities to find jobs has risen steadily since then. 

   The large numbers of transient residents have created serious 
problems for the transportation sector and social life of China's 
larger cities.  Beijing JINRONG SHIBAO reported on 5 March that 60 
million peasants are "floating" among various cities.  There are an 
estimated 24 million in 23 cities with populations exceeding one 
million.  These travelers have aggravated the strain on transport 
facilities.  Since mid-February, railroads have been carrying 3.5 
million passengers daily nationwide.  Besides creating monumental 
traffic jams, this "60-million-strong floating block" has further 
worsened the already deteriorating infrastructure of urban areas, 
"forcing cities with 1960s facilities to serve the needs of the 
1990s."  It has also intensified the shortage of food, energy, 
water, and postal services. 

   While many peasants have picked up heavy, dirty, and other odd 
jobs, others have become thieves, robbers, prostitutes, and drug 
dealers.  Some peasants, the JINRONG SHIBAO article stated, have 
even engaged selling humans.  Three hundred women have reportedly 
been abducted from a labor market in Chengdu and sold to eight 
different provinces.  According to statistics, the floating 
population committed one-third of all crimes in Beijing in 1993.  In 
the busier commercial areas, 80 percent of all crimes were committed 
by "outsiders."  The article also noted that with numerous "black 
children" (children without birth certificates) among the floating 
population, the mandatory family planning policy is hard to enforce. 
A survey shows that 66.7 percent of all pregnancies among the 
floating population were in violation of the family planning policy, 
and 40 percent of the families have two or more children. 

   By contrast, the CHING CHI TAO PAO article emphasized the 
positive influence of the labor migration, saying it has created 
wealth for the poorer provinces.  In 1993, five million Anhui 
citizens worked outside the province.  Based on an average income of 
$172, these people earned $839 million.  In Sichuan, $270 million 
was remitted to their families by the 5.1 million who worked in 
other provinces in the first six months of 1993.  Moreover, many 
workers, after learning various trades and technology and saving 
enough money, have come home and opened their own businesses. 
Furthermore, the migrating rural laborers have contributed to the 
cities' prosperity by providing cheap labor.  Peasants make up 50 
percent of Shenzhen's labor force, for instance.  Many of the 
conveniences of city life are due to the services these rural 
laborers provide.  The article further noted that the rural labor 
migration has had a more profound influence, giving peasants a 
chance to participate in economic development.  Peasants, who 
comprise 80 percent of China's population, are no longer "excluded" 
from the process of modernization.  The article predicted that after 
undergoing the "baptism" of urban civilization, they will become a 
positive force speeding modernization. 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - Foreign-Funded Holding Companies 
Seen As Rising Trend -- Despite the lack of clear rules governing 
their operations, China is seeing growing interest among foreign 
investors in the use of umbrella companies to oversee rapidly 
expanding businesses.  A report by accounting firm Deloitte Touche 
Tohmatsu said this rising interest was demonstrated by an increase 
in applications to the Ministry of Foreign Trade and Economic 
Cooperation (MOFTEC) and the State Administration of Industry and 
Commerce (SAIC)--the main bodies governing foreign investment--to 
set up China holding companies.  About 30 foreign investors have 
established holding companies, which could easily be elevated to 
regional headquarters for their China operations as investments 
became more substantial.  Because the establishment of holding 
companies is a new trend, there are no published regulations 
governing their operation, which means that under corporate law they 
are treated as foreign-invested enterprises rather than as a 
distinct class of company.  MOFTEC takes into account three criteria 
in assessing an application.  The potential foreign investors should 
have at least three existing or planned foreign-invested enterprises 
on the mainland, registered capital investment of at least $10 
million for the holding company, and the status of a multinational- 
known entity.  Because these are only internal guidelines, certain 
foreign investors have been permitted to set up holding companies 
even though they did not meet all three criteria.  As applications 
increase, MOFTEC and SAIC have indicated that the prerequisites may 
be more rigorously enforced. 

   Holding companies are set up more for operational and 
administrative convenience than for tax advantages.  Currency swaps 
and working capital transfers among subsidiaries can be regulated to 
allow greater efficiency, and a "one-company" corporate image could 
be promoted.  For tax purposes, a holding company is treated as a 
foreign-invested enterprise and is entitled to a reinvestment 
refund.  Under Chinese law, part of the income tax paid by a 
foreign-invested enterprise is refunded to the company if it 
reinvests its profits in China for at least five years.  Profits 
distributed to the holding company in the form of dividends are 
exempt from Chinese taxes, which, in effect, means profits of 
subsidiaries are not taxed twice.  The holding company, however, 
does not enjoy the tax holiday of two years income tax exemption and 
three subsequent years of a 50-percent reduction because it is not 
considered a productive enterprise.  (Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING 
POST (BUSINESS POST) 3 May 94 p 4) 

   Almost 12,000 Foreign-Funded Enterprises Approved in First 
Quarter -- According to information disclosed by relevant 
departments, China approved the establishment of 11,834 new foreign- 
funded enterprises from January through March of this year, with an 
agreed-upon foreign capital of $19.6 billion and actual use of 
$5.229 billion.  The number of foreign-funded enterprises going into 
operation this year is expected to increase sharply.  The latest 
statistics show that foreign-funded enterprises in China total over 
186,000.  The total output value of these enterprises was 300 
billion yuan in 1993, accounting for 11 percent of the country's 
gross industrial output value.  (Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE 0629 
GMT 29 Apr 94) 

   Power Sector Official on Foreign Funding Needs, Limitations -- 
Although China is reviewing its cap on the rate of return of power 
projects, it cannot guarantee that the ceiling will be raised to 
match those of other countries.  "Foreign investors investing in 
power projects will definitely find that there is money to be made 
as there is a great shortage of power on the mainland," said Yan 
Qin, director of the China Electricity Council.  "But we cannot 
promise that the rate of return will be higher than what it is now." 

   Mr. Yan's comments apparently were prompted by recent complaints 
from foreign investment banks and construction firms over the caps 
on the amount of profit they can make on power projects.  Foreign 
investors allege that the country's central planners have laid down 
unpublished guidelines for power projects, including a limit on 
returns of between 12 and 15 percent.  The investors argue that a 
more reasonable rate of return would be 15 to 18 percent. 

   Yesterday, Mr. Yan said that foreign investors would also have to 
take into account China's concerns before asking for higher returns. 
"We also put in money and land for power projects, so we also have 
to take into account our interest.  What this means is that power 
ventures will have to be mutually beneficial," he said.  To meet the 
country's massive power needs, China would need HK$25 billion in 
foreign funds, accounting for 25 percent of investment in power 
construction in the next seven years.  Mr. Yan said to meet these 
capital needs, the country would also turn to the World Bank, the 
Asian Development Bank, and the Japan Overseas Cooperation Fund for 
loans and export credits.  The country will also encourage foreign 
investment and will funds through flotation of power companies 
abroad.  (Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST (BUSINESS POST) 6 May 
94 p 1) 

   Australia's National Mutual Insurance Sets Up Office in Beijing 
-- National Mutual, Australia's second largest life insurance 
underwriter, opened a representative office in Beijing recently as a 
step toward expanding its operations in China.  In 1992, National 
Mutual (Asia) became the first and only life insurance underwriter 
listed on the Hong Kong stock exchange.  The company's income 
derived from insurance premiums totaled HK$3.4 billion last year. 
(Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 0655 GMT 5 May 94) 

   German, Dutch Companies To Build Oil-Gas Storage Facility in 
Zhuhai -- On 27 April, the German VTG Company and the Dutch Boten 
International Company signed letters of intent with the Zhuhai port 
office to build a large oil-gas storage and transport base.  The 
investment totals $150 million.  The two firms will set up a joint 
company to launch the project.  The capacity of the oil depot will 
be 1 million cubic meters, and the land assigned for the project, 
which will be completed in three phases, measures 500,000 square 
meters.  (Hong Kong WEN WEI PO 30 Apr 94 p b2) 

   Taiwan Group Invests $150 Million in Semiconductors, Other Areas 
-- The Taiwan Northern Telecommunications Corporation signed four 
agreements with the mainland on 27 April for major investments in 
research, development, manufacture, production, sales, and service 
of switchboards, semiconductors, and other technology.  In the next 
five years, investment by the Northern Telecommunications 
Corporation will reach $150 million.  The Beijing Telecommunications 
Corporation has ordered more than 4.5 million of the company's 
switchboards.  (Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE 1011 GMT 28 Apr 94) 

   Record Number of Contracts Signed at Guangzhou Export Fair -- 
According to FUZHOU WANBAO (Fuzhou Evening News), at the 75th China 
Export Commodities Fair, which was held in Guangzhou from 15 to 30 
April, 112 representatives of Fuzhou's 12 foreign trade enterprises 
signed export contracts involving a record amount of over $30.13 
million, an increase of 35 percent and 27.3 percent respectively 
from last year's spring and autumn export commodities fair levels. 
(Fuzhou Fujian Radio 2300 GMT 8 May 94) 

   Haikou City Seeks Foreign Capital To Build New International 
Airport -- With the approval of the State Council and the Central 
Military Commission, Haikou City will start building Meilan 
International Airport at Lingshan, 15 km from the city center, 
toward the end of this year.  After the new airport is commissioned, 
the site of the existing Haikou Airport will be redeveloped into a 
modern urban center and a financial, trade, and information hub of 
the province.  The search for foreign investment has already 
started.  (Hong Kong WEN WEI PO 5 May 94 p a6) 

   Malaysian Group Interested in Nanjing Infrastructure Projects -- 
Nanjing Vice Mayor Zhou Xuepo said the city government will 
accelerate the city's infrastructure construction, including the 
construction of a new airport, which will be completed in 1996.  A 
feasibility study is under way for the construction of the second 
Chang Jiang bridge in Nanjing.  A Malaysian financial group has 
indicated its willingness to cooperate.  This project will involve 
an investment of 3.8 billion yuan.  The State Planning Commission 
has approved the construction of a subway in Nanjing, which will 
require a total investment of 4.8 billion yuan.  Four five-star 
hotels will also be built.  (Hong Kong WEN WEI PO 5 May 94 p c3) 

   Foreign-Invested Firms Key Players in Shenyang Development Zone 
-- The Shenyang Nanhu scientific and technological development zone, 
known as the "Shenyang silicon valley," which is one of the 
country's five comprehensive reform experimental zones, has so far 
introduced 210 foreign-invested enterprises, with a total foreign 
capital of $250 million.  Foreign-invested enterprises in the 
development zone account for only 15 percent of the zone's total, 
but their output value accounts for 50 percent.  In addition, an 
industrial zone was built early last year south of the Hui He.  More 
than 600 businessmen from 15 countries and regions in the world have 
come to this zone to sign contracts and agreements on building 
industrial groups, bonded warehouses, and electronics centers. 
(Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO 3 May 94 p 25) 

   Foreign Investors Now Free To Form Real Estate Companies in 
Shanghai -- At a press conference on 3 May in Hong Kong, an official 
from the Shanghai Municipal Real Estate Administration said that 
foreign investors are now allowed to establish real estate 
development companies in Shanghai.  However, they must register with 
the Shanghai authorities for land utility approval before they form 
companies.  Early this year, the Shanghai Municipal Government 
formally approved foreign investors' request to build residential 
buildings for domestic sales.  (Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO 4 May 94 p 5) 

   Hong Kong Company Claims Mainland Investments of HK$30 Billion -- 
Huang Hua, chairman of the Nanfang International Group, says that 
the group now has more than 40 investment projects on the mainland, 
with investments in excess of HK$30 billion.  In the future, the 
group will increase its holdings of Guangzhou real estate, as well 
as real estate developments in cities in eastern and northern 
Guangdong.  Huang also said the company would increase its 
investments in the tertiary sector. (Hong Kong WEN WEI PO 30 Apr 94 
p C3) 

   Sun Hung Kai Adopts 'Prudent Strategy' on Mainland Investment -- 
Sun Hung Kai Properties, one of Hong Kong's largest real estate 
groups, has stated that it is adopting a "prudent strategy" with 
regard to investments in China.  A company spokesman said the HK$4 
billion figure cited previously for three projects in Guangzhou 
referred to the total cost of these developments.  As these projects 
were being run as joint ventures, Sun Hung Kai exposure was 
significantly less than HK$4 billion.  The spokesman said Sun Hung 
Kai would continue with its policy of keeping its investment 
exposure in China to less than 10 percent of its total assets. 
While Guangzhou New Town Plaza is a joint venture with Guangzhou 
Investment and China Overseas Land and Investment, the group's 
biggest mainland project is the HK$2.3 billion redevelopment of 
Dongan Market in Beijing.  The spokesman said future investments 
would focus on Beijing, Shanghai, and Guangzhou.  (Hong Kong SOUTH 
CHINA MORNING POST (BUSINESS POST) 12 May 94 p 3) 

   Hong Kong, UK Investors Set Up Guangzhou Electronics Plant -- 
Upsonic, a joint venture between the Wong family of Hong Kong and UK 
merchant bank Kleinwort Benson's China Investment Development Fund, 
has set up an electronics factory in Guangzhou.  Guangzhou Vice 
Mayor Liu Jinxiang and former British ambassador to China Sir Percy 
Cradock attended the 26 April opening ceremony.  Initial investment 
will be $8 million, increasing to $16 million by the end of 1994. 
(Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO 27 Apr 94 p 29) 

   Beijing Municipality Brings in $2 Billion in Foreign Investments 
-- Beijing Municipality has acquired more investments for industrial 
production from noted companies and corporations from Japan, the 
United States, Germany, the Netherlands, and Switzerland.  By 1993, 
more than 40 industrial enterprises across the municipality had 
acquired $2.08 billion in foreign investment.  In 1993, enterprises 
in the municipality signed contracts on 246 projects that involved 
$1.47 billion in foreign investment.  In early 1994, these 
industrial enterprises signed agreements on more than 50 joint- 
venture projects that involved $2 billion in foreign investment. 
(Beijing BEIJING RIBAO 5 May 94 p 1) 

   Beijing Makes $225 Million in Export Deals at Guangzhou Trade 
Fair -- The Beijing Municipal Trade Delegation, composed of 
representatives from 48 foreign trade enterprises and 10 foreign- 
funded enterprises, has scored unprecedented achievements at the 
75th China Export Trade Fair held in Guangzhou.  The total volume of 
export deals made at the trade fair reached $225.1 million, a 29.4- 
percent increase over the target set by the municipality and a 
117.1-percent increase over 1993.  (Beijing BEIJING RIBAO 4 May 94 p 
1) 

   Dalian's Achievements in Economic Opening -- Since its opening to 
the outside world, Liaoning's Dalian City has boldly utilized 
foreign funds and imported technologies to renovate more than 100 
large and medium-sized state-owned enterprises.  As a result, a 
great deal of key equipment has entered the world markets, and more 
than 40 percent of its machinery and electrical products have 
attained international standards.  The volume of exports and import 
substitutes in the past 10 years totaled $750 million.  Over the 
past 10 years, Dalian has attracted investors from 46 countries and 
regions.  Last year, the annual output value of the 1,400 foreign- 
invested enterprises already in operation reached 10 billion yuan. 
These enterprises created $900 million in foreign exchange and 600 
million yuan in profit and tax.  Last year, the total output value 
of township and town enterprises in Dalian City amounted to 30.7 
billion yuan, accounting for 50 percent of the city's total 
industrial output value.  (Shenyang Liaoning People's Radio 1000 GMT 
6 May 94) 

   Qingdao Reports Volume of Foreign Capital Over Last 10 Years -- 
Since 1984, Qingdao City in Shandong Province has approved 2,625 
projects involving foreign capital.  The actual volume of foreign 
capital involved in these projects reached $1.69 billion.  In 1993, 
the city's total volume of imports and exports reached $1.388 
billion, its total industrial output value showed a 420-percent 
increase over the figure recorded in 1984, and its financial 
revenues a 180-percent increase.  (Jinan Shandong People's Radio 
2300 GMT 3 May 94) 

   Shandong Chemical Company Forms Joint Venture With German Firm -- 
Qingdao Degusa Chemical Corporation, China's largest carbon black 
production enterprise, was formally established in Jiaozhou on 21 
April.  The investment in this corporation totals $55 million.  The 
corporation is a joint venture bewteen the Qingdao Zhenya Carbon 
Black Group Company, Germany's Degusa Corporation, and Germany's 
Investment and Development Corporation.  (Jinan DAZHONG RIBAO 26 Apr 
94 p 2) 

   Taiwan:  Economics Minister Proposes Method To Protect Investment 
in Mainland -- Delivering a speech in Taichung on 30 April, Economic 
Minister Chiang Ping-kun said establishing a foreign trade 
association on the mainland in the name of a ROC-Japan joint venture 
may be a way to seek protection of Taiwan investment there.  He said 
it is not possible for Taiwan to set up branches of the Foreign 
Trade Association of Taiwan because the mainland side had made it 
clear that if Taiwan sets up trade association branches there, it 
will set up similar branches on Taiwan.  It will not be possible to 
solve this political question within the foreseeable future, he 
noted.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 1 May 94 p 2) 

   Growth in Exports to PRC Via Hong Kong Slow -- The mainland 
retrenchment policy has slowed Taiwan's exports there. According to 
Hong Kong Customs statistics, Taiwan's exports to the mainland via 
Hong Kong totaled $1.217 billion in the first two months of this 
year, an  increase of four percent over the same period last year. 
However, the growth rate was smaller than that of the previous two 
years. (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 30 Apr 94 p 6) 

   Ban on Imports of Japanese Wine, Cigarettes May Be Lifted for 
GATT -- The Ministry of Finance has initially decided to lift the 
ban on imports of Japanese cigarettes and wine to comply with GATT 
principles.  However, the ministry may lift the ban gradually in 
order to safeguard the health of citizens and protect farmers.  The 
Republic of China and Japan are scheduled to hold bilateral 
consultations in August in connection with Taiwan's application to 
join GATT.  Japan is expected to demand the lifting of the ban on 
the import of Japanese cigarettes and wine.  An official of the 
ministry said the lifting of the ban will seriously affect the sale 
of cigarettes made in Taiwan.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 25 Apr 94 p 
1) 

   Tariffs on 758 Products Being Reduced or Eliminated -- The 
Customs Tariff Rate Committee under the Ministry of Finance on 29 
April adopted the draft amendment of the customs import tariff 
regulations for 1994.  The amendment reduces import tariffs for 758 
products, including refrigerators, washing machines, yellow beans, 
agricultural machinery, feed, farm insecticides, perfumes, 
lipsticks, and toothbrushes, by an average of 2.81 percent.  The 
tariff on 15 products, including stone materials and anticancer 
drugs, will be eliminated.  The current tariff amendment will lower 
the average rate from the 4.99 that existed at the end of 1993 to 
4.69  percent.  The rate for agricultural products will drop from 
11.55 percent to 11.01 percent, and that of industrial products from 
4.35  to 4.26 percent.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 30 Apr 94 p 2) 

   SOUTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  Supreme Court, Patent Office Propose New 
Patent Trial System -- SUMMARY:  In April the Supreme Court and the 
Office of Patent Administration each made proposals for revising the 
ROK's patent trial system, the ROK press reported.  The Supreme 
Court's proposal has generated criticism and concern that the 
court's proposed revisions may create an impression that the ROK is 
"hesitant to protect patents."  Debate over the issue of revising 
the patent trial system is  "heated," and groups are working to 
protect their "livelihood." 

   According to the 20 April TONGA ILBO, the current patent trial 
system involves three offices and as many as three trials:  The 
Office of Patent Administration's Trial Office handles the first 
trial, its Appeals Office the second trial, and the Supreme Court 
handles any third and final trial.  The 5 May CHUGAN CHOSON reported 
that the issue of revising the patent trial system arose in August 
1993, when two lawyers requested a trial before the Constitutional 
Court to determine the system's constitutionality.  The point of 
contention was whether the process adequately protected a citizen's 
right to trial.  According to the 17 April HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN, in 
February the Supreme Court indicated that, because the process did 
not include a hearing before the High Court (an appellate court one 
level below the Supreme Court), it violated a citizen's right to 
trial and was therefore unconstitutional.  As a result, in April the 
Supreme Court announced it would submit a formal proposal to amend 
the patent trial system to the National Assembly.  CHUGAN CHOSON 
reported that the Office of Patent Administration subsequently 
announced its own formal proposal several days later. 

   The Supreme Court's proposal to amend the patent trial system 
attempts to resolve the constitutionality issue by including the 
High Court in the process.  TONGA ILBO reported that, under this 
proposal, the patent administration would still handle the first two 
trials, while the Seoul High Court would handle a third trial, and 
the Supreme Court would handle a fourth trial, if necessary.  The 
Supreme Court proposes implementing these changes in 1996.  HANGUK 
KYONGJE SINMUN noted that the Supreme Court originally wanted to 
shift responsibility for the second trial from the patent 
administration to the Seoul High Court.  However, after the patent 
administration opposed the plan, the court opted instead to simply 
add the Seoul High Court to the process.  The paper quoted a source 
affiliated with the Supreme Court as asserting that the court's 
proposed amendment was "somewhat lacking" due to "insufficient 
negotiations" with the patent administration.  However, the source 
remarked the amendment will likely be revised in committee at the 
National Assembly. 

   The issue of revising the patent trial system was discussed in a 
public forum in January (see the 9 March 1994 Pacific Rim Economic 
Review, pages 31-32), and at that time the Office of Patent 
Administration asserted that the current system was legal.  However, 
in the wake of the Supreme Court's proposal, on 19 April the patent 
administration announced its own proposal for amending the system. 
CHUGAN CHOSON reported that this amendment accepts most of the 
Supreme Court's ideas, and would use the four-trial system until 
1998.  At that time, the patent administration would combine its 
Trial Office and its Appeals Office into a single entity, the Patent 
Trial Board, which would handle the first patent trial.  The High 
Court would then handle any second trial, and the Supreme Court a 
third trial, if necessary.  According to TONGA ILBO's calculations, 
if the National Assembly passes both proposals, from 1996 to 1998 
patent holders could go through as many as four trials before 
receiving a final verdict in a patent suit.  Protecting one's patent 
rights could become more difficult under such a system, the paper 
opined. 

   Despite its limited acceptance of the proposed four-trial system, 
the patent administration is concerned about the system, according 
to HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN.  It could be harder to protect one's 
patent rights, because it could take up to five years to receive a 
final ruling on a patent suit.  The paper noted the patent 
administration's worries that adopting such a system might create 
the misunderstanding overseas that South Korea is hesitant to 
protect patents, which could generate trade friction.  According to 
the paper, Japan set up such a system in 1945, but dismantled it in 
1959 after finding it inefficient.  Some are criticizing the Supreme 
Court's amendment, which comes 40 years after Japan dismantled a 
similar law, as a "typical example of incompetent policy," HANGUK 
KYONGJE SINMUN observed. 

   The patent administration is not alone in criticizing the Supreme 
Court's proposed amendment, according to CHUGAN CHOSON.  The Korea 
Patent Attorney Association criticized the court's "unilateral 
decision" to amend the system, commenting that the court had not 
listened to the opinions of inventors or industrialists.  The 
association called for the establishment of a special patent court 
and an expert judge system similar to those in the United States and 
Europe.  CHUGAN CHOSON noted that scientists and inventors are 
calling for the immediate establishment of a court specializing in 
patent cases.  The issue of reforming the patent trial system has 
generated a "tug-of-war" and "shrill confrontation" as various 
groups--the courts, patent attorneys, and the patent administration- 
-collect opinions and propose amendments that "favor themselves," 
the journal observed.   It commented that, as intangible products 
such as patents and industrial property rights move to the fore, 
attention is focusing on how the groups' "keen competition" to 
"guarantee their own livelihood" will turn out. 

   FEATURE:  76 Core Companies Exempted From Credit Restrictions -- 
SUMMARY:  The Office of Bank Supervision has announced the names of 
companies which it will exempt from credit restrictions, according 
to ROK press reports.  This year's list includes fewer manufacturing 
firms and reflects the government's moves to include non- 
manufacturing areas as core business sectors. 

   According to the 1 April HANGUK ILBO, on 31 March the Office of 
Bank Supervision announced the names of 76 companies--subsidiaries 
of the 28 largest conglomerates--which would be exempt from credit 
restrictions, effective 1 April.  Of the 76, 55 held exempt status 
in 1993, while 21 were newly selected.  The 76 companies chosen are 
among the 108 companies designated by the 30 largest ROK 
conglomerates as their key companies. 

   According to the 1 April HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN, the Office of 
Bank Supervision "readjusted" its list of core companies "based on" 
the Ministry of Trade, Industry, and Energy's (MOTIE) list of key 
companies.  The paper noted that the bank office is changing its 
emphasis in order to help the government "professionalize" core 
business sectors.  The 13 April CHUGAN MAEGYONG noted that the 
inclusion of more non-manufacturing companies as core companies is 
due mainly to the government's move to include distribution and 
construction as core business sectors.  The journal reported that 
among the 76 core companies are 17 chemical companies, 12 
distribution and storage firms, nine construction firms, seven car 
and transportation machinery manufacturers, six foodstuff companies, 
and six metals companies.  HANGUK ILBO noted that this year 55 
companies (72.4 percent) are in the manufacturing sector, compared 
to 63 companies (86.3 percent) in 1993.  This year, for the first 
time, Taehan Wire and Tonguk Trade Group are included in the list of 
the ROK's 30 largest conglomerates.  However, the Office of Bank 
Supervision has not yet recognized any of their subsidiaries as core 
companies.  According to HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN, this is because the 
two have not yet selected any subsidiaries as key companies under 
MOTIE.  The paper noted that, if some of the groups' subsidiaries 
are so designated with MOTIE, the Office of Bank Supervision may 
allow the groups to choose three companies as core companies exempt 
from credit restrictions. 

   HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN reported that the 30 largest conglomerates 
have 573 domestic subsidiaries, 492 of which are subject to credit 
restrictions.  (The remaining 81 are exempt from such restrictions 
because they are either core companies or high-performing stock 
dispersing companies.)  The Office of Bank Supervision will limit 
the share of credit allotted to the 492 non-exempt subsidiaries to 
10.79 percent of the total credit available, compared to 10.93 
percent in 1993.  Moreover, the subsidiaries in this category that 
belong to the five largest conglomerates will be limited to no more 
than 5.89 percent of the total credit available, compared to 6.15 
percent in 1993.  HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN noted that, at the end of 
1993, subsidiaries with credit restrictions accounted for 12,861.9 
billion won ($16.08 billion), or 8.28 percent, of total loans the 
office monitors. 

   CHUGAN MAEGYONG noted that, from a conglomerate's point of view, 
a core company enjoys privileges that can enable it to revitalize 
its investments and improve its development.  However, recently 
banks have been strengthening their credit inspections and using 
their "extremely weak financial powers" with regard to awarding core 
company status.  The banks are "leery of" including an insolvent 
enterprise as a core company.  In the future, when a group's main 
correspondent bank opposes designating a  financially weak 
subsidiary as a core company, the government will not "help" the 
group win that designation from the bank.  Thus, groups' "thin 
tactics" of setting up a debt-laden enterprise as a core company and 
then "throwing away" its financial benefits will not "turn out as 
they wish." 

   CHUGAN MAEGYONG commented that a group's management strategy and 
investment expansion will differ depending on which subsidiaries it 
has designated as core companies.  For example, Hyundai Group has 
named Hyundai Oil Refinery as a core company, in lieu of Hyundai 
Petrochemicals.  Hyundai chose its oil refinery as a core company 
because the group has completed most of its basic investment in 
petrochemicals, and now needs more than 1 trillion won ($1.25 
billion) to increase its refining capacity by 300 percent by 1995. 
The competition in oil refining is expected to actually intensify, 
because four of the five largest oil refiners (Honam Oil Refinery is 
excluded) have all been named as core companies.  Another example is 
Daewoo, which selected only two subsidiaries as core companies, and 
in lieu of a third chose to register two of its subsidiaries--Daewoo 
and Daewoo Telecom--as high-performing stock dispersing companies. 
CHUGAN MAEGYONG explained that a high-performing stock dispersing 
company is not only exempt from credit restrictions, but also from 
regulations regarding "self-financing" to cover real estate 
acquisitions and enterprise investments.  In order to register the 
two subsidiaries as high-performing stock dispersing companies, the 
group sold off shares to reduce its stock interest in the two to 
less than 8 percent.  Yet a third example is Halla Group.  Its goal 
of targeting the automobile market can be seen in its choice of 
Halla Cooperative, its car parts firm, as a core company. 

                           Designated Core Companies 

   Samsung:  Samsung Chemical Corporation, Samsung Heavy Industries, 
   Samsung Electronics 
   Hyundai:  Hyundai Oil Refinery, Hyundai Electronics Industry, 
   Hyundai Motor 
   Daewoo:  Daewoo Shipbuilding and Heavy Machinery, Daewoo Motor 
   Lucky-Goldstar:   Lucky, Goldstar, Goldstar Electron 
   Hanjin:  Hanjin Heavy Industries, KAL, Hanjin Construction 
   Kia:  Asia Motors, Kia Machine Tool, Kia Steel 
   Sunkyong: Yukong, SKC, Sunkyong Industry 
   Ssangyong:  Ssangyong Oil Refining, Ssangyong Cement Industrial, 
   Ssangyong Motor 
   Daelim: Daelim Ceramic, Daelim Concrete 
   Hanil:  Hanil Synthetic Fiber, Kyungnam Wool Textile Industries, 
Hanhyo Construction 
   Hanhwa: Kyung-In Energy, Hanyang Chemical, Hanhwa 
   Kumho:  Kumho, Kumho Petrochemicals, Asiana Airlines 
   Doosan: Oriental Brewery, Doosan Beverage, Doosan Construction 
   Dongkuk Steel Mill:  Dongkuk Steel Mill, Yonhap Steel, Korea 
   Steel 
   Hyosung:  Tongyang Nylon, Tongyang Polyester, Hyosung Heavy 
   Industries 
   Lotte:  Lotte Confectionary, Honam Petrochemical, Lotte Shopping 
   Sammi:  Sammi Steel, Sammi 
   Koryo Synthetic:  Koryo Synthetic, Koryo Petrochemical, Kohap, 
   Inc. 
   Kolon:  Kolon, Kolon Chemical, Kolon International 
   Halla:  Mando Machinery, Halla Cooperative 
   Haitai: Haitai Distribution, Haitai International 
   Dong-ah Construction:  Dong-ah Construction, Daehan Shipping 
   Woo-sung Construction:  Woo-sung Construction, Woo-sung 
   Distribution 
   Dongbu:  Dongbu Steel, Dongbu Industrial, Dongbu Rapid Transit 
   Kukdong Construction:  Kukdong Ceramics, Kukdong Construction 
   Kukje 
   General Construction 
   Byucksan:  Byucksan, Byucksan Construction, Byucksan Development 
   Taehan Wire:  none designated yet 
   Tongguk Trading:  none designated yet 
   Jinro:  Jinro, Jinro General Foods 
   Samyang:  Sunhill Glucose, Samnam Petrochemical, Samyang Co. 

   FEATURE:  ROK Public Database Project Moves Forward -- SUMMARY: 
South Korea's public database development project, one of three 
projects addressed in the Ministry of Communications' omnibus 
program to promote the development and use of electronic databases, 
has completed its initial stage of theme selection, according to 
Seoul press reports.  Korea Telecom will now solicit outside bids to 
build these particular databases.  Meanwhile, a Ministry of Science 
and Technology research institute is developing a database service 
system to facilitate management of high-speed data transfer and to 
systematize multimedia applications. 

   The ROK government's public database development project took a 
"big step forward" with the selection of 93 "development themes" by 
the Public Database Development Promotion Council, the 15 April 
Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN (MKS) reported.  Some 45 percent of the 
themes pertain to economics and industry, 30 percent to academic 
fields and education, and 15 percent to daily living.  The remaining 
10 percent focus on miscellaneous themes such as government 
administration and election data.  According to the newspaper, the 
economics and industry themes include national statistics, 
information on the North America Free Trade Association and the 
Uruguay Round, and data on agricultural products, distribution, 
construction, transportation, and computer software.  Academic 
fields will include data on library holdings, science and 
technology, and the social sciences. 

   MKS reported the "next step" is for the Ministry of 
Communications to "prioritize" the database themes and pass this 
guidance onto Korea Telecom, which in June will solicit proposals 
from private companies to develop the databases.  The ministry 
reportedly has budgeted 80 billion won ($100 million) for use on the 
project between now and 1997.  According to the 21 March Seoul 
CHONJA SINMUN, this "public database" is one of three such state- 
supported projects, which also include "government-funded databases" 
and the database industry in general.  The three projects were 
reported by the newspaper to be directed by the Korea Database 
Promotion Center (DPC) in accordance with the Ministry of 
Communication's 1993 policy on database promotion.  The "Public 
Database Development Promotion Council" mentioned in the MKS report 
presumably is an appendage of the DPC. 

   In what appears to be a related development, the 15 April MKS 
reported in a separate article that the Computer Research Group of 
the Electronics and Telecommunications Research Institute (ETRI, an 
ROK government-funded institute under the control of the Ministry of 
Science and Technology) has begun work on a "database service 
system" with a 5 billion won ($6.25 million) budget that also runs 
from 1994 to 1997.  The service system is reportedly based on 
technology used for ETRI's "Pada I and II" database management 
systems developed in 1991-92, and will be used to develop a 
"management system for use in a high-speed data communications net." 

   ETRI's project also involves building a "multimedia applications 
system development tool," and a "database structure tool" needed for 
multimedia database service.  The institute expects these systems 
will form the "basic core" for high-speed communications services 
(such as electronic libraries, "hop shopping," and video-by-order) 
and for augmenting existing services.  They will also help 
"systematize" technology used with domestic database management 
systems. 

   FEATURE:  ROK High-Speed Information Highway Project Described -- 
SUMMARY:  A Seoul business magazine has published a detailed 
breakdown with budget figures of South Korea's high-speed 
information highway project.  Scheduled to run until 2015, the 
project envisions spending $56 billion on a national data 
communications net for government use, a separate public data 
communications net, and applications and core technology.  The 
system will connect all parts of the country with high-capacity 
optical electronic cables able to handle such next-generation 
communications services as 3-D conferencing, parallel database 
searches, multimedia applications, and high-definition television 
(HDTV). 

   South Korea has begun building a high-speed information highway 
of its own called the "Super High-Speed Data Communications Net." 
According to the 13 April Seoul CHUGAN MAEGYONG, basic plans for the 
project were laid down last August by the ROK's Ministry of 
Communications, and the go-ahead for full-scale development was 
given by the Blue House in January.  The magazine reported that the 
project is under the control of a "promotion committee" headed by 
the country's prime minister, which in turn presides over a "working 
level committee" of some 25 officials on the bureau chief- level 
from related government agencies.  A "planning group" has also been 
established in the Ministry of Communications to coordinate the 
project.  The ministry's plan reportedly calls for simultaneous work 
in three areas: a super high-speed national data communications net, 
a super high-speed public data communications net, and development 
of applications and core technology.  Each program has three stages 
with separate budgeting for each stage. 

   For the national net, stage one is from 1994-97 and envisions 
dividing South Korea into five jurisdictions--metropolitan Seoul, 
the central region, the Honam area, Pusan, and Taegu--where basic 
construction will be carried out separately, CHUGAN MAEGYONG 
reported.  During this stage, "the entire country including medium 
and small cities" will be connected by an optical cable network 
capable of 155-162 megabits per second providing data service to 
national agencies, local government bodies, and research institutes. 
Existing administrative, national defense, public security, 
education, and all other public computer networks will be 
incorporated into the system.  Stage two is from 1998-2001, during 
which a 2.5 gigabit per second (GBPS) optical cable and "next 
generation" ATM (asynchronous transmission mode) switching system 
exchange will be built.  Services will include remote medical 
examination and treatment, education, and electronic libraries. 
Stage three from 2003 to 2010 involves building optical cable links 
with several tens of GBPS capacity for use with three-dimensional 
image conferencing and parallel searching of dispersed databases. 

   CHUGAN MAEGYONG also described the "public data communications 
net" project aimed at building a broad-band integrated system 
digital network (B-ISDN).  Stage one from 1994 to 1997 will expand 
present ISDN services.  Stage two continues until 2002, during which 
time "model ATM switching nets" will be built in the large city 
areas while 10 GBPS optical electronic transmission equipment will 
be provided for various high-tech communications services.  The 
third stage runs until 2015 and involves installing 100 GBPS 
equipment for use with optical cables to provide household 
subscribers with multimedia and HDTV services. 

   The application core technology component's three stages are 
coterminous with those of the public data communications project. 
In stage one, ATM switching and optical communications equipment 
will be developed.  During the second stage, an information 
processing system that can be used with digital HDTV will be built. 
An advanced "next generation" version will be developed in the third 
stage.  In addition, a "multifunction advance model network" will be 
built and operated between Seoul and Taedok science town to 
expedite applications and technology development and to maximize 
research results."  The network initially will have a 2.5 GBPS 
capacity, which will be upgraded to 10 GBPS and finally to a "T- 
class" super high-speed net. 

   According to CHUGAN MAEGYONG, the Ministry of Communications will 
submit a 44.77 trillion won ($56 billion) budget for the project to 
the South Korean National Assembly (figures in billion won.  800 won 
= $1): 


               Super High-Speed National Data Communications Net 
                       (funding:  government finance and 
                             proceeds from sales) 
Project/Stage                 1        2         3          Subtotal 

Build a high-speed trunk net  153.7    161.1     277.2      547.0 
Operate high-speed trunk net   19.1     71.5     178.4      269.0 
Build prototype test net       12.9     17.6      30.5       61.0 
Model projects                 14.0      -                   14.0 

Totals                        199.7    205.2     486.1      891.0 

                Super High-speed Public Data Communications Net 
                         (funding:  private business) 

Project/Stage                1         2         3          Subtotal 

Build optical cables          423.9    2,851.9   28,247.1  31,522.9 
Build communications net      143.8      947.0    9,436.7  10,527.5 

Totals                        567.7    3,798.9   37,683.8  42,050.4 

                 Applications and Core Technology Development 
            (funding:  government finance and proceeds from sales) 

Project/Stage                 1        2         3          Subtotal 

Applications development       52.0     70.0     100.0        222.0 
Core technology development   796.0    321.7     496.6      1,614.3 

Totals                        848.0    391.7     596.6      1,836.3 



   KAIST Establishes Optical-Electronics Research Center -- A new 
optical-electronics research center is being established within the 
Korea Advanced Institute of Science and Technology (KAIST) for 
research in optical communications and to build a foundation for an 
optical electronics industry.  The center will carry out 
concentrated research on components for optical information 
processing, a next-generation optical transmission module and 
optical network, and fibre-optics materials.  Some 1.2 billion won 
($1.5 million) will be spent by the center annually between now and 
1996 to commercialize one (unspecified) optical-electronics product, 
1.5 billion won ($1.875 million) annually from 1997 to 1999 for two 
more products, and 2.0 billion ($2.5 million) annually between 2000 
and 2002 to commercialize three more products.  The research is 
expected to yield some 62 patents or theses by 2002.  KAIST's center 
will serve as the nucleus for coordinated research that ultimately 
will involve South Korean universities, research institutes, and 
commercial firms.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 14 Apr 94 p 14) 

   ROK Restructuring State-Funded S and T Research Institutes -- The 
South Korean government is completely restructuring its 27 science 
and technology research institutes and affiliated organizations by 
merging some and abolishing or selling others, in order to eliminate 
"inefficiency and bureaucratism" standing in the way of S and T 
development.  According to an "informed source," the Korea 
Electrotechnology Research Institute is among those to be sold.  A 
"fair number" of institutes will be subordinated to national 
agencies, while still others will have their functions changed to 
training S and T personnel, as is now done by the Korea Advanced 
Institute of Science and Technology (KAIST). 

   At present, there are 13 government-funded institutes subordinate 
to the Ministry of Science and Technology (MOST), and one each under 
the Ministry of Trade, Industry, and Energy (MOTIE), the Ministry of 
Health and Social Affairs, the Ministry of Construction, and the 
Ministry of Communications.  Ten others are "affiliated institutes." 
The 27 institutes employ 7,237 people, and are receiving 375.5 
billion won ($469.4 million) in government funds for 1994.  The 
institutes and their present affiliations are: 

                     State-funded R and D institutes under 

A. Ministry of Science and Technology 
      1. Korea Institute of Science and Technology 
             a. System Engineering Research Institute 
             b. Genetic Engineering Research Institute 
             c. Research and Development Information Center 
             d. Science and Technology Policy Institute 
             e. Management Research Institute 
      2. Korea Advanced Institute of Science and Technology 
      3. Korea Research Institute of Standards and Science 
             a. National Astronomical Observatory 
             b. Basic Science Support Center 
      4. Korea Institute of Machinery and Metals 
             a. Korea Aerospace Research Institute 
      5. Korea Institute of Nuclear Safety 
      6. Korea Atomic Energy Research Institute 
             a. Atomic Energy Hospital 
             b. Atomic Energy Environment Management Center 
      7. Korea Institute of Energy Research 
      8. Korea Institute of Geology, Mining, and Materials 
      9. Korea Electrotechnology Research Institute 
      10. Korea Research Institute of Ships and Ocean Engineering 
      11. Korea Research Institute of Chemical Technology 
      12. Korea Science and Engineering Foundation 
      13. Kwangju Institute of Science and Technology 

B. Ministry of Trade, Industry, Energy 
      14. Production Technology Research Institute 
C. Ministry of Health and Social Affairs 
      15. Food Development Research Institute 
D. Ministry of Construction 
      16. Construction Technology Research Institute 
E. Ministry of Communications 
      17. Electronics and Telecommunications Research Institute 

(Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 12 Apr 94 p 1) 

   ROK Scientific and Technological Research 'Stagnating' -- South 
Korea's S and T research, as measured by articles published in 
world-famous scholarly journals by ROK science-related institutes 
(including state-funded research institutes, universities, and 
private research labs) remained stagnant during 1993, according to 
the Korea Institute of Industry and Technology Information (KINITI). 
South Korea's total of 3,129 articles ranked 35th worldwide, "behind 
even such countries as Brazil, Taiwan, and the Republic of South 
Africa."  The number represents only 0.5 percent of the world total 
of science-related articles published that year, compared to the 
United States with 39.1 percent, Japan with 7.8 percent, and England 
with 7.7 percent.  KINITI blamed the ROK's poor showing on the 
"absence of an S and T policy," and the "lazy" manner in which 
government-funded research institutes are operated.  Of the 3,129 
South Korean articles, 583 were prepared by the Korea Advanced 
Institute of Science and Technology, 559 by Seoul National 
University, 156 by Postech, 149 by Yonsei University, 130 by the 
Korea Institute of Science and Technology, and 105 by Pusan 
University.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 31 Mar 94 p 14) 

   Government Views Post-"G7" Advanced S and T Projects -- The ROK 
Ministry of Science and Technology (MOST) is working on a "Long-Term 
Plan for Science and Technology Development Aimed at the Year 2010" 
to take South Korea beyond the present "Highly Advanced National" 
(HAN) projects (also known as "G7") scheduled to be completed in 
2001.  The ministry and the (quasi-independent) Science and 
Technology Policy Institute (which has responsibility for the "G7" 
projects) will hold public hearings this June to determine the 
specific projects to be included in the new plan.  Project selection 
will take place against the backdrop of long-term technology 
forecasts that extend to the year 2015. 

   Post-"G7" planning assumes the "G7" projects now underway will 
have greatly raised the level of ROK technology.  By the year 2001, 
the ROK government will have invested 1.47 trillion won ($1.84 
billion), government-invested agencies 0.59 trillion ($0.74 
billion), and private industry 1.64 trillion won ($2.05 billion) in 
the 11 HAN projects now being developed.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE 
SINMUN 6 Apr 94 p 13) 

   ROK Government Biotech Research Funding for 1994 -- South Korea's 
Ministry of Science and Technology will spend 34 billion won ($42.5 
million) on biotech research in 1994, some 55 percent more than last 
year's amount of 21.9 billion won ($27.3 million).  The breakdown by 
category is as follows (figures in billion won ($ million)): 

   10.8 ($13.5) Develop new biological materials. 
   0.8   ($1.0) Develop new medicines and agricultural chemicals. 
   3.0   ($3.8) Genome research, research on anatomical functions, 
                develop commercial biological products,agricultural 
                technology, new technology for diagnosing and 
                preventing illnesses, medical engineering 
   2.4   ($3.0) R and D conducted at the Genetic Engineering 
                Research Institute. 
   1.5   ($1.9) Korean Institute of Science and Technology's medical 
                science projects. 
   3.0   ($3.8) "Other research agencies connected with biological 
                engineering." 
   8.0  ($10.0) 12 research centers involved in biotech research. 
   4.5   ($5.6) R and D projects related to bioengineering within 
                basic, goal-directed research projects. 

(Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 14 Apr 94 p 14) 

   MOST to Oversee Patent Applications for Affiliated Institutes -- 
The Ministry of Science and Technology is devising "support 
policies" to protect ministry affiliated research institutes from 
unauthorized use of their research results domestically and 
internationally.  Although many such institutes have been performing 
research with a high probability of commercialization, the 
complicated procedures and expense of applying for patent 
protection has caused the institutes to ignore this precaution.  It 
costs some 5 million won ($625,000) per country to apply for 
overseas patents, plus an annual maintenance fee of 200,000-300,000 
won ($250-375) per country per item.  Many ministry-affiliated 
institutes also lack the expertise needed to apply for patents 
abroad.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 15 Apr 94 p 19) 

   High-Level 'Semiconductor Equipment Council' Formed -- A 
Semiconductor Equipment Council was formally inaugurated to oversee 
an investment of 50 billion won ($62.5 million) over the next four 
years to "indigenize" semiconductor manufacturing equipment.  Kim 
Chi-rak, vice-director of the Semiconductor Industry Association, 
was elected head of the Council at its first meeting on 8 March. 
The Council's other members are Kim Ik-man (chief, Semiconductor 
Department, Ministry of Trade, Industry, and Energy), Choe Chang-ho 
(managing director, Samsung Electronics), Yun Chong-se (director, 
Goldstar Electron), Yi Hyon-hui (managing director, Hyundai 
Electronics), and Chong Kyong-jun (chief, Evaluation and Control, 
Korea Academy of Industrial Technology). 
   The Council will determine the basic direction that 
"indigenization" of semiconductor equipment will take, including 
what particular items will be singled out for indigenization and 
what businesses will be selected to participate.  The South Korean 
government is providing 20 billion won ($25 million) in subsidies to 
the project, including 4 billion won ($5 million) from its 
Industrial Development fund and 16 billion won ($20 million) in 
basic industrial technology support funds.  Samsung, Goldstar, and 
Hyundai are supplying 10 billion won ($12.5 million) each.  (Seoul 
CHONJA SINMUN 10 Mar 94 p 1) 

   ROK-PRC 'Technomart' Held in Beijing -- An "ROK-PRC 
technomart"opened in Beijing on 4 April representing the "largest 
scale cooperative undertaking between South Korea and China since 
relations were established" in 1992.  Some 138 technologies are 
being offered to China and 434 to South Korea.  The ROK delegation 
included 109 members of conglomerates and small-medium businesses, 
led by the Ministry of Trade, Industry, and Energy's(MOTIE's) 
Planning and Management Office director.  Chinese participants 
numbered 600.  Of the South Korean firms, 49 wanted to import PRC 
technology, 4 sought to transfer technology, and another 5 wanted to 
do both.  The following is a breakdown by category: 


                                               from 
                   TECHNOLOGY               PRC     ROK 
                   machinery                126      38 
                   metallurgy                21      21 
                   chemical engineering      70      31 
                   electronics               66      14 
                   medical service           43       6 
                   medicinal herbs           36      13 
                   light industry            30       5 
                   agriculture               30       5 
                   environment               30       5 
                   Totals                   434     138 



This is the first opportunity MOTIE has had to make an objective 
analysis of the Chinese technologies, an opportunity the South 
Korean Government regards as "significant."  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE 
SINMUN 4 Apr 94 p 4) 

   ROK Third Country Exports 'Frustrated' by Quotas -- South Korean 
firms using third countries as a base for indirect exports are being 
frustrated by new trade regulations imposed by the advanced nations 
on developing ones and by preferential policies enacted toward 
domestic manufacturers in the developing countries themselves. 
According to the Korea Trade Promotion Corporation (KOTRA), the 
United States and European Union are using new quotas to limit 
exports from such third-world countries as Vietnam and Burma, and 
the latter are filling these quotas with products made by 
domestically-owned companies.  In the case of Burma, new quotas 
issued by the United States are causing ROK firms there, such as 
Segye Corp. and Daewoo, problems since 80-90 percent of their 
production had been going to the United States.  KOTRA will devise 
"countermeasures" when it finishes its survey of affected countries 
during the second quarter of 1994.  Since United States tariffs are 
tied to the human rights records of the exporting countries, KOTRA 
expects that ROK companies will take this into account in planning 
their investment strategies.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 30 Mar 94 
p 11) 

   Seoul District Civil Court Sets Up International Trade Court -- 
On 1 March the Seoul District Civil Court established its own 
International Trade Court to handle suits involving international 
trade disputes, such as international maritime shipping or 
international insurance disputes.  It will be composed of eight 
judges--six panel judges and two single judges.  (In the ROK legal 
system, there are two types of judges:  those who serve on a panel 
that judges a case, and those who sit in judgement on their own.) 
The civil court has staffed the new trade court with judges who have 
studied abroad, and intends to maintain a staff that has become 
familiar with foreign legal environments through overseas study. 
The need for such a court has arisen as South Korea emerges as an 
international trading country. 

   On 28 March the Seoul District Civil Court held a "bull session" 
involving 60 people from the Korea Chamber of Commerce and Industry, 
the Korea Commercial Arbitration Board, and other trade-related 
organizations, such as the Korea Export-Import Bank, the Korea 
Traders Association, and the Korea Shipping Society.  The 
participants were invited to share opinions on how the new 
International Trade Court should be managed.  A lawyer noted that in 
maritime cases the standards often differ for every port.  He 
commented that the court should set definite standards and then 
disseminate these standards to every lower court.  A manager at the 
Korea Traders Association observed that, in maritime disputes, the 
court prefers to ignore agreements or traditional practices and 
makes judgements solely based on actual laws.  As a result, the 
court often becomes an "international laughing stock."  He stated 
that judges can understand the real situation only if they 
understand the agreements and traditional practices in effect.  Ka 
Chae-hwan, chief of the Seoul District Civil Court, concluded that 
South Korea must clean up all facets of its judiciary and work to 
make ROK courts into model courts.  (Seoul CHUGAN CHOSON 14 Apr 94 
pp 82-83) 

   ROK Becoming World's Top Cathode-Ray Tube Producer -- According 
to data compiled by the Korea Trade Promotion Corporation (KOTRA), 
South Korea will be the largest cathode-ray tube producer in 1994. 
ROK production is expected to total 35 million units, while Japan is 
expected to produce 32 million units.  According to KOTRA's 
forecast, world demand for cathode-ray tubes in 1994 will equal 150 
million units, while supply will be between 138 and 146 million 
units.  (Seoul CHUNGANG ILBO 7 May 94 p 8) 

   Korea Heavy Industries To Build Thermal Power Plant in India -- 
Korea Heavy Industries has exchanged a memorandum of understanding 
with India's Essar Group to build a 500-megawatt thermal power 
plant.  The contract order is worth $50 million.  Korea Heavy 
Industries will supply a steam turbine generator, three heat 
recovery steam generators, and other components and systems to the 
plant, which will be built in an industrial complex northwest of 
Bombay.   The two companies also agreed to build a follow-on power 
plant, an oil refinery, and an ironworks.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE 
SINMUN 28 Apr 94 p 10) 

   Anam To Supply Semiconductors to Japan's NEC -- Anam Industrial 
Co. will assemble and supply for NEC of Japan about 10 percent of 
NEC's ASIC (application-specific integrated circuit) semiconductor 
chips beginning in June.  Anam's chips will be used in personal 
computers and communication equipment, namely the QFP (quad-flat 
package), and standard cells with 40 to 208 pins.  The ROK company's 
production costs are reportedly 30 percent lower than those in 
Japan.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 8 May 94 p 6) 

   Hyundai Steel Pipe To Build Plant in Vietnam -- Hyundai Steel 
Pipe has decided to build a joint venture steel pipe plant in 
Vietnam.  Its decision comes as the demand for steel pipe increases 
in Vietnam--due to growing investment in Vietnam's infrastructure- 
-and as the profitability of domestically produced ROK steel pipe 
decreases.  Hyundai is currently consulting on building a 40,000- 
tonne plant near Ho Chi Minh City.  The plant would require an 
investment of about 15 billion won ($18.75 million).  Hyundai will 
finalize its plans by June and begin construction during the latter 
half of the year.   (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 3 May 94 p 10) 

   Mando Machinery To Manufacture Caliper Brakes in China - Mando 
Machinery has created a joint-venture car parts company with the 
Langfang Municipal Brake and Air Compressor Plant and Britain's 
Lucas Industries.  The $30-million joint venture will be located in 
the Langfang Industrial Complex in China's Hebei Province.  The 
plant will produce 300,000 caliper brakes beginning in 1995 and 
increase production to 600,000 units annually beginning in 1998. 
(Seoul CHOSON ILBO 9 May p 11) 

   Samsung To Export TDX to Russia - Samsung Electronics will export 
its new time division exchange (TDX) to Russia on a turnkey basis. 
Samsung recently signed a contract for the deal with the governor of 
Russia's Pskov region and the Russian telecommunications company 
GTS.  According to the contract, Samsung will supply its SDX-100 
(Samsung digital exchange) system with 20,000 phone lines to the 
city of Pskov, along with a power supply, testing equipment, and 
auxiliary facilities.  The SDX-l00 system can accommodate up to 
220,000 telephone lines, compared to 100,000 lines for the TDX-10 
system.  Samsung also signed an agreement to digitalize the 
communications network in the Russian province.  (Seoul THE KOREA 
TIMES 5 May 94 p 8) 

   Kia Motors, UK's Rover To Develop Car Engines - Kia Motors has 
signed a contract with the British firm Rover to jointly develop a 
gasoline engine.  The contract is part of Kia's plan to develop its 
own passenger car with a 2000-cc engine.  Under the terms of the 
contract, the two companies will develop 2000-cc and 2500-cc engines 
by 1997.  Kia plans to use a Japanese-made engine when it begins 
marketing its new car in 1996, but hopes to switch to using its 
jointly developed engine in the vehicle after 1997.  (Seoul MAEIL 
KYONGJE SINMUN 5 May 94 p 8) 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA - INDONESIA:  FEATURE: Impact of Industrial Growth 
on Rice Production -- SUMMARY:  Recent Jakarta newspapers reported 
that Indonesia's self-sufficiency in rice is threatened by 
industrial growth and could result in the country becoming a rice 
importer in the near future. 

   According to the 18 April SUARA PEMBARUAN and 19 April KOMPAS and 
MERDEKA, Indonesia's self-sufficiency in rice is threatened.  The 
decline in rice production is especially felt in Java--the center of 
industrial growth--according to Amrin Kahar, director-general for 
food crops in the Ministry of Agriculture.  Kahar said that Java 
with its fertile soil, good irrigation system, and adequate 
marketing and distribution systems, has long been considered the 
bread basket for Indonesia.  The island produces 60 percent of the 
nation's rice.  The papers see Indonesia as possibly returning to 
being the world's largest rice importer as it was before the l98Os. 

   According to SUARA PEMBARUAN, Soni Harsono, state minister for 
Agrarian Affairs and chairman of the National Land Agency, is also 
concerned about the problem.  The paper quoted him as saying that 
for the past few years, about 50,000 hectares of rice fields per 
year have become housing developments and industrial parks.  Based 
on two harvests per year and a yield of six tons per hectare, 
Indonesia's rice production has decreased by about 600,000 tons 
annually.  The minister pointed out that this means a $150-million 
annual loss without even taking into account the government's 
investment in developing irrigation facilities. 

   Industrialization has also created other "drawbacks" to rice 
production and to agriculture in general, according to MERDEKA.  In 
West Java, the sector is facing a decreasing supply of manpower.  An 
official of the Karawang agricultural service said that workers are 
scarce in the rice fields of Bekasi and Karawang (areas with newly- 
established large factories.)  It is difficult to compete with the 
higher wages offered by factories, he said.  The official also 
stated that industrialization has led to increased migration from 
rural areas other than Java. 

   An offshoot of industrial development that is also hurting rice 
production is a water shortage, according to SUARA PEMBARUAN. 
Faisal Kasryono, chairman of the Agriculture Research and 
Development Agency, said that 25,000 hectares of rice fields in Java 
have been lost because the water has been diverted to the factories. 

   To offset these losses, the government has tried to develop new 
rice fields outside Java, KOMPAS reported, but insufficient capital 
and poor infrastructure are "bottlenecks" that still need to be 
overcome.  From March 1993 to April 1994, Indonesia's goal was to 
develop 47,950 hectares of new fields.  However, as January 1994, 
only 7,012 hectares--about 14 percent of the goal--have been 
developed. 

   Pulp Joint Venture With Japan Announced -- Indonesia's Barito 
Pacific Timber Group and Japan's Marubeni Corporation and Nippon 
Paper Industries Co. have signed an agreement to establish a $1 
billion pulp factory in South Sumatra.  The factory, scheduled for 
completion in early 1997, is expected to have an annual production 
of 450,000 tons, all for export.  While final ownership is still 
being negotiated, it was determined that the Barito Group will have 
a 40-percent share in this venture.  (Jakarta BISNIS INDONESIA 9 Apr 
94 p 1) 

   Daihatsu, Other Foreign Auto Production Growth -- The Japanese 
automaker Daihatsu has increased vehicle production in Indonesia by 
74 percent to 24,000 vehicles compared with 1993's output of 13,800 
vehicles.  Major components for its vehicles, such as stamped parts 
and engines, are procured through "Astra-Daihatsu Motors," its 
Indonesian joint venture company with the Astra Group, one of 
Indonesia's largest conglomerates.  Daihatsu vehicles are assembled 
at its Jakarta plant by the Indonesian firm Gaya Motors.  Four types 
of Daihatsu vehicles are produced, including its "Charade" 
subcompact and a recreational vehicle.  For Daihatsu, plant 
operating rates are rising, it has ample production capacity, there 
is no need for additional plant and equipment investment, and demand 
for vehicles appears strong. 

   1993 sales in Indonesia totaled about 200,000 units, "more than 
90 percent of which were produced by Japanese automakers."  Among 
other foreign automakers, South Korea's Hyundai Motors, in 
association with an Indonesian conglomerate, will begin production 
of small passenger cars in February 1995 at a plant being completed 
outside Jakarta.  Hyundai's production during the first fiscal year 
of operation will be 3,000 units, increasing to a maximum of 10,000 
units by 1999. 

   For Daihatsu, its Indonesian operations are an important part of 
its Asian production together with its operations in China and 
Malaysia.  In China, Daihatsu plans to increase passenger car 
production to 115,000 units in 1994, up from 47,000 vehicles 
assembled in 1993.  In Malaysia, Daihatsu, as the Japanese partner 
in Malaysia's "second national car project," will begin production 
of a new mini car in July 1994. (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 25 Apr 
94 p 11) 

   State Bank Obtains $87-Million Loan -- The People's Bank of 
Indonesia (BRI) has obtained a $37-million loan from a syndicate of 
37 foreign banks to be used as working capital.  Included in the 
syndicate are the Arab Bank, the DKB Merchant Bank and KDB 
Internatonal of Singapore, the Overseas-Chinese Banking Corp., the 
Westdeutsche Landesbank Girozentrale, and the Yasua Trust and 
Banking Co.  The loan is for 25 months at an interest rate of 1 
percent above SIBOR (Singapore Inter Bank Offered Rate).  BRI 
reported a 1993 profit of $53 million, and its loans amounted to 
$8.5 billion.  (Jakarta BISNIS INDONESIA 20 Apr 94 p 1) 

   Contract For Digital Telephone System Signed -- P.T. Telkom's 
Director Setyanto P. Santoso and representatives of the SNH 
consortium recently signed a contract for the second phase of the 
Indonesia central digital telephone system.  The contract, worth $34 
million, entails the installation of 444,100 telephone lines in over 
91 locations and is expected to be completed by June 1996.  The 
consortium comprises P.T. Humpuss, Sumitomo Corporation (Japan), and 
P.T. NEC Nusantara Communications.  (Jakarta KOMPAS 28 Apr 94 p 2) 

   Pertamina Begins Gas Production in South Sumatra -- South 
Sumatra's branch of the state-owned oil corporation Pertamina 
recently started producing natural gas for commercial purposes at 
Lembak district.  The daily 60-million cubic feet production will be 
supplied to P.T. Pupuk Sriwijaya.  (Jakarta KOMPAS 22 Apr 94 p 2) 

   Hong Kong Bank Opens Branch in Semarang -- The Hong Kong and 
Shanghai Banking Corporation recently opened a branch in Semarang to 
expand its service network.  Peter Atkins, manager of the Hong Kong 
and Shanghai Banking Corporation in Indonesia, stated that the 
bank's assets in Indonesia are currently $500 million and its 1992- 
93 profits were $8.5 million.  (Jakarta KOMPAS 25 Apr 94 P 2) 

   Firms To Participate in New Power Projects -- State Electric 
Company (PLN) President Zuhal and Giri Suseno Hadiarjo, vice 
chairman of the Agency for Strategic Industries (BPIS), recently 
signed an agreement for its 10 state-owned strategic industries to 
assist PLN in improving its power generation technology.  The five- 
year agreement calls for the 10 companies to participate in the 
construction of power plants, technology procurement, and joint 
research.  (Jakarta THE JAKARTA POST 16 Apr 94 p 8) 

   Government Allocates $1 Billion for Oil Refinery Projects -- The 
government has allocated $1 billion for the state-owned oil company 
Pertamina in fiscal year 1994/95 for its three investment projects 
in Cilacap (Central Java) and Balikpapan (East Kalimantan). 
Pertamina's Exploitation Director G.J. Atihuta said $600 million 
will be used for the Cilacap refinery to increase its production 
capacity from 300,000 to 350,000 barrels a day and the remainder 
will be for upgrading and modifying the two Balikpapan refineries to 
increase production to 65,000 barrels a day.  (Jakarta THE INDONESIA 
TIMES 6 May 94 p 1) 

   MALAYSIA:  Petronas To Supply Petroleum Products to Zimbabwe -- 
The National Petroleum Corporation (Petronas) has established a 
toehold in southern Africa after winning an open tender for the 
supply of 300,000 metric tons of petroleum products worth about 
$59.6 million to Zimbabwe.  The agreement was signed in February. 
(Kuala Lumpur NEW STRAITS TIMES 28 Apr 94 p 2) 

   South Korea Emerges as Seventh Foreign Investor -- South Korea 
has emerged as the seventh largest foreign investor in Malaysia, 
with investments amounting to approximately $1.2 billion in more 
than 140 manufacturing projects.  These projects have created 25,000 
jobs in Malaysia.  (Kuala Lumpur UTUSAN MALAYSIA 12 Apr 94 p 7) 

   PHILIPPINES:  Singapore Firm To Build Port, Industrial Complex in 
Iloilo -- The Singapore Transstroy International Pte. Ltd. has 
signed a memorandum of understanding with the municipal government 
of Leganes, Iloilo, to undertake a $1 billion reclamation and port 
development project under the build-operate-transfer program.  The 
project entails the reclamation of 1,000 hectares along the coastal 
area of the town and the development of a commercial port and 
industrial complex.  (Manila BUSINESS WORLD 10 May 94 p 4) 

   Board of Investments Approves PVC Resin Venture -- The Board of 
Investments has approved the establishment of a $600-million 
polyvinyl chloride (PVC) resin manufacturing plant by a consortium 
comprising Mabuhay Vinyl Corp., Bank of the Philippines, Mitsubishi 
Corp., and Tosoh Corp. of Japan.  The plant, to be located in 
Bataan, will start operations in July 1996 with an expected annual 
capacity of 60,000 metric tons.  (Quezon City MALAYA 3 May 94 pp 9, 
10) 

   SINGAPORE:  American, Japanese Firms Open Disk Drive Facility -- 
Quantum Corporation, an American disk drive maker, and Japan's 
Matsushita-Kotobuki Electronics have set up a logistics center and a 
factory, respectively.  The facilities opened on 26 April. 
Singapore produced about 21 million disk drives with a factory value 
of $5.8 billion in 1993, accounting for nearly half of world 
production of hard disk drives.  Quantum's new logistics center will 
take finished disk drives from Kotobuki Electronics Industries 
Singapore and configure them according to the specifications of 
Quantum's customers before delivery.  (Singapore THE STRAITS TIMES 
27 Apr 94 p 36) 

   Government Plans To Lower Corporate Tax Rate -- Singapore plans 
to cut its corporate tax rate from 27 percent to 25 percent to 
encourage further investments and to bolster its standing as a 
commercial and high-tech industrial hub.  To offset this reduction 
in government revenues, Singaporeans have begun paying a new tax on 
most goods and services.  (Kuala Lumpur BERITA HARIAN 12 Apr 94 p 5) 

   THAILAND:  Cabinet Authorizes Additional Telephone Circuits -- 
The Cabinet recently authorized the Communications Authority of 
Thailand (CAT) to install 10,000 additional circuits for 
international telephone calls.  Deputy Transport and Communications 
Minister Phinit Charusombat said the new circuits, which will cost 
$256 million, will make up the CAT's fourth international 
transmission switching center.  (Bangkok BANGKOK POST 11 May 94 p 6) 

   PTT, Total Company To Establish Gas Venture in Vietnam -- The 
Petroleum Authority of Thailand (PTT) and the France-based Total 
Company plan to establish Vietnam LPG Company Ltd., a liquefied 
petroleum gas venture with Vietnam Gas.  PTT will hold a 32-percent 
equity, while Vietnam Gas will hold 36 percent, and Total Company 
the remaining 32 percent. The 20-year, $15.04-million venture has a 
registered capital of $5.25 million and is expected to generate a 
return of 39 percent.  (Bangkok Radio Thailand Network 0000 GMT 11 
May 94) 

   Joint Venture With PRC Firm in Asian Oil Projects -- PetroAsia--a 
joint-venture company between Thailand's Charoen Phokkhaphan (CP) 
Group, the Petroleum Authority of Thailand (PAT), and the PRC state 
oil firm Sinopec--plans to invest up to $3.2 billion over the next 
five years in Asian projects.  Ventures are planned in oil refining, 
storage, distribution, wholesaling, and retailing in Thailand, the 
PRC, Vietnam, Cambodia, Laos, Burma, the Philippines, and 
Bangladesh.  On 2 May, the three partners formalized an agreement to 
set up a PetroAsia subsidiary known as PetroAsia (Thailand) to 
operate retail oil businesses in Thailand.  CP and PAT will hold 35 
percent each in the joint venture, while Sindpec will hold the 
remaining 30 percent.  The Thai unit will be responsible for setting 
up a retail network to include the establishment of at least 300 
standard service stations and 200 small outlets over the next 10 
years.  Total investment is estimated at more than $280 million. 
(Bangkok ZHONG HUA RIBAO 5 May 94 p 10) 

   VIETNAM:  Japanese Ministry To Help Establish Postal Savings 
System -- The Vietnamese Government has requested the assistance of 
Japan's Ministry of Posts and Telecommunications (MPT) in 
establishing a postal savings system.  The government's goal is to 
raise Vietnam's low individual savings rate and help improve the 
efficient use of such savings.  Currently Vietnam's more than 1,000 
post offices only handle mail and money exchange remittances. 

   In January 1994 the MPT began cooperating with Vietnamese 
personnel studying Japan's governmental system.  Now plans are to 
send MPT officials to Vietnam to provide advice concerning 
legislation for a new postal savings system, including advice on its 
organizational structure and the training of personnel.  The MPT has 
provided similar assistance to South Korea a d China in establishing 
their postal savings systems. (Tokyo NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN 26 Apr 94 
p 1) 

   Resolution Highlights City's Growth, Development Objectives -- At 
its midterm party conference held on 28-31 March, the Ho Chi Minh 
City party organization endorsed a resolution containing the 
following major economic objectives: 

   1.  Step up rationally structured industrialization and 
modernization. 

   Quickly invest to upgrade equipment and apply modern technology; 
emphasize production of consumer goods; gradually develop the 
machine tool and asssembly sector; improve agricultural programs; 
and gradually modernize infrastructure.  The conference set economic 
growth targets at 14 percent per year, with the total investment 
capital at 30 percent of GDP. 

   2.  Increase external economic operations. 

   Quickly build an international business center in Ho Chi Minh 
City; and move on to organize commercial representation abroad; and 
quickly attract foreign investment keyed to development, i.e. giving 
priority to infrastructure, farm produce processing, and consumer 
goods production along with development of high-technology 
industries. 

   3.  Create additional advantageous conditions for economic 
sectors to develop along socialist lines. 

   Continue research strengthening the cooperative economy; 
establish policies to support individual enterprises and small 
owners; and eliminate excessive bureaucracy regarding the approval 
and registration of commercial endeavors. 

   4.  Emphasize the role of science and industrial technology. 

   Make priority studies of the application of new industries, so 
that 50 percent of the production facilities will have undergone 
equipment renovation by the end of 1995.  (Ho Chi Minh City THOI BAO 
KINH TE SAIGON 7 April 94 p 7) 

   Malaysian Company Upgrades Rice Mill for Exports -- The Tien 
Giang Grain Processing Company and the Malaysian firm Renong have 
formed a joint venture to process rice for export.  They began by 
restoring and upgrading the Tam Long rice mill in Cai Lay District. 
The mill's present capacity is 10,000 metric tons per year with a 
capacity of 30,000 metric tons expected by 1995.  Total investment 
capital amounts to $3.36 million, equally shared by both partners. 
(Ho Chi Minh City THOI BAO KINH TE SAIGON 30 Mar 94 p 6) 

   French Company to Produce Beer, Soft Drinks -- The French company 
B.G.I. and the Danang Brewery have formed a joint venture to produce 
beer and soft drinks.  Total investment capital is  $23.8 million, 
of which the French partner will contribute 70 percent. Construction 
has begun on the plant in in Quang Nam - Da Nang Province.  The 
plant's capacity will be 25 million liters per year with 80 percent 
beer and 20 percent soft drinks.  (Ho Chi Minh City THOI BAO KINH TE 
SAIGON 13 April 94 p 5) 

   State Bank to Invest $73 Million for Automation -- The Vietnam 
State Bank plans to invest some $73 million for automation and 
computerization of the SRV banking system.  The bank sees automation 
as a way to improve service which will attract more deposits from 
the public.  The automation process may take six years.  The World 
Bank will provide technical assistance.  Part of the automation cost 
will be borne by the Vietnam State Bank, and part by IMF and ADB 
loans.  (Hanoi HANOI MOI 21 April 94 p 2) 

   Rice Export Earnings Lower, Processing Methods Poor -- Vietnam's 
lack of modern rice processing methods is depressing profits on its 
annual exports of two million metric tons.  In January, Thai rice 
with five percent broken grains sold at $380-$390 per metric ton, 
but the Ministry of Trade set the export price for Vietnamese rice 
of the same grade at only $255 per ton in February.  With a 
difference of $125-$134 per ton, Vietnam "loses" approximately $200 
million per year.  Specialists say Vietnamese rice has a high 
moisture content when processed locally, which affects the taste. 
It also has a higher percentage of husks and impurities.  (Ho Chi 
Minh City THOI BAO KINH TE SAIGON 30 Mar 1994 p 4) 

   French, Norwegians in Harbor Construction Project -- Construction 
of the Phu My harbor in Chau Thanh District, Ba Ria-Vung Tau 
Province is expected to be finished in late 1995.  The new harbor 
will be built with a total investment capital of $9 million, of 
which the Vietnamese side is contributing 40 percent and the foreign 
partners-- France's Conco and Sogema Companies and Norway's Norsk 
Hydro Company--are contributing 60 percent.  In the first phase, the 
harbor will be able to handle ships of up to 40,000 tons.  (Hanoi 
VNA 1407 GMT 30 Apr 94) 

   British Petroleum in Lubricant Plant Joint Venture -- British 
Petroleum will open a $28 million lubricant plant in Nha Be 
District, Ho Chi Minh City in a joint venture with the Vietnamese 
oil export company Petrolimex.  It is expected to produce 50,000 
tons of lubricant per year.  (Hanoi Voice of Vietnam 1000 GMT 28 Apr 
94) 

   Rubber Industry Seeks Foreign Partners -- In an effort to 
increase its rubber production, the Vietnam Rubber Corporation has 
negotiated with Indian and Taiwanese companies to conduct 
feasibility studies to set up joint ventures in rubber plantations 
and processing.  Vietnam plans to set aside an additional 5,000 
hectares for rubber plantations.  (Hanoi VNA 1354 GMT 10 May 94) 
EAG/18May94/ECONF/TECHTF/EAST ASIA GROUP/PF 19/1645z May 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47630 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000027894001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   20 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOUO -- DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS, THE 
FOLLOWING ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS 
FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY--WEST EUROPE 
<H3> <TI>      FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY--FB PSE 94-019--WEST EUROPE </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY--FB PSE 94-019--WEST EUROPE </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
Europe      Economic Review:  WESTERN EUROPE Vol. III, No. 19, 19 May 
1994 

   Notice To Readers:  FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY is a series published by 
FBIS Europe/Lat in America Group featuring brief summaries of 
foreign media reports on topical issues, compiled from the most 
recent sources available to FBIS. 

   Europe Economic Review (EER) is a subseries of FOREIGN MEDIA 
SURVEY published by the West and East European Divisions of 
Europe/Lat in America Group with contributions from FBIS overseas 
bureaus.  The EER is intended to supplement coverage of European 
economic issues by the FBIS Daily Report for West and East Europe, 
and other FBIS publications.  Foreign news, feature, and editorial 
reports selected for summary in this publication normally do not 
appear in other FBIS publications. 

   The EER is published in two editions, one for West Europe (also 
including media coverage of Canada and Turkey), and the other for 
East Europe.  Drawing primarily from domestic media sources of these 
countries but also using other foreign media where appropriate, the 
EER focuses on national and regional economic issues, such as 
economic competitiveness, regional economic integration, economic 
reforms and other changes in economic policies, and foreign trade 
and investment. 

   FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY is a U.S. Government publication.  Its 
contents in no way represent the policies, views, or attitudes of 
the U.S. Government.  All comment or analysis contained herein is 
attributable to the cited media source, unless otherwise indicated. 

TABLE OF CONTENTS 

   FINLAND 

   EU Entry Seen Forcing Change in Co-op Firms 

   FRANCE 

   Editorial on U.S. Markets, Administration; Relations With Taiwan 
Continue To Sour Seguin's Referendum Proposal Scored; Further 
Reactions to Employment Referendum; UAP Privatization Called 
Political Necessity; German, French Opinion on Unions Compared; 
Farm Land Loses Value 
   GERMANY 

   Czech Skoda Firm Buys Major Erfurt Company; East's Agriculture 
Rebound Outstrips Industry's; Trust Agency Boasts MBO/MBI 
Privatization Success 

   ITALY 

   Economic Concerns of New Government; Alitalia Losses Prompt 
Reorganization Revision 

   PORTUGAL 

   Possibility of EMU Participation 

   TURKEY 

   Ciller's Economic Stability Package Is Unveiled; Party Leaders, 
Organizations on Economic Package; Former Central Bank Governor 
Proposes Solutions; KOI Director Comments on Privatization; 
Eximbank Executive Interviewed on BSEC Credits; 

   ECONOMIC BRIEFS 

   Greece, Portugal 

   FINLAND 

   EU ENTRY SEEN FORCING CHANGE IN CO-OP FIRMS--If Finnish voters 
opt for EU membership in the fall referendum, the country's nearly 
century-old agricultural cooperative movement will have to undergo a 
structural and operational change to survive, according to the 
research director of the Swedish-Speakers' Cooperative Association 
of Finland, Mikael Ingberg.  Speaking at the association's meeting 
on 19 April, Ingberg warned that adapting to enter the EU would 
place severe strain on an institution which has played a major role 
in assuring relative self-reliance and prosperity in rural areas 
since before Finnish independence. 

   The cooperative movement, having weathered many problems over the 
past two decades, including the recent recession, must now face the 
challenge of a projected 1 January 1995 entry into the EU and must 
brace itself to end protective tariffs and to steadily reduce 
agricultural subsidies.  Ingberg argues that cooperatives are going 
to have to implement many of the changes made by their domestic 
competitors, the larger "private" food conglomerates.  Plants will 
need to increase the amount of processing value in their products to 
meet the import challenge, modernize their operations, and seek ties 
with both domestic and foreign companies which would permit 
specialization and allow the movement to continue it traditional 
place in helping to maintain viable small family farms and slowing 
rural depopulation.  This, however, will require new sources of 
financing, since traditional sources--membership shares and domestic 
bank loans--will not be adequate.  The size of investments needed 
will mean the movement is going to have to seek immediate infusions 
of venture capital, perhaps even from abroad since there are few 
Finnish venture capitalists.  This may be a major hurdle, according 
to Ingberg.  The cooperative movement will also need to change its 
marketing practices, never its strong suit, and become more 
demanding and market oriented, he concludes. (Roger B. x36508) 
(Helsinki HUFVUDSTADSBLADET in Swedish 20 Apr 94 p 14) 

   FRANCE 

   EDITORIAL ON U.S. MARKETS, ADMINISTRATION--Assistant director of 
editing Didier Pourquery, writing in the Paris business daily LA 
TRIBUNE DESFOSSES, contends that at the moment the world's financial 
markets are being controlled by an "ambiguous" relationship among 
the Clinton administration, the Federal Reserve, and Wall Street. 
While the U.S. Government congratulates itself on strong growth and 
lower unemployment, Pourquery sees Wall Street reacting to projected 
inflationary risk and the Federal Reserve acting with "legendary 
prudence" to forestall such a possibility.  The market--as well as 
Europe, which fears that higher U.S. rates will derail a hesitant 
recovery--is waiting once again for the Federal Reserve to make a 
gesture to fight against inflation.  However, the gesture is late in 
coming and in the meantime the market's financial operators are 
distrustful of the Clinton administration's actions which they judge 
are often hesitant, sometime ill considered, and a bit 
"inexperienced," according to Pourquery.  He concludes that the 
large majority of these operators, are dyed-in-the-wool liberals- 
-hardly "Clintonites"--who do not have confidence in this 
administration. (Dian I. x36286)  (Paris LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES in 
French 9 May 94 p 32) 

   RELATIONS WITH TAIWAN CONTINUE TO SOUR--Alexandra Schwartzbrod 
and Michel de Grandi, writing in the Paris financial daily LES 
ECHOS, cite a Taiwanese French-language publication, LES ECHOS OF 
THE REPUBLIC OF CHINA, as having reported that the French 
electronics company Thomson may have been involved in the December 
assassination of a Taiwanese citizen, a Captain Yin Chin-feng, who 
was implicated in the purchase of foreign arms for the Taiwanese 
Government.  The authors imply that this report, in what it calls "a 
very official" publication, may have been an attempt by the 
Taiwanese Government to embarrass the French and to indicate its 
displeasure with France's renewed diplomacy with China which led to 
French promises not to sell arms to Taiwan.  They suggest that the 
Taiwanese report contributed to Thomson losing the contract to arm 
the empty-shell frigates sold to Taiwan in 1991. 

   The Taiwanese report claimed that Yin's assassination was "an 
affair of bribes and secret military sales."  It argued that Thomson 
may have been involved since the principal suspect in the case was a 
Taiwanese citizen named Wang Chuan-Pu who was reportedly the local 
agent for several foreign companies, one of which was Thomson. 
"Captain Yin was assassinated after having threatened to reveal the 
misdeeds that he had discovered in the attribution of arms sales 
contracts," detailed the report.  However, the authors note the 
report "temporized," stating that "Wang was not the legal agent of 
Thomson but simply an intermediary and that nothing allowed one to 
think at that time that the French company had been implicated in 
the death of Captain Yin." 

   The publication of the Taiwanese report, which was destined for 
French readers, exacerbated French-Taiwanese relations even further, 
since it came only a few days after Prime Minister Edouard 
Balladur's trip to China, according to the authors.  Furthermore, 
they add that it was published at the same time the U.S. Congress 
authorized President Bill Clinton to increase arms sales to Taiwan. 
(Dian I. x68286)  (Paris LES ECHOS in French 5 May 94 p 7) 

   SEGUIN'S REFERENDUM PROPOSAL SCORED--Delphine Girard reports in 
the Paris financial daily LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES that all French labor 
unions, as well as some political leaders, have been quick to oppose 
National Assembly President Philippe Seguin's proposal to hold a 
referendum on unemployment.  According to Seguin, the referendum 
would take place after the presidential elections next year and is 
necessary to unblock the social controversy over how best to solve 
France's high unemployment rate, much of which is not due to the 
recession but is blamed on structural rigidities in the French labor 
market. 

   Labor unions unanimously criticized Seguin's plan.  Secretary 
General of the French Democratic Confederation of Workers (CFDT) 
Nicole Notat claimed the plan was "too much" and that the question 
of employment was "too serious to be reduced to looking for a magic 
potion."  Worker's Force President Marc Blondel complained, "The use 
of a referendum to go over the heads of the unions is a way to put 
us at odds with our representatives. ...  It is no longer possible 
to allow double talk:  to call for strong unions and then to 
destabilize them."  The CFTC labor union noted that according to a 
BVA poll, 77 percent of the French think that unions are "an 
indispensable intermediary." 

   Some political leaders also spoke against the referendum.  Vice 
president of the Assembly's Union for French Democracy (UDF) group, 
Jacques Barrot warned that such a referendum would "risk a false and 
thus dangerous social debate that confines itself to announcing 
magic formulas."  Former Socialist Labor Minister Martine Aubry 
claimed, "When I heard this proposition, I thought it was a joke." 
Furthermore Aubry noted, the search for solutions for unemployment 
"is the responsibility of politicians.  If they do not think so, 
they should change occupations."  (Dian I. x36286)  (Paris LA 
TRIBUNE DESFOSSES in French 4 May 94 P 4) 

   FURTHER REACTIONS TO EMPLOYMENT REFERENDUM--In an interview with 
former President and Union for French Democracy (UDF) leader Valery 
Giscard d'Estaing by Patrick Jarreau appearing in the Paris daily LE 
MONDE, Giscard argued that a solution to the unemployment problem is 
"too urgent" to be left to a referendum.  New measures are needed to 
respond to the French people's concerns, Giscard d'Estaing 
continued, noting that he will propose a number of them after the 
June European Parliament elections, "since one debate should not 
obscure the other."  However, he concluded that Seguin's 
contribution is "worthwhile" because it raises people's 
consciousness on the need for an overall new approach to 
unemployment. 

   According to Jean-Claude Vajou writing in the 3 May Paris daily 
LIBERATION, the Seguin-proposed referendum "appeals to those in the 
public who are against particular interests. .. by going over 
constituted bodies." Additionally, if a return to "direct democracy" 
through use of a referendum creates favorable conditions to oppose 
the "technostructure," it also may be a vote for or against the 
current government and raise questions of its continuing validity. 

   In an interview with UDF parliamentary leader Charles Millon by 
Eric Zemmour for the Paris daily LE QUOTIDIEN, Millon stated that he 
opposed a referendum, arguing that unless a simple question such as 
are you for or against unemployment" were asked--to which the 
answer is obvious--it is difficult to formulate a referendum on a 
subject as complex as unemployment.  In addition, Millon noted that 
a referendum should not be applied to other than purely 
institutional issues, because extending it to societal problems 
would mean "increased undervaluation of representative democracy" at 
a time when France is already suffering from a weakening of such 
democracy.  The natural result of a referendum, Millon concluded, is 
a  democracy of opinion" or "democracy of the moment" aimed at any 
type of reform.  (Rosa M. x36287)  (Paris LIBERATION in French 2 May 
94 p 9) (Paris LE MONDE in French 11 May 94 p 10)  (Paris LE 
QUOTIDIEN in French 3 May 94 p 6) 

   UAP PRIVATIZATION CALLED POLITICAL NECESSITY--According to Eric 
Leser, writing in the Paris daily LE MONDE, Union of Paris Insurance 
companies' (UAP's) privatization had to occur, "at any cost," for 
political rather than economic reasons.  Although UAP was offered 
for sale at a time when the stock market was in a downturn and 
investor interest was weak--attracting only 1.9 million shareholders 
rather than the 2 to 3 million of previous privatizations--Leser 
contends that it was important to Prime Minister Edouard Balladur to 
counter the failures of his 1986-87 privatization attempts.  For him 
to delay the UAP privatization to wait for better market conditions 
would have also aroused doubts about his determination to pursue the 
program, permanently weakening the market for future privatizations. 
Additionally, it would have jeopardized the privatization of the 
second-ranked General Insurance Companies of France (AGF). 

   Leser also writes that by offering a minimum price to 
shareholders, the Ministry of Finance also limited the risk of 
market prices undercutting the public offering price, as happened in 
previous privatizations.  Institutional investors, and especially 
U.S. investors who play a major role on the Paris stock exchange, 
have recently complained of having purchased shares at higher prices 
than private investors.  This time around, Leser remarked, "They are 
almost ensured in a couple of months, like small investors, of 
making a comfortable return on their investment.  (Rosa M. x36287) 
(Paris LE MONDE in French 7 May 94 p 18) 

   GERMAN, FRENCH OPINION ON UNIONS COMPARED--A telephone poll on 
the attitudes toward labor unions and their purpose was 
simultaneously conducted by the BVA organization in France and the 
Arte company in Germany among 943 individuals in France on 25 and 26 
February and among 806 individuals in Germany from 28 February to 2 
March.   An article in LE NOUVEL OBSERVATEUR characterized the 
results as surprising.  While the article claimed most of the French 
were thought to be "individualistic and indifferent to militantism," 
a majority answered that labor unions are an "indispensable 
intermediary" between management and labor and that unions are the 
best means to defend workers' rights but only if they follow the 
German practice where unions manage companies in conjunction with 
owners.  Respondents were asked the following questions: 

   "These opinions are sometimes heard about labor unions.  For each 
of them, tell me if you fully agree, rather agree, rather disagree 
or fully disagree." 


                            Total: fully or    Total: fully or 
                            rather agree       rather disagree 

                                France  Germany    France  Germany 

Labor unions are an indispensable 
intermediary between workers and 
management.                         77      79         22      15 

To be unionized is the best way 
to defend one's rights and 
work conditions.                    66      69         32      26 

Without labor unions, there is no 
real solidarity in the work place.  55      63         43      32 

Labor unions must participate more 
in management.                      70      55         29      37 

Labor unions are too politicized.   83      54         15      33 

Today, labor unions are no longer 
adapted to the world of labor.      71      28         27      66 

To be unionized is considered bad 
form.                               50      27         47      62 


   "At this time, do you think that labor unions have too much 
power, not enough power, or just enough?" 


                      France   Germany 

Too much                  17        21 

Not enough                40        40 

Just enough               40        31 

No answer                  3         8 



   "In your opinion, what should be the priority for labor unions?" 


                            France  Germany 

Defend employment               57       61 

Improve working conditions      19       18 

Defend gains                    14       13 

Increase salaries                8        5 

No answer                        2        3 



   "For each of the following organizations, tell me if you trust 
them, rather trust them, or not trust them at all to fight against 
unemployment?" 


                              Total:  fully or   Total:  rather or 
                              rather trust         fully distrust 

                            France  Germany     France  Germany 

Associations                    67       37         31       46 

Managers                        50       43         48       51 

Government                      42       37         57       60 

Trade unions                    40       59         58       37 

Political parties               20       38         78       57 

(Rosa M. x36287) 

(Paris LE NOUVEL OBSERVATEUR in French 28 Apr-4 May 94 pp 16-17) 



   FARM LAND LOSES VALUE--According to an article in LE FIGARO, the 
reform of the EU's Common Agriculture Policy (CAP) did not have the 
intended beneficial impact on the cost of farmland.  According to 
the annual report of the National Federation of Safer, the average 
cost per hectare in 1993 dropped below 20,000 francs (Fr), reaching 
Fr19,970 compared to Fr20,500 in 1992, a 3-percent drop in constant 
1956 francs.  Actually, two facts should have favored a hike in 
prices.  For one, farm revenue per hectare was maintained in 1993 
and, according to forecasts, will remain stable at least until 1996. 
Secondly, to compensate for the CAP-mandated "land freeze," farmers 
are trying to increase the size of their farms.  Despite this, the 
price of land (in current francs) continued to fall last year. 
Agriculture specialists explained the drop by noting the farmers' 
lack of confidence in their future and in the continuation of the 
level of direct aid by the reform of the CAP.  (Dian i. x36286) 
(Paris LE FIGARO Le Fig-Eco supplement in French 28 Apr 94 p II) 

   GERMANY 

   CZECH SKODA FIRM BUYS MAJOR ERFURT COMPANY--The most significant 
Czech direct investment in Germany has been finalized after only 
three months' of  privatization negotiations.  Skoda, a major 
manufacturer of heavy equipment and machine tools, has bought 
Umformtechnik Erfurt (UTE), a 1,600 employee metalworking firm with 
a 1993 sales volume of 202 million German marks (DM).  Skoda agreed 
to save 1,000 jobs at UTE, to invest DM150 million, and to share 
ownership with the Trust Agency and the government-owned Thueringer 
Industriebeteiligungs company.  The sales agreement permits 
ownership by additional partners, and Russian companies are said to 
be interested.  Skoda's international relations manager, Jiri 
Kotina, claims that the company intends to expand its business with 
the automobile industry and that UTE, which supplies die presses to 
Audi, Mercedes-Benz, VW, and SEAT, is part of that strategy. 
Twenty-one percent of Skoda is held by the Czech Government and the 
balance by banks, investment funds and individuals and the firm 
functions as a holding company for 36 largely independent companies. 
(Charles W. x36473)  (Berlin DIE WELT in German 2 May 94 p 12) 

   EAST'S AGRICULTURE REBOUND OUTSTRIPS INDUSTRY' S--In an article 
in the daily FRANKFURTER ALLGEMEINE, Helmut Born, secretary general 
of the German Farmers' Association, characterizes the profits of 
privatized farms in eastern Germany as "respectable," noting that 
agriculture in the new laender had come out of the trough more 
rapidly than industry.  He concedes that this was true only for crop 
farming and that livestock farming has not yet recovered from its 
"horrible bloodletting."  The DM15.8 billion expended since 1990 to 
support and expand eastern German farming have led to unprecedented 
structural change and a reduction in the labor force from 850,000 to 
180,000.  For the farmers remaining in business, efforts are 
starting to pay off, partly due to the size of the farms in the 
east, which historically have been larger than those in the west. 

   Now, however, a controversy is brewing between eastern and 
western Germany over the subsidies paid farmers.  Eastern farms 
still have wide-reaching exemptions from taxes and fees and 
simplified rules for calculating valuation.  Personal income per 
worker is higher for farmers in the east than for those in the west, 
the only exception being those belonging to cooperatives deriving 
from the GDR-era agricultural co-ops.  With the upcoming expiration 
of the concessions, the farmers' association sees an opportunity to 
restructure agricultural supports.  It is calling for a kind of mid- 
sized agricultural unit program extensively based on cheap credit 
that can be allotted to both eastern and western German businessmen 
according to uniform criteria. (Charles W. x36473)  (Frankfurt/Main 
FRANKFURTER ALLGEMEINE in German 10 May 94 p 18) 

   TRUST AGENCY BOASTS MBO/MBI PRIVATIZATION SUCCESS--According to 
Trust Agency board member Klaus-Peter Wild, privatization by means 
of Management Buy Out (MBO) or Management Buy In (MBI)--the 
procedure by which some 20 percent of the 14,000 agency's companies 
were sold--has been a success.  This counters rumors and speculation 
that MBO/MBI companies were facing a gloomy future due to frequently 
inadequate initial capital and short-term loan repayment 
obligations.  These factors had not offset the advantage of selling 
to managers experienced in the respective firms and Wild said that 
the number of "serious problem cases" amounted to only 10 percent of 
the MBO/MBI sales, with a mere 2 percent involving bankruptcy or 
factory closings, although significant longer term problems were to 
be expected in about 25 percent of the companies.  It was a matter 
of Trust Agency pride that MBO/MBI privatizations had achieved 115 
percent of the guaranteed employment figures and that the value of 
investments reached 139 percent of the guaranteed figure.  Wild 
noted that the Trust Agency continued to consult with company 
managements on current and ongoing operational problems, even if the 
firms had passed completely out of Agency control. (Charles W. 
x36473)  (Duesseldorf HANDELSBLATT in German 6-7 May 94 p 21) 

   ITALY 

   ECONOMIC CONCERNS OF NEW GOVERNMENT--According to an article in 
the Milan daily CORRIERE DELLA SERA, the new government will focus 
on solving Italy's unemployment and other economic problems.  The 
article lists the main economic priorities and the government's 
plans on how to tackle them: 

   Unemployment:  Investments (which have been blocked during the 
"Clean Hands" investigation into public corruption) will be 
unblocked to create new employment opportunities.  Laws will be 
introduced that will favor shorter work hours and part-time 
employment; apprenticeship programs will be modified to lower 
employers' costs; hiring practices will be liberalized, allowing 
companies with fewer than 15 employees to hire directly rather than 
from employment pools or agencies; the article of the 1994 Budget 
Law which established new criteria for awarding public contracts 
will be suspended. 

   Tax Reform:  Tax reform will be based on certain fundamental 
principles:  The first 10 million lire of annual income will be 
totally tax exempt, personal income tax rates will be drastically 
reduced to favor middle- to low-income individuals, the tax payment 
system will be simplified, and personal income tax payments will be 
reduced from quarterly to semiannually. 

   Privatizations:  The new government will proceed with the rapid 
privatization of the National Insurance Institute (INA) and the 
National Electric Power Board (ENEL), fine-tuning the procedures for 
the concession of electric service and regulating ENEL's rates. 

   Pensions:  The law which allowed the creation of private pension 
funds will be revised to eliminate the tax burdens which have kept 
these funds from actually being established.  However, the 
incentives to acquire private pensions do not exempt individuals 
from contributing to the public pension system.  Only lower-income 
individuals will be guaranteed adequate living standards when they 
retire by tying pension payments to salary scales.  Higher-income 
individuals will be compensated from available national funds only 
after lower-income individuals have been guaranteed adequate 
compensation. 

   Health:  Health benefit payments will be made directly to 
patients; a minimum level of assistance will be established, to be 
paid through taxation, which will be the same throughout the 
country.  The service will be paid for directly by the patients with 
both private and public funds which will be disbursed to them by 
private insurance companies.  Competition in the public health 
system will be stimulated by passing regional laws that allow 
hospitals to be run like private companies. 

   Schools:  A new method of financing schools will be established 
which will be equally valid for public and private institutions. 

   Family:  A new legislation that will favor families with children 
has already been drawn up, which will provide assistance in the form 
of "house coupons" for lower-income couples, extended mortgages for 
first-time home buyers, and a new system of tax deduction for lower- 
income families.  To encourage the elderly to remain with their 
families, families who assist the elderly without burdening the 
state budget will be rewarded. 

   --Immigrants:  Immigrants will be given the same access to 
employment as citizens; they will be provided with adequate housing, 
Italian language instruction, and employment assistance. (Anilla B. 
x36283)  (Milan CORRIERE DELLA SERA 8 May 94 p 2) 

   ALITALIA LOSSES PROMPT REORGANIZATION REVISION--The unexpected 
extent of Alitalia's losses in 1993 will require the company to 
revise its reorganization plan, according to an article in IL 
MESSAGGERO.  Although it was expected that Alitalia would record 
substantial losses in 1993, the 345.6 billion lire actually lost was 
a surprise even to its president, Renato Riverso, and its CEO, 
Roberto Schisano.  The loss amounted to 130 billion lire more than 
in 1992 and losses in the first quarter of 1994 already amount to 
190 billion lire.  Since the losses for 1993 amounted to more than 
one third of the company's capital, by law the board is obligated to 
call a meeting of the shareholders, which it has arranged for June. 
If by that time Alitalia has not reduced its losses to less than one 
third of its capital, the shareholders will have to authorize the 
company to restructure its capital. 

   Reducing the losses, however, will not be an easy task and will 
require "great sacrifices," beginning with a complete revision of 
the company's reorganization which had been approved just six months 
ago.  Alitalia's reorganization will be revised to include the 
following changes, which Schisano said should lead to increased 
profits within the short to medium term and will allow Alitalia to 
successfully compete on the international market: 

   * Flight frequency and regional business, especially in the north 
at Milan's airports, will be increased.  Romano Prodi, president of 
the Institute for the Reconstruction of Industry (IRI), Alitalia's 
main shareholder, said that because of the delay in increasing 
activities in Milan, Alitalia is losing 1 trillion lire yearly in 
business to Munich, Frankfurt, and Zurich airports. 

   * Alitalia's fleet will be examined, possibly replacing the Jumbo 
B-747's with the more economical and flexible "twin-engine" jets. 

   * Alitalia's assets will be reviewed.  Alitalia will examine its 
sale of the Rome airports, for which there are already potential 
buyers. 

   * General expenses will be cut and will include the probable 
dismissal of 2,000 employees through early retirements, incentives 
to resign, and "solidarity contracts." 

   * Regulations for hiring aircraft crews will be reexamined, 
leading to expected increased productivity from pilots and other 
members of the crew, and may involve a cut in the number of pilots. 
(Anilla B. x36283)  (Rome IL MESSAGGERO in Italian 10 May 94 p 14) 

   PORTUGAL 

   POSSIBILITY OF EMU PARTICIPATION--According to Joao Cesar das 
Neves writing in DIARIO DE NOTICIAS, Portugal can in the long term 
achieve the five core criteria the Maastricht Treaty requires to 
become part of the EU's Economic and Monetary Union (EMU).  One way 
of determining this, das Neves contends, is to examine whether in 
the past Portugal showed financial stability in accordance with 
these criteria.  Using available statistics, das Neves claims the 
following would be the picture of Portugal's economy based on 
historical performance: 

   * Debt: Public debt below 60 percent of GDP.  On average, 
Portugal's public debt during the 140 years between 1851 and 1992 
was 54 percent of GDP, even if in 1993 it rose to 65.8 percent of 
GDP, higher than the Maastricht requirement. 

   * Deficit: Budget deficit below 3 percent of GDP.  The average 
government budget deficit in the same 1851-1992 period was 2.2 
percent of GDP, again within permissible limits.  It did rise to 
8.25 percent in 1993. 

   * Inflation: Differential between Portugal's inflation rate and 
the average EU inflation rate less than 1.5 percent.  During the 
period 1870-1992, the long-term rate of inflation in Portugal was 
4.6 percent.  As the average inflation rate in EU countries during 
the same period was around 4.4 percent, the 0.2 percent differential 
meets EMU requirements.  In 1993, the differential was about 3.1 
percent, above the allowable limit. 

   * Interest Rates: Differential between Portugal's long-term 
interest rates and average EU interest rates less than 2 percent. 
The average long-term EU interest rate during 1961-92 was about 9.3 
percent.  While it is difficult to gauge long-term interest rates in 
Portugal, as a result of using the Bank of Portugal's discount rate 
as an indicator it appears that the average rate for the same period 
was about 9.8 percent. 

   * Exchange Rates: An exchange rate within the European Monetary 
System's (EMS's) original narrow band.  This is the most difficult 
criterion to gauge, since Portugal does not have a long experience 
in EMS participation.  However, it should be noted that Portugal did 
not experience difficulties in other systems of fixed exchange rates 
such as Bretton Woods, and that the Portuguese average annual 
devaluation rate in relation to the British pound--the currency used 
as a reference during most of the last 100 years--was 1.3 percent; 
by subtracting the last 20 years from that period, this rate becomes 
0.14 percent, which shows significant stability. 

   These historical trends indicate, according to das Neves, that 
Portugal is much stronger and more stable than recent events may 
make it seem.  While it may not be easy to become part of EMU, it 
"will not be difficult to live in it," he continued, in contrast 
with other countries that may presently appear more stable than 
Portugal.  (Rosa M. x36287)  (Lisbon DIARIO DE NOTICIAS 2 May 94 p 
4) 

   TURKEY 

   CILLER'S ECONOMIC STABILITY PACKAGE IS UNVEILED--Below are the 
provisions of Prime Minister Tansu Ciller's new economic package 
reported by Zulfikar Dogan in the Istanbul daily MILLIYET: 

   * There will be no freeze on white-collar salaries.  White-collar 
workers will have a 15-percent pay raise in July, followed by a 12- 
percent raise in October. 
   * There will be no intervention in foreign exchange rates. 

   * There will be no currency devaluation. 

   * The General Directorate of the Office of State Equipment (DMO) 
and the Turkish Agricultural Equipment Board will be eliminated by 
the end of the year. 

   * State-owned housing will be sold through bids.  The occupants 
of the homes will have a preference in the bidding system. 

   * Taxpayers will pay an additional one-time only 10-percent 
surtax on 1993 income and will have two years to pay. 

   * Additional taxes on second homes and luxury cars will be 
levied. 

   * The price of sugar will be increased 50 percent, gasoline 70 
percent, and state monopolies, such as cigarettes and alcohol, 90 
percent.  All of the governors' offices will receive instructions 
from the office of the Council of Ministers, advising them to 
determine stocks, including sugar and fuel oil, and not to be 
lenient on hoarders. 

   * The budget deficit will be reduced 100 trillion lira. 

   * The growth rate will be reduced to 2.5 percent. 

   * The government will increase its revenues by 300 trillion lira 
through the economic stability package. (Ender C. x36285)  (Istanbul 
MILLIYET in Turkish 5 Apr 94 p 1) 

   PARTY LEADERS, ORGANIZATIONS ON ECONOMIC PACKAGE--The following 
comments found in articles published in Istanbul's daily MILLIYET 
offered insights on how party leaders and members of various 
prominent organizations have reacted to Prime Minister Tansu 
Ciller's new economic program: 

   * Prosperity Party Chairman Necmettin Erbakan: Cited as 
characterizing Ciller's January 24 decisions on the economy as a 
betrayal, Erbakan claimed, Ciller was "...giving the country to 
(Henry) Kissinger's nephew and (former British Prime Minister 
Margaret) Thatcher's son.  She has given a promise to all of them 
and she is busying herself trying to keep her promise." 

   * Republican Populist Party Chairman Deniz Baykal:  Reported to 
be planning a trip to Karabuk to support the workers of the Karabuk 
Iron-Steel factory, which the economic program has proposed closing. 

   * Motherland Party Group Deputy Chairman Hasan Korkmazcan: Stated 
that his party was not going to support the economic stability 
package, declaring that Ciller was a "political fraud." 

   * Public Sector Workers Trade Unions: Members are cited as saying 
they were going to hold demonstrations on 11 April in Ankara Sakarya 
street to protest the stability package. 

   * The Ankara Democracy Platform: This group--composed of the 
Turkish-Workers (Turk-Is), the Confederation of Revolutionary 
Workers Union (DISK), Public Sector Workers Union, and various 
associations and chambers related to the Turkish Union of Chambers 
of Architects and Engineers (TMM0B) and the Turkish Physicians Union 
(TTB)--is cited as criticizing the stability package. 

   * The Istanbul branch of the Chambers of Construction Engineers: 
Members have stated, "Society will surely not take this bitter 
medicine without resistance."(Ender C. x36285)  (Istanbul MILLIYET 
in Turkish 8 Apr 94 p 11) 

   FORMER CENTRAL BANK GOVERNOR PROPOSES SOLUTIONS--Rusdu Saracoglu, 
former governor of the Central Bank, speaking at the Institute of 
Banking and Insurance of the University of Marmara, provided some 
scenarios for the future of Turkey's economy: 

   * If the True Path Party-Socialist Populist Party (DYP-SHP) 
Coalition continues, the markets will not have confidence in the 
government's  economic stability program.  The pressure on the 
Turkish lira will continue.  Investors will be able to make up for 
their losses due to foreign currency appreciation only with 
overnight 500-1000 percent interest rates on Turkish Liras. 

   * A Motherland Party (ANAP)-supported DYP minority government 
will be equally ineffective since the ANAP can withdraw its support 
at any time.  A party which does not have a guaranteed majority can 
not carry out a stabilization program. 

   * If DYP and ANAP form a coalition and endorse an early election, 
they will not be able to achieve economic stability.  Recent local 
election indicate that these two parties both will have to go to 
their constituents with populist promises.  If they go into the 
elections with separate partners, it is unlikely that they can 
convince people to support the stability package.  After the 
elections, the administration still will have to undertake large 
public expenditures. 

   * A technocrat government is completely absurd.  Saracaglu points 
out that his name is mentioned in such scenarios but states that it 
is unrealistic.  Such a government, installed just to reform the 
economy,  would not run in the 1996 elections.  It is hard to guess 
what is going to happen after 1996.  Individuals are not going to 
change their present behaviors if they know that the reforms will be 
short-lived.  And this kind of thinking will prevent the reforms 
from being successful. 

   * A United ANAP-DYP would be the best solution, Saracaglu 
contends, and would be his choice of a new government.  However, the 
parties on the Left also must unite.  A united DYP and ANAP would 
have to assemble an able cadre, an economic program, and immediately 
call for early elections.   The vote potential of these two parties 
is about 45 percent.  Explaining the economic package to people 
prior to the elections may cause them to lose about 5 percent of the 
votes.  However, such a coalition could win an election and govern 
for five years with their existing vote potential.  In this case, a 
Turkey with a balanced budget, monetary discipline, based on the 
principle of a small but effective government, and with judicial and 
educational reform could result from this crisis.  (Ender C. x36285) 
(Istanbul MILLIYET in Turkish 2 Apr 94 p 10) 

   KOI DIRECTOR COMMENTS ON PRIVATIZATION--An article in the 
Istanbul daily DUNYA reported that Public Partnership Administration 
(KOI) Director Tezcan Yaramanci has stated that the KOI intends to 
revolutionize" its privatization policy.  He stated that the 
objectives of privatization to date have been to make money but in 
the future the real purpose of privatization will be to make the 
Public Sector Enterprises (PSE) productive.  Furthermore, Yaramanci 
suggested that Prime Minister Tansu Ciller should prepare the legal 
basis for such a change "as soon as possible," adding that "all of 
the countries which have been successful in privatization owe it to 
the prime minister and the head of the technical team."  He also 
stated that if a legal foundation is not established for the 
privatizations, foreign investors will be skeptical of the whole 
thing.  He also thought that privatization lacked a cultural 
foundation and that a great majority of people did not have a sound 
understanding of it.  Yaramanci said, "we will solve the problem of 
unemployment which might result from privatization by paying 15 
percent of the income earned from privatization as unemployment 
benefits. 

   Yaramanci listed the following as principles the KOI would follow 
in privatizing companies: 

   * Government-owned companies will be privatized "in accordance 
with their own characteristics."  If necessary, some should be 
leased. 

   * Privatization will be implemented on the basis of market price 
rather than insisting on government-fixed prices. 

   * PSE private purchasers will include an experienced group of 
shareholders who can take on managerial responsibility. 

   * Foreign capital will be allowed to finance privatization since 
the total amount of capital needed is unlikely to be found 
domestically. (Ender C. x36285)  (Istanbul DUNYA in Turkish 30 Mar 
94 p 2) 

   EXIMBANK EXECUTIVE INTERVIEWED ON BSEC CREDITS--In an interview 
conducted by DUNYA, Turkey's Eximbank Executive Director Ahmet 
Ertugrul discussed the credits the bank would give the Black Sea 
Economic Cooperation (BSEC) group.  Additionally, he pointed out 
that the bank did not plan to give further credit to countries 
outside of the BSEC.  He explained, for example, that about half of 
the $1.15-billion credit allocated the former USSR still remains, 
$599 million having been disbursed during 1989-91.  For the BSEC 
countries, funds are allocated as follows: 

   Romania: Of the $50-million export credits allocated to this 
country in 1990, $49 million have been used.  A second credit line 
amounting to $75 million was opened to this country in 1993, none of 
which has been used so far.  By sector, the credit has been applied: 
44 percent for agricultural, 26 percent for machinery and electric 
material, and 11 percent for minerals and basic consumer goods. 

   Albania: Some $13.8 million of the $15-million credit allocated 
in 1991 has been used to export iron and other metals, 16 percent 
for textile and clothing, 16 percent for machinery and electrical 
materials, 13 percent for chemicals, and the rest for basic consumer 
goods and other investments. 

   Bulgaria: Of the $50-million credit allotted in 1991, $20.9 
million of this has been used.  Some 74.8 percent to finance export 
of construction materials, 18.7 percent for textile goods, and 6.3 
percent for other goods.  An agreement to open a second line of 
credit to Bulgaria for $50 million during 1993-94 has not been 
signed yet because Bulgarian officials have not yet completed the 
required procedures. 

   Ukraine: Two separate credit agreements have been concluded to 
finance exports and projects in 1994, which are not to exceed $50 
million. 

   Moldavia: Loaned $10 million for 1994.  Discussions with Moldavia 
about the loan has just started and Moldavia has asked that this 
credit be used to finance telecommunication projects to be realized 
in this country by Turkish companies. 

   Georgia: A credit agreement amounting to $50 million has been 
concluded, $28 million of which will be used for consumer goods and 
$22 million for investments by Export-Import Bank of Georgia and 
Turk Eximbank in 1993.  A list of products subject to these credits 
are being established by Georgia. 

   Azerbaijan: Two credit agreements have been signed between the 
International Bank of Azerbaijan and Turkey's Eximbank.  One was 
signed in 1993 to export goods amounting to $100 million and the 
other on 27 January 1994 to finance a project amounting to $150 
million.  The credit will cover food, medicine, medical supplies, 
and telecommunication equipment as well as the construction of 
telecommunication and industrial plants. (Ender C. x36285) 
(Istanbul DUNYA SURVEY in English Mar 30 94 p 2) 

   ECONOMIC BRIEFS 

   Greece 

   --Ministry of Finance secret investigation revealed 10 companies 
broke government-imposed embargo on Former Yugoslav Republic of 
Macedonia (FThOM), four in Northern Greece, six in Athens, realizing 
large profits. . .goods loaded in Salonica port for Bulgaria 
delivered 
to Skopje after falsifying bills of lading... companies to be 
prosecuted but outcome uncertain given absence of legislation 
forbidding exports to FYROM. (TA NEA 27 Apr 94 p 14) 

   Portugal 

   --Government studying ways to encourage small investors to buy 
stock in view of upcoming privatizations, including creating ways to 
open credit lines based on prime rate to allow small purchases of 
stock. . .goal to more widely disseminate capital among increasingly 
larger groups of small investors. (EXPRESSO 30 Apr 94 p 10) 

   --Salaries grew less than inflation rate at average of 4.7 
percent during first quarter of 1994, 5.2 percent if public 
employees are not taken into account. . .Bank of Portugal hopes 
containment of salary increases will contribute to lower inflation 
rate further.  (DIARIO DE NOTICIAS 23 Apr 94 p 2) 

ELAG/19 MAY/ECONF/WED/PF 19/ 2022z May 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47631 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000028194001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   21 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-20May94-Russia 
<H3> <TI>      Yeltsin Attempts Conciliatory Gesture to Legislature </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Yeltsin Attempts Conciliatory Gesture to Legislature </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                                            In what appears to have been intended as a conciliatory gesture 
to the legislature, President Boris Yeltsin has signed into law 
legislation on the prerogatives and perquisites of lawmakers even 
though he has challenged the Federal Assembly on the 
constitutionality of some of the bill's provisions and requested 
specific amendments.  Yeltsin is primarily challenging the bill 
for ascribing to deputies significant oversight functions that he 
contends exceed their constitutional role as legislators.  By 
declining to veto one of the first pieces of legislation passed 
by both parliamentary chambers, Yeltsin appears to be trying to 
choose his political battles carefully, but the chances for a 
successful legislative-executive compromise will depend on 
whether lawmakers are willing to accept Yeltsin's narrow view of 
their powers. 
                                     END SUMMARY 
   Suggesting that he is not interested in engaging the legislature 
in political battles at this early juncture, Yeltsin signed the 
law "On the Status of Federation Council Deputies and the Status 
of State Duma Deputies" despite expressing serious concerns about 
the constitutionality of some of its provisions.  (See Note 1) 
In a letter to both chambers of the Federal Assembly, Yeltsin 
indicated that the decision to sign the law was "difficult" 
because it "contains obvious juridical imperfections and 
inconsistencies with the Constitution."  At the same time, he 
noted that the law "as a whole" is necessary for "effective 
legislative work" and portrayed his decision to sign it as a 
"step toward fulfilling the treaty on social accord." 
Nevertheless, he attached a lengthy memorandum recommending 
amendments to the law and "inviting" the legislature to "suspend" 
those provisions he claims are at odds with the constitution 
(Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 12 May). 
   (Note 1)  Yeltsin's decision to sign the law reportedly came 
despite contradictory advice from his advisers.  According to 
Izvestiya's parliamentary observer Sergey Chugayev, an edict for 
a veto had already been drafted at the behest of Presidential 
Administration leader Sergey Filatov, but Georgiy Satarov, 
Yeltsin's adviser on legislative affairs who counseled Yeltsin to 
sign the bill, prevailed (Izvestiya, 12 May). 
   Objections to Oversight Functions 
   At the heart of Yeltsin's objections to the law are its 
provisions granting deputies extensive oversight functions that 
he says violate the constitutional role of lawmakers.  Showing 
particular sensitivity to parliamentary intrusion in executive 
affairs at all levels of government, Yeltsin has challenged 
provisions in the law granting deputies broad access to inspect 
government bodies and state enterprises and requiring state 
officials to respond in timely fashion to requests for 
information from deputies: 
   Access.   Article 5 of the law states that a deputy is entitled 
to "visit without hindrance all organs of state power and organs 
of local self-government . . . and enterprises, institutions, 
organizations, military units, and public associations."  Yeltsin 
argued in his letter that such unrestricted access "is in no way 
connected with the legislative process" (Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 12 
May). 
   Right to Information.  Several articles in the law concern the 
deputies' right to demand information from state and local 
officials and to receive the requested information in a timely 
manner.  In his memorandum, Yeltsin argued that the constitution 
does not grant the Federal Assembly an "all-embracing monitoring 
function with regard to other state institutions." (See Note 2) 
He claims that deputies will use broadly formulated oversight 
functions to "interfere in the activity" of state and local 
governments and enterprises.  It is less clear, however, whether 
Yeltsin is also challenging the practice, described in Article 14 
of the law, whereby deputies are entitled to question any member 
of the federal government during parliamentary sessions.  While 
he wrote that "Articles 13-17 indicate that the deputy will 
possess powers to interfere actively in the activity of all other 
bodies of state authority and local self-government," he has not 
previously objected to ministers' participation in the Duma's 
weekly "government hour" session to report on an issue and answer 
deputies' questions.  For example, Acting Finance Minister Sergey 
Dubinin and Central Bank Chairman Viktor Gerashchenko addressed 
the Duma on 4 February on the enterprise payment crisis and 
budget issues (ITAR-TASS, 4 February).  Similarly, Minister of 
Internal Affairs Viktor Yerin reported to the Duma on the crime 
situation on 11 February (ITAR-TASS, 11 February). 
   (Note 2)  The only oversight function explicitly granted to the 
Federation Council and the State Duma under the constitution is 
the right to monitor implementation of the federal budget through 
the parliamentary Comptrollers Office (Article 101). 
   In challenging these parliamentary oversight functions, Yeltsin 
has demonstrated his intention to consign lawmakers exclusively 
to a lawmaking role.  In his memorandum Yeltsin noted that 
Article 1 of the bill "correctly" defines a deputy as the 
"people's elected representative, authorized to exercise 
legislative power in the corresponding chamber of the Federal 
Assembly."  Moreover, according to Yeltsin, the legislative 
function is the deputy's "sole" constitutional function.  He 
argued that the oversight functions prescribed in the law are "in 
no way connected with parliament's legislative activity" and 
violate the constitution's separation of powers by combining 
"legislative, executive, and monitoring functions."  According to 
Yeltsin, the law's oversight provisions demonstrate that deputies 
continue "as before" to view themselves as an "individual state 
official . . . and possessor of extensive independent powers" 
(Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 12 May), an oblique but obvious reference to 
broadly empowered Supreme Soviet deputies. 
   Yeltsin's Strict Constructionism 
   Yeltsin appears to be basing his view that deputies should 
function exclusively in a legislative role on a narrow 
interpretation of the constitution.  While the constitution 
contains no explicit language on the role of legislators, Article 
94 defines the Federal Assembly as the "representative and 
legislative organ of the Russian Federation" (Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 
25 December 1993).  By contrast, Article 1O7 of the previous 
Russian Constitution--based on the 1978 RSFSR Constitution- 
-explicitly gave deputies a significant oversight role by 
defining the Supreme Soviet--the standing parliament--more 
broadly as a "legislative, directive, and supervisory body of 
governmental authority" (Konstitutsiya Rossiyskoy Federatsii, 
1992). 
   Opposition From Deputies 
   Predictably, Yeltsin's narrow interpretation of lawmakers' 
functions has already met with opposition from some deputies who 
want to see the legislature more broadly empowered to 
counterbalance the executive.  Vladimir Isakov, chairman of the 
Duma's Legislation, Judicial, and Legal Reform Committee and a 
staunch Yeltsin foe, has complained that a narrow legislative 
function turns deputies into "a minor official with a large 
wage," whose only right is to "press the voting button" to vote 
on legislation.  According to Isakov--who may be articulating the 
position of a significant number of opposition deputies, 
particularly those who served in the old Supreme Soviet--a deputy 
is a "plenipotentiary representative of his voters" and the 
"guarantor of the rights and freedoms of his own electors." 
Isakov has vociferously supported the right of deputies to 
question any state official, arguing that "in a rule-of-law state 
any citizen has the right to appeal to any official and any 
official is obliged to answer" (Trud, 11 May; Sovetskaya Rossiya, 
17 May).  Isakov also claims that Yeltsin wants to do away with 
the legislature's practice of questioning members of the federal 
government--" the most important institution of democracy since 
the birth of the parliamentary system"--charging that Yeltsin's 
intention is to turn the Federal Assembly into a mere "democratic 
adornment" (Sovetskaya Rossiya, 17 May). 
   Duma's Response Cool 
   Although under no legal obligation-to amend a signed law, the 
Duma has signaled some receptivity to Yeltsin's proposals by 
forming a conciliation commission to review the legislation and 
also addressing Yeltsin's proposals in plenary sessions.  The 
commission's chairman, Valentin Kovalev, a deputy chairman of the 
Duma and Communist Party (CPRF) representative, has indicated 
that the Duma is "favorably disposed" to Yeltsin's proposed 
amendments, but he cautioned that there is no procedure allowing 
the Duma to suspend selected provisions of a bill (ITAR-TASS, 12 
May).  Suggesting that Yeltsin may have a difficult time selling 
his proposals to the deputies, an attempt by Ruslan Orekhov, head 
of Yeltsin's State-Legal Directorate, to represent the 
president's position reportedly met with a cool response from the 
deputies on 13 May (ITAR-TASS, 18 May).  The administration's 
next chance to defend Yeltsin's proposals will come at an 
upcoming plenary session of the Duma, when Filatov is scheduled 
to answer further queries from deputies (ITAR-TASS, 18 May). 
   Because media reports have not been observed to report the vote 
total when the Duma passed the bill, it is difficult to gauge the 
level of support for the law in its current form.  In an 
indication that deputies may be reluctant to make significant 
modifications, a press report noted that the Duma passed the law 
"practically without debate" (Kommersant-Daily, 14 April), and 
Isakov claims that deputies "stood and applauded" when the law 
passed (Sovetskaya Rossiya, 17 May). 
   Implications 
   The issue of parliamentary oversight may prove difficult to 
resolve because it rests on widely diverging interpretations of 
the constitution, but deputies may seek to compromise with 
Yeltsin on his less contentious objections to the bill.  The 
significant differences between Yeltsin and some members of the 
Duma on lawmakers' constitutional role may spur passage of 
legislation to reconstitute the Constitutional Court--potentially 
the final arbiter of the dispute.  If, as Isakov contends, 
Yeltsin is in fact challenging the Federal Assembly's practice of 
questioning members of government at its sessions, Yeltsin 
appears to have embarked on a collision course with the 
legislature despite having signed the law. 
   (AUTHOR:  O'CONNELL.   QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE GALL 
CHIEF, ANALYSIS BRANCH, RUSSIA DIVISION (73) 733-6070.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/CB 21/0009z May 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47632 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000027994001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   21 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
(DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS, THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT CONSUMERS. 
IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND BEHAVIOR AND IS M 
ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER U.S. GOVERNMENT 
COMPONENTS) 
FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-068 
<H3> <TI>      IRAQ: 'Udayy Saddam Husayn's Youth Television </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       IRAQ: 'Udayy Saddam Husayn's Youth Television </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
Summary--Despite      closure for nearly one month last December- 
January, the Iraqi Youth Television (IYTV) station has become 
another arm of media influence for Saddam Husayn's son, 'Udayy 
Saddam Husayn.  Indeed, IYTV's resumption of broadcasting following 
strong support from leading Baghdad dailies appears to have 
solidified the station's status as an alternative to state-run 
Iraqi Television (ITV).  The hardcopy version of this Foreign Media 
Note contains a picture and name. 

   Like his radio station and the daily BABIL, flagship of his media 
empire, IYTV has become a prominent part of 'Udayy's expanding 
commercial, political, and cultural empire and a vehicle for 
promoting his own interests. 'Udayy's adventure with electronic 
media began on 28 April 1993, President Saddam Husayn's 56th 
birthday, when he launched the radio station known as "Voice of 
Youth from Dar al-Salam."  London's AL-SHARQ AL-AWSAT noted on 12 
May that the station quickly became known for "stinging criticism" 
aimed at ministers and senior officials and their performances. 

   Meanwhile, 'Udayy began preparations, according to Paris' AL- 
WATAN AL-'ARABI on 30 July, for starting a television station also 
targeted at Iraqi youth, which together with the radio station, were 
called by AL-WATAN AL-'ARABI as signs of 'Udayy's "rising star" in 
Iraq.  The first report of broadcasting by IYTV was monitored on 31 
July on Iraqi radio.  Within a few months after IYTV began 
broadcasting, AL-THAWRAH, a powerful Baghdad daily, praised 'Udayy 
in its 12 September issue for "establishing a sound and healthy 
democratic atmosphere, an atmosphere ... through which the citizen 
smells the fresh air, vents his anguish, submits his complaints, and 
exposes the corruption of those who exploit their position to 
harass, exhaust the people, lie to and unjustly treat them."  It 
continued: "'Udayy in his relations with citizens adopts the style 
of the son who emulates his father, a style based on facts and love 
for Iraqis."  It characterized IYTV, in the same rave review, as 
representing "a course of action that restores hope to those who 
lost it, and fulfills the dreams of those who stopped dreaming a 
long time ago .... a course that will be a haven for those unjustly 
treated by officials, who only care for themselves." 

   Despite the apparent success of this high profile media empire, 
both of 'Udayy's radio and television stations were abruptly 
shutdown in mid-December.  Iraqi officials and media sources gave no 
reason for this sudden move, which amounted to a public thrashing 
for 'Udayy, but it may have been caused by IYTV's penchant for sharp 
criticism directed against high officials in Saddam's regime. For 
example, on 4 August, the day a bomb exploded in Baghdad, IYTV 
interviewed some Interior Ministry officials and aired what Interior 
Minister Watban Ibrahim called, in an article published in BABIL on 
10 August, an attempt "to belittle the efficiency of our Ministry's 
officials."  Watban Ibrahim, a maternal half-brother of Saddam 
Husayn, criticized IYTV, in the same article, for breaking "all 
security restraints applied to cases concerning the security of the 
State and society."  He said that IYTV "pretends" that it is 
interested in truth, but in reality, it is engaged in an 
"irresponsible" act "disguised as democracy."  He called IYTV's 
conduct "arbitrary, moody, and undisciplined" and charged that IYTV 
is "destructive" and provides a "weapon in the hands of our 
enemies."--charges obviously directed against 'Udayy. 

   However, a few weeks after the shutdown of IYTV, two major 
dailies came to 'Udayy's help and strongly appealed for the 
resumption of IYTV broadcasts.  An article in AL-THAWRAH on 8 
January called the interruption "an irreplaceable loss" and 
expressed hopes that transmission would resume, because the 
programming had been "well received by the various sectors of the 
people."  AL-THAWRAH showed even greater solidarity with IYTV by 
ceasing to publish ITV program schedules around the same time.  AL- 
JUMHURIYAH, another Baghdad daily, also wrote on 8 January: "This 
honest voice should resume transmission as soon as possible."  Two 
days later, on 10 January, the Radio Baghdad announced the 
resumption of IYTV broadcasting. As BABIL now resumed publishing 
IYTV's daily schedule, the station became the only television 
channel with program schedules published in the Iraqi press. 

   AL-THAWRAH continued to defend IYTV and attack its enemies, 
saying on 19 January: "One cannot ask the Youth Television to please 
everyone .... it should not appease the public by appealing to its 
whims, shallow feelings, and low instincts because it will then turn 
into an instrument for destruction and corruption .... Youth 
Television is loved by the viewers, who have given it the right to 
represent them.  It is now unacceptable to violate such a right." 

   PROGRAMMING 

   The following analysis is done based on published program 
schedules for the two stations rather than actual programs, which 
are not available to FBIS at this time. 

   Comparison of IYTV and ITV program schedules reveals that IYTV is 
more interactive with its viewers, as it has a viewers' requests 
segment.  IYTV may also appeal to a younger audience through 
programs like fashion shows and sports segments. Furthermore, it 
broadcasts commercial advertisements, which identifies IYTV as a 
private rather than a government station.  In contrast, ITV clearly 
presents the government's official line and has programs like 
provincial reports, presentations by government officials, and 
government educational programs. ITV broadcasts Friday prayer 
sermons and has more than an hour of religious programming every day 
(2 hours on Fridays), while IYTV has less than 10 minutes of 
religious programming each day. 

   IYTV begins broadcasting each day at 1445 local time.  Programs 
generally begin with the national anthem and a Koranic reading, 
although at times commercial advertisements will open programming. 
Among the programs, it has a political report segment, which may be 
intended for presentation of independent news and analysis reports. 
It gives weather reports, something that ITV has never done, 
possibly because it is considered not important by ITV or because of 
security reasons. The last feature of the day is always the national 
anthem, which is preceded by a serial or a movie that begins any 
time between 2300 to 0200. 
   Following is a typical example of IYTV programs: 

IYTV:  Monday, 16 April 1994 

14:45--Advertisements 
15:00--National anthem &amp; Koranic reading 
15:10--Pictures from the battle 
15:15--Iraq: The Cradle of Civilization 
15: 25--Cartoons 
15:45--Variety cartoons 
16:00--Sports section 
17:00--News 
17:10--Fashion show 
17:25--New songs 
17:45--Variety news report 
18:00--News 
18:10--Viewers' requests 
18:55--Advertisements 
19:00--Hourly news &amp; review of programs 
19:10--Foreign serial "Manuela" 
19:45--Variety songs 
19:55--Advertisements 
20:00--News 
20:05--Charity program 
       Weather Report 
20:15--Aspiring to the summit 
20:55--Advertisements 
21:00--Political reports 
21:10--Sports section 
21:30--Unforgettable songs 
21:55--Advertisements 
22:00--News &amp; Leader's speech 
22:10--Arabic serial "The Man in Our Home" 
23:00--News 
23:15--Arabic movie "All of Them in Hell" 
       National anthem 

   A review of ITV program schedules when they were published by AL- 
THAWRAH, shows that they consist of religious and Koranic lessons, 
children's programs, TV magazine reports, provincial reports, both 
Western and native serials, programs on farming, news in both Arabic 
and English, musical, educational programs, presentations by 
government officials, and foreign and Arabic movies.  Programming 
begins every day, 1400 to 1500, local time and continue after 
midnight.  ITV also carries Friday prayer sermons on Fridays. 
Friday program begins at 1000 local time. 

   Following are two typical examples of ITV program days. 

ITV Program: Thursday, 4 November 1993 

15:00--National anthem 
15:02--Readings from Koran &amp; religious lessons 
15:20--Report on the fifth national celebrations from the province 
of Babil 
16:00--Religious lessons 
17:00--Children' s program/cartoons 
19:00--Evening newsmagazine 
20:05--Part 8 of the Iraqi serial "Stories From the Days of 
Tribalism" 
21:00--News 
22:10--Part 2 of the serial "Concrete Jungle" 
23:00--News summary 
23:10--Our shows and viewer responses 
23:40--New Arabic movie "Doctorate With Honors" 
       Religious lessons ending with national anthem 
ITV Program: Friday, 12 November 1993 

10:00--National anthem and morning program 
11:30--Switching to foreign broadcasting (system) for reporting on 
Friday prayer events and sermons 
13:20--Magazine program on the activities in the province of Ninawa 
15:00--New Arabic movie "The She-Devil Who Loved Me". This is based 
on the social theme of human potential for reform and return to the 
       right path after committing errors. 
16:30--Folklore music 
18:00--Educational festival in cooperation with the Ministry of 
Education 
20;05--Weekly program on social services, inventions, and 
innovations 
21:45--Part 7 of the serial "The Message Written on the Forehead" 
22:10--Presentation by an Iraqi official on the subject of cultural 
       alertness 
23:05--Staying alert to events 
       National anthem 

   (QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, PERSIAN 
GULF/SOUTH-ASIA BRANCH AT (703)733-6574 
ENEAG/20 May/POLCHF/NEASA Division/CB 20/2328z May 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47633 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000028094001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   21 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-20MAY94-CHINA 
<H3> <TI>      Beijing Pledges Power Sector Reform, Solicits Foreign Investment </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Beijing Pledges Power Sector Reform, Solicits Foreign Investment </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                                            In a renewed bid to close the gap between China's rapidly 
expanding economy and sluggish growth in power production, 
Beijing has stepped up its efforts to boost foreign investment in 
the power industry, promised new state loans for power projects, 
and reaffirmed an agenda of sweeping market reforms announced 
last year.  However, continued administrative control of 
investment return rates may discourage a rapid increase in 
foreign investment. 
                                     END SUMMARY 
   Underscoring the power ministry's renewed drive to court foreign 
investors, the 17-23 April issue of Beijing's English-language 
paper China Daily reported that Minister of Power Industry Shi 
Dazhen had begun an official visit to France, Spain, and Israel 
to "bring in investment."  While in France, the article said, Shi 
was expected to "sign an agreement" to extend a "10-year power 
cooperation treaty" due to expire this year and to "explain 
China's energy policies" to French government and business 
leaders.  The article went on to describe Shi's visits to Spain 
and Israel as "important" because Spain is the home of the 
"European power union" and Israel has "ties" with financial 
organizations "worldwide."  Revealing that Shi's trip was part of 
a larger series of overseas visits planned to attract investment 
or assistance for the struggling power sector, the article quoted 
a ministry spokesman as saying that other delegations will be 
dispatched to unnamed "Western nations" this year with "proposals 
for cooperation." 
   Investment Gap 
   Shi's trip and other current initiatives are part of Beijing's 
ongoing effort to remedy serious shortages in the power sector, 
which power ministry officials have long warned is dangerously 
underfunded.  Since Shi took office a year ago, PRC media have 
increasingly stressed the urgency of bringing power production 
into line with economic growth, claiming that the present 20 
percent shortfall in power capacity not only curbs current 
industrial output but also poses a serious obstacle to continued 
economic development. 
   Revisiting this theme, the 17-23 China Daily article stated that 
Beijing has "planned" for only 12 of the average 17 million 
kilowatts of new capacity needed annually to sustain a 9 percent 
economic growth rate until the year 2000.  Ten billion of the 66 
billion yuan needed to pay for an increase of this size, the 
article said, is "not available."  Although the article indicated 
that this "capital shortage" would be eased later in the year, it 
complained that the government had reduced funding for large 
power plants in order to control inflation and quoted power 
ministry officials as warning that this shortage would 
"jeopardize" long-term economic growth. 
   Promotion of Market Reform 
   Consistent with his efforts over the past year in spearheading a 
drive to increase funding and introduce sweeping reforms in the 
power industry, Shi Dazhen was quoted in a 3 May China Daily 
article as saying that "plans are under way" to "lift price 
controls" on electricity, introduce a "shareholding system" into 
the power industry, and launch a publicity campaign to encourage 
energy conservation. 
   -- Price reform.  Seeking to correct the longstanding problem of 
low state-set electricity prices that have resu1ted in massive 
waste and have severely constrained power sector development, the 
article reported Shi as reiterating his call of last December 
(China Daily, 28 December 1993) to establish a "rational pricing 
system" for the power industry in the "next three years." 
Allowing electricity prices to "ref1ect market demand," Shi 
asserted, is the "best way to attract domestic and overseas 
investment."  Arguing that price reform would attract foreign 
investment and financial assistance, the article said that an 
"American expert" abstained in a 1992 World Bank vote on 
investment in a power plant because electricity prices "failed to 
reflect market demand."  The article went on to paint a grim 
picture of acute power shortages and waste, noting that 
electricity prices were set in 1958, and, "although adjusted for 
the first time last year," are still "extremely low." 
   -- Institutional Reform.  Shi also reaffirmed his plan for a 
radical restructuring of the power industry along market lines. 
He called for "breaking free from the planned economy" and for 
turning "al1" state-owned power enterprises into "shareholding 
firms" that will "operate free of government interference" and 
assume responsibility for profits and losses.  Elaborating on 
this reform agenda in a keynote article appearing in Renmin Ribao 
late last year, Shi had insisted that China must "take the road" 
of "unconventional" development and that power enterprises must 
be reorganized into "standardized joint-stock" companies--or 
corporations--and must "experiment with newer and more dynamic 
management forms" (19 December 1993).  The joint-stock system, he 
said, would "clearly define property rights," provide "a legal 
guarantee for the real separation of ownership from management 
power," and "ensure the legitimate rights and interests of 
investors."  Shi also indicated that the new system would allow 
for a radical decentralization of decisionmaking power.  Some 
power companies, he said, would be "managed by investors on their 
own" and some power plants would be "run by other industries." 
In addition, he  reaffirmed 1987 State Council guidelines--which 
were apparently never implemented--that allow provincial and 
transprovincial power grids to operate as commercial entities 
responsible for profits and losses and enjoying autonomy in 
raising and allocating funds for development.  The "key issue," 
he declared, "is to firmly establish the concept that electric 
power is a commodity" and to create "a policy environment 
ensuring fair competition." 
   Limit on Investment Returns 
   Although eager to attract foreign investment, Beijing has also 
expressed concern over perceived foreign exploitation of power- 
starved localities and has responded by setting administrative 
limits on the rates of return that may inhibit the increased flow 
of foreign funds.  A 7 May report in Zhongguo Xinwen She, 
Beijing's news service for overseas Chinese, announced that the 
State Council had fixed the "rate of return" for foreign 
investment in joint venture power projects at "between 11 and 12 
percent."  The State Council was "greatly concerned," it said, 
because "some provinces and municipalities" had agreed to a rate 
of return that was "too high" in order to "seek early success" in 
negotiations with foreign parties.  Independent Hong Kong media 
have confirmed high rates in some areas and investor concern over 
arbitrary limits.  The well-connected Hong Kong daily Ming Pao 
reported on 7 March that some southern provinces had accepted a 
Hong Kong company's request for a "50 percent return" on its 
investment in a power project.  A 6 May article in the prominent 
English-language Hong Kong daily South China Morning Post 
reported that unnamed foreign investors believe that a rate of 
return of 15 to 18 percent would be "reasonable." 
   New Infusion of State Loans 
   While Beijing has undertaken high-profile measures to attract 
foreign investment, it has also taken steps to beef up state 
loans to the power industry and has signaled that state 
investment, funneled through new institutions created by the 
recent wave of banking reform, will continue to play the major 
role in power sector development.  For example, a China Daily 
article on 18 May reported that the recently established State 
Development Bank will grant 7 billion yuan in loans to ease 
"capital shortages" for large power projects.  Apparently 
attempting to emphasize the state's commitment to the power 
industry, the article said that the loans--only the "first batch" 
for the year--would account for fully 36 percent of all bank 
loans Beijing plans to grant this year.  Similarly, the article 
reported that 40 percent of all power sector funding this year 
will come from the state, whereas foreign investment is expected 
to account for only 10 percent. 
   Implications 
   Under increasing pressure to provide adequate power for China's 
booming economy, Beijing is straining to draw more capital into 
the power sector and is using the energy crisis to prod powerful 
bureaucrats into implementing radical market reforms.  Because of 
the limited ability of state coffers to address China's rapidly 
growing power needs, efforts to attract more foreign investors 
are likely to expand.  However, these efforts may be undercut by 
Beijing's continuing administrative control of investment return 
rates. 
   (AUTHOR:  VOSS.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
CHINA ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6097.) 
EAG/HEBBEL/CB 20/2345z May 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47634 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000028294001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   21 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-20May94-Russia 
<H3> <TI>     Zyuganov Sees Broad International and Domestic Conspiracy </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>      Zyuganov Sees Broad International and Domestic Conspiracy </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Against   Russia 
                                       SUMMARY 
   Gennadiy Zyuganov, Chairman of the Central Executive Committee of 
the Communist Party of the Russian Federation (CPRF) outlines his 
view that Russia is the target of a broad and centuries-old 
conspiracy in his book Derzhava (Great Power), a collection of 
his essays and interviews with him, published in January 1994. 
He sees the main forces behind the conspiracy today as Zionists, 
capitalists, and Western nations, especially the United States. 
Their plot is carried out by agents in Russia, who in recent 
years have included former USSR President Mikhail Gorbachev and 
Russian President Boris Yeltsin.  Since the plotters and their 
agents have successfully employed a strategy of successively 
defeating opposing forces in Russia by luring them into violent 
confrontations such as those of August 1991 and October 1993, 
Zyuganov believes that "patriots'' can defeat Yeltsin and the 
anti-Russian plotters only trough nonviolent, legal opposition 
and by uniting behind an ideology that fuses elements of Russian 
nationalism and communism.  Zyuganov has consistently expounded 
these themes of a broad plot against Russia and the need for a 
nationalist-communist fusion to counter it since 1992, when he 
became a leading force of the anti-Yeltsin opposition.  These 
themes are not unique to Zyuganov and the CPRF, however, for 
other opposition leaders, including Vladimir Zhirinovskiy, have 
cited the existence of an international plot against Russia and 
articulated an ideology that combines nationalism with elements 
of traditional Soviet communism. 
                                     END SUMMARY 
   According to Zyuganov the great plot was hatched more than a 
thousand years ago, at the dawn of Russian history, by malevolent 
forces determined to subjugate Russia, which they see as the main 
obstacle to their plans for world domination.  Zyuganov blames 
this plot for all the horrors and suffering, such as the Great 
Purges of the Thirties, that have afflicted Russia throughout its 
history.  In his view, those behind the plot have used witting 
agents and manipulated unwitting fools inside Russia to undermine 
Russia's economic and social structure by orchestrating economic 
chaos, political unrest, and social upheaval. 
   Behind the Plot 
   While Zyuganov sometimes explicitly accuses the United Nations 
and the United States of being instigators of what he describes 
as recurring attempts to destroy Russia in the current era, at 
other times he is less explicit and lapses into mystical rhetoric 
about the secretive roots of the plot.  Although he uses Soviet 
style anti-capitalist rhetoric, his depiction of the plot appears 
to be drawn from the infamous Protocols of the Elders of Zion, 
allegedly a blueprint for world domination by the Masons and 
Jewish Elders now acknowledged as a forgery concocted by the 
Czarist secret police.  The Protocols, which have been repeatedly 
reprinted by ultranationalist media in post Soviet Russia, warn 
of a strong President installing a new constitution and 
accumulating personal power for the benefit of his unseen 
patrons, the Jewish-Masonic plotters and a rapacious capitalist 
class, ever prepared to sell out the Motherland to enhance the 
power of the hidden hand behind the great plot.  (See Box 1) 
   Zyuganov explains both the Bolshevik revolution and the 
disintegration of the Soviet Union as products of this plot and 
its efforts to subvert Russia.  During the revolution, 
russophobes and internationalists among the Bolsheviks perverted 
the struggle of honest Russians against the rapacious capitalist 
class and instituted a Soviet dictatorship that kept Russia in 
subjugation.  According to Zyuganov the good features of the 
Soviet era--the victory over Fascism or social protection for 
children, for example--were due to the selfless qualities of the 
Russian people and the patriotic Russian elements within the 
communist party.  The bad features--the cruelty and bureaucratism 
of the system, for example--were the work of the plotters and 
their witting and unwitting agents.  He sees the breakup of the 
Soviet Union as a move by the plotters and "agent" like 
Gorbachev and Yeltsin to keep the USSR from obstructing the 
establishment of a new world order under U.S. domination. 
   Interpretation of Recent Events 
   In a section of Derzhava titled "The Algebra of Politics" 
(published in FBIS USR 94-003-L, "Zyuganov on Russian 
'Catastrophe"'), Zyuganov applied his conspiracy theory to the 
attempted coup of August 1991 and Yeltsin's clash with the 
Supreme Soviet in September-October 1993, seeing both events as 
the skillful elimination of opposing forces in Russia by the 
plotters and their agents.  Describing both as examples of 
"virtuoso use" of the natural flow of events and the "method of 
controlled explosions," Zyuganov alleges that the plotters used 
the clashes to remove from the Russian political arena "all 
forces capable of impeding the country's integration into the 
single supra-state system of the 'new world order.'"  According 
to Zyuganov's interpretation of the fall 1993 clash, Yeltsin took 
advantage of his almost complete control of the country's power 
structures to  deliberately provoke a confrontation with the 
Supreme Soviet during 1993 in preparation for defeating and 
ousting them.  "All who were 'against' democratic extremism" 
gathered under the banner of the Supreme Soviet, but they were 
completely and decisively defeated.  Among the few positive 
facets of this crisis, Zyuganov says, was that certain extremist 
organizations that had afforded the "democrats" a pretext for the 
"dirtiest and most unbridled accusations against the patriots" 
were "swept from the political stage." 
   Zyuganov's Current Strategy 
   Zyuganov concludes the "Algebra of Politics" with an assertion 
that "the present antipopular regime" will inevitably collapse 
under the pressure of an increasingly hostile populace if the 
opposition does not repeat the mistakes of the past and refuses 
to be drawn into a violent confrontation.  As a result of the 
1991 and 1993 clashes, he claims, more people have become aware 
of the "real nature of the present authorities" and are convinced 
that Russia can be saved only by "the unification of all healthy 
forces based on our centuries-old national-state, spiritual, 
moral, and religious values."  Arguing that the Yeltsin regime 
can hold on to power "only by intensifying the dictatorship", 
Zyuganov argues that the opposition must pursue a peaceful, 
nonviolent path that will provide no pretext for the use of force 
against it.  "If it is compelled to exist for any length of time 
under the conditions of peaceful, nonviolent development and 
legal stability, [the Yeltsin regime] will inevitably be swept 
away by the opposition." 
   Nationalist-Communist Fusion 
   A main element of Zyuganov's strategy for defeating Yeltsin and 
the plotters is his effort to unite the opposition under an 
ideology that fuses Russian nationalism and communism.  He 
rejects Marxism-Lenninism's traditional international focus in 
favor of an explicitly Russo-centric version of communism. 
Indeed, despite his long career in the communist apparatus, which 
included a stint as an ideologist with the CPSU Central 
Committee, the views he expounds in Derzhava make clear that he 
is not a proponent of communist ideology's official 
internationalism.  Zyuganov views the communist era as a 
continuation rather than a break with Russian history, but an era 
flawed because the Russian people suffered at the hands of the 
Russophobes within the communist party.  According to Zyuganov, 
the Russian people, ever altruistic and selfless, suffered more 
than all the other nations of the Russian-Soviet empire as they 
were required to sacrifice their interests for the good of all. 
   Although he rejects some aspects of the communist era, Zyuganov 
sees many of its features as positive continuations of Russian 
spirit and achievement.  In his view, the USSR continued Czarist 
Russia's powerful spiritual legacy, its collectivist spirit, and 
ideological consensus, which enabled the communist rank and file 
and the common people to build a powerful, feared, and respected 
state, which became an industrial society, repulsed the Nazi 
invaders, launched powerful rockets, and looked after the old and 
the sick.  Zyuganov sees the effort to use these common positive 
elements from the Russian imperial past as the basis for a 
revival of Russia, a revival that should be lead by undogmatic, 
patriotic communists who are willing to work with the Church and 
other traditionalist elements.  Proceeding from this 
identification of the Russian Empire and the Soviet Union, 
Zyuganov calls on all "patriots," that is, those who want Russia 
to inherit the USSR's great power status, to unite to achieve 
that goal. 
   The Two Parties Within the CPSU 
   Central to Zyuganov's fusion of nationalism and communism is his 
view that the Soviet Communist Party was divided internally 
between two philosophically antagonistic parties: the party of 
"our country" ("nasha strana")--made up of populists and 
patriots--and the party of "that country" ("eta strana") made up 
of internationalist, cosmopolitan, and mercenary elements, coming 
largely from among ethnic minorities.  According to Zyuganov, the 
party of "our country," the party of rank and file communists and 
men like Marshall Georgiy Zhyukov (hero of the Great Patriotic 
War) and Cosmonaut Yuriy Gagarin, was fundamentally patriotic and 
Russian.  It never lost its affection for Russian tradition and 
its sympathy for the common man, in whose name the Great October 
Revolution was made.  In Zyuganov's view, the party of "our 
country" saw the particular talents and spiritual qualities of 
the Russian people, rather than dogmatic adherence to Marxism- 
Leninism, as the essential element in the construction of the 
Soviet Union and its socialist system, which, for all its 
shortcomings, achieved much that is worth preserving. 
   Zyuganov holds the party of "that country" responsible for all 
the black pages of Soviet history, due, at least in part to its 
strong non-Russian composition.  He cites the influence of the 
Jews Leon Trotsky and Lazar Kaganovich, and the Georgian Lavrenti 
Beria (but not the Georgian Stalin).  Zyuganov sees these non- 
Russians as incapable of drawing on Russian traditions which were 
alien to them.  Indeed, he views them as Russophobes with 
accomplices among the mercenary, careerist elements within the 
party, elements he says were exemplified in the late Soviet 
period by figures like former Soviet President Mikhail Gorbachev 
and Russian President Boris Yeltsin. 
   Relationship to Other Nationalists 
   Despite ideological and political divisions among Russian 
Ultranationalist groups, Zyuganov's notion of an international 
plot against Russia is shared in some form by virtually all these 
groups.   LDPR leader Vladimir Zhirinovskiy and other nationalist 
figures (See Box 2) frequently make reference to Western-Zionist 
(in the sense of the "Zionism" of the Protocols, that is, as a 
world-wide Jewish conspiracy) attempts to destroy Russia and have 
wielded terms like "agent of influence" to describe those they 
consider ideological enemies.  Such politicians seem to agree in 
viewing the Soviet period as merely one stage in the unbroken 
chain of Russian history. 
   Box 1 
                         The Protocols of the Elders of Zion 
   The Protocols of the Elders of Zion, concocted by the Czarist 
secret police to encourage ultra-nationalist resistance to reform 
of the Czarist system, were published in a widely circulated 
edition in Russia in 1905 by the court printers at Czarskoye 
Selo, and later at the print shop of the Troitse-Sergeyeva Lavra, 
one of pre-revolutionary Russia's foremost monasteries.  The 
Protocols ostensibly are the records of meetings of the Elders of 
Zion, a secret Jewish society allied with the Masonic order and 
dedicated to establishing world rule by the elders.  Nationalist 
fanatics saw the Protocols as proof that not only the 
revolutionary movement, but capitalists and reformers as well, 
were agents of a world-wide conspiracy to destroy the Czarist 
order. 
   The Protocols have found a ready audience among oppositionists 
today, and they have been reprinted and commented on countless 
times in the opposition press.  Reports of opposition gatherings 
regularly report the sale the Protocols to participants. 
   All references are to the version published in Molodaya Gvardiya 
No. 10, 1993: 
   "Our watchwords are force and hypocrisy . . . we must not shrink 
from bribery, deception and treachery . . . on the path to world 
domination . . . around the world the words 'liberty, equality, 
fraternity,' are attracting whole legions of our blind agents." 
p.134 
   "The role of the press is to order up the necessary demands, to 
pass along the plea of the people's voice, to express and create 
discontent . . . it [the press] will be in our hands." p.135 
   "Having created by all the underground means available to us, 
with the help of our gold, all of which is in our hands, a 
general economic crisis, we will throw whole crowds of workers 
out on the streets simultaneously in all the countries of Europe. 
p.138 
   "We must undermine faith, to take the very principle of God and 
the spirit from the lips of the gentiles and exchange everything 
for a simple arithmetic of accounting by material demands . . . 
all feelings toward the Motherland and religion will be displaced 
by cosmopolitan institutions." p.139 
   "They [the gentiles] will be forced [by perpetual crisis] to turn 
over international power to us . . . to form a supergovernment." 
p. 141 
   "Through speculation all of the world's money will wind up in our 
hands, and that will force all of the gentiles into the ranks of 
the proletariat." p.142 
   "We have serving us people of all opinions, of all doctrines . . 
. monarchists, . . . socialists, and all kinds of utopians." 
p.146 
   "From liberalism is born constitutional government . . . the 
president will be taken from among our creatures, our slaves." 
p.149 
   "We will supply our own opposition . . . which will present 
itself as our antipode . . . our actual opposition will, in 
spirit, accept this opposition as their own." 
   "[In order to undermine traditional morals] we have created 
mindless, filthy, disgusting literature." p.157 A footnote 
states: "The participation of Jews in the creation and 
distribution of this type of literature is well known." 
   "The Russian autocracy is the single serious enemy for us in the 
world, if the Papacy is not taken into account." p.158 
   "When it becomes necessary to strengthen strong security 
measures, we will arrange simulations of disturbances and 
manifestations of discontent." p. 166 
   END BOX 1 
   BOX 2 
            Other Opposition Figures on "Plot" Against Russia 
   Claims of international Zionist or imperialist conspiracies 
against Russia are prominent features of the ideologies of most 
Russian ultranationalist groups.  The mainstream Russian media 
have noted the commonality of conspiracy theories among the 
movements, as illustrated by the following account of the first 
meeting of General Aleksandr Sterligov's Russian National 
Assembly, from a Moscow Mayak radio account:  "What unites these 
people?  After all, one can see monarchists, nationalists, KGB 
staffers, engineering and technical personnel, along with many 
military and communist figures in the hall.  So, in the view of 
these patriots, international forces embodied by the 
International Zionist Organization, the World Jewish Congress, 
and some other organizations are destroying Slavic statehood 
through the United Nations, the CSCE, the EC, and NATO." (12 June 
1992) 
   From an ITAR-TASS report on the same meeting: "Addressing the 
delegates, [nationalist writer] Valentin Rasputin said that 
'Satanic forces are experimenting on Russia,' which is 
'surrounded by domestic and foreign devils,' and that 'Russia 
cannot recover from the blows it received from the democrats' . . 
  [Russian National Assembly Chairman] Aleksandr Sterligov said 
that Russia's foes are 'working on destroying Russia' and added 
that 'the goals of American imperialism to demolish Russia have 
been achieved' . . . Yeltsin and his accomplices have reached 
their objective to weaken Russia and now they can 'board their 
plane and fly off to their Western values.'" (12 June 1992) 
   Direct statements from ultranationalist groups themselves also 
cite the existence of conspiracies against Russia as in this 
appeal by military officers to the Russian Supreme Soviet:  "The 
destruction of the USSR has been carried out through the joint 
actions of imperialism, Zionism, and internal reaction." 
(Sovetskaya Rossiya, 25 March 1993) 
   From an interview with Vladimir Zhirinovskiy: "The United States 
is the evil empire, the nucleus of hell, which is behind the 
beginning of every war . . . .1 spit on the Russian Ministry of 
Foreign Affairs.  They are criminals, CIA agents'        They 
have trying to introduce their system everywhere and at all times 
. . . the Anglo-Saxon model under the ideological influence of 
Jerusalem." (Warsaw, Sztandar Mlodych, 1 February 1993). 
   From an interview with the Russian Orthodox Church's Metropolitan 
Ioann of St. Petersburg: 
   Reporter: "During the past 50 years it has been declared 
repeatedly that the 'Protocols of the Elders of Zion' is a 
literary falsification. 
   Ioann: I think this way: there is a saying that the cap burns on 
the thief.  If these Protocols are forged, then what are the 
Zionists worried about?  Of course it is difficult to determine 
who wrote them, but the program is already in operation. . . 
   Reporter: Do you believe in the possibility of a world conspiracy 
against Russia? 
   Ioann: It is not just possible, there is one. . .  Zionism is 
founded not on religious domination but on the golden calf, on 
domination on a global scale." (Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 16 April 
1993) 
   According to a 27 July 1993 Interfax report on a conference of 
the oppositionist National Salvation Front: "A number of 
nationally-minded parties' have left the NSF . . . . [Russian 
National Republican Party leader Nikolay] Lysenko claimed that 
certain unnamed members of the NSF [which includes Communist 
Party Chairman Gennadiy Zyuganov] were 'obsessed' with a 'Judeo- 
Masonic conspiracy'." 
   END BOX 2 
   Appendix A 
   Unless otherwise noted, all quotations below are from Derzhava 
   Continuity of Russian/Soviet History 
   The communist party has behaved differently toward the Church at 
different times in its history, from harsh opposition to 
cooperation during the Great Patriotic War. . . . I see no reason 
to repeat old mistakes . . . . We [CPRF] are for freedom of 
conscience to such a degree, that believers have the right to 
join our party without any sort of limitations. p.8 
   Life forces us to greater wisdom. . . . We should look at our own 
history and understand the meaning for the world of the thousand 
year history of Russian statehood . . . from century to century 
we were inspired by the labor and the achievements of our 
forebears in building a great power. . . . Our main, primary duty 
is to re-establish this holy connection [with our past]. p.13 
   An empire, a great power, they [the democrats] tell us, means an 
all-powerful bureaucracy . . . [it means] censorship, the absence 
of elementary rights. . . . This is a lie!  Empire is the 
historical and geopolitically stipulated form of development for 
the Russian state . . . it is many different . . . peoples, 
connected by a single general and higher culture. . . . From 
ancient times, Russia recognized itself as the successor and 
preserver of the imperial heritage.  'Moscow is the third Rome' . 
    Russia is the continuation of the universal imperial 
tradition. p.15 
   It [the national unity of imperial Russia] found expression in 
the formula "Autocracy, Orthodoxy, Narodnost [national roots]." 
p.15 
   The revolution of 1917 was the natural result of the general 
crisis . . . Autocracy gradually was transformed into a regime of 
all-powerful, cosmopolitan bureaucrats . . . [which had] divided 
the supreme power from the people. p.18 
   Having united the "red" ideal of social justice . . . and the 
"white" ideal of national . . . statehood [Russia will have] the 
might [necessary to reestablish] our . . . Fatherland! p.33 
   The Russian people . . . are the preservers of Russian statehood, 
its main bearer and defender . . . the free development of . . . 
peoples . . . who have connected their historical fate with 
Russia must become the cornerstone of Russian state policy. p.41 
   Conflict of the Two Parties Within the CPSU 
   In fact, there were two parties . . . [during] the Soviet period, 
and a fierce, but quiet struggle, between them took place. . 
The first was the party of "our country," the party to which 
. Zhukov and Gagarin belonged . . . the largest part of ordinary 
functionaries and administrators belonged to it . . . but there 
was a second party in the Soviet Union--the party of "that 
country," . . . for whom "that country," and "those people" were 
merely the arena for the realization of their own . . . ambitions 
and . . . reckless social experiments.  It was the party of 
Trotsky and Kaganovich, Beria, . . . Gorbachev and Yeltsin, 
Yakovlev and Shevardnadze.  Its legal successor today is 
"Demrossiya." p.66 
   I joined the party of . . . Zhukov . . . each person must bear 
personal responsibility for their own actions, and the effort [by 
the Yeltsin administration] to portray 40 million people, people 
who were members of the party, as state criminals--this is 
political genocide directed against the Russian people, and that 
cannot be allowed to happen again. p.7 
   [During the revolutionary period of 1917 and after] heroism and 
treachery . . . patriotism and Russophobia poured forth in one 
fiery torrent . . . among the victors. . . . [There were] various 
approaches to the future of the country . . . for some, Russia, 
regardless of her new name [the USSR], was . . . the Fatherland, 
the beloved native country . . . but for others she was simply 
. . [a platform] for the "permanent" revolution, a proving ground 
for new world cataclysms . . . for inhuman experiments . . . a 
reserve of resources and "human material."  The first group 
endeavored to reestablish the destroyed, paralyzed economy . . . 
to modernize the economy, build new factories, and resurrect the 
armed forces.  The second group . . . cruelly destroyed hostages 
by the thousands . . . [and] organized the concentration camps. 
.  . The interparty struggle of these two groups . . . went on for 
many long decades . . . and decisively predetermined the dramatic 
events of the last few years. p.19 
   [During World War II] for communists there was one privilege, to 
be the first raised up in battle, to be the first to be shot if 
captured. . . . During that period there was [an internal-party] 
decision to turn away from doctrinal myths, from Russophobia and 
the . . . anti-Church campaign. . . . [During the] "Khrushchev 
thaw" all of the haters of Russia were able to . . . freeze the 
process of Russian national rebirth which had only just begun. 
p.21 
   The Great Plot Against Russia 
   A.  Historical Roots 
   From "The Russian Question" (Sovetskaya Rossiya, 3 July 1993): 
   To a large extent, the West does not understand us.  It is afraid 
of our might as a world power.  It has a self-interest in 
weakening, dismembering, and, if possible, enslaving Russia . . . 
[efforts to do so span] a period of more than a thousand years. 
   The Western states and the transnational banking and financial 
corporations are, in the final analysis, the obedient relayers of 
thee aggressive and irreconcilable anti-Russian policy . . . an 
independent, self reliant Russia, [represents] in the modern 
world, the chief hindrance on the path of creating a "New World 
Order," that stipulates the formation of supernational agencies 
of political, economic, and military leadership.  That maniacal 
idea has an ancient history that is closely linked with the 
development of secret political societies, religious sects, and 
mystical dogmas.  But it was not until the end of the 20th 
century that the idea received the fundamental possibility of 
practical realization as a result of the achievements of 
scientific-technical programs and the objective processes of 
global economic integration. 
   B.  Current Manifestations 
   If you look over the program of the International Monetary Fund . 
. . you will find that the essence of it amounts to one thing--to 
make our economy non-competitive--first [they plan to] destroy 
fundamental science. . . . From the point of view of America, I 
understand their interest [in such a program].  From our point of 
view, this is nothing more than colonial democracy. . . . We live 
on one planet, on the same cosmic ship, which is flying through 
space at great speed, and if we violate the balance of 
equilibrium in something, and a narrow, American elite gets it 
into their heads to form a new planetary system of a one-party 
nature, and thereby establish a new dictatorship, a world order, 
then we are waiting for, in our own time, a Macedonian, 
Napoleonic, Hitlerian order.  [Such an order] is unnatural. pp. 
8-9 
   [Technological changes after the second world war make possible, 
for the first time in history] effective coordination of the 
development of world civilization in all the most important 
parameters. . . . It is not surprising that this development has 
caused the sharp activization of trans-national, cosmopolitan 
forces, who are attempting to realize such possibilities in the 
concrete geopolitical form of a world superstate.  This 
superstructure must, by the logic of its own elaboraters, 
gradually eliminate sovereign national states. . . . [These 
efforts] are proceeding from a single ruling center.  The 
practical work of the creation of such a center began long ago. 
p.23 
   The developed capitalist states are prepared to support the idea 
of the creation of the "New World Order," within which they will 
strengthen their own leading role. . . . [Within the New World 
Order] certain regions will prosper, while the development of 
others will be artificially frozen.  Is it necessary to clarify 
in which group Russia will be under such a "division of labor." 
p. 23 
   [Under conditions of a division of labor there must be a] planned 
reduction [of population] . . . of peoples "without prospects" 
. . It is easy to do it by regulating the conditions of life 
without need of concentration camps or gas chambers.  In Russia, 
in any event, for two years . . . the population has been 
dropping, and this is a concrete example of how economic 
"reforms" can regulate demographic processes. p.25 
   Our own "time of troubles" has obviously revealed the fact of a 
crisis of Russian national consciousness.  The collapse of the 
Soviet Union convincingly has shown that the denationalized 
ideology of the "stagnation" period was not able to resist the 
destructive, anti-state activities of Russia's enemies. . . . The 
nationalist regimes of the periphery were able to form and 
survive thanks to two factors: the betrayal by the ruling clique 
of the interests of the Russian people and the apathy of a 
significant part of the Russian majority, which found itself 
indifferent to the fate of their own countrymen who were 
"abroad." p. 29 
   "De-Russification" is being carried out by the current regime . . 
. by the order of, and under the control of, world-wide "centers 
of influence." p.29 
   I have studied documents of the State Department of the USA and 
the CIA, which were directed toward the destruction of our 
country and requested the Constitutional Court, where they [the 
government] were trying to portray the CPSU as a criminal 
organization, to publish them.  Let everyone know who is who and 
what are their true plans. p.38 
   The experience of the last few years proves the lie of the idea 
of division of powers . . . it is necessary to subordinate the 
executive power to the legislative and liquidate the institution 
of the presidency. p. 69 
   The executive authority has deprived itself of legitimacy, having 
. . . violated the . . . Constitution . . . the results of the 
[December] referendum have no legal force . . . a so called 
opposition bloc, that of Shakray, is being formed for the purpose 
of the formation of a dictatorship of the Anglo-American type. . 
. . All of this, down to the last detail, was thought out and 
considered for the purpose of deceiving the people. p.75 
   From "Appeal to the Citizens of Russia by the National Salvation 
Front Organizing Committee" signed by Zyuganov, among others: We 
are convinced that the tragedy that has befallen our country is 
the result of a deliberate anti-people policy by the ruling 
elite. . . . The foreign masters of our new rulers are going 
around Russia telling us what to do and how to live (Sovetskaya 
Rossiya, 1 October 1992). 
   Opposition Strategy 
   Why should we communists take part in the elections?  First of 
all so that we, together with our people, who have been decieved 
[by the Yeltsin regime], can try to take advantage of the small 
possibility [opened for us by the elections] for liberating the 
people from deception. p.75 
   In brief, this set of methods [used by the Yeltsin regime to 
destroy the opposition] could be formulated as follows: 
"DIVISION--CONFLICT--DEADLOCK--EXPLOSION--COLLAPSE."  The seed of 
division is introduced. . . . The rival factions are artificially 
polarized. . . . This is followed by political deadlock and then 
a severe crisis, in the course . . . of which the "enemy" 
political grouping is liquidated. 
   There is no future for the present anti-popular regime, however. 
IF IT IS COMPELLED TO EXIST FOR ANY LENGTH OF TIME UNDER THE 
CONDITIONS OF PEACEFUL, NONVIOLENT DEVELOPMENT AND LEGAL 
STABILITY, IT WILL INEVITABLY BE SWEPT AWAY BY THE OPPOSITION. 
The present "elite" can hold on to power only by intensifying the 
dictatorship.  Increasingly new conflicts and social unrest are 
needed as a pretext for this. p.63 
   (AUTHOR:  ALLENSWORTH.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL 
CHIEF, ANALYSIS BRANCH, RUSSIA DIVISION (703) 733-6070.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/CB 21/0049z May 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47635 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000028394001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   24 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-23MAY94-KOREA 
<H3> <TI>      North Accuses South of 'Kidnapping' Loggers </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       North Accuses South of 'Kidnapping' Loggers </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Protesting      Seoul's role in the recent escape of a group of North 
Korean lumberjacks from a Siberian logging camp to South Korea, 
Pyongyang is demanding the "unconditional and prompt" return of 
the "kidnapped" loggers to the North, warning that the South will 
"pay dearly" should it reject the North Korean demand.  In a 
"telephone message" conveyed to the South through the North-South 
Liaison Office at Panmunjom on 21 May, the Committee for the 
Peaceful Reunification of the Fatherland (CPRF) called the 
"kidnapping" of the six loggers a "shameless, inhuman, and 
barbaric act" that cannot be "tolerated" (KCNA).  The message by 
the CPRF, a quasi-official organization Pyongyang often uses to 
register its position on inter-Korean issues, also signaled 
Pyongyang's concern about possible future defections by warning 
of unspecified "grave consequences" in "North-South relations as 
a whole," if the South "continues kidnapping" North Korean 
loggers. 
   Against the backdrop of increasing South Korean reporting of 
sensational accounts of the "inhuman" treatment of North Korean 
loggers in Siberia, some of whom had allegedly fled the camp and 
were seeking asylum in South Korea, Pyongyang, in recent months, 
has repeatedly accused Seoul of attempting to "kidnap" its 
workers.  A Foreign Ministry spokesman's statement on 9 April, 
for example, warned of an "immediate" and "decisive 
countermeasure" should the South abduct North Korean workers 
(KCNA).  Subsequently, as South Korean reporting about the 
alleged plight of North Korean loggers continued, another Foreign 
Ministry spokesman's statement on 11 May indirectly warned of the 
adverse effect on DPRK-Russian ties should the Russian 
authorities allow the South Koreans to carry out their 
"kidnapping plot" (KCNA).  Reflecting the Pyongyang regime's 
sensitivity to the possible domestic repercussion of the loggers' 
defection, monitored Pyongyang domestic media have not reported 
or commented on the issue. 
   (AUTHOR:  YIM.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6534.) 
EAG/HEBBEL/PF 23/1901z May 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47636 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000028494001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   24 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-069--Russia 
<H3> <TI>      RUSSIA/UKRAINE/BELARUS/KAZAKHSTAN:  IDENTIFICATIONS OF ARMS </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       RUSSIA/UKRAINE/BELARUS/KAZAKHSTAN:  IDENTIFICATIONS OF ARMS </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
CONTROL   OFFICIALS (NO. 3) 

   This Foreign Media Note lists selected Russian, Ukrainian, 
Belarusian, and Kazakhstani officials who have been identified in 
the open media as being involved with arms control and related 
issues. 

   RUSSIAN DIPLOMATIC OFFICIALS 

   Ivanov, Aleksandr.  Acting chairman, President's Committee for 
Convention-Related Problems of Chemical and Biological Weapons. 
Former chairman Anatoliy Kuntsevich reportedly chose Ivanov to serve 
as acting chairman just before his dismissal (NOVOYE VREMYA No. 16, 
Apr 94 p 9). 

   Kulebyakin, Vyacheslav.  Head of Russian delegation to CFE Joint 
Consultative Group (ITAR-TASS 0619 GMT 17 Nov 93).  Previously 
served as head of Soviet delegation to Vienna Talks on Confidence- 
and Security-Building Measures in Europe (TASS 1613 GMT 4 Dec 91). 

   Shelepin, Mikhail.  Chief, Conventional Weapons Sector (otdel), 
Ministry of Foreign Affairs, presumably a subdivision of the Foreign 
Ministry Arms Control Department (departament) (IZVESTIYA 29 Oct 93 
First Edition p 3) 

   Zemskov, Valeriy.  Acting permanent representative to the Geneva 
Conference on Disarmament (ITAR-TASS 1007 GMT 17 Aug 93). 

   RUSSIAN INTELLIGENCE OFFICIALS 

   Yevstafyev, Gennadiy.  Chief, Arms Control and Proliferation 
Department, Foreign Intelligence Service (MOSCOW NEWS No. 2, 17 Jan 
94 p A14). 

   RUSSIAN MILITARY OFFICIALS 

   Alekseyev, Col Vladislav Arsenyevich.  Officer, Arms Reduction 
Treaty Implementation Support Center, Strategic Missile Forces 
(KRASNAYA ZVEZDA 25 Mar 94 p 2). 

   Ivanov, Lt Gen Gennadiy.  Chief, Military Building and Reform 
Directorate, Ministry of Defense.  Previously group leader in the 
Center for Operational and Strategic Research (OBSHCHAYA GAZETA No. 
4, 28 Jan 94 p 7).  Headed Russian delegation to May 1994 U.S.- 
Russian talks in Moscow on military and security issues; identified 
as "defense minister's aide for military politics" (ITAR-TASS 0846 
GMT 5 May 94). 

   Kharchenko, Lt Gen Dmitriy.  Chief, International Treaty 
Directorate.  Promoted from major general to lieutenant general and 
given the additional title of deputy chief of the General Staff 
(OBSHCHAYA GAZETA No. 4, 28 Jan 94 p 7). 

   Khristoforidi, Col Georgiy.  "Specialist," Arms Reduction Treaty 
Implementation Support Center, Strategic Missile Forces (KRASNAYA 
ZVEZDA 25 Mar 94 p 2). 

   Kirshkovskiy, Lt Col Sergey.  Communications officer, Arms 
Reduction Treaty Implementation Support Center, Strategic Missile 
Forces (KRASNAYA ZVEZDA 25 Mar 94 p 2). 

   Kiryushin, Col Mikhail.  Demolition engineer, Arms Reduction 
Treaty Implementation Support Center, Strategic Missile Forces 
(KRASNAYA ZVEZDA 25 Mar 94 p 2). 

   Lukyanov, Maj Gen Anatoliy.  Deputy chief, International Treaty 
Directorate, Ministry of Defense (KRASNAYA ZVEZDA 19 Jan 94 p 3). 

   Maslin, Col Gen Yevgeniy Petrovich.  Chief, 12th Main Directorate 
(Nuclear Munitions), Ministry of Defense.  Served as spokesman on 
removal of strategic nuclear weapons from Ukraine (ITAR-TASS 1320 
GMT 4 Sep 93; KRASNAYA ZVEZDA 19 Jan 94 p 3).  Identified as Defense 
Ministry's "chief specialist" in nuclear safety issues (Moscow Mayak 
Radio 1336 GMT 18 Jan 94). 

   Murashchenkov, Col Anatoliy.  Chief, Arms Reduction Treaty 
Implementation Support Center, Strategic Missile Forces (KRASNAYA 
ZVEZDA 25 Mar 94 p 2). 

   Orzhekhovskiy, Col Vasiliy.  Demolition engineer, Arms Reduction 
Treaty Implementation Support Center, Strategic Missile Forces 
(KRASNAYA ZVEZDA 24 Mar 94 p 2). 

   Pavlov, Lt Col Anatoliy.  "Specialist," Arms Reduction Treaty 
Implementation Support Center, Strategic Missile Forces (KRASNAYA 
ZVEZDA 25 Mar 94 p 2). 

   Romashev, Col Valentin.  "Specialist," Arms Reduction Treaty 
Implementation Support Center, Strategic Missile Forces (KRASNAYA 
ZVEZDA 25 Mar 94 p 2). 

   Shpirko, Lt Col Mikolay.  "Specialist," Arms Reduction Treaty 
Implementation Support Center, Strategic Missile Forces (KRASNAYA 
ZVEZDA 25 Mar 94 p 2). 

   Tarasevich, Maj Gen Yuriy.  Deputy chief, Radiation, Chemical, 
and Biological Protection Troops, Ministry of Defense; briefed State 
Duma on implementation of chemical weapons elimination agreements 
(INTERFAX 1459 GMT 24 Mar 94; KRASNAYA ZVEZDA 25 Mar 94 p 1). 

   Titov, Maj Andrey.  Communications officer, Arms Reduction Treaty 
Implementation Support Center, Strategic Missile Forces (KRASNAYA 
ZVEZDA 25 Mar 94 p 2). 

   Volkov, Col Gen Aleksandr Petrovich.  First deputy commander, 
Strategic Missile Forces, and in charge of missile elimination under 
START treaties (KRASNAYA ZVEZDA 25 Mar 94 p 2). 

   Yakunin, Lt Col Viktor.  "Specialist," Arms Reduction Treaty 
Implementation Support Center, Strategic Missile Forces (KRASNAYA 
ZVEZDA 25 Mar 94 p 2). 

   Yevstigneyev, Lt Gen Valentin Ivanovich.  Deputy chief, 
Radiation, Chemical, and Biological Protection Troops, Ministry of 
Defense.  Has served as spokesman to deny that Russia is continuing 
Soviet biological weapons development programs (IZVESTIYA 17 Apr 92 
Morning Edition p 7; NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA 15 Sep 92 p 3; KRASNAYA 
ZVEZDA 30 Mar 94 p 3) and on BW inspection agreement with U.S. and 
Great Britain (KRASNAYA ZVEZDA 16 Sep 92 p 3). 

   UKRAINIAN OFFICIALS 

   Demyanenko, Vladislav.  Deputy chief, Disarmament and Arms 
Control Department, Ministry of Foreign Affairs (INTERFAX 1347 GMT 
20 Apr 94). 

   Shmarov, Valeriy.  Deputy prime minister in charge of military- 
industrial complex and defense conversion (NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA 14 
Apr 94 p 3).  In spring 1994, he headed the Ukrainian delegations in 
talks with U.S. officials in Kiev and in Washington on the 
trilateral START I implementation agreement and on control of 
missile technology proliferation (UKRINFORM-TASS 0743 GMT 8 Apr 94; 
ITAR-TASS 1606 GMT 4 May 94; Kiev Ukrayinske Radio 0500 GMT 13 May 
94).  He also headed the Ukrainian delegation at multilateral talks 
in Kiev on nuclear disarmament (NARODNA ARMIYA 21 Apr 94 p 1). 

   Tertychnyy, Col Volodymyr.  Deputy chief, Center for 
Administrative Control of Nuclear Strategic Forces, Ministry of 
Defense (Narodna Armiya 23 Feb 94 p 1). 

   BELARUSIAN OFFICIALS 

   Mikulin, Maj Gen Ya. I.  Chief, National Verification and 
Inspection Agency, Ministry of Defense (VO SLAVU RODINY 13 Apr 94 p 
1; ZVYAZDA 6 May 94 pp 1, 2).  The previous chief, Viktor Vakar, is 
now head of the Armed Forces Military Academy (RESPUBLIKA 4 May 94 p 
2). 

   Osip, Col I.  Deputy chief, National Verification and Inspection 
Agency, Ministry of Defense (VO SLAVU RODINY 29 Dec 93 p 1). 

   Puhachow, Vasil.  Chief, Scientific and Technical Committee, 
Ministry  of Defense.  Interviewed on the progress of Belarusian 
disarmament and demilitarization (ZVYAZDA 6 May 94 pp 1, 2). 

   KAZAKHSTANI OFFICIALS 

   Zhukeyev, Tulegen.  Deputy prime minister, previously state 
counselor (ABV 8 Apr 94 p 6).  As state counselor, he served as 
spokesman on Kazakhstani plans for nuclear disarmament (NEZAVISIMAYA 
GAZETA 24 Jun 94 pp 1, 2), the Semipalatinsk nuclear test site 
(KRASNAYA ZVEZDA 14 Jan 94 p 3), the Baykonur space-launch facility 
(Almaty Kazakh Radio 1500 GMT 12 Jan 94), rebutting rumors of 
inadequate safety and security measures at nuclear weapons storage 
sites (Almaty Kazakh Radio 0700 GMT 14 Feb 94), and on Kazakhstani 
peacekeeping troops in Tajikistan (KRASNAYA ZVEZDA 8 Apr 94 p 1). 
Reportedly, his promotion to deputy prime minister does not involve 
any change in his areas of responsibility (ABV 8 Apr 94 p 6). 

(AUTHOR:  O'LEARY.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLESE CALL CHIEF, 
MILITARY/INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS BRANCH, CIS DIVISION (703) 733-6375.) 

ENEAG/23 MAY/MILFI/CIS DIVISION/PF 23/1945z May 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47637 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000028594001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   24 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-071--Mongolia 
<H3> <TI>      MONGOLIA:  Joint Ventures, No 2, 1994 </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       MONGOLIA:  Joint Ventures, No 2, 1994 </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
Twelve      additional joint ventures have been registered at the 
Mongolian State Registry since 11 May 93.  Seven of the foreign 
partner parties are Chinese, two are Russian, one is Japanese, and 
one is Malaysian. 

   The following 12 joint ventures have been registered at the State 
Registry in accordance with the Foreign Investment Law and the Law 
on Economic Units since 11 May 1993.  (For reporting on 48 earlier 
registered joint ventures, see FB PN92-386, FB PN 92-426, FM PN 92- 
479, and FB PN 94-041.) 

   1.  "Altan aral" BBHK (expansion not given) -- Registration No.: 
760846; Mongolian participating party:  "Moriton" BBHK; Foreign 
participating party:  Buryat Agricultural Institute in Russia; 
Investment:  7,596,600 tugriks; Business activity:  Production of a 
type of feed and consumer goods, travel and tourist office and 
restaurant; Duration:  8 years; Director:  B. Sanjargal (Selenge 
Aymag, Suhbaatar City) 

   2.  "Monsya" BBHK -- Registration No.:  760986; Mongolian 
participating party:  Vehicle Trailer Enterprise UUG (expansion not 
given); Foreign participating party:  Ningsia Province Import and 
Export Company in China; Investment:  2,402,000 tugriks; Business 
activity:  Production and sale of furniture; Duration:  5 years; 
Director:  Yang Ben-Yuuy (Ulaanbaatar, Han-Uul, Vehicle Trailer 
Enterprise 

   3.  "Ard-Bogd san chuan" BBHK -- Registration No.:   761117; 
Mongolian participating party:  National Center for standardization 
and Measurements; Foreign participating party:  OMODzO (expansion 
not given) Main Center for the Development of Approximate 
Measurements in China; Investment:  3.5 million tugriks; Business 
Activity:  Installation and repair of some kinds of measuring and 
laboratory instruments and equipment; Duration:  4 years; Director: 
Y. Gantogoo (Ulaanbaatar-51, Songinohayran, National Standardization 
Building) 

   4.  "Yargay-Shafa" BBHK -- Registration No.:  761389 
Mongolian participating party:  Citizens S. Pagma and T. Galsan; 
Foreign participating party:  OMODzO Main "Shafani" Glass Factory in 
China; Investment:  750,000 tugriks; Business activity:  Production 
of furniture parts; Duration:  3 years; Director:  S. Pagma 
(Ulaanbaatar-Bayandzurh, Block No 12, Building No 1) 

   5.  "Soyol" BBHK -- Registration No.:  761249; Mongolian 
participating partner:  Citizen G. Damdinsuren; Foreign 
participating partner:  OMODzO Movie Industry of China; Investment: 
4,385,700 tugriks; Business activity:  Colored photos, recordings, 
exports and imports; Duration:  5 years; Director"  Yang-Go Wang 
(Ulaanbaatar-Bayandzurh, Block no 13, Building 1) 

   6.  "Minj" BBHK -- Registration No.:  761516; Mongolian 
participating party:  "Moriton" BBHK; Foreign participating party: 
Ulaanhad City Wood Products Enterprise in China; Investment: 
6,436,900 tugriks; Business activity:  Production of household 
articles made of wood, tourism, and information dissemination; 
Duration:  7 years; Director:  T. Badarch (Suhbaatar Somon, Selenge 
Aymag) 

   7.  "MonSib orakul: BBHK -- Registration No.:  761648; Mongolian 
participating partner:  "Dzabiyaa"  BBHK; Foreign participating 
party:  "Tusarosk" Company in Novosibirsk, Russia; Investment: 
2,666,600 tugriks; Business activity:  Production of leather goods, 
work clothes and children's clothing; Duration:  5 years; Director: 
G. A. Anatolivich (Nalayh, former Social and Economic Services 
Industry Building) 

   8.  "Singamon" BBHK -- Registration No.:  764078; Mongolian 
participating party:  "Michid" BBHK; Foreign participating party: 
Singapore citizens Ho Van Kiok arid Ho Bon Sen; Investment: 
$40,000; 
Business activity:  Production of beverage and coffee containers; 
Duration:  10 years; Director:  L. Baygali  (Ulaanbaatar-Suhbaatar, 
Union of Mongolian Writers Training Center) 

   9.  "En-ji" BBHK -- Registration No.:  764337; Mongolian 
participating party:  "Ololt" BBHK; Foreign participating party: 
Japanese citizen Atsuko Koji; Investment:  1,830,000 tugriks; 
Business activity:  Silk printing, translations and the repair and 
servicing of electric equipment; Duration:  3 years; Director:  D. 
Bat-Erdene (Ulaanbaatar-Bayangol, District IV, No 63-33) 

   10. "Deej" BBHK -- Registration No.:  759775; Mongolian 
participating party:  "Monteh-Ornol"; Foreign participating party: 
OMODzO Hohhot "Silen" Company in China; Investment:  9,000,000 
tugriks; Business activity:  Bread and pastry production; Duration: 
5 years; Director:  N. Lundaa (Ulaanbaatar-Songinohayrhan, 0U 
(expansion not given) "Gurban gol" Geology Company) 

   11. "MONT" BBHK -- Registration No. 760048; Mongolian 
participating party:  Six persons including M. Sambuu; Foreign 
participating party:  Six Russian citizens including  Kudryanov; 
Investment:  $12,500; Business activity:  Supply of petroleum 
equipment, installation and production of some; Duration:  5 years; 
Director:  D. Batsuuri (Ulaanbaatar-Songinohayrhan, District 10 
Dzuun-Bayan-Uul 8, No 4) 

   12. Bayan-Fu" BBHK -- Registration No.:  760315; Mongolian 
participating party:  State Security Administration Unit No 0119 
UUG; Foreign participating party: "Fushunuot" Textile Company in 
Liaoning Province, China; Investment:  2,280,000 tugriks; Business 
activity:  Wood household furniture and pastry enterprise; Duration: 
1 year; Director:  S. Damdinsuren (Ulaanbaatar-Suhbaatar dzuun ayl) 
(Ulaanbaatar ARDYN ERH in Mongolian 1 Feb 94 p 2) 

(AUTHOR:  MIAB/CISD.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
MILITARY/INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS BRANCH, CIS DIVISION, (703) 733- 
6375.) 

ENEAG/23 MAY/ECONF/CIS DIVISION/PF 23/1951z May 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47638 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000028694001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   24 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-070--Mongolia 
<H3> <TI>      MONGOLIA:  PERIODICAL UPDATE, FEBRUARY 1994 </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       MONGOLIA:  PERIODICAL UPDATE, FEBRUARY 1994 </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
The      Mongolian political climate, rising inflation and chronic 
paper shortage have contributed to changes in periodicity and costs, 
renaming, and cancellation of Mongolian periodicals.  Despite these 
problems four new periodicals were announced in the February 1994 
publications list.  A comparison of data released in the 
publications lists issued in September 1993 and February 1994 
indicates that four periodicals had no periodicity or subscription 
rate changes, eleven have undergone either periodicity or rate 
modifications, two showed changes in both, and one offered a special 
rate.  The latest comprehensive list also announced the cancellation 
of three periodicals. 

   I.   New Titles 

   The following are the titles of the new periodicals announced in 
the subscription availability list released on 4 February 1994: 

   1. A new quarterly ILD BAMBAY (Shield and Sword), 100 tugriks an 
issue.  Index No. 14534 

   2. TSAGAAN DUN (White Snail), a quarterly, 80 tugriks an issue. 
Index No. 14532 

   3. UNDESNIY SOYOLYN DZAM (Road of National Culture), a quarterly, 
80 tugriks an issue.  Index No. 14517 

   4. PATENTYN MEDEELEL (Patent Information), a monthly, whose 
quarterly subscription rate is 300 tugriks.  Index No. 14572. 

   The sponsors of these four titles are not identified. 

   II.  Name Change 

   SOYOMBO (the emblem on the Mongolian coat of arms) has been 
renamed STRATEG SUDLAL (Strategic Studies).  It will appear 
quarterly at the subscription rate of 30 tugriks an issue.  Index 
No. 14529. 

   III.  Same Periodicity and Rate 

   Periodicals whose subscription rate and periodicity remain the 
same include the following: 

   1. ERUUL MEND (Health) continues to be a quarterly costing 40 
tugriks an issue.  Index No. 14526 

   2. MONGOLYN ANAGAAH UHAAN (Mongolian Medical Science) remains a 
quarterly costing 50 tugriks an issue.  Index No. 14528 

   3. SHINJLEH UHAAN AMIDRAL (Science and Life) continues to be 
published once a quarter and costs 25 tugriks an issue.  Index No. 
14544 

   4. The price for the quarterly ADAL YABDAL (Adventure) remains at 
50 tugriks per issue.  Index No. 14558 

   IV.   Same Periodicity, Rate Change 

   The following seven periodicals have maintained their periodicity 
but show an increase or decrease in subscription rates compared to 
those quoted in the September 1993 listing: 

   1. The quarterly AMIDRAH UHAAN (Science of Living) increased from 
100 tugriks to 150 tugriks an issue.  Index No. 14506 

   2. The price of the quarterly GOO MARAL (Beautiful Doe) increased 
from 100 tugriks to 180 tugriks an issue.  Index No. 14512 

   3. The quarterly rate for the monthly HUULI DZUYN MEDEELEL 
(Legal Information) decreased from 330 tugriks to 180 tugriks. 
Index No. 14511 

   4. MONGOL BOH (Mongol Wrestler) continues to be published six 
times each quarter but its subscription rate has increased from 90 
tugriks to 110 tugriks.  Index No. 14530 

   5. The quarterly subscription rate for the monthly SETGUULCH 
(Journalist) rose from 30 tugriks to 90 tugriks. Index No. 14518 

   6. SHINJLEH UHAANY AKADEMIYN MEDEE (News of the Academy of 
Sciences) is a quarterly whose subscription rate increased from 25 
tugriks per issue to 35 tugriks.  Index No. 14544 

   7. The rate for the quarterly HOLBOOCHIN (Communications Worker), 
index no 14555, increased from 20 tugriks to 25 tugriks an issue. 
Index No. 14555 

   V. Periodicity, Rate Change 

   Periodicals whose periodicity and subscription rates changed 
since  September include the following: 

   1. The number of issues of STANDARTCHILAL HEMJIL DZUY 
(Standardization and Measurements) will increase each quarter to 
three and cost 180 tugriks instead two issues per quarter at 120 
tugriks.  Index No. 14548 

   2. TORIYN MEDEEEL (Government News) will appear three times a 
quarter costing 600 tugriks instead of two times a quarter at 400 
tugriks.  Index No. 14503 

   VI.   Special Rate 

   Subscriptions for the monthly DZASGIYN GADZRYN MEDEELEL 
(Government Report) may be procured for a nine-month period at a 
cost of 450 tugriks for nine issues or on a quarterly basis for 
three issues at 150 tugriks.  Index No. 14504 

   VI.   Cancellations 

   The Feburary 1994 list announced that the publication of the 
following periodicals available in 1993 has ceased:  BOLOBSROL 
(Education), HUN BOLOX BAGAASAA (Young People as Persons) and 
BIDZNESNIY MEDEE (Business News). (Ulaanbaatar ARDYN ERH in 
Mongolian 4 Feb 94 p 3) 

(AUTHOR:  MIAB/CISD.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
MILITARY/INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS BRANCH, CIS DIVISION, (703) 733- 
6375.) 

ENEAG/23 MAY/POLCHF/CIS DIVISION/PF 23/1956z May 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47639 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000028794001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   25 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-24MAY94-CROATIA 
<H3> <TI>      Tudjman Renews Threat to Use Force Against RSK </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Tudjman Renews Threat to Use Force Against RSK </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
Indicating      his frustration at the lack of progress in 
implementing the March ceasefire plan and the postponement of 
talks with separatist Serbs on confidence building measures, 
Croatian President Franjo Tudjman has issued an ultimatum 
demanding that control of the UN Protected Areas (UNPA's) be 
returned to the Croatian Government by September.  In a 21 May 
speech, he pledged that the Croatian Government would "do its 
utmost" to regain control of Serb-held territory--the so-called 
Republic of Serbian Krajina (RSK)--"in a peaceful way," declaring 
that this process must be completed "within the current mandate" 
of the UN Protection Force (UNPROFOR) that expires on 30 
September.  If negotiations fail, he warned, Croatia "will use 
all means to which it is entitled as an internationally 
recognized and sovereign" state to establish legal control over 
"every inch of Croatian soil" once the current UNPROFOR mandate 
expires (Zagreb TV, 21 March).  In recent weeks Tudjman and his 
government have expressed growing frustration with UNPROFOR's 
"inefficiency" in halting the "crimes" of the "Serb terrorists 
and occupiers" and complained about the lack of progress in 
holding the talks envisioned by the 30 March ceasefire agreement 
(Zagreb TV, 15 and 20 May). 

   Tudjman's 21 May remarks mark a sharp break with the policy he 
had followed since November 1993 of avoiding threats to use force 
to reintegrate the UNPA's.  At that time, Tudjman had announced a 
"peace initiative" on 2 November 1993 to seek a "political 
solution", after acknowledging that his government's policies had 
created an impression with "parts of the Serbian population" of 
Croatia that the conflict with the RSK would be resolved by 
"military means" and "ethnic cleansing" (Zagreb TV, 2 November). 
In the following months, he and other Croat leaders, while not 
giving an absolute guarantee that the Croatian government would 
eschew an eventual military solution, had carefully avoided 
threatening to use force against the Krajina Serbs (Trends, 15 
December 1993, pages 47-51). 

(AUTHOR:  NASH.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF 
ANALYST, EUROPE AND LATIN AMERICA GROUP, (703) 733-6120) 

ELAG/HEBBEL/JF 24/2346Z MAY 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47640 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000028894001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   25 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE BY U.S. GOVERNMENT CONSUMERS. 
IT IS BASED ON DATA COLLECTED BY FBIS AND IS ISSUED 
WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER U.S. GOVERNMENT 
COMPONENTS. 
MEDIA GUIDE--FB WMR 94-002--ISRAEL 
<H3> <TI>      FBIS MEDIA GUIDE:  ISRAEL </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       FBIS MEDIA GUIDE:  ISRAEL </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
INTRODUCTION 

        This guide is intended to help users of Foreign Broadcast 
Information Service (FBIS) translations assess the value and 
reliability of Israeli media sources.  Characterizations of the 
sources identified in this guide, where provided, are based on 
FBIS analysis of media content.  The "sourcelines" cited at the 
beginning of each entry are the descriptors used by FBIS to 
identify media sources of FBIS translations.  Sourcelines are 
composed of three elements--the place of origin of the medium, 
its name, and the language it uses. 

   PRINT MEDIA 

   Israel possesses an extensive, lively, and often outspoken 
press that spans a broad political spectrum on international, as 
well as national issues.  While subject to state control on 
matters affecting national security, Israeli newspapers have 
managed to exercise considerable freedom in both reporting and 
editorial comment.  A number of publications are formally 
affiliated with political parties or interest groups, while 
others are published independently.  Taken together, they provide 
a wide range of reporting and editorial opinion.  Israeli papers 
are vulnerable to market forces--particularly the smaller 
newspapers--as illustrated in recent months by the demise of two 
longtime publications, the daily HADASHOT and the weekly HA'OLAM 
HAZE. 

   In terms of political ideology, the mainstream press can be 
divided generally as follows:  'AL HAMISHMAR and DAVAR are left- 
leaning, tending to support socialist economic principles; both 
they and HA'ARETZ are conciliatory on peace process issues; 
MA'ARIV, HATZOFE, and THE JERUSALEM POST are right-leaning, 
tending toward a harder line on both national defense and peace 
process issues; while YEDI'OT AHARONOT is centrist.  A given 
newspaper's coverage of national security affairs often coincides 
with its political ideology.  Thus, the views of conservative 
military commentator Gerald Steinberg are carried in the 
nationalist dailies HATZOFE and THE JERUSALEM POST, while 
moderate Ze'ev Schiff writes for the liberal HA'ARETZ.  In 
addition to divergent political views, individual newspapers are 
also distinguished by their varying views on religion, economics, 
and military affairs.  For example, the daily HATZOFE, published 
by the National Religious Party (MAFDAL), advocates its own 
approach to orthodox religious affairs. 
   There is also a distinct Palestinian press, published mostly 
in East Jerusalem and catering primarily to the interests of 
Palestinians in the occupied territories.  While generally 
representing mainstream Palestinian views, several leading 
Palestinian papers have in recent years demonstrated a growing 
independence in their editorial commentary and occasionally 
criticize Palestinian leaders from both the territories and the 
Palestine Liberation Organization (PLO).  At the same time, the 
Palestinian press remains subject to censorship by the Israeli 
authorities and has also experienced turbulence as a result of 
the Palestinian uprising and the Palestinian movement's political 
and financial difficulties.  Several publications have been 
forced to cease operations either by Israeli order or due to 
inadequate funds. 


   ISRAELI PUBLICATIONS 

'AL HAMISHMAR 

Sourceline:              Tel Aviv 'AL HAMISHMAR in Hebrew 

Translation of name:     On Guard 

Type of publication:     Newspaper 

Days of publication:     Daily except Saturday 

Address:                 P.O. Box 61999, 2 Rehov Homa U'migdal, 
                         Tel Aviv 67771 

Editor in chief:         Tzvi Timor 

Managing editor:         Yisra'el Zamir 

Major writers:           Betzal'el 'Amiqam, Yoram Bar, Arye 
                         Palgi, Yitzhaq Shor (military), Moti 
                         Bassok (political), 'Eran Klein, Yo'av 
                         Kaspi, Yehuda Tzur 

Foreign Correspondents:  Pe'erli Shahar, Oerem Neubach (United 
                         States) 

Op-Ed:                   Pinhas 'Inbari (Arab affairs), Yisra'el 
                         Zamir, Avner Regev (political) 

Circulation:             16,500 daily; 17,500 Friday 

   Organ of United Workers' Party (MAPAM); owned by MAPAM's 
United Kibbutz Movement (Hakibbutz Hameuhad) and read mostly by 
kibbutz members; intellectual, left-wing.  The newspaper 
traditionally has strongly opposed the religious establishment 
and the concept of a national unity government; has generally 
sympathized with U.S. policies.  Advocates Palestinian rights; 
outspoken critic of Israeli policies in the territories. 
Relatively good standing among Israeli Arabs, who consider it the 
best "Jewish" daily.  Has little obvious political influence, but 
reflects the left-wing opinion of MAPAM, which is one of the 
three components of the Meretz bloc. 

BAMAHANE 

Sourceline:              Tel Aviv BAMAHANE in Hebrew 

Translation of name:     In the Camp 
Type of publication:     Weekly magazine 

Address:                 IDF P.O. Box 01013, 29 David Elazer 
                         Street Haqirya, Tel Aviv 

Editor in chief:         Colonel Orli Lahat-Eshkol 

Circulation:             70,000 

   Organ of the Israel Defense Forces; deals with all aspects of 
military life; carries interviews with key military officers. 
BITA'ON HEYL HA'AVIR 

Sourceline:              Tel Aviv BITA'ON HEYL HA'AVIR in Hebrew 

Translation of name:     Air Force Organ 

Type of publication:     Monthly magazine 

Publisher:               Air Force Command 

Address:                 IDF P.O. Box 01560, Tel Aviv 

Editor in chief:         Merav Halperin 

Major writers:           Daniyel Molad (deputy editor), Sharon 
                         Geva', Gil Arbel, Li'ora Schuster, 
                         Sharon Sade, Enar Govrin, Qobi Marinko 

Circulation:             30,000 

   Contains technical and military information pertaining to air 
warfare, in general, and Israel's air force in particular. 

DAVAR 

Sourceline:              Tel Aviv DAVAR in Hebrew 

Translation of name:     Word 

Type of publication:     Newspaper 

Days of publication:     Daily except Saturday 

Address:                 P.O. Box 199, 45 Sheinkin Street, Tel 
                         Aviv 

Editor in chief:         Yoram Peri 

Executive editor:        Daniyel Bloch 

Major writers:           Daniyel Bloch, Amir Oren, Natan Ro'i, 
                         Shlomo Ginossar (Knesset), Daniyel Ben- 
                         Simon, Tova Tzimuqi, 'Aliza Wallach 
                         (party politics), Onn Levi (defense), 
                         Dan Avidan (Arab affairs), Teddy Preuss 
                         (economic columnist), Yosi Melman 
                         (diplomatic) 

Foreign correspondents:  Miryam Fuchs (New York), Gid'on Kouts 
                         (Paris), Drora Perl (Washington) 

Circulation:             21,200 daily; 24,000 Friday 

   Davar is owned and subsidized by Histadrut (General Federation 
of Labor); supports Labor Party line; strongly anti-Likud. 
GLOBES 

Sourceline:              Tel Aviv GLOBES in Hebrew 

Type of publication:     Evening newspaper 

Days of publication:     Daily except Saturday 

Publisher:               Globes Group 

Address:                 P.O. Box 18041 127 Yigal Alon Street, 
                         Tel Aviv 61180 

Editor in chief:         Adam Barukh 

Major writer:            Ze'ev Klein, Itamar Levin (diplomatic 
                         and foreign affairs) 

Circulation:             25,000 subscribers 

   Business publication. 

HA' ARETZ 

Sourceline:              Tel Aviv HA'ARETZ in Hebrew 

Translation of name:     The Land 

Type of publication:     Newspaper 

Days of publication:     Daily except Saturday 

Publisher/Owner:         'Amos Schocken 

Address:                 21 Zalman Schocken Street, Tel Aviv 

Editor in chief:         Hanokh Marmari 

Managing editor:         Tzvi Bar-El 

Major writers:           'Aqiva Eldar and Hemi Shalev (politics), 
                         Dov Alfon (editor of weekend 
                         supplement), Aluf Ben, Eytan Rabin, 
                         Yerah Tal (defense), Yizhar Be'er (Arab 
                         affairs), Ilan Shehori (party politics), 
                         Gid'on Alon, Dan Margalit (Knesset), 
                         Nehemya Stressler (economics editor), 
                         'Uzi Benziman, Ran Kislev, Dani 
                         Rubinstein, Yosi Torpstein (territories) 

Op-Ed:                   Ze'ev Schiff: highly respected "dean" of 
                         Israel's military commentators, somewhat 
                         dovish in outlook 

                         Yo'el Marcus: influential commentator, 
                         close friend of Yitzhaq Rabin 

                         Dr. Shlomo Gross (pseudonym "Poles"): 
                         senior member of editorial board, wields 
                         strong influence over paper's editorial 
                         line and  coverage; writes weekly Friday 
                         column;  serious, in-depth analyst, with 
                         reliable sources 

                         Gid'on Samet: keen observer of local 
                         political scene, U.S.-Israeli relations 
                         Eliyahu Salpeter: member of editorial 
                         board, noted for analytical articles on 
                         social and international topics 

                         Dan Margalit: political commentator, 
                         returned to HA'ARETZ after short stint 
                         as MA'ARIV editor 

                         'Uzi Benziman, Ran Kislev: political 
                         commentators 

Foreign correspondents:  Ori Nir (Washington), Shlomo Shamir (New 
                         York), Nitzan Horowitz (Paris), 'Amos 
                         Ben-Vered (London), Yehuda Lahav 
                         (Central Europe), Hulda Liberanoma 
                         (Rome) 

Circulation:             52,000 

   Independent, liberal, intellectual daily.  Favors the Labor 
Party, free enterprise, and a pragmatic foreign policy. 
Generally sympathetic to U.S. policy.  Editorial line is dovish, 
secular, and strongly anti-trade union.  Read by policymakers, 
especially for reports by its parliamentary and diplomatic 
correspondents.  Owner, Schocken publishing house, also publishes 
books and several Jerusalem and Tel Aviv local magazines. 
Approximately 80 percent of circulation is derived from 
subscriptions. 

HATZOFE 

Sourceline:              Tel Aviv HATZOFE in Hebrew 

Translation of name:     The Observer 

Type of publication:     Newspaper 

Days of publication:     Daily except Saturday 

Address:                 66 Hamasger Street, Tel Aviv 

Editor:                  Moshe Ishon 

Major writers:           Ya'aqov Edelstein (politics), Sha'ul 
                         Schiff (political parties), Yona Kohen 
                         (Jerusalem bureau chief, Knesset), Arye 
                         Nafshi (Arab affairs), Barukh Adler 
                         (military, science, finance) 

Circulation:             7,000 daily; 8,000 Friday 

   Organ of National Religious Party (NRP), owned by the World 
Mizrahi Movement.  Serious, right-of-center, pragmatic.  Has 
small circulation and little apparent influence in Israel, but 
enjoys wide circulation among orthodox Jewish religious 
communities in the United States and Europe.  Extensive coverage 
of religious parties and related orthodox groups. 

THE ISRAEL ECONOMIST 

Sourceline:              Jerusalem THE ISRAEL ECONOMIST in 
                         English 

Type of publication:     Monthly magazine 

Publisher:               Israel Kelman 
Address:                 6 Hazanowitz St., P.O. Box 7052, 
                         Jerusalem 91070 

Editor:                  Ben Mollov 

   Independent political-economic publication. 

AL-ITTIHAD 

Sourceline:              Haifa AL-ITTIHAD in Arabic 

Translation of name:     The Union 

Masthead caption:        "Workers of the World Unite!" 

Type of publication:     Newspaper 

Days of publication:     Daily except Saturday 

Address:                 P.O. Box 104, Haifa 31000, 9 al-Hariri 
                         St. 

Editor in chief:         Nazir Majali 

Managing editor:         Tawfiq Tubi 

Major writers:           Antoine Shalhat (deputy editor), Yusuf 
                         Farah, Mahmud Abu-Shanab, 'Abd-al-Majid 
                         Hamdan, Fayiz Zu'bi, Nisim Abu-Khayt, 
                         Marzuq Halabi, Dr. Halim Salim 'Azzam 

Op-Ed:   Nazir Majali 

   Organ of the Israeli Communist Party, RAKAH (New Communist 
List), which is part of HADASH (Democratic Front for Peace and 
Equality). 

THE JERUSALEM POST 

Sourceline:              Jerusalem THE JERUSALEM POST in English 

Type of publication:     Newspaper 

Days of publication:     Daily except Saturday 

Publisher:               Yehuda Levi 

Address:                 P.O. Box 81 Romema, 91000 Jerusalem 

Executive editor:        David Bar-Ilan 

Major writers:           Michael Rotem (defense), Yig'al Kotzer 
                         (south Lebanon), Ilan Barzel (editor, 
                         economics), Alisa Odenheimer and Evelyn 
                         Gordon (economics), Asher Wallfish and 
                         Dan Izenberg (Knesset affairs), David 
                         Makovsky (politics), Judy Siegel 
                         (science), Jon Imanuel (Arab affairs) 

Op-Ed:                   Yosef Goell, Joel Rebibo, Asher Wallfish 

Foreign correspondents:  Allison Kaplan (Washington), Jonathan 
                         Schachter (New York), Tom Tugend (Los 
                         Angeles), Walter Ruby (Moscow) 

Circulation:             30,000 daily, 50,000 Friday; 50,000 
                         international edition to 90 countries, 
                         mainly the United States 

   THE JERUSALEM POST took a right-wing, pro-religious, and 
nationalist orientation following its purchase by Canadian 
newspaper magnate Conrad Black in 1989.  The change prompted the 
mass resignation of many of the paper's most important editors 
and journalists, who protested what they described as a heavy- 
handed intervention by the new publishers in the editorial 
management of the newspaper.  Prior to its sale, THE JERUSALEM 
POST, which was inaugurated as THE PALESTINE POST during the 
period of the British Mandate over Palestine, pursued a liberal, 
independent line and was traditionally supportive of Labor Party 
policies.  The paper enjoys wide readership among the diplomatic 
community, as well as among other English-language readers in 
both Israel and the United States. 

THE JERUSALEM REPORT 

Sourceline:              Jerusalem THE JERUSALEM REPORT in 
                         English 

Type of publication:     Biweekly magazine 

Publisher:               Sam Lipsky 

Address:                 P.O. Box 1805 Jerusalem 91017, 22 Yosef 
                         Rivlin St. 

Editor in chief:         Hirsh Goodman (former JERUSALEM POST 
                         defense correspondent) 

Managing editor:         David Horovitz 

Major writers:           Hanan Sher (senior editor), Natan 
                         Sharansky (Jewish world), Ehud Ya'ari 
                         (Arab world), Khalid Abu-Tu'amah 
                         (Palestinian affairs), Ze'ev Hafetz 
                         (former Shamir government press office 
                         director), Ze'ev Schiff (HA'ARETZ 
                         defense commentator) 

Circulation:             13,000 

   Covers Israeli political, social, and economic scene, as well 
as the Jewish world, in feature-style articles directed mainly at 
foreign readers who want an overview of developments.  Format 
similar to U.S. news weeklies.  Founded by journalists who broke 
with JERUSALEM POST after its change in ownership. 

MA' ARAKHOT 

Sourceline:              Tel Aviv MA'ARAKHOT in Hebrew 

Translation of name:     Military Campaigns 

Type of publication:     Bimonthly magazine 

Publisher:               Israel Defense Force Publishing 

Address:                 P.O. Box 7026 Tel Aviv 

Editorial Staff:         Lt. Col Rahel Rojanski (editor in 
                         chief), Avitar Ben-Tzedef (editor) 

   Doctrine and history of the Israel Defense Force (IDF). 
MA'ARIV 

Sourceline:              Tel Aviv MA'ARIV in Hebrew 

Translation of name:     Of the Evening (also name of evening 
                         prayer) 

Type of publication:     Evening newspaper 

Days of publication:     Daily except Saturday 

Publisher:               'Ofer Nimrodi 

Address:                 2 Carlebach Street, Tel Aviv 61200 

Editorial staff:         'Ofer Nimrodi (editor in chief), Ya'aqov 
                         Erez (editor) 

Major writers:           Avino'am Bar-Yosef (politics), 'Imanu'el 
                         Rosen (defense), Tzvi Levi and Menahem 
                         Rahat (Knesset affairs), Gabi Kessler 
                         (economics), David Lipkin and Shmu'el 
                         Nehushtan (economics), Shefi Gabay 
                         (Middle East), Hanan Schlein 
                         (territories) 

Op-Ed:                   Shalom Rosenfeld, Avraham Tirosh, Yosef 
                         Lapid, 'Oded Granot, Yosef Harif, 
                         Shmu'el Segev (security issues, U.S.- 
                         Israel relations), Shmu'el Schnitzer, 
                         Rafi Mann, David Landau 

Foreign correspondents:  Ben Kaspit (New York), 'Oded Shorer 
                         (Washington), Tamar Golan (Paris), 
                         Yehi'el Limor (London), Gad Shomron 
                         (Bonn), Alexander Lesser (Moscow) 

Circulation:             170,000 daily, 280,000 Friday 

   Formed in 1947 by a group of journalists who broke away from 
the evening paper YEDI'OT AHARONOT.  Paper is independent and 
secular, describes itself as having a "nationalistic, hawkish 
line in matters of foreign policy and security, and liberal views 
in social and economic affairs."  Second highest circulation of 
the Israeli press.  MA'ARIV was sold to the late British 
newspaper magnate Robert Maxwell in 1990; following Maxwell's 
death, it was bought by Israeli businessman Ya'aqov Nimrodi. 

MONITIN 

Sourceline:              Tel Aviv MONITIN in Hebrew 

Translation of name:     Reputation 

Type of publication:     Biweekly magazine 

Publisher:               Carmel Publishing 

Address:                 37 Nahal Ayalon, 42 Pinat Yitzhaq Sade, 
                         Tel Aviv 67771 

Editorial staff:         Giyora Schmiss (editor in chief), Sharon 
                         Qimhi (editorial assistant) 

Major writers:           Ya'aqov Ahime'ir, Avi Raz, Nave Sanders 

   Investigative journalism, racy entertainment; often carries 
interviews with political figures. 

NEQUDA 

Sourceline:              'Ofra NEQUDA in Hebrew 

Translation of name:     Point or Settlement 

Masthead caption:        "Publication of Settlements in Judaea, 
                         Samaria, and Gaza" 

Type of publication:     Monthly magazine 

Publisher:               Society for the Advancement of 
                         Settlement and Absorption in Judaea, 
                         Samaria, the Gaza Strip, and the Jordan 
                         Valley 

Address:                 'Ofra, M.P. Mizrah Binyamin, 90906 

Editor in Chief:         Yisra'el Har'el 

Major writers:           Mikha'el Eytan, Jay Shapiro, Elyaqim 
                         Ha' etzni 

   Organ of the settler movement. 

NEW OUTLOOK 

Sourceline:              Tel Aviv NEW OUTLOOK in English 

Masthead caption:        "Middle East Magazine" 

Type of publication:     Bimonthly magazine 

Publisher:               Hashqafa Hadasha, Tel Aviv 

Address:                 9 Gordon St., Tel Aviv 63458 

Editorial staff:         Hayim Shur (editor in chief), Dan Leon 
                         (senior editor) 

Circulation:             10,000 

   Established by MAPAM members and other left-wing Israeli Jews 
and Arabs dedicated to the promotion of Palestinian-Arab-Israeli 
peace; covers Middle Eastern affairs.  The magazine recently shut 
down after 35 years of publication, with the January-February 
1994 issue being its last.  Hayim Shur will now edit a new 
magazine tentatively named MIDDLE EAST magazine that replaces NEW 
OUTLOOK.  The new magazine will be a monthly with its pilot issue 
expected in the spring of 1994.  The publishers are promoting it 
as "the first Arab-Israeli magazine." 

SHISHI 

Sourceline:              Tel Aviv SHISHI in Hebrew 

Translation of name:     Friday 

Masthead caption:        "SHISHI: Your Second Newspaper for the 
                         Weekend" 

Type of publication:     Weekly newspaper 

Day of publication:      Friday 

Publisher:               Globes Group 

Address:                 127 Yig'al Alon Street, Tel Aviv 

Editorial staff:         Rino Tzror, Dani Dror, 'Irit Elqabetz, 
                         Tamar Shani 

Major writers:           'Uzi Mahanaymi and Yehuda Litani (Arab 
                         affairs), Yo'av Qarni (formerly of 
                         HA'ARETZ), Moshe Zaq and Dov Goldstein 
                         (formerly of MA'ARIV) 

   The newest, independent, Hebrew-language weekly, inaugurated 
on 10 December 1993; replaces HA'OLAM HAZE, which closed on 7 
December 1993 after 47 years of publication.  Editor Rino Tzror 
and the other members of the SHISHI editorial staff formerly 
managed HA'OLAM HAZE.  The publisher, the Globes Group, also 
issues the business daily GLOBES. 

AL- SINNARAH 

Sourceline:              Nazareth AL-SINNARAH in Arabic 

Translation of name:     The Fishhook 

Masthead caption:        "Largest Circulating Arabic Newspaper in 
                         the Country" 

Type of publication:     Weekly newspaper 

Day of publication:      Friday 

Publisher:               AL-SINNARAH Corporation 

Address:                 P.O. Box 148, Nazareth 16101 

Editor in chief:         Lutfi Mash'ur 

Managing editor:         Vida Mash'ur 

Major writers:           Ahmad Darwish, Munqidh al-Zu'bi, 
                         'Atallah Mansur, Salibah Khamis 

Op-Ed:                   Ahmad Hazim, Clovis Maqsud, and Hisham 
                         Shirabi (Guest columnists--Maqsud is a 
                         former Arab League representative to the 
                         United Nations, now a university 
                         instructor in Washington; Shirabi is a 
                         history professor at Georgetown 
                         University) 

Foreign correspondents:  Fawzi al-Asmar (Washington), Ahmad Hazim 
                         (Berlin) 

Supplements:             Weekend, women's (translation of the 
                         Hebrew magazine Na'amat) 

   Widest circulating Arabic-language newspaper within Israel's 
Arab community; Arab-Christian, Palestinian-nationalist. 

YEDI'OT AHARONOT 

Sourceline:              Tel Aviv YEDI'OT AHARONOT in Hebrew 

Translation of name:     Latest Information (News) 

Type of publication:     Evening newspaper 

Days of publication:     Daily except Saturday 

Publisher:               Arnon Moses 

Address:                 2 Moses Street, Tel Aviv 61000 

Editor in chief:         Arnon Moses 

Mangaging editor:        Moshe Vardi 

Major writers:           Dani Sade (defense), Ron Ben-Yishay 
                         (defense commentator), Shim'on Schiffer 
                         (political), Sever Plotzker (editor, 
                         economics), Beni Baraq and Gid'on 'Eshet 
                         (economics), Hayim Shibi (Knesset 
                         affairs), Roni Shaqed (Arab affairs), 
                         Bina Barzel, Ronit Vardi, and Orli 
                         Azulay-Katz (political parties), Smadar 
                         Peri (Arab affairs), 'Uzi Mahanaymi 
                         (Middle East) 

Op-Ed:                   Yesha'yahu Ben-Porat, Nahum Barne'a, Dov 
                         Genachowsky (politics, economics), 
                         Avi'ezer Golan, David Witzthum, No'omi 
                         Levitsky 

Foreign correspondents:  Tzadoq Yehezqeli (New York), Rami Dromi 
                         (Los Angeles), Yohanan Lahav (London), 
                         Edwin Eytan (Paris), Yosi Bar (Rome), 
                         Amnon Kapeliuk (Moscow), Shlomo Shlanger 
                         (Bonn) 

Circulation:             300,000 daily, 600,000 Friday 

   Israel's largest circulation daily; the Friday edition sells 
more than all the other newspapers combined.  Independent, 
center-right editorial line.  Serious, popular, easy-to-read 
style.  Offers readers a full spectrum of views on wide-ranging 
topics in regular op-ed columns spanning pro-Palestinian to far- 
right expansionist views. 

   EAST JERUSALEM, WEST BANK PUBLICATIONS 

AL-BAYADIR AL-SIYASI 

Sourceline:              Jerusalem AL-BAYADIR AL-SIYASI in Arabic 

Translation of name:     The Political Threshing Floor 

Masthead caption:        "Magazine of the Palestinian Masses" 

Type of publication:     Weekly magazine 

Day of publication:      Saturday 

Publisher:               Jack Khazmu 

Address:                 P.O. Box 21445 Bayt Hanina, Jerusalem 
                         91213 

Major writers:           Ghazi Sa'di, Mashhur al-Hijazi, 'Awwad 
                         al-Astal 
   Pro-PLO magazine. 

THE JERUSALEM TIMES 

Sourceline:              Jerusalem THE JERUSALEM TIMES in English 

Masthead caption:        "Independent Palestinian Weekly" 

Type of publication:     Weekly newspaper 

Day of publication:      Friday 

Ownership/affiliation:   Biladi Publishing Company 

Address:                 19 Nabulus Road, P.O. Box 20815, East 
                         Jerusalem 

Publisher and 
Editor in chief:         Hanna Sinyurah 

Managing editor:         'Ali Khalili 

   A new Palestinian weekly that debuted on 11 February 1994. 
Editors Hanna Sinyurah and 'Ali Khalili formerly managed the now 
defunct AL-FAJR.  The successor to the weekly AL-FAJR English 
edition, the paper declared its editorial policy "will be similar 
to its predecessor AL-FAJR, although the ownership is different." 
Pro-PLO and supportive of the peace process.  Currently, it is 
the only Palestinian English-language newspaper published in the 
occupied territories. 

AL-MANAR 

Sourceline:              Jerusalem AL-MANAR in Arabic 

Translation of name:     The Lighthouse 

Type of publication:     Newspaper 

Days of publication:     Monday and Friday 

Address:                 P.O. Box 20772 Al-Mas'udi St. 23, 
                         Jerusalem 

Editor in chief:         Isma'il 'Ajwah 

   Moderate, pro-PLO and  pro-Egyptian paper. 

AL-NAHAR 

Sourceline:               Jerusalem AL-NAHAR in Arabic 

Translation of name:      The Day 

Type of publication:      Daily newspaper 

Address:                 P.O. Box 17183 Al-Rashid St. 23, 
                         Jerusalem 

Editor in chief:         'Uthman al-Hallaq 

   A moderate, pro-Jordanian and pro-PLO paper, launched on 7 
March 1986 as a weekly but appearing as a daily since April 1987. 

AL-QUDS 

Sourceline:              Jerusalem AL-QUDS in Arabic 

Translation of name:     Jerusalem 

Type of publication:     Daily newspaper 

Publisher:               Mahmud Abu-al-Zalaf 

Address:                 P.O. Box 19788 Salah-al-Din St., 
                         Jerusalem 

Editor in chief:          Marwan Abu-al-Zalaf 

Circulation:              30,000 

   Moderate pro-PLO daily established in 1951; has the largest 
circulation in the territories. 

AL-TALI'AH 

Sourceline:              Jerusalem AL-TALI'AH in Arabic 

Translation of name:     The Vanguard 

Type of publication:     Weekly newspaper 

Day of publication:      Thursday 

Address:                 P.O. Box 20628 Al-Shaykh Jarrah St. 7, 
                         Jerusalem 

Editor in chief:         Bashir al-Barghuthi (senior official in 
                         People's Party) 

   Established in 1978 as mouthpiece of the Palestinian Communist 
Party, now called the People's Party. 

   RADIO AND TELEVISION 

   The state-owned Israel Broadcasting Authority, IBA, (Rashut 
Hashidur) is the primary radio and television broadcasting 
organization in Israel.  IBA falls under the Ministry of 
Education and Culture and determines what will be broadcast by 
radio and television.  It is an autonomous public body charged by 
law with providing educational and entertainment programming and 
supplying information in the areas of politics, society, 
economics, culture, and the arts to domestic and foreign 
audiences, including neighboring Arabs and Diaspora Jewry, in 
Hebrew, Arabic, and other languages. 

   IBA operates Qol Yisra'el (The Voice of Israel) and Israel 
Television (ITV), but not New Channel 2, an independent 
commercial station.  IBA controls the stations with a minimum of 
censorship regarding sensitive security and military matters.  As 
in the case of print media, this censorship applies to all 
electronic media, domestic and foreign.  There are also legal 
limitations on the coverage of candidates' speeches prior to 
Knesset elections.  Nevertheless, like Israeli print media, the 
content of Israeli broadcast media is varied and wide-ranging, 
with reporting and commentary spanning a broad political spectrum 
in both domestic and international affairs. 

   The Israel Defense Forces radio station, Galey Tzahal, falls 
under the jurisdiction of the Army's chief education corps 
officer with regard to its content.  As a national radio, it also 
falls under the IBA's jurisdiction in the spheres of broadcast 
timetables and technical operations.  The radio is funded by the 
Defense Ministry. 

   Transmission of programming is the responsibility of the 
Communications Ministry, which sets policy, advances legislation, 
supervises communications and licensing, encourages industrial 
development and research in the communications field, sets 
standards for the cable television industry, grants 
authorizations for Bezeq--the Israeli telecommunications 
corporation, and directs satellite transmissions.  Private 
companies have started to enter the field of international data 
communications, which until recently had been under Bezeq's 
monopoly.  Bezeq, a government-owned corporation with a board of 
directors nominated by the government, was formed in 1984, 
pursuant to the telecommunications law adopted in 1982 by the 
Knesset.  The law separated regulatory activities, which remain 
the responsibility of the Communications Ministry, from 
operational activities, now performed by Bezeq.  Bezeq operates 
all transmitters, although the equipment is the property of the 
Communications Ministry, which funds technical improvements. 
Maintenance and upkeep are funded by the IBA. 

   The transmission times provided below are one hour earlier 
during daylight savings time in the summer months. 

   QOL YISRA'EL (THE VOICE OF ISRAEL) 

   Qol Yisra'el is controlled and funded by the Israel 
Broadcasting Authority.  Mordekhay Kirshenbaum is the current 
director general of the IBA.  Qol Yisra'el's programs are 
broadcast in a number of different languages over its domestic 
networks and the international service.  FBIS monitors several of 
the Hebrew, Arabic, and English-language broadcasts. 

   Qol Yisra'el's domestic service consists of a number of 
networks, including the following: 

   Network "A" features programs on religion, music, education, 
and agriculture, as well as children's programs.  News is carried 
in French, English, and Hebrew. 

   Network "B" broadcasts only in Hebrew and its programming 
emphasizes features and news.  Newscasts are carried on the hour 
and most are paralleled on networks "A" and "C," the "Voice of 
Music," "IDF Radio," Gush Emunim's "Radio 7," and "Radio 10." 
News updates are carried on the half hour accept at 0030, 0130, 
0230, 1130, 1730, 2230, and 2330 GMT on Sunday through Thursday 
and after 1030 GMT on Friday.  There are no updates on the half 
hour on Saturday.  News flashes covering crises, important 
events, and emergency situations are broadcast as warranted. 

   Network "C" carries popular music and human interest 
programming directed at young audiences. 

   Network "D" programming is entirely in Arabic to Israel and 
the Arab world.  Broadcasts consist of general interest programs 
such as music, entertainment, religious programs, features, 
commentaries, and news. 

   The "Immigrant Absorption Network" (Reshet Qlitat 'Aliya, 
REQA'), which broadcasts in a variety of languages, is targeted 
at newly arrived immigrants.  It offers news, Jewish and Israeli 
history and cultural programs, Hebrew lessons, and various 
orientation talks shows. 

   Qol Yisra'el's international service currently broadcasts in 
15 languages over shortwave and mediumwave frequencies.  Many of 
the international programs are relays from Qol Yisra'el's 
domestic networks.  The entire Arabic-language portion of the 
international service is a relay of Qol Yisra'el's network "D." 
Arabic-language programs are also relayed by Voice of Israel's 
international service over shortwave and mediumwave to Central 
and Southeast Asia, Australia, New Zealand, Africa, and Central 
and South America on 738, 5900, 5915, 9815, 15095, and 15480 kHz. 
Network "B" programs are relayed by the international service via 
shortwave to North America, Europe, Russia, and Asia on 
frequencies that change semiannually.  Current frequencies 
include 9388, 11585, 11590, 13750, 15615, and 17545 kHz. 

   English-language programs are broadcast by Qol Yisra'el over 
its international service and on two of its domestic networks. 
The international service's 0500-0515 and 1100-1130 GMT programs 
are paralleled on domestic network "A," which also broadcasts a 
daily two-minute news brief in English at 1500 GMT.  The director 
of Israel Radio International is Shmu'el Ben-Tzvi. 

   DOMESTIC HEBREW-LANGUAGE PROGRAMMING 

Sourceline:              Jerusalem Qol Yisra'el in Hebrew 

Station identification:  "Qol Yisra'el Miyerushalayim" (Voice of 
                         Israel from Jerusalem) 

Transmission span:       0000-2400  GMT Sunday through Thursday; 
                         0100-2305  GMT Friday; 
                         0458-0100  GMT Saturday 

Frequencies:             Tel Aviv (657 kHz, 95.5 MHz FM); 
                         Jerusalem (1080 kHz, 95.5 MHz FM); 
                         Haifa (1206 kHz, 103.2 MHz FM); 
                         Galilee (882 kHz, 100.5 MHz FM); 
                         Northern border (882 kHz); 
                         Beersheba (103.8 MHz FM); 
                         Elat (927 kHz, 90.7 MHz FM); 
                         Zefat (846 kHz, 92.0 MHz FM); 
                         Bet She'an Valley area (102.0 MHz FM); 
                         Negev area (93.9 MHz FM); 
                         'Arava area (95.6 MHz FM) 

Address:                 Main Studios -- Heleni Hamalka 21 
                         P.O. Box 1082 
                         Jerusalem 91010 

Personnel:               Director, Qol Yisra'el's Hebrew 
                         programming:  Amnon Nadav 

   DOMESTIC ARABIC-LANGUAGE PROGRAMMING 

Sourceline:              Jerusalem Qol Yisra'el in Arabic 

Station identification:  "Huna Sawt Isra'il Min Urshalim al-Quds" 
                         (This is the Voice of Israel from 
                         Jerusalem) 

Transmission span:       0358-2215 GMT daily 

Frequencies:             Central Region (738 kHz, 90.3 MHz FM); 
                         Tel Aviv (1026 kHz, 90.3 MHz FM); 
                         Jerusalem (675 kHz, 90.3 MHz FM); 
                         Haifa, Galilee, Northern Israel (738 
                         kHz); 

Address:                 Main Studios -- Heleni Hamalka 21 
                         P.O. Box 1082 
                         Jerusalem 91010 

Personnel:               Director, Qol Yisra'el's Arabic 
                         programming:  Edmund Sehayek 

   ENGLISH-LANGUAGE PROGRAMMING 

Sourceline:              Jerusalem Qol Yisra'el in English 

Station identification:  "Qol Yisra'el -- The Voice of Israel, 
                         Jerusalem" 

Transmission span:       0500-0515 GMT daily, both domestic and 
                         international service; 
                         1100-1130 GMT daily, both domestic and 
                         international service; 
                         1400-1425 GMT daily, international 
                         service on shortwave; 
                         1500-1502 GMT daily, domestic service 
                         only; 
                         1600-1615 GMT daily, both domestic and 
                         international service; 
                         2000-2030 GMT daily, international 
                         service on shortwave; 
                         2230-2300 GMT daily, international 
                         service on shortwave 

Frequencies:             International Service:  7465, 9435, 
                         11603, 11605, 11675, 15640, 15650, 
                         17545, and 17575 kHz; 
                         Domestic Network "A":  Tel Aviv and 
                         central district (576 kHz); Jerusalem 
                         (1458 kHz); Elat (1458 kHz); 
                         Immigrant Absorption Network ("REQA'"): 
                         Tel Aviv, Jerusalem, and central 
                         district (954 kHz); Haifa and the north 
                         (927 kHz) 

Address:                 Main Studios -- Heleni Hamalka 21 
                         P.O. Box 1082 
                         Jerusalem 91010 

Personnel:               Head, Broadcasts to the West, Israel 
                         Radio International:  Moshe Sela' 

IDF RADIO 

Sourceline:              Tel Aviv IDF Radio in Hebrew 

Station identification:  "Galey Tzahal" (IDF Radio) 

Transmission span:       0000-2400 daily 

Frequencies:             IDF 1: 
                         Central Israel (1287 kHz); 
                         Haifa and Elat (1305 kHz); 
                         Galilee Panhandle and Negev (1368 kHz); 
                         Jerusalem (1404 kHz); 
                         Beersheba (1224 kHz); 
                         Tel Aviv (92.4 MHz FM); 
                         Haifa region (106.4 MHz FM); 
                         Jerusalem and central Israel (93.9 MHz 
                         FM) 
                         IDF 2: 
                         Central Israel (96.6 MHz FM); 
                         Dan District (91.8 MHz FM); 
                         Haifa and north (102.3 MHz FM); 
                         Galilee Panhandle and Elat (93.9 MHz 
                         FM); 
                         Bet She'an Valley and Beersheba (99.8 
                         MHz FM); 
                         Western Negev (104.1 MHz FM); 
                         Mizpe Ramon (1395 kHz) 

Address:                 Military Post Office Box 01005 
                         Tel Aviv 

Personnel:               Commander:  Moshe Shlonsky 

   IDF (Israel Defense Forces) Radio broadcasts 24 hours a day, 
splitting into "IDF 1" and "IDF 2" between 1200 and 2200 GMT 
Sunday through Thursday, between 1400 and 2400 GMT on Friday, and 
between 0600 and 2200 GMT on Saturday.  During the split, IDF 1 
and IDF 2 carry different programs, but link up for the relay of 
news, news flashes, the 1400 GMT IDF newsreel on Sunday through 
Thursday, and the 1600 GMT "Friday-Saturday" program on Saturday. 

   IDF 1 and IDF 2 both carry hourly newscasts from Qol 
Yisra'el's domestic network "B" with the following exceptions: 
the 0000, 0100, 0200, 0300, 0400, 0600, 0700, 1000, 1100, and 
1400 GMT casts are not relayed Sunday through Friday; the 1500, 
1600, 1700, 1900, and 2200 GMT casts are not relayed Sunday 
through Thursday; and the 0900, 1600, 1700, and 1800 GMT 
newscasts are not relayed on Saturday. 

   Both IDF 1 and IDF 2 provide news flashes on the half-hour 
between 0730-1430 GMT (except at 1130), and 1830-0330 GMT (except 
at 1930 and 2130 Sunday through Thursday).  Friday's flashes on 
the half-hour are 0730-1030 GMT.  On Saturday and holidays news 
flashes are carried every two hours on the half-hour starting at 
0430 GMT.  IDF Radio's non-news programming consists of general 
interest features. 

   ISRAEL TELEVISION CHANNEL 1 NETWORK 

   Jerusalem Israel Television Channel 1 Network falls under the 
jurisdiction of the Israel Broadcasting Authority.  With the 
exception of foreign films, specials, and documentaries, which 
are generally subtitled in Hebrew and/or Arabic, all programming 
is in Hebrew or Arabic.  The prime time Hebrew broadcasts consist 
of general interest programs, family entertainment, religious 
programs, educational and feature films, foreign programs, and 
newscasts.  Arabic programming consists of films, family 
entertainment, educational and children's programs, and 
newscasts.  Programming originates in studios located in 
Jerusalem's Romena District and in Herzliyya. 

   Israel Television utilizes the PAL color systems B and G and 
is received on different channels throughout Israel.  Reception 
in Tel Aviv is best on VHF channel 8 via a 200-kw transmitter 
located at Etanim in the Jerusalem mountain range; on Tel Aviv's 
100-kw UHF transmitter on channel 28; and on UHF channel 46 via a 
200-kw transmitter located in Haifa.  Satellite service is 
carried on the 1.0 West Intelsat; Ku band, video carrier RF 
11.590 MHz VP; audio on subcarrier at 6.6 MHz. 

   HEBREW-LANGUAGE PROGRAMMING 

Sourceline:              Jerusalem Israel Television Channel 1 
                         Network in Hebrew 
Station identification:  "Hatelevizya Hayisre'elit 'Arutz Ehad" 
                         (Israel Television Channel 1) 

Transmission span:       1730-2230  Sunday-Thursday; 
                         1800-2300  Friday; 
                         1800-2230  Saturday; Signoff time varies 
                         each day 

Frequencies:             As described above 

Address:                 Israel Broadcasting Authority 
                         P.O. Box 7139 
                         Jerusalem 91071 

Personnel:               Director, Israel Television's Hebrew 
                         programming:  Ya'ir Stern 

   Principal newscasts are broadcast at 1800-1850 GMT Sunday 
through Thursday, at 1830-1930 GMT on Friday, and at 1900-2000 
GMT on Saturday. 

   ARABIC-LANGUAGE PROGRAMMING 

Sourceline:              Jerusalem Israel Television Channel 1 
                         Network in Arabic 

Station identification:  "Al-Tilifizyun al-Isra'ili al-Qanah al- 
                         Ula" (Israel Television Channel 1) 

Transmission span:       1630-1730  Sunday-Thursday; 
                         1440-1800  Friday; 
                         0800-1800  Saturday 

Frequencies:             As described above 

Address:                 Israel Broadcasting Authority 
                         P.O. Box 7139 
                         Jerusalem 91071 

Personnel:               Director, Israel Television's Arabic 
                         programming:  Yosef Binia 

   The main daily Arabic newscast is broadcast at 1700-1730 GMT 
Sunday through Thursday, at 1700-1800 GMT on Friday, and at 1630- 
1700 GMT on Saturday. 

   ISRAEL TELEVISION CHANNEL 3 NETWORK 

Sourceline:              Jerusalem Israel Television Channel 3 
                         Network in Hebrew 

Station identification:  "Hatelevizya Hayisre'elit 'Arutz 
                         Shalosh" (Israel Television Channel 3) 

Transmission span:       When the Knesset is in session: 
                         Monday, Tuesday: relay of Knesset 
                         committee sessions from approximately 
                         0800 GMT; relay of Knesset plenum 
                         sessions from 1400 GMT; 
                         Wednesday: relay of Knesset plenum 
                         sessions from approximately 0900 GMT; 
                         There is no regular signoff time for the 
                         end of any day's broadcasts 

Frequencies:             Received via cable television system on 
                         Channel 33; 
                         Satellite service on the 1.0 West 
                         Intelsat; Ku band, video carrier RF 
                         11.019 MHz VP; audio on subcarrier at 
                         6.6  MHz 

Studio address:          Channel 3 
                         Israel Television 
                         Romema Jerusalem 91071 

Personnel:               Editorial staff consists of a five- 
                         member steering committee headed by Mr. 
                         Yosef Bar'el 

   This channel, also under the jurisdiction of the IBA, began 
broadcasting in November 1993 and has yet to finalize its 
schedule for news and entertainment programming.  Programming 
currently features relays of the Knesset committee and plenum 
sessions when it is in session, plus ad hoc broadcasts, such as 
the Shamgar commission hearings, which were carried Sunday 
through Thursday from 8 March to 18 April 1994. 

   EDUCATIONAL TELEVISION NETWORK 

Sourceline:              Tel Aviv Educational Television Network 
                         in Hebrew 

Station identification:  "Hatelevizya Hahinukhit Hayisre'elit" 
                         (Israel Educational Television) 

Transmission span:       0600-1530 GMT Sunday through Thursday; 
                         0600-1430 GMT Friday; 
                         No broadcasts on Saturday; 
                         (Note: During the July and August summer 
                         school recess, and on other major school 
                         holidays, the transmission span is 0700- 
                         1530 GMT Sunday through Thursday; 0700- 
                         1430 GMT Friday) 

Frequencies:             Transmitted on Israel Television Channel 
                         1 Network and received on different 
                         channels throughout Israel 

Address:                 14 Klausner Street, Ramat Aviv, 
                         Tel Aviv 

Personnel:               General Manager:  Ya'aqov Lorberbaum 

                         Director of Programs:  Mrs. Y. Prener 

   Programming is controlled by the Educational Television 
Center, which is located in Ramat Aviv and falls under the 
jurisdiction of the Education Ministry.  Programming consists of 
lessons and lectures on various subjects and stories for 
elementary and high school students.  From 1500 to 1530 GMT 
Sunday through Thursday, the network broadcasts "New Evening," a 
live magazine program that deals with topical issues and includes 
interviews, special features, and news headlines.  On Fridays, 
"New Evening" is aired an hour earlier in the form of a Sabbath 
supplement entitled "Supplement of Supplements." 

   NEW CHANNEL 2 TELEVISION NETWORK 

Sourceline:              Jerusalem New Channel 2 Television 
                         Network in Hebrew 

Station identification:  "'Arutz Shnayim Hahadash" (New Channel 
                         2) 

Transmission span:       1200-2300  GMT Sunday through Thursday; 
                         0800-2300  GMT Friday; 
                         0600-2300  GMT Saturday 

Frequencies:             Broadcasts are transmitted on UHF 
                         channel 22 and are currently being 
                         beamed through the 50-kw transmitter at 
                         Etanim on the Jerusalem mountain range. 
                         Satellite service on the 1.0 West 
                         Intelsat; Ku band, video carrier RF 
                         11.174 MHz VP; audio on subcarrier at 
                         6.6 MHz 

Address:                 3 Kanfey Nesharim 
                         Giv'at Sha'ul 
                         Jerusalem 

   This station (formerly government-owned and operated) began 
broadcasting as a commercial enterprise on 1 November 1993. 
Operational oversight is provided by the Second Television and 
Radio Authority, which supervises the broadcasts of five 
concessionaires: Tel'ad Studios, Reshet, Qeshet Communications, 
Educational Television, and The News Company (Hevrat Hahadashot). 
Each concessionaire maintains its own independent editorial 
staff.  Principal newscasts are broadcast at 1800-1830 GMT every 
day but Friday, when a 75-minute news and interview program airs 
at 1800 GMT. 



   Comments and queries regarding this media guide may be 
directed to Chief Analyst, EurAsia/Near East/Africa Group at 
(703) 733-6072.  Comments and queries concerning the World Media 
Report Series can be directed to Media Assessment Branch, Global 
Issues Group at (703) 733-6131. 

   FBIS Media Guides are disseminated electronically to U.S. 
Government offices that are regular FBIS soft-copy customers, and 
as a hard-copy publication to all U.S. Government subscribers who 
regularly receive the corresponding geographic Daily Report. 
Copies of this guide (FBIS MEDIA GUIDE:  ISRAEL, Document Number: 
WMR 94-002, Publication Date: 18 May 1994) and subscriptions to 
FBIS Media Guides are available free of charge to government 
offices from Requirements and Dissemination Branch, Foreign 
Broadcast Information Service, P.O. Box 2604, Washington, D.C. 
20013-2604, Fax: (703) 733-6042.  For additional information or 
assistance, call FBIS at (202) 338-6735.  Electronic customers 
may also request copies or subscriptions to the hard-copy version 
by sending a message to the router RUCWAAB/FBIS RESTON VA//ATTN 
RDB//. 

GIG/24MAY94/OSD/JF 25/0148Z MAY 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47641 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000028994001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   26 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-25MAY94-KOREA 
<H3> <TI>      Pyongyang Sets Up New Body to Replace MAC </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Pyongyang Sets Up New Body to Replace MAC </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
Seeking      to force Washington to accept Pyongyang's unilateral 
withdrawal from the Military Armistice Commission (MAC), North 
Korea has notified the U.S. side at Panmunjom of the 
establishment "a new negotiation body" representing the Korean 
People's Army.  According to the North Korean news agency KCNA on 
24 May, a "Panmunjom mission," headed by a North Korean 
lieutenant general, has been set up with a view to establishing a 
new "peace arrangement" to replace the MAC.  Clearly moving to 
establish a precedent for its functioning, the mission, through 
its "chief liaison officer," formally protested the recent 
shipment of U.S. Patriot missiles to South Korea.  Pointedly 
disregarding the existence of the United Nations Command (UNC), 
the protest was lodged with the "U.S. Forces side."  Pyongyang 
had been boycotting the MAC since March 1991, when a South Korean 
general was named to head the UNC, and in April had called for 
DPRK-U.S. talks on a new peace accord to replace the 1953 
Armistice Agreement that established the MAC (Trends, 4 May 1994, 
pages 3-4). 
(AUTHOR:  YIM.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6534.) 
EAG/HEBBEL/cs 25/1533z may 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47642 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000029094001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   26 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS ANALYSIS-25MAY94-Russia/Ukr 
<H3> <TI>      Russia/Ukraine </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Russia/Ukraine </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
Media      Developments: Russia and Ukraine No. 6 
   This Special Memorandum, "Media Developments:  Russia and 
Ukraine," is a periodic series aimed at reporting and analyzing 
changes to and events affecting the Russian and Ukrainian media. 
Comments and queries regarding this series may be directed to 
Chief Analyst, ENEAG at (703) 733-6072. 
   In this issue... 
   Spotlight on... 
Russia:  RTV's Shakhov--One Vision, Many Voices 
Russia:  Pravda Toes Orthodox Line 
   Features 
Russia:  Media Organizations Respond to Coup Scenario 
Publication 
Russia:  Media React to 'Cheleken' Incident 
Russia:  Independent TV-6 Expands Audience, Erodes State 
Monopoly 
Ukraine: Radio, TV Censorship Charged 
   Other Publications of Interest 
Russia:  RTV Increasingly Cynical of U.S. Motives 
   Spotlight on... 
Russia:  RTV's Shakhov--One Vision, Many Voices 
   Summary:  Russian Television's (RTV) "Vesti" news program has 
recently run a series of commentaries on foreign affairs 
assailing the West,  defending Russian interests, and promoting a 
positive vision of Russia's role in world politics.  The 
commentaries, attributed to a G. Shakhov, have been read by as 
many as five different newsmen--other commentaries appear to be 
read consistently by one individual--and may be a variation on 
the Soviet-era print media practice of publishing particularly 
important editorial statements under a pseudonym. 
   The Shakhov commentaries appear designed to simultaneously 
assuage wounded national pride as Russia struggles with its 
diminished role and influence on the world stage, and to defend 
the notion that, in spite of all its current domestic travails, 
Russia remains a superpower.  The commentaries have: 
   -- questioned U.S. motives in unilateral foreign policy 
initiatives toward Ukraine and Georgia which it claimed have 
undercut Russian-brokered understandings with those countries (9 
March); 
   -- assailed NATO's Partnership for Peace initiative, calling it 
an attempt to place "arsenals of American weapons" along Russia's 
periphery and cut Russia out of the Eastern European arms market 
(24 March); 
   -- decried as "provocative acts" Ukrainian attempts to remove 
hydrographical equipment from onboard a Black Sea Fleet vessel 
harbored in Odessa and the "raid" on a detachment of Russian 
servicemen stationed there, and other "anti-Russian" actions in 
various regions in Ukraine (14 April); 
   -- condemned NATO's "wager on force" in Bosnia as ineffective and 
asserted that the NATO airstrikes raised questions about NATO's 
suitability as a partner in Partnership for Peace (18 April); 
   -- questioned the government's decision to extend an agreement 
between Russia and Hungary, allowing Hungary to continue to 
export its nuclear waste to Russia; and asserted that the 
destruction of Russia's "gigantic stocks" of chemical weapons 
under the terms of a treaty signed with the United States "could 
threaten the lives of people in our fatherland" (21 April); 
   -- praised Russia's role in helping restart the Middle-East peace 
talks between Israel and the PLO (25 April); 
   -- and praised Russia's "decisive role" in bringing about a 
settlement in Moldova between the Moldovan government and 
predominantly ethnic Russian separatists in the Transdniestr 
region (29 April). 
   Who is Shakhov? 
   The recent spate of Shakhov commentaries have been read on the 
air by as many as five different newsmen, a practice that appears 
unprecedented and suggests the possibility that "Shakhov" is a 
pseudonym used for representing the views of more than one person 
and perhaps those of an influential collective of "Vesti" 
personnel.  Other evidence suggests, however, that Shakhov is a 
flesh-and-blood commentator who has been working as a television 
and radio journalist since at least 1992.  The earliest observed 
"Vesti" commentary attributed to G. Shakhov, scoffing at the 
terms and implications of a deal to import grain from the West, 
appeared on 31 July 1992.  A 2 May 1992 Radio Rossii commentary 
attributed to a Geliy Shakhov, possibly "Vesti's" G. Shakhov, 
discussed Russian President Boris Yeltsin's rejection of tough 
IMF conditions for loans.  Both items appear to have the same 
pro-Russian tone as more recent Shakhov commentaries. 
   Russia:  Pravda Toes Orthodox Line 
   Summary:  Pravda appears to speak for the more orthodox, non- 
nationalist Marxist-Leninist tendency in Russia's communist 
movement, supporting an ideological line which tends to stress 
economic and class-oriented themes and, in its coverage of the 
activities of communist groups, lends support and encouragement 
to a traditional communist approach to political and economic 
problems.  Its criticism of the Russian Government is couched in 
Marxist terms, and the newspaper has been highly critical of 
Communist Party of the Russian Federation (CPRF) Chairman 
Gennadiy Zyuganov and his national communist ideology.  The 
orthodox Marxist line pronounced in Pravda stands in sharp 
contrast to the "patriotic" ideology of Zyuganov and Sovetskaya 
Rossiya, which supports Zyuganov's nationalist-communist fusion. 
   Party Conference Coverage 
   Pravda's 26 April coverage of the second All-Russian Conference 
of the CPRF was typical in its wariness of Zyuganov's line. 
Pravda stressed the importance of the "class positions"; 
highlighted calls made by some delegates for a rejection of 
parliamentarism"; and also noted criticism directed at the party 
leadership for neglecting the "workers' movement."  Another 
article in the same issue ("Political Theatre and the Realities 
of Life"), while not explicitly reporting the conference, 
attacked "centrists" for backing the aspirations of "indigenous 
capital" which desired only to maintain its own "privatized" 
property and merely "slow down" the "collapse" of the country. 
The article excoriated the CPRF for its "social democratic" line, 
one which merely pledged to "defend hired labor," and called on 
the party to once again become the "avant-garde and leader of the 
working people."  The article also attacked Zyuganov by name for 
his pledges to work in a coalition government, which the article 
called a government "of the new bourgeoisie."  Such cooperation, 
the article maintained, would further distance the CPRF from 
"workers" and would lead the party to follow Zyuganov's 
"national-patriotic" ideology, an ideology attractive to 
"national capital." 
   In contrast to the editorializing in Pravda's coverage, 
Sovetskaya Rossiya published Zyuganov's report to the conference, 
which was, in part, a defense of his leadership of the party and 
the turn to a more nationalist line (26 April).  The paper also 
carried a front-page article on the conference's acceptance of 
"important documents, which give the party the basis and right to 
become the leading consolidating force in society." 
   Diverging Politics 
   The orthodox/nationalist divergence between Pravda and Sovetskaya 
Rossiya, which together represent the communist viewpoint in the 
central press, has been evident for some time.  In August 1992, 
both papers marked the first anniversary of the failed anti- 
Gorbachev coup by mounting scathing attacks on the Yeltsin 
administration, with Pravda lamenting the collapse of socialism, 
while Sovetskaya Rossiya stressed the loss of great power status 
and the humiliation of the Russian people: 
   -- Pravda longed for "a civilized.society, which one could call 
communist," and predicted a "new putsch," which "General Winter" 
and "Czar Hunger" were preparing.  Pravda predicted that Gen. 
Winter "will bring an army into the streets. . . .  In attack 
columns behind him will follow all those who have been robbed- 
-the hungry, the unemployed, and the homeless" (18 August 1992). 
   -- Sovetskaya Rossiya maintained that the collapse of the Soviet 
Union following the failure of the August coup was part of a 
grand design by "agents of influence" carrying out a plan "worked 
out in Washington."  Political observer Eduard Volodin called the 
August 1991 events a "liberation," but not a liberation from 
stagnation . . . [and] dogmatism" so much as a "liberation from 
national honor . . . and national dignity."  The democrats, he 
claimed, had "liberated themselves from the USSR in order to 
freely dismember Russia."  Volodin lamented the "destruction of 
Russia's international authority" and the possible "trading of 
her territory" (20 August 1992). 
   Slavin Sets Pravda's Tone 
   Boris Slavin, a member of Pravda's editorial board and the 
paper's political observer, has set the tone for its orthodox 
line and disdain for nationalist themes.  Upholding the 
internationalist theme of communist ideology while reporting on 
the May Day holiday, Slavin wrote that he was "confident" that 
"May Day in the capital will be . . . truly a festival of working 
people's international solidarity" (8 April). 
   Unlike the CPRF, which has lent its support to limited private 
ownership, Pravda and Slavin maintain the traditional communist 
hostility to private property.  Commenting on private ownership 
of land, Slavin has claimed that the buying and selling of land 
may lead not only to the redistribution of land, but to civil 
war, when the private owners assert their claim to collective and 
state farm workers' land" (15 June 1993).  During last summer's 
constitutional conference, Slavin blasted Yeltsin, saying that 
"the president wants speculators and stockbrokers to be able to 
calmly continue plundering the people's assets, and the 
conference is proclaiming private ownership, including land 
ownership, to be a natural right" (18 June 1993). 
   Slavin began his assaults on the Yeltsin reforms soon after the 
failure of the August 1991 coup and the concomitant collapse of 
the Soviet Union.  According to Slavin, a "revolution" began "on 
19 August on the wave of public anti-putsch emotions" and is 
directed against "socialist tendencies dating all the way back to 
the October Revolution."  This "bourgeois" revolution "had 
intensified the [economic] crisis" and was "eliminating" economic 
and social support institutions which were, according to Slavin, 
of "vital importance to the people."  The immediate task of the 
communist movement, in Slavin's view, was to "unite and mobilize 
all democratic forces against. . . [a] new round of anti- 
communist actions," leaning in particular on the "working class," 
which Slavin called the "largest social force that can lead the 
country out of the present impasse" (28 December 1991). 
   Features 
   Russia:  Media Organizations Respond to Coup Scenario Publication 
   Summary:  Official reaction to Obshchaya Gazeta's controversial 
publication of "Versiya no. 1," the purported blueprint for a 
planned coup against Russian President Boris Yeltsin, raises 
questions about the objectivity of the Russian Federation 
Committee for the Press and its chairman, Boris Mironov.  The 
affair has also provided an opportunity for the Judicial Chamber 
for Information Disputes to assert authority over the Press 
Committee in regulating the activities of the print media. 
   Obshchaya Gazeta's Sensational Publication 
   The incident began during Yeltsin's March working vacation in 
Sochi on the Black Sea coast when, amidst coup rumors and 
allegations that he was seriously ill, Obshchaya Gazeta published 
an article containing the somewhat abridged text of "Versiya No. 
1," which it termed an "analytical memo" purporting to describe a 
conspiracy of leading officials aiming to "depose" Yeltsin and 
install Prime Minister Viktor Chernomyrdin in his place until new 
presidential elections could be held (No. 11, 18-24 March). 
Among the conspirators, the "memo" named such prominent figures 
as First Deputy Prime Minister Oleg Soskovets, General Staff 
Chief Colonel General Mikhail Kolesnikov, Moscow Mayor Yuriy 
Luzhkov, Federation Council Chairman Vladimir Shumeyko, and 
Chairman of the Duma's Information Policy and Communications 
Committee Mikhail Poltoranin.  The group of conspirators also 
included a "B. Mikhaylov," incorrectly listed as the chairman of 
the "Russian Federation Committee for the Press." (See Note 1) 
The "memo" asserted that the group had "managed to obtain [the] 
agreement" of Defense Minister Pavel Grachev, Interior Minister 
Viktor Yerin, and Director of the Federal Counterintelligence 
Service Sergey Stepashin "not to take countermeasures," and that 
"B. Mikhaylov" was attempting to "establish contacts with 
[Foreign Intelligence Chief] Ye. Primakov's inner circle," 
presumably for the same purpose.  It asserted that an initial 
attempt to put the plan into action had failed but that the group 
had not given up on its plans to depose Yeltsin. 
   (Note 1) Obshchaya Gazeta's editors noted parenthetically, that 
"B. Mikhaylov" was "apparently B. Mironov," the actual chairman 
of the State Committee for the Press. 
   Together with "Versiya No. 1," Obshchaya Gazeta published an 
editorial commentary calling the "memo" a "clear mystification, 
an anonymous letter, nothing more," which it asserted was aimed 
at compromising Yeltsin's closest allies.  The commentary added, 
however, that the "memo" should not simply be dismissed as an 
"innocuous joke," calling such a "memo" one of the "technologies 
in the struggle for power" and asserting that a "coup d'etat" 
could be organized in just such a way, by "pitting influential 
politicians against each other, ratcheting up the psychosis of 
universal suspiciousness, and provoking the authorities into 
taking inadequate 'security measures.'" 
   "Versiya" Author Comes Forward 
   Two weeks after publishing 'Versiya,' Obshchaya Gazeta reported 
that Gleb Pavlovskiy, a member of its own editorial council, 
former dissident, and current chief editor of the journal, 20th 
Century and Peace, was one of the authors of the document (No. 
12, 25-31 March).  According to the report, Pavlovskiy claimed 
that the document was an analytical report drafted for official 
use and that it had "found its way into the hands of high-ranking 
officials and to newspaper editorial boards without his 
knowledge."  The newspaper questioned Pavlovskiy's explanation, 
saying it was "scarcely more convincing than the scandalous 
'Versiya No. 1'."  The report did not, however, mention that any 
measures had been taken by the paper to discipline Pavlovskiy 
and, as of early May, he was still listed as a member of the 
paper's editorial council. 
   Official Reaction 
   The Russian prosecutor's office was the first official body to 
react to the publication.  On 28 March it instituted a criminal 
investigation into the matter (Ostankino TV, 28 March).  Results 
of the investigation have not yet been announced. 
   The State Committee for the Press issued a harsh warning to the 
paper, seemingly acting out of pique at slights to its chief, 
Mironov, (and perhaps his ally Poltoranin) (See Note 2) rather 
than out of concern for ascertaining the facts of the case. 
Ignoring the paper's disclaimers about the document's 
authenticity, seemingly forgetting that only a court can legally 
determine whether the publication was slanderous, and refusing to 
wait for the criminal investigation to conclude, the committee 
issued an official warning to Obshchaya Gazeta, taking it to task 
for "disseminating deliberately false and slanderous 
fabrications" and for allegedly seeking to "undermin[e] the 
constitutional order and destabiliz[e] the situation in society" 
(Obshchaya Gazeta, No. 13, 1-7 April).  The warning charged the 
paper with violating articles 4 and 51 of the Law on the Mass 
Media.  Article 4 prohibits media from "performing criminally 
punishable acts" (e.g. undermining the constitutional order) 
while article 51 prohibits "spreading rumors under the guise of 
reliable information" and spreading "information for the purpose 
of defaming a citizen . . . exclusively on the basis of sex, age, 
racial or national affiliation, language, attitude toward 
religion, profession, place of residence and work, or in 
connection with their political convictions" (Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 
8 February 1992). 
   (Note 2)  According to previous reporting from Obshchaya Gazeta, 
Poltoranin is a close friend and former associate of Russian 
Federation Press Committee Chairman Boris Mironov.  For his part, 
Mironov may have perceived Obshchaya Gazeta's editorial comment 
noting that he, not the "B. Mikhaylov" named in "Versiya", is 
head of the Press Committee, as an attempt to defame. 
   In an apparent rebuke to Mironov and the press committee, the 
Judicial Chamber for Information Disputes challenged its official 
warning, saying that Obshchaya Gazeta had "sufficiently weighty 
grounds" for publishing "Versiya No. 1," and that the publication 
had defused tension in society, not destabilized it (Obshchaya 
Gazeta, No. 14, 8-14 April).  The chamber further asserted that, 
had there in fact been a plot as described in the "memo," the 
publication would have to some degree "prevented" the actions. 
The chamber's announcement judged that the publication "did not 
violate" the Law on the Mass Media as the paper had the right to 
inform the public about the events in preparation or about 
"insinuations" about such events.  In its announcement, the 
chamber noted that Obshchaya Gazeta had issued disclaimers as to 
the authenticity of the "memo," demonstrating that the paper had 
taken a "balanced" approach to the publication and was not merely 
"chasing after sensationalism."  The announcement concluded by 
asserting that, in light of the fact that a criminal 
investigation into the matter had not yet been completed, the 
administrative actions taken against the paper by the press 
committee were "premature."  The press committee has not been 
observed to officially respond to the judicial chamber's 
statement. 
   Obshchaya Gazeta Adds Fuel to the Fire 
   Under circumstances where the hierarchical relationship between 
the chamber and the press committee is unclear (see box), 
Obshchaya Gazeta, not satisfied with a favorable ruling from the 
judicial chamber, has upped the ante in what may turn into a long 
and bitter struggle with the press committee.  The paper's 
editors published an editorial statement, together with the 
judicial chamber's ruling, which called the press committee's 
warning a "typical libel," demanded a formal retraction published 
in the papers which published the warning, and asserted the right 
to pursue their claims against the committee in court if 
necessary.  In the same statement, the editors attacked Mironov 
on an unrelated matter as a "slanderer" for allegedly asserting 
publicly that Obshchaya Gazeta had received 300 million rubles 
from the Ostankino State Television and Radio Broadcasting 
Company.  Four weeks later, the paper published a very 
unflattering profile of Mironov questioning his ability to carry 
out his duties fairly and depicting him as an anti-semite, an 
authoritarian anti-democrat, and an unscrupulous businessman in 
his previous position as head of the Russkaya Kniga publishing 
house (No. 18, 6-12 May). 
   Box 
   Sorting Out Jurisdictions 
   According to the various presidential edicts, government 
resolutions, and organizational statutes that regulate their 
activities, the judicial chamber appears to have the authority to 
pass final judgement on press committee actions.  The press 
committee does have statutory authority to issue "written 
warnings" to press sources when they violate the law (Sobraniye 
Aktov Prezidenta i Pravitelstva Rossiyskoy Federatsii, No. 10, 7 
March).  The judicial chamber, however, though not given any 
explicit authority to review decisions of the press committee, 
has the broadly defined authority to "resolve disputes and other 
matters" relating to the media which are not reserved by law "to 
the jurisdiction of the Russian Federation courts" (Rossiyskaya 
Gazeta, 3 February).  The case of "Versiya No. 1" appears to be 
just such a matter.  The situation is muddied by the fact that 
the hierarchical relationship of the two organizations is not 
clear.  Both bodies exist within the executive branch, with the 
press committee residing among the government structures 
subordinate to Prime Minister Viktor Chernomyrdin, while the 
judicial chamber is part of the presidential apparatus 
subordinate to Yeltsin.  The language of the edict creating the 
judicial chamber does suggest, however, a higher spot in the 
media hierarchy for the chamber, stating that the body was 
created to assist the president, the constitutionally established 
guarantor of media freedoms, in "upholding rights and freedoms in 
the mass information sphere" while the responsibilities of the 
press committee are mostly administrative in nature (Rossiyskaya 
Gazeta, 10 January).  Moreover, the chamber's statute states that 
chamber decisions taken within its jurisdiction are "final." 
   End Box 
   Implications 
   The 'Versiya No. 1' incident is an inauspicious beginning for the 
media structures established in Yeltsin's recent media 
reorganization.  The contentiousness of the press committee's 
warning and its apparent rush to judge Obshchaya Gazeta's actions 
bode poorly for its capacity to play the role of even-handed 
mediator between the state and the media.  While the Judicial 
Chamber for Information Disputes appears to have played its 
intended role in this instance, its decision overruling the press 
committee's warning to Obshchaya Gazeta is likely to leave a 
legacy of rivalry between the two bodies. 
   Russia:  Media React to Cheleken Incident 
   Summary:  Opposition media appear to have passed up an 
opportunity to whip up nationalist and anti-Ukrainian sentiments 
over a series of Russian-Ukrainian confrontations over elements 
of the Black Sea Fleet which occurred on 8-9 April.  The most 
alarmist reaction to the incidents among the media appears to 
have come from the two state television companies, the Defense 
Ministry newspaper, Krasnaya Zvezda, and one of two government 
dailies. 
   Opposition Press 
   Sovetskaya Rossiya, reappearing on 15 April following an extended 
publishing hiatus caused by financial difficulties, devoted only 
a brief front page article to the incidents.  The article 
characterized them as "provocational" and said they "evoked sharp 
responses in both Russia and Ukraine."  The article then provided 
an apparently straightforward account of the incidents from 
Valeriy Volodin, the chairman of the Officers' Assembly of the 
Black Sea Fleet.  It concluded by reporting that a meeting of 
Black Sea Fleet servicemen had expressed "perplexity" that 
neither Russian President Boris Yeltsin nor Ukrainian President 
Leonid Kravchuk had reacted officially to the incidents.  The 
servicemen at the meeting also declared their "complete lack of 
trust" in the Ukrainian Ministry of Defense and "demanded" a 
"harsh" response to those responsible for the "provocation." 
Brief excerpted comments from First Deputy Commander in Chief of 
the Russian Navy Admiral Igor Kasatonov and Crimean President 
Yuriy Meshkov, the latter seeing the incidents as a prologue to 
the "introduction of [Ukrainian] presidential rule in Crimea," 
followed.  The next issue of the paper, published on 19 April, 
did not mention the incidents. 
   On 12 April Pravda carried a straightforward front-page account 
which used the incidents to bash Yeltsin administration policy on 
the Black Sea Fleet issue.  On 15 April the paper published a 
page-two assessment of the incidents by Nikolay Musiyenko, in 
which he asserted that the incidents "would be reminiscent of a 
low quality action film" if not for the fact that peoples' lives 
and the "mutual relations of two Slavic peoples" were at stake. 
Musiyenko claimed that while previously the Russian leadership 
had "pretended" that nothing special had been happening regarding 
the Black Sea Fleet, it was "impossible" to shut one's eyes to 
the Odessa incidents. 
   Krasnaya Zvezda 
   Not surprisingly, it was the Defense Ministry's official 
newspaper, Krasnaya Zvezda, that gave the most extensive coverage 
to the incidents and suggested the most dire consequences from 
them.  On 12 April Krasnaya Zvezda carried a front page article 
titled "If It Is Impossible To Agree Peacefully, It Is Necessary 
To Take by Storm."  Referring ironically to the anniversary of 
the liberation of Odessa, the article charged that Ukrainian 
spetsnaz troops had "in their own way achieved the liberation of 
Odessa."  In a more serious vein, the article charged that the 
presence in Odessa during the events of Commander of the 
Ukrainian Navy, Vice Admiral Vladimir Bezkorovayniy could be 
"unambiguously interpreted as the rebirth of attempts by 
Ukrainian officials to resolve the issue of the status of the 
Black Sea Fleet by forceful methods."  According to the article, 
the use of force in the incidents, combined with anonymous 
letters threatening physical harm that had been received by "a 
majority" of Black Sea Fleet unit commanders, demonstrates that 
"Ukraine has made a wager on forceful methods, including 
terrorist acts" to resolve the Black Sea Fleet issue. 
   On 13 April the newspaper devoted its lead article, by Oleg 
Odnokolenko, to the incident.  Odnokolenko began by asserting 
that the events in Odessa were "nearly fateful for Russian- 
Ukrainian relations."  Although Odnokolenko ruefully noted that 
"for the first time in such an open fashion . . . Ukrainians and 
Russians found themselves face to face with weapons in their 
hands," he ended his commentary optimistically, noting that 
official Russian Government and State Duma reactions to the 
incidents emphasized that Russia's course in relations with 
Ukraine remains a course of "friendship and cooperation."  This 
optimism was somewhat tempered by a post script to the article 
which cited pessimistic remarks by Kasatonov (see section on 
Rossiyskiye Vesti's reaction). 
   On 14 April Krasnaya Zvezda moved coverage of the incident to 
page three but focused on what it depicted as continuing tensions 
and provocative behavior by the Ukrainian side.  The article 
cited an official statement by the Black Sea Fleet Military 
Council asserting that the incidents had occurred "with the 
connivance" of the Ukrainian military.  While the article 
exhorted both sides to put the incident behind them for the sake 
of "peace and accord," it called for an investigation into the 
matter and "calling to account" the guilty, and noted that "the 
Ukrainian side opposes this."  It concluded by warning that 
"sources close to the staff of the Ukrainian Navy" had alleged 
that a repeat of the Odessa incidents was being prepared for a 
brigade of river vessels at Izmail in Ukraine, and that the 
spetsnaz troops who had acted in Odessa had been "placed on 
combat alert." 
   State Television Responds 
   The two state television companies, Ostankino and Russian 
Television (RTV), also raised the specter of armed conflict 
between Russia and Ukraine as a result of the incidents, with 
Ostankino's "Novosti" news program taking a more alarmist view 
than RTV's "Vesti": 
   "Novosti" responded to the incidents with alarm and perplexity. 
On 11 April Odessa correspondent Yuriy Selivanov said that the 
incident was the closest his "native Odessa" had been to war 
since World War II.  Noting that Ukrainian servicemen had seized 
Black Sea Fleet objectives in the recent past, he asserted that 
these had only been "semi-military" "shore units" such as 
hospitals, while in the current incident they had seized a 
"combat detachment" whose personnel are armed.  "Only by a lucky 
chance," he asserted, had "fateful shots" been avoided. 
   On 14 April a new "Novosti" rubric, "50 Years of Victory," linked 
the incidents to the liberation of Odessa, on the anniversary of 
which the incidents took place and during which "thousands" of 
Russian soldiers lost their lives daily.  The feature's narrator 
questioned whether the liberators of Odessa could have imagined, 
"even in a terrible dream," that 50 years later Ukrainian 
servicemen would handcuff their "brother Slavs" and "humiliate 
and degrade" their "compatriots" merely because someone in the 
political leadership wanted to "demonstrate his power."  The 
feature ended with the ominous warning that history will "take 
vengeance cruelly" against Russians and Ukrainians "and their 
descendents" if they are unable to overcome their differences 
"even during these sacred days" commemorating the victories of 
World War II. 
   RTV's "Vesti" looked more calmly on the incidents, attributing 
their occurrence to Ukrainian domestic problems.  On 14 April a 
'Vesti' news broadcast carried a commentary by G. Shakhov on 
Russian-Ukrainian relations which asserted that the confrontation 
on the Cheleken and the "raid" on the detachment of Russian 
servicemen in Odessa had contributed to a "sharp increase in 
tensions" between the two countries, which he characterized as a 
"political crisis."  According to Shakhov, unspecified Ukrainian 
political actors provoked the incidents to "distract attention" 
from Ukraine's "economic collapse" and the "strengthening of 
authoritarian power" in Ukraine in the runup to scheduled 
presidential elections in which the success of Ukrainian 
President Leonid Kravchuk is "manifestly not guaranteed." 
Shakhov concluded his commentary with the optimistic assertion 
that "many in Kiev suppose" that the meeting between Yeltsin and 
Kravchuk scheduled to take place at the CIS summit in April would 
"relieve the crisis situation." 
   State Press 
   Rossiyskaya Gazeta and Rossiyskiye Vesti, both dailies sponsored 
by the Council of Ministers, were more cautious in their 
reactions, although Rossiyskiye Vesti turned mostly to Russian 
military sources in its reporting. 
   On 12 April--its first publication day after the incidents- 
-Rossiyskiye Vesti carried a brief front-page item citing Chief 
of the Black Sea Fleet Press Service, Captain Second Rank Andrey 
Grachev denying Ukrainian claims that the Cheleken was 
transporting "radioactive subs-tances."  Grachev alleged that the 
incident was "provoked by the Ukrainian side with the aim of 
seizing" the Cheleken.  On 14 April Rossiyskiye Vesti carried a 
page-two interview with Kasatonov in which he characterized the 
incidents as unprecedented "state hooliganism" which attested to 
an "extremely uncivilized approach" on the part of the Ukrainians 
towards the Black Sea Fleet.  Kasatonov also asserted that 
"someone is directing all of this" and that the actions were 
"aimed exclusively at destabilizing the situation in the region." 
He warned that the matter was an "international affair, going 
beyond the bounds of Russian-Ukrainian relations" and was "very 
dangerous for the security of international shipping."  When 
asked if it would be possible to avoid bloodshed if 
"provocations" against the Black Sea Fleet continue, Kasatonov 
responded that he was "surprised" that the Russian sailors 
involved showed such "patience" and avoided firing a single shot, 
adding that "such shots were clearly awaited." 
   In contrast, Rossiyskaya Gazeta's coverage of the incidents 
appeared to play down their significance.  Initial coverage in a 
page-six article provided a detailed account of the events and 
Russia's official response to them.  The piece concluded by 
citing the official statement's emphasis that "Russia's course 
regarding Ukraine remains a course of friendship and cooperation" 
(12 April).  The following day the paper limited its coverage of 
the incidents to a front-page statement by Federation Council 
Chairman Vladimir Shumeyko, who asserted that the incident was 
"first and foremost" a phenomenon of "internal Ukrainian 
politics" and that it was necessary to respond "calmly" and 
refrain from "exacerbating" the situation.  Shumeyko stated 
confidently that "a way out of the situation would be found."  On 
14 April the paper published a front-page report on official 
discussions between Russia and Ukraine to resolve the conflict 
and cited a statement by Russian State Duma Chairman Ivan Rybkin 
that "forces" attempting to "break off" the scheduled 15 April 
meeting of CIS heads of state had provoked the incidents. 
   Izvestiya 
   Coverage of the incidents in the pro-Yeltsin Izvestiya expressed 
relief that the danger of conflict had passed but also concern 
that the potential for armed conflict remains.  A 13 April report 
by Teymuraz Mamaladze noted that the struggle for control of the 
fleet is "accompanied by an exhausting war of nerves, largely 
provoked by the sides' press centers and the mass media" and 
warned that the speed with which "disinformation" can be verified 
"may not coincide with the firing speed of multiple rocket 
launchers."  He concluded ominously by quoting former U.S. 
President Richard Nixon as saying that "a conflict between Russia 
and Ukraine could make events in Bosnia look like a Sunday-school 
picnic." 
   Nezavisimaya Gazeta 
   The independent Nezavisimaya Gazeta's coverage of the incident 
appeared to provide a uniquely balanced assessment of the 
incidents with details that appeared nowhere else, implying that 
some of the blame for the incident should be placed on the 
Russian side.  On 12 April Aleksandr Sivashov reported that the 
incident began when Russian sailors on board the Cheleken 
arrested a Ukrainian naval captain who had boarded the Cheleken 
for an "inspection," on grounds that the Russian vessel was 
"Russian territory."  The incident escalated when armed Black Sea 
Fleet marines boarded the Cheleken with orders to open fire if 
necessary and were confronted by Ukrainian marines who were given 
orders to open fire in the event the Cheleken attempted to leave 
shore.  According to Sivashov, the Ukrainians then demanded and 
achieved the release of the Ukrainian officer and then "allowed" 
the ship to leave port.  Ukrainian coast guard cutters followed 
the Cheleken to sea, however, and demanded it return to port, 
firing signal rockets at the ship when it refused.  After the 
ship arrived in Sevastopol, Ukrainian Navy Chief of Staff Rear 
Admiral Aleksey Ryzhenko boarded to meet with representatives of 
the Black Sea Fleet command after which he charged that the 
"tense situation" had been "created" by Black Sea Fleet Chief of 
Staff Rear Admiral Petr Svyatashov.  Sivashov concluded by 
reporting an exchange of diplomatic demarches in which Moscow 
accused Kiev of "still another provocation--a piratical action" 
and Kiev accused Moscow of a "terrorist act." 
   Russia:  Independent TV-6 Expands Audience, Erodes State Monopoly 
   Summary:  According to Russian media reports, the Moscow 
Independent Broadcasting Corporation (TV-6) has signed a deal 
with Ted Turner's TBS television company that, if implemented, 
will allow the entertainment-oriented TV-6 to become the first 
national television company whose broadcasting capabilities are 
based on commercial contract rather than governmental rulings. 
Successful realization of the deal would erode the state's 
control over national-level broadcasting beyond what has occurred 
with the establishment of NTV in December of 1993 and could 
demonstrate the viability of independent television on a national 
scale, putting pressure on the Russian Government to move further 
toward denationalization of its financially burdensome television 
assets. 
   According to press reports, TV-6 has already, as a result of the 
agreement, expanded its broadcasting beyond Moscow to 20 cities 
across Russia and the former Soviet Union.  It plans to reach 
more than 30--with more than 30 million potential viewers--by the 
end of the year (Obshchaya Gazeta No. 14, 8-14 April; Kommersant- 
Daily, 8 April).  As reported by Kommersant-Daily, the deal will 
allow the Russian participants to "establish program policy" and 
Eduard Sagalayev, one-time deputy chairman of the Soviet-era 
Gosteleradio and founder of the independent TV-6, to "head the 
board of directors" and have "the last word" in "all debatable 
issues." 
   TV-6 began broadcasting to Moscow viewers on 1 January 1993.  The 
company has focused its programming on domestic and foreign 
motion pictures and also offers CNN news programming.  It has 
borne out Sagalayev's initial conception of a "channel standing 
outside politics and ideology" (Izvestiya, 6 January), though it 
has made an occasional foray into politics, as when it broadcast 
a live program on voting results from the April 1993 referendum. 
Under the recent agreement, TV-6 will reportedly lease capacity 
on the Ministry of Communications' "Gorizont" communications 
satellite system, which covers the entire territory of the former 
Soviet Union, and negotiate contracts with "regional non-state" 
companies to organize a "network of ground-based receiving 
stations" to broadcast in the regions. 
   The deal will make TV-6 the first independent television company 
to achieve nationwide broadcasting capabilities on a contractual 
basis.  In December 1993 the establishment of NTV, a news- 
oriented independent television company that broadcasts to a 
potential audience of about 40 million viewers, broke state 
television's monopoly on supra-regional broadcasting.  However, 
NTV was given access to state broadcasting facilities on an 
"experimental" basis by presidential edict while TV-6's access 
will be contractually based. 
   Ukraine: Radio, TV Censorship Charged 
   Summary:  During the recent Ukrainian parliamentary election 
campaign, the independent media ran a series of articles charging 
that state radio and television were subject to increased 
political censorship aimed at eliminating criticism of the 
governing institutions and keeping election coverage to a 
minimum.  An official rebuttal did not address the specific 
charges, but attacked the independent press as provincial and 
opportunistic. 
   The Hart Controversy 
   The first signs of controversy revolved around Hart [Type], one 
of the most popular public affairs programs on Ukrainian 
Television.  A December 16, 1993 broadcast where people addressed 
critical New Year's messages to President Kravchuk was reportedly 
kept off the air.  In response, almost the entire studio 
collective broadcast a statement condemning the heads of the 
Ukrainian State Television and Radio Company for censorship, 
claiming that the Ukrainian public's right to free and full 
information was being curtailed and demanding that conditions be 
provided for the free exercise of journalistic rights.  The 
statement also warned that the heads of the company intended by 
every means possible to deny airtime to the forces supporting 
reform in the upcoming elections (Nezavisimost, 22 December 
1993). 
   The television and radio company leadership threatened to fire 
Hart's editor-in-chief, Viktor Pavlyuk, and cancel the program. 
The threats were not carried out, but according to Pavlyuk, the 
program is now subject to close control.  It is reportedly not 
allowed to broadcast live and there is no assurance that the 
material it prepares will actually go on the air (Molod Ukrayiny, 
25 March).  Pavlyuk countered by suing the heads of the State 
Radio and Television Company for damages resulting from the ban 
on live broadcasts.  However, the case was postponed because 
Mykola Okhmakevych, the head of the Radio and Television Company, 
did not show up in court (Vechirniy Kyyiv, 15 March).  In later 
court testimony, the television and radio company leadership 
reportedly justified their actions by claiming that criticism of 
the president exceeded all reasonable bounds, and that state 
television has a duty to support the president's policies 
(Vechirniy Kyyiv, 12 May).  Reportedly no verdict has yet been 
reached in the suit. 
   In a further attack on government interference in the broadcast 
media, Vitaliy Karpenko, editor-in-chief of the independent Kiev 
daily Vechirniy Kyyiv, cited in the newspaper a long list of 
television journalists and technical people who, he reported, 
were either dismissed or quit after being harassed by their 
superiors for their independent views, asserting that the 
authorities were trying to hush up the Hart affair.  Karpenko 
claimed that the leadership of state television regards loyalty 
to the government as the most important criterion for employees, 
and that officials responsible for overseeing Okhmakevych are 
willing to tolerate ineptness as long as the mass media are 
obedient.  He charged that state-run media leadership is aware of 
conditions prevailing in Ukrainian Television but has no 
incentive to change as long as it remains fully funded by the 
government and Okhmakevych retains his powerful protectors in the 
Ukrainian Supreme Council (Vechirniy Kyyiv, 26 February). 
   Election Coverage 
   In addition to these charges, there have been numerous complaints 
from candidates running for parliament about the lack of 
television coverage of the campaign.  A commentator writing a 
month into the campaign noted the total lack of mention of the 
campaign on Ukrainian television.  The blackout of campaign 
reporting was reportedly so complete that a well-known 
politician's comments on world events, in this case the Clinton 
visit to Ukraine, were aired, but the fact that he was officially 
registered as a candidate in the upcoming parliamentary elections 
was not mentioned (Ukrayina Moloda, 18 January). 
   Vechirniy Kyyiv's Vitaliy Karpenko, a candidate for the new 
parliament, charged that not only were candidates barred from the 
first television channel, but independent candidates were denied 
airtime and the time allotted for candidates on the local channel 
was restricted to the 4-6 PM slot, the time with one of the 
lowest possible viewing audiences.  He also questioned the 
objectivity of the coverage, maintaining that not only were state 
radio and television used to attack him and those other 
candidates opposed to government policies, but that there was 
also disproportionate coverage of the Vinnytsya election district 
where Okhmakevych was running for a Supreme Council seat 
(Vechirniy Kyyiv, 16, 26 February). 
   State Radio Muzzled 
   In a more general complaint about pressures on radio 
broadcasting, columnist Myroslav Lyvytskyy cited a marked 
deterioration in the quality of programming in 1994 on the first 
program of Ukrainian Radio.  He complained that informational 
programming on the first channel has been reduced to three hours 
a day, the rest of the day being devoted mainly to classical 
music and folk singing--mirroring similar changes in Ukrainian 
Television programming.  The popular political program 
"Nezalezhnist" was nearly cancelled, according to Lyvytskyy, with 
its staffers given the choice of either following the government 
line more closely or resigning.  As a result, program head Mykola 
Kyzmych and part of the staff resigned. 
   Lyvytskyy attributed the deterioration in radio programming to 
the appointment of Zynoviy Kylyk as first vice president of the 
State Radio and Television Company and Viktor Pasak as head of 
the First Program of Ukrainian Radio.  Distinguished mainly as 
Okhmakevych loyalists, according to Lyvytskyy, they both are 
likely to enforce the government line.  As a result, Lyvytskyy 
concluded, listeners will turn to other sources, either to the 
International Program of Ukrainian Radio--as yet unaffected by 
these changes, but available only in a limited number of oblasts- 
-or to Russian media (Za Vilnu Ukrayinu, 4 February; Vechirniy 
Kyyiv, 16 February). 
   Official Attempts Rebuttal 
   Vitaliy Ablitsov, a programming director for Ukrainian 
Television, attempted to rebut these charges in the Supreme 
Council newspaper Holos Ukrayiny, but did not address the 
specific charges of censorship and provincialism in Ukrainian 
Television.  He denied that there is any political censorship, 
attributing any controversies to inexperienced or unreasonable 
journalists, and confined himself to stating the general goals of 
raising Ukrainian Television to European standards without 
specifying how that is to be done.  He attacked the independent 
press by questioning its professionalism and journalistic 
competence, suggesting that the independent press has taken up 
the censorship issue because it lacks the knowledge to deal with 
more substantive issues.  Ablitsov cited the small circulation of 
the independent newspapers as evidence of their own 
provincialism, implying that, in the case of the former Komsomol- 
sponsored Nezavisimost and Molod Ukrayiny, their post-coup 
independent line was the result of political opportunism (Holos 
Ukrayiny, 5 February). 
   Other Publications of Interest 
   Russia:  RTV Increasingly Cynical of U.S. Motives 
   Recent commentaries on state-owned Russian Television's "Vesti" 
news broadcasts suggest growing disillusionment with U.S. 
policies towards the nations of the former Soviet bloc, 
portraying the United States as a self-interested meddler along 
Russia's periphery, willing to undermine Russian national 
interests in areas which Russia has traditionally viewed as its 
exclusive sphere of influence.  The cynical view of U.S. motives 
exhibited in these commentaries contrasts sharply with previous 
commentary from "Vesti," a staunchly proreform news program. 
(AUTHORS:  ALLENSWROTH, CRIMMINS, VILLHAUER.  QUESTIONS AND/OR 
COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, ANALYSIS BRANCH, RUSSIA DIVISION 
(703) 733-6070.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH  cka 25/2003z may 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47643 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000029194001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   26 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-25MAY94-Russia/Ukr 
<H3> <TI>      Russia-Ukraine </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Russia-Ukraine </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
BSF      Command Fuels Russia-Ukraine Tensions in Krym 
                         SUMMARY 
   Russia's Black Sea Fleet (BSF) command appears to be making 
common cause with the new Pro-Russian Crimean leadership, 
criticizing Ukraine on BSF issues and supporting Crimean 
officials' calls for a role in Ukrainian-Russian negotiations 
over the division of the former Soviet fleet.  Most recently, the 
BSF command has appeared to deliberately fuel Russian-Ukrainian 
tensions and aggravate the already difficult relationship between 
Krym and Ukraine by spreading incendiary and unsubstantiated 
rumors about Ukrainian military actions in Krym. 
                       END SUMMARY 
   Russian Black Sea Fleet officials have made repeated attacks on 
Ukrainian stands in the BSF talks and demanded that the Crimean 
Government be brought into Russian-Ukrainian negotiations over 
the fleet: 
   -- Following the 21-22 April round of talks on the status of the 
fleet, the BSF Press Center issued a statement criticizing the 
Ukrainian side as being "unprepared for compromise" and for 
insisting that the Russian BSF and Ukrainian Navy both be 
stationed in Sevastopol.  The statement said that the Ukrainian 
position contradicted "not only the logic of military 
organizational development . . . and the will of the presidents" 
but also the latest decisions of the Sevastopol City Soviet that 
the Ukrainian fleet should be moved (Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 28 
April). 
   -- In a joint statement on 26 April, BSF Commander Admiral Eduard 
BaIt in, Crimean President Yuriy Meshkov, and Chairman of the 
Sevastopol City Soviet Viktor Semyonov appeared to blame Ukraine 
for the breakdown of the latest round of talks on 21 April, 
charging that "struggles for political power and the Ukrainian 
presidency" could turn the negotiations into a "military 
conflict."  The statement decried "attempts" to "lay blame for a 
possible break-up of Ukraine's statehood" on Krym and urged the 
Russian and Ukrainian presidents to resume talks and "act as 
guarantors of peace" in Krym (ITAR-TASS, 26 April). 
   -- In an interview with Interfax on 26 April, Chief of the BSF 
Headquarters Rear Admiral Petr Svyatashov criticized Ukraine's 
insistence that Meshkov be excluded from negotiations between 
Russian Defense Minister Pavel Grachev and Ukrainian Defense 
Minister Vitaliy Radetskyy.  Svyatashov accused Radetskyy of 
placing himself above the law, asserting that Ukrainian 
legislation--which states that the Crimean leadership must be 
informed of the establishment of new military units and the 
disposition of troops--justifies Crimean involvement in the 
talks. 
   BSF Stokes Crimean-Ukrainian Disputes 
   In addition to taking anti-Ukrainian stands on issues related to 
the BSF itself, the BSF command appears to have exacerbated the 
potential for Crimean-Ukrainian conflict by issuing 
unsubstantiated reports of Ukrainian troop movements.  After 
Crimean Acting Internal Affairs Minister Valeriy Kuznetsov 
claimed to the Crimean legislature on 18 May that Ukrainian 
Deputy Internal Affairs Minister Valentin Nedryhaylo and spetsnaz 
troops had attempted a "coup" against the Crimean leadership 
(UNIAN, 19 May), sources from the BSF Headquarters were cited in 
ITAR-TASS as reporting that "Ukrainian home guards and special 
forces numbering 1,000" and a "group of saboteur swimmers" had 
been dispatched to Krym (19 May), and that a Ukrainian military 
field hospital was being set up in Kherson Oblast preparing to 
receive wounded people from Ktym "in the near future" (Kiev World 
Service, 19 May).  Neither of these reports has been confirmed by 
other media. 
   In at least one case, Russian media have censured the BSF command 
for its inflammatory statements.  A 4 May Izvestiya article 
entitled "Black Sea Fleet Press Center Continues to Spread 
Disinformation" asserted that citizens of the CIS "suffer acutely 
from [a]  misunderstanding" of Russian-Ukrainian relations as a 
result of news agencies "succumbing" to "manipulation" by the BSF 
Press Center.  The article highlighted early May media coverage 
of an allegedly "wicked" attack on the official car carrying the 
wife of BSF Commander Baltin, and countered that, according to 
the Sevastopol internal affairs chief, Major General V. 
Beloborodov, the BSF official car tried a "double-pass," nearly 
causing a collision, prompting the other driver involved--an 
excitable person"--to express his feelings toward the driver and 
Baltin's wife "in uncensored form."  The Sevastopol Internal 
Affairs Administration stated officially that there had been  no 
"attack" on Admiral Baltin's wife. 
   Crimean Position on BSF 
   These stands by the BSF leadership have supported demands put 
forward by Meshkov and other officials in Simferopol and 
Sevastopol to play a prominent role in the talks: 
   -- Meshkov reportedly stated that it would be "most logical" if 
the BSF question were resolved by Krym and Russia alone (ITAR- 
TASS, 5 May).  In a press conference after his 30 January 
election victory, Meshkov was quoted as saying that the fleet 
must "be a single unit, belong to Russia, and be based at 
Sevastopol" (Interfax, 2 February). 
   -- On the Russian Defense Ministry's "Slavyanka" program, Crimean 
Deputy Premier Yevgeniy Saburov sharply criticized Ukraine for 
attempting to reap the economic benefits--which he claimed 
rightfully belonged to Krym--of a BSF settlement with Russia. 
Saburov asserted that Ukraine's refusal to allow full Crimean 
representation in the talks suggested a "mercenary interest in 
making use of the benefits of the Russian proposal" and demanded 
that any decisions must "benefit Sevastopol, the fleet, and the 
families of the sailors who live there."  He also stated flatly 
that a joint fleet is "out of the question . . . it must be a 
Russian fleet" (Moscow Radio, 12 May). 
   -- Chairman of the Sevastopol Administration Mykola Hlushkov, in 
an appeal to Presidents Boris Yeltsin and Leonid Kravchuk, 
reportedly deemed it "necessary" that Sevastopol city leaders 
take part in BSF negotiations to ensure that Russia and Ukraine 
address the question of economic assistance to the region (UNIAR, 
28 April). 
   -- After discussing the BSF issue, the Sevastopol City Soviet 
reportedly recommended to Kiev that the Ukrainian Navy 
headquarters and other installations be relocated out of 
Sevastopol (Segodnya, 21 April). 
   Ukraine Rebuffs BSF, Minimizes Crimean Role 
   While Ukrainian official statements have in the past criticized 
actions and statements by the BSF command (Kiev Radio Ukraine 
World Service, 16 March; Kiev Ukraine Radio, 14 April), Kiev 
recently appears to have stepped up its rhetoric against the BSF 
command's actions.  Following the coup rumors, a 19 May Ukrainian 
Defense Ministry statement vehemently decried the 
"misinformation" circulated by the BSF as "malicious falsehoods 
   carrying out open subversive activities" on Ukraine's 
sovereign territory (Kiev World Service, 19 May). 
   Ukrainian officials have consistently tried to exclude Krym from 
the BSF negotiations.  Although Kravchuk in a 26 April 
Rossiyskiye Vesti interview acknowledged that Krym has a "role" 
in the talks, he emphasized the need to "ensure that Krym does 
not drive [Ukraine and Russia] or their peoples apart." 
Nezavisimaya Gazeta on 22 April  reported that, before the 21 
April BSF negotiations began at the BSF Headquarters in 
Sevastopol, Radetskyy declared that the talks could riot proceed 
"with the participation or even in the presence of" Meshkov or 
Sevastopol's Semenov, both of whom subsequently left the room.  A 
"high-ranking" Ukrainian diplomat was quoted as saying that 
resolution of the BSF issue requires that Ukraine "reject the 
politicking of the Crimeans and talk with the real owners of the 
fleet" (Izvestiya, 15 April). 
   Outlook 
   The apparent BSF support for the Crimean leadership and its 
spreading of the inflammatory rumors are likely to fuel Ukrainian 
suspicions of Russian meddling in Krym and intransigence over 
division of the BSF.  If not checked, these BSF actions risk 
providing Kiev with its own pretext for intransigence in the 
negotiations or, at worst, provoking Ukraine to additional 
actions to assert what it views as its legitimate authority in 
Krym. 
   (AUTHOR:  NERO.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ANALYSIS BRANCH, RUSSIA DIVISION (703) 733-6070.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/ta 25/2314z may 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47644 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000029294001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   26 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-25MAY94-Ukraine 
<H3> <TI>      Donetsk Voters Demonstrate Strong Anti-Kiev Sentiment </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Donetsk Voters Demonstrate Strong Anti-Kiev Sentiment </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                               The overwhelming Communist Party (CPU) victory in the Donetsk 
Oblast election of Ukrainian Supreme Soviet deputies appears to 
reflect a groundswell of anti-Kiev public sentiment rather than 
just orchestration by the pro-communist oblast leaders, auguring 
serious trouble for the Ukrainian Government.  Donetsk leaders 
themselves did not appear to control the election and, despite 
their connections to the CPU, did poorly.  The Donetsk public's 
alienation from Kiev was especially clearly demonstrated in the 
vote on referendum questions on the Russian language and on 
joining an economic union with Russia, all of which passed by 
over 10 to 1.  Donetsk's pro-communist sentiment did not extend 
to the neighboring oblasts of Kharkiv and Dnipropetrovsk, 
however, where communists won few seats and a strong, well- 
financed campaign helped industrial and agricultural leaders 
predominate. 
                     END SUMMARY 
   The Communist Party of Ukraine was virtually the only winner in 
Donetsk.  Of the 43 seats settled by the election (four are still 
vacant), the CPU won 23 (22 CPU and one joint CPU-Socialist- 
Labor), while in eight other districts the CPU candidates came in 
second (getting into the runoffs but losing).  CPU First 
Secretary Petro Symonenko won on the first round in district 150. 
In addition, seven deputies from parties close to the CPU won 
(three Socialist Party (SPU), two Labor, one Peasant Party 
(SelPU), one Civil Congress of Ukraine), according to Post-Inform 
(Post-Postup News Agency) identifications. 
   Other than the CPU, no party or group or category elected many 
representatives: 
   -- Government officials lost about as many races as they won, 
suggesting that officeholding did not translate into control of 
the elections and that prominence and name recognition did not by 
themselves help much.  While the winners included Deputy Chairmen 
of the Donetsk City Executive Committee Volodymyr Shcherban 
(nonparty) and Yuriy Boldyrev (Civil Congress of Ukraine and, 
according to Donetsk Television on 3 April, one of the initiators 
of the referendums), deputy chairman of the Kramatorg City 
Executive Committee Pavlo Kuznetsov (CPU), and chief of the 
oblast agriculture administration Anatoliy Petrenko (SelPU), 
losers included oblast soviet chairman Vadym Chuprun in district 
147, deputy Donetsk City Soviet Chairman Burikh in district 118, 
deputy oblast administration chief Hennadiy Molodan (Liberal 
Party) in district 110, and deputy presidential representative V. 
Nakonechnyy, who failed to get elected in district 152 because of 
insufficient turnout (Post-Inform, 11 April; Holos Ukrainy, 27 
April). 
   -- Even the prominence of Acting Premier Yukhym Zvyahilskyy and 
Deputy Premier Valentyn Landyk, both formerly important figures 
in Donetsk, did not bring them easy victories, and both won only 
in runoffs.  In particular, zvyahilskyy, who was a local mine 
director and Donetsk city mayor before being named first deputy 
premier in June 1993, demonstrated little local popularity.  In 
the first round he ran second to a CPU candidate (Vechernyy 
Donetsk, 5 April).  An article in the 17-24 March Post-Postup 
reported that the independent union at his old mine had opposed 
the mine's nomination of Zvyahilskyy.  Zvyahilskyy's son-in-law, 
Volodymyr Vechirko, running in district 109, lost when neither 
candidate won a majority in the runoffs (Post-Inform, 11 April). 
A 15-21 April Post-Postup article asserted that Landyk and 
Shcherban won votes by having clerks identified with them sell 
food at cutrate prices in key precincts and that Boldyrev and 
zvyahilskyy were aided by local officials who barred outside 
observers at voting precincts and appeared to add ballots. 
   -- Incumbent Supreme Soviet members did badly.  According to the 
25-31 March Post-Postup, 14 Supreme Soviet members ran for 
reelection.  Only four were among the winners and two of them ran 
on the CPU ticket--Oleksiy Shekhovtsov, Anatoliy Khunov (CPU), 
Oleh Panasovskiy (CPU), and zvyahilskyy--while even one of the 
most prominent leftist-conservative deputies, Oleksandr 
Charodeyev (running as nonparty), lost in district 116. 
   -- Industrial and enterprise leaders did better, but "red 
directors" did not appear dominant.  The winners included 
Chairman of the State Committee for the Coal Industry Mykola 
Surhay (nonparty), head of the Donetsk Railway Oleksandr 
Kozhushko (nonparty), President of the Aton Corporation Yevhen 
Shcherban (Liberal Party), mine director Volodymyr Ampilohov 
(non-party), deputy plant director Borys Kozhevnykov (CPU), chief 
of a mine construction trust Valeriy Pudryk (CPU), coal 
construction trust official Anatoliy Tatarynov (nonparty), farm 
enterprise head Oleksandr Shamaryn (CPU), and power station 
director Oleh Panasovskyy (CPU).  But metallurgical combine 
deputy director M. Khromov lost in 134, and mine director 
Teslenko lost in district 144 (Post-Inform, 11 April). 
   -- Almost no union leaders won, despite the importance of unions 
in Donetsk and the miners' political activism and repeated 
strikes.  While one minor union official won (Anatoliy 
Khmelyovyy, head of a union at a locomotive depot), Cochairman of 
the Donetsk Strike Committee Mykola Krylov lost in district 113 
to a CPU candidate, chairman of the trade union at the Azov Steel 
Plant (Azovstal) lost in district 137, and a rayon trade union 
head lost in district 151 (Post-Inform, 11 April). 
   Factors in Victory 
   Donetsk's pro-communist tide appears to reflect longstanding 
communist strength in the oblast and public dissatisfaction with 
Kiev's economic policies and its ptomotion of Ukrainian 
nationalism.  An article in the 25-31 March Lviv weekly Post- 
Postup discussing reasons for the communist victory argued that 
the Donetsk CPU organization, one of the biggest in the old 
Soviet Union, is still strong and was able to put up far more 
candidates than other parties (52 in the 47 districts).  The 
article also maintained that Donetsk has an especially high 
number of pensioners, who are inclined to prefer the past and who 
are inclined to go out to vote, while young people were simply 
ignoring the election. 
   Local Leadership 
   The Donetsk leadership is close to the CPU, even though it did 
not do as well as the CPU itself in the election.  The local 
government leadership consists of many of the same individuals 
who ran the oblast before the overthrow of the communist system 
in 1991.  The top Donetsk leader, Presidential Representative 
Yuriy Smirnov (who did not run for the Supreme Soviet), was CPU 
oblast first secretary and then oblast soviet chairman before 
being chosen by President Leonid Kravchuk for the top local 
government post when Kravchuk created this new post of 
presidential representative in early 1992.  The No. 2 man in the 
province, Oblast Soviet Chairman Chuprun, had been CPU oblast 
secretary until succeeding Smirnov as soviet chairman.  He was 
defeated by incumbent Supreme Soviet deputy and CPU candidate 
Panasovskyy.  Chuprun recently renewed his membership in the CPU, 
and a 26 April Donetsk CPU conference nominated him for 
reelection as oblast soviet chairman (Post-Inform, 29 April). 
   Moreover, the top Ukrainian republic leaders from Donetsk were 
also part of the party or government establishment there.  Acting 
Premier Zvyahilskyy was elected Donetsk City Soviet and Executive 
Committee chairman in the fall of 1991 (Nezavisimost, 21 July 
1992), while Deputy Premier Landyk was director of a prominent 
Donetsk enterprise.   Present Ukrainian Communist Party First 
Secretary Symonenko was Donetsk CPU second secretary in 1990 and 
founded the new CPU, now the Ukraine's biggest party, in 1993. 

                     Donetsk Leadership 
                            1990            1992            1994 
   Communist Party: 
   Oblast first secretary   Mironov         (CPU banned) 
Oblast second secretary     Symonenko 
Oblast secretary            Chuprun 
   Government: 
   Presidential representative  ---         Smirnov         Smirnov 
Oblast soviet head         Smirnov          Chuprun         Chuprun 
City soviet head           Makhmudov      Zvyahilskyy   (apparently 
                                                          vacant) 
eot 
   Public Attitudes 
   The local leadership, sympathetic to Russia and the old system, 
has pressed for autonomy from Kiev and closer ties to Russia and 
took advantage of the election to put on the ballot referendum 
questions designed to promote a course opposite from Kiev's.  In 
mid-1993 the oblast soviet had passed a resolution calling for 
regional autonomy and expressing no confidence in President 
Kravchuk (Rossiyskiye Vesti, Izvestiya, 16 June 1993), and on 22 
February it adopted a decision to put questions on the 27 March 
ballot on making Russian, in addition to Ukrainian, the official 
language, either in Ukraine as a whole or at least in Donetsk 
(Donbass, 25 February).  Also added to the ballot were questions 
on having Ukraine join the CIS economic union and on changing the 
Ukrainian Constitution to provide for a federal system that would 
enable Donetsk to become autonomous. 
   The results of the referendums reflected the strong public 
alienation from the Kiev government, its promotion of Ukrainian 
nationalism, and its conflicts with Russia.  Donetsk voters 
clearly backed more use of the Russian language, closer economic 
ties with Russia, and autonomy for Donbass to pursue its own 
policies, judging by the results reported in the 1 April 
Vecherniy Donetsk: 

                                  Yes            No 
Should the constitution make 
   Russian a state language 
   in Ukraine along with 
  Ukrainian?                    2,430,821      238,017 
   Should the Russian language 
   be the "language of work, 
   business, and documentation 
   and also education and 
   science" along with 
  Ukrainian in Donetsk Oblast?  2,455,949      191,791 
   Should Ukraine become a full 
   member of the CIS economic 
   union and parliamentary 
  assembly of states?           2,481,981      190,907 
   Should the Ukrainian Constitution 
  establish a federal system?   2,227,538      419,794 
eot 
   Opinion Polls 
   Opinion polls in Donetsk have also suggested antagonism toward 
Kiev and President Kravchuk.  A mid-April poll of Donetsk voters 
on support for presidential candidates showed 38 percent for 
Kuchma, 21 percent for Kravchuk, 8 percent for reform economist 
Volodymyr Lanovyy, 5 percent for Supreme Soviet Chairman Ivan 
Plyushch, 4 percent for CPU leader Symonenko, and 3 percent for 
SPU leader Oleksandr Moroz (Post-Postup, 29 April-6 May). Another 
such poll showed Kuchma with 24.1 percent, 20.7 percent for 
Symonenko, and 13.8 percent for Rukh leader Vyacheslav Chornovil, 
while Kravchuk got only 3.4 percent, falling behind them and also 
behind Zvyahilskyy, New Ukraine leader Volodymyr Hrynyov, and 
Moroz (Aktsent, 30 April). (See Note 1)  Lviv's Vysokyy Zamok on 
23 April cited a recent poll by the Ukrainian Center for 
Political Psychology showing that in Donetsk and Luhansk only 40 
percent support Ukrainian independence now while 37.1 percent 
oppose it--less than half the 83 percent who voted for 
independence in December 1991 in both these oblasts 
(Demokratychna Ukraina, 5 December 1991). 
   (Note 1) In an effort to boost his sagging popularity, Kravchuk 
in mid-May visited Donetsk and delivered a speech to industry 
leaders supporting "the broadest regional independence" and 
recalling his recent decree allowing four eastern oblasts to 
conduct an economic experiment.  He also called for postponing 
the presidential election and won support for this from others at 
the meeting (UNIAN, 17 May). 
   Role of Press 
   The local newspapers, although calling themselves independent of 
the oblast leadership, have appeared to promote the communist 
cause and the position of local leaders.  The oblast paper with 
the biggest circulation, Aktsent, on 18 March argued that Kiev's 
bureaucracy is draining and holding back Donetsk and that the 
oblast needs economic independence to extricate itself from 
economic crisis.  The same paper on 1 April enthusiastically 
lauded the communist victory and ridiculed the nationalists' poor 
showing and declared that "for the communist majority of voters 
and in general for this region the very word 'liberal' . . . is a 
swear word and 'bourgeois.'" 
   Some papers appeared to have ties to some establishment 
candidates.  The weekly Donetskiy Kryazh, according to a 17-24 
March Post-Postup article, promoted Zvyahilskyy's son-in-law as a 
"talented doctor and active public figure" who is developing a 
"super-modern" medical center to aid invalids and pensioners. 
Vechirko leads the scientific-industrial firm Interbis, which 
also happens to be one of the sponsors of the paper.  The 17-24 
March Post-Postup article by Serhiy Furmanyuk also asserted that 
city executive committee deputy chairman Volodymyr Shcherban, who 
heads the stock company "Delo Vsekh" (Everybody's Cause), shortly 
before the campaign became a publisher of the popular local paper 
Gorod, "thereby reliably protecting his candidacy from any press 
criticism."  Furmanyuk, who worked for the paper Gorod, was 
subsequently fired by its chief editor for trying to discredit 
Shcherban and impugning the honesty and independence of Gorod 
(Post-Postup, 8-14 April).  Donetsk City's paper Vecherniy 
Donetsk did not provide much coverage of the election or 
candidates but did appear to give special coverage to a few 
selected candidates--Zvyahilskyy (16 March, 8 April), Ampilohov 
(23 March, 7, 8 April), and V. Shcherban (25 March, 6 April), and 
it also carried a 1 April report on a press conference by the 
victorious CPU. 
   Contrast to Kharkiv and Dnipropetrovsk 
   The pro-CPU tide in Donetsk was also evident in neighboring 
Luhansk and Zaporizhzhya, where the party took 18 of the 23 seats 
settled and 7 of 16, respectively, but anti-Kiev sentiment did 
not translate into communist victories in neighboring Kharkiv and 
Dnipropetrovsk, where the CPU was seriously outspent by 
industrial-agricultural forces.  In Dnipropetrovsk the CPU won 
only one seat of the 21 settled and in Kharkiv only six of the 24 
settled, based on identifications in the list of winners in the 
21 April Uryadovyy Kuryer (see table).  Although these oblasts 
also oppose Kiev's nationalistic policies and economic decisions, 
they elected mainly industrial and agricultural leaders, rather 
than CPU candidates.  Thus, Kharkiv elected nine such industrial 
and agricultural officials (three of whom were also CPU 
candidates) of their 24 elected, and Dnipropetrovsk elected eight 
of its 21. 
   The fact that the main winners in these oblasts were industrial- 
agricultural forces at least partly reflected the efforts of the 
Interregional Bloc for Reforms (MBR) organized by former Premier 
Leonid Kuchma and former Supreme Soviet Deputy Chairman Volodymyr 
Hrynyov to compete with the leftists.  While it is hard to assess 
MBR successes because its winning candidates usually identified 
themselves as nonparty or members of the Party of Democratic 
Revival of Ukraine (PDVU), the 15-21 April Post-Postup reported 
five MBR candidates elected in Kharkiv City, and Post-Inform on 
11 April reported three MBR candidates elected in Dnipropetrovsk 
Oblast. 
   In Dnipropetrovsk the MBR appeared to put on a strong campaign 
and spend large sums of money the leftists could not match.  The 
MBR ran many ads in the local paper Dneprovskaya Panorama listing 
a ticket of candidates in 13 districts plus support for five 
independent candidates, and seven of these won, judging by the 
list of winners in the 12 April Dneprovskaya Panorama.  A 15-21 
April Post-Postup article argued that leftists simply could not 
compete with the big money of the MBR and industrialists and 
quoted one SPU candidate complaining on television that the MBR 
was spending enough on the election to feed the whole population 
of Kharkiv for one year.  By contrast, the MBR appeared inactive 
in Donetsk.  The 19 February Vecherniy Donetsk's complete list of 
candidates for Donetsk City's 10 districts included no MBR 
candidates. 
   The industrial-agricultural leaders, although presumably broadly 
reflecting the establishment, appeared to include some reformers 
and democrats.  MBR leader Hrynyov is clearly an economic 
reformer, and one of the MBR candidates spoke of MBR's candidates 
as "marketeers" (rynochniki), according to a 5 April Dneprovskaya 
Panorama article. 

The party representatives elected in the three contrasting 
oblasts, judging by official identifications in the list of 
winners in the 21 April Uryadovyy Kuryer, were: 
                CPU   SPU   Labor  SelPU   Civil    PDVU  Nonparty 
                                        Congress 
Dnipropetrovsk  1    1     2      3       0      1       13 
Kharkiv         6    2     0      0       1      1       14 
Donetsk       22*    3     1*     1       1      0       15 
   *Post-Inform identifications differed slightly, listing 22 CPU 
winners plus one joint CPU-SPU-Labor and two Labor.  Two winners 
listed as nonparty in Uryadovyy Kuryer were listed as Labor and 
joint CPU-SPU-Labor, respectively, by Post-Inform on 11 April. 
eot 
   Implications 
   Ukraine's biggest oblast is at sharp odds with the government in 
Kiev at least partly because of widespread public sentiment 
hostile to Ukrainian nationalism and the prospect of economic 
reform.  Its deputies in the Supreme Soviet will probably play a 
key role in organizing a bloc against reforms, and President 
Kravchuk will have difficulty winning much support in Donetsk in 
his bid for reelection.  Fortunately for Kravchuk and reformers, 
pro-communist sentiment is not dominant everywhere in the east, 
as the success of the strong, well-financed campaign by MBR- 
industrialists demonstrated in the nearby provinces of Kharkiv 
and Dnipropetrovsk. 
   Appendix: 
   Winners in Donetsk, Kharkiv, Dnipropetrovsk (based on 
identifications in Uryadovyy Kuryer, 21 April) 
                      Donetsk Supreme Soviet Deputies 
   District 
   107    Volodymyr Shcherban--nonparty, deputy chairman Donetsk 
            City Executive Committee 
   108    Serhiy Kiyashko--SPU, docent of political science at 
            Donetsk State Technical University 
   109    no winner (neither runoff candidate won a majority) 
   110    Yukhym Zvyahilskyy--nonparty, acting premier 
   111    Anatoliy Pysarenko--CPU, chief of an administration of the 
             Donetsk Communal Ecology Organization 
   112    Yuriy Boldyrev--Civil Congress of Ukraine, deputy chairman 
             of Donetsk City Executive Committee 
   113    Borys Kozhevnykov--CPU, deputy director of a Donetsk plant 
   114    Valentyn Landyk--nonparty, deputy premier 
   115    Mykola Azarov--head of Labor Party 
   116    Volodymyr Ampilohov--nonparty, mine director 
   117    Volodymyr Cherepkov--SPU, school director 
   118    Yevhen Krasnyakov--CPU, teacher 
   119    Valeriy Sikalov--CPU, worker at Horlivka factory 
   120    Heorhiy Vyshnevetskyy--CPU, teacher at State Pedagogical 
            Institute of Foreign Languages 
   121    Hennadiy Samofalov--nonparty (but identified as Labor 
            Party by Post-Inform, 11 April), military, head of 
         Donetsk Oblast Committee of the Society for Assisting 
         Defense 
   122   Viktor Kocherha--CPU, lawyer 
   123   Kostyantyn Okhrimenko--CPU, chief of foreign economic ties 
         department at metallurgical plant 
   124   Oleksandr Yakovenko--CPU, department head in Yenakiyeve 
         city soviet 
   125   Mykhaylo Chechetov--nonparty, dean of economic faculty of 
            Kharkiv Engineering-Economic Institute 
   126   Lyudmyla Pasechna--CPU, school director 
   127   Pavlo Kuznetsov--CPU, deputy chairman of the Kramatorg 
         City Soviet Executive Committee 
   128   Oleksiy Shekhovtsov--nonparty, incumbent Supreme Soviet 
         deputy 
   129   Mykola Zavarzin--CPU, military, chief of staff of 
         Krasnoarmiysk City civil defense 
   130   Anatoliy Khunov--CPU, chief of leased enterprise in 
         Donetsk railway 
   131   Volodymyr Moiseyenko--CPU, deputy chairman of the Hirnitsk 
            Rayon Soviet Executive Committee 
   132   Anatoliy Tatarynov--nonparty, chief of an administration 
         of the Makiyivka Coal Construction Trust 
   133   Insufficient turnout 
   134   Valeriy Pudryk--CPU, chief,of a mine construction trust 
   135   Mykhaylo Pozhyvanov--nonparty, director of a small 
         enterprise 
   136   Lyudvih Miroshnychenko--nonparty, deputy chairman of 
         council of leasers at a metalurgical combine 
   137   Viktor Shestakov--CPU, foreman at Azov Steel Plant 
   138   Vasyl Tereshchuk--CPU, teacher at philosophy faculty of 
            Pryazov State Technical University 
   139   Insufficient turnout 
   140   Anatoliy Khmelyovyy--CPU, head of trade union at 
         locomotive depot 
   141   Leonid Kaminskyy--SPU, miner 
   142   Mykola Surhay--nonparty, chairman of the State Committee 
         for the Coal Industry 
   143   Anatoliy Peyhalaynen--CPU, deputy chief of shop at pipe 
         factory 
   144   Oleksandr Shamaryn--CPU, head of agricultural enterprise 
   145   Oleksandr Kozhushko--nonparty (but identified as backed by 
         Labor, CPU, and SPU in 11 April Post-Inform), chief 
         of Donetsk Railway 
   146   Anatoliy Motspan--nonparty, teacher of history and social 
         sciences at Amvrosiyivka Industrial Technikum 
   147   Oleh Panasovskyy--CPU, director of a coal power station, 
         incumbent Supreme Soviet deputy 
   148   Yevhen Shcherban--nonparty, president Aton Corporation 
   149   Mykola Dondyk--CPU, head of culture department of rayon 
         state administration 
   150   Petro Symonenko--first secretary of CPU 
   151   Volodymyr Olekseyenko--nonparty, deputy head of department 
         for agroindustrial complex and food in Ukrainian 
         cabinet 
   152   Insufficient turnout 
   153   Anatoliy Petrenko--SelPU, chief of agriculture 
         administration of Donetsk Oblast State Administration 
                    Kharkiv Supreme Soviet Deputies 
   366   no winner 
   367   no winner 
   368   Mykola Kashlyakov--CPU, deputy director of enterprise 
   369   Volodymyr Alekseyev--Civil Congress, scientific worker at 
            institute 
   370   Volodymyr Mukhin--SPU, department chief at institute 
   371   Oleh Dyomin--nonparty (but Post-Postup, 1-7 April, 
         identified him as MBR), vice president of investment 
         corporation 
   372   Oleh Taranov--nonparty (but Post-Postup, 1-7 April, 
         identified him as MBR), president of joint stock company 
   373   Oleksandr Karpov--nonparty, docent at Kharkiv State 
         University 
   374   no winner 
   375   Leonid Harmash--CPU, teacher 
   376   Volodymyr Hrynyov--PDVU, co-leader of MBR 
   377   no winner 
   378   Viktor Musiyaka--nonparty, professor at Ukrainian 
         Juridical Academy 
   379   Oleh Chornousenko--nonparty, deputy head of Kharkiv City 
              department of Security Service of Ukraine 
   380   Petro Didyk--nonparty, chairman of Izyum City Soviet 
   381   Oleksandr Chupakhin--SPU, chief of shop at plant 
   382   Mykola Bychenko--CPU, chairman of agricultural collective 
   383   Viktor Suslov--nonparty, economist, adviser to premier 
   384   Volodymyr Pustovoytovskyy--CPU, plant director 
   385   Bronislav Raykovskyy--CPU, private lawyer 
   386   Valentyna Hoshovska--nonparty (but identified as CPU by 
         Post-Inform, 4 April), first deputy chairman of a rayon 
         state administration 
   387   Vladlen Karasyk--nonparty, general director of Kharkiv 
         Sugar Association 
   388   Borys Olkhovskyy--nonparty, docent at Ukrainian State 
         Juridical Academy 
   389   Anatoliy Kosolapov--nonparty, chairman of association of 
         farms 
   390   Oleksandr Bandurka--nonparty, oblast MVD chief 
   391   Oleksiy Berezhnyy--nonparty, kolkhoz chairman 
   392   Oleksandr Kudrevich--nonparty, kolkhoz chairman 
   393   Vasyl Ivanov--CPU, plant worker 
                   Dnipropetrovsk Supreme Soviet Deputies 
   73    no winner 
   74    no winner 
   75    Oleksandr Ryabchenko--nonparty (but identified as MBR in 
          Post-Postup, 1-7 April), chairman of city bank 
   76    Serhiy Mykhaylenko--PDVU (but identified as MBR in Post- 
         Inform, 30 March, 11 April), director of Institute of 
         International Relations, Economics, Politics, and Law 
   77    Leonid Kostyuchenko--nonparty (but identified as MBR in 
         Post-Postup, 1-7 April), chairman of rayon soviet 
   78    Viktor Merkushov--nonparty, chairman of Dnipropetrovsk 
City 
           Soviet 
   79     no winner 
   80     no winner 
   81     Serhiy Chukmasov--nonparty, deputy director of pipe plant 
   82     Vitaliy Shybko--SPU, docent of history and Ukrainian 
         studies at State Metallurgical Academy 
   83    no winner 
   84     Leonid Hamanyuk--nonparty, first deputy head of oblast 
         state administration 
   85     Anton Koropenko--CPU, foreman at metallurgical plant 
   86     no winner 
   87     Dmytro Stepanyuk--nonparty, chairman of rayon soviet 
   88     Viktor Kocherha--Labor, deputy general director of Kryvyy 
         Rih Steel Combine 
   89     Volodymyr Melnyk--nonparty, sovkhoz director 
   90     Vadym Hurov--Labor, chief of shop at Kryvyy Rih Steel 
         Combine 
   91     Leonid Borodych--nonparty, first deputy head of Kryvyy Rih 
City MVD 
   92     no winner 
   93     no winner 
   94     Kostyantyn Lyashchenko--nonparty, chairman of "Channel 5" 
   95     no winner 
   96     no winner 
   97     Valeriy Babych--nonparty, president of Ukrainian Financial 
           Group 
   98     no winner 
   99     Yevhen Chulakov--SelPU, incumbent Supreme Soviet deputy 
   100    Viktor Omelich--nonparty, deputy director of President 
           Kravchuk's Service for Questions of Internal Policy 
   101    Yuriy Tikhonov--nonparty, director of chicken factory 
   102    Volodymyr Sadko--SelPU, director of agricultural 
         enterprise 
   103    Viktor Kharlamov--SelPU, chairman of agricultural 
         enterprise 
   104    no winner 
   105    no winner 
   106    Vitaliy Harkavyy--nonparty, deputy head of rayon state 
         administration 
   (AUTHOR:  HAHN.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ANALYSIS BRANCH, RUSSIA DIVISION (703) 733-6070.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/ta 25/2330z may 







</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47645 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000029394001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   26 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-25MAY94-CHINA-U.S. 
<H3> <TI>      Beijing Continues Campaign for MFN Renewal </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Beijing Continues Campaign for MFN Renewal </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                               With the deadline for a U.S. decision on renewing most-favored- 
nation (MFN) trading status for China rapidly approaching, 
Beijing is sticking to its longstanding strategy of making 
gestures on human rights and publicizing compliance on other 
issues of concern to Washington while rejecting any formal 
linkage between MFN and human rights.  Beijing has continued to 
warn of the negative economic consequences that might result from 
the Clinton administration's failure to renew China's MFN status 
and, resurrecting a tactic used during past MFN renewal debates, 
has highlighted the strategic consequences that could arise if 
MFN is not renewed.  However, Beijing's efforts to present an 
image of progress in addressing U.S. demands are being undermined 
by leadership concerns about domestic stability and the adoption 
of measures to repress dissent that are at odds with the goals of 
China's campaign for MFN renewal. 
                        END SUMMARY 
   Stepping up its efforts to influence the MFN debate as the 
deadline for renewal draws near, Beijing in recent days has 
sought to highlight its alleged progress in meeting U.S. human 
rights concerns, announcing the release of more jailed 
dissidents.  On 13 May, for example, Xinhua announced a major 
gesture on human rights in reporting that Chen Ziming, who along 
with Wang Juntao had been serving a 13-year sentence for his role 
as an alleged ringleader of the 1989 pro-democracy movement, had 
been "released on bail for medical treatment."  China had 
released Wang on 23 April and allowed him to go to the United 
States for medical treatment.  In a similar concession to 
Washington on a high-profile dissident, Beijing, according to the 
independent Hong Kong daily The South China Morning Post, has 
resolved one of the "major blocked passport" cases and has given 
noted legal scholar Yu Haocheng permission to leave for the 
United States (12 May). 
   In addition, Xinhua on 12 May reported that Zhang Ruiyu, who 
reportedly had been jailed in August 1990 for having "conspired 
to overthrow the government by means of religious activities," 
has been released "on parole."  The next day, Xinhua announced 
that five more religious dissidents--Chen Zhumun, Yan Peizhi, Xu 
Zhihe, Cui Tai, and Zhang Li--have been released from labor 
reeducation institutions.  According to the press agency, the 
five had been arrested between December 1991 and September 1993 
for "disturbing social order and endangering public security by 
making use of religion." 
   Compliance with Executive Order Conditions 
   Beijing has also stepped up its efforts in recent days to 
demonstrate Chinese compliance on other MFN-related issues, while 
denying any linkage between these gestures and the MFN debate. 
On 19 May, for example, Zhongguo Xinwen She, Beijing's news 
service for overseas Chinese, reported remarks by a PRC Foreign 
Ministry spokesman that touched on a number of issues identified 
as areas of U.S. concern in President Clinton's May 1993 
executive order on China's MFN status for 1993 and 1994. 
According to the report, the spokesman denied that Beijing is 
"jamming" Voice of America broadcasts to China, but noted that it 
has agreed to hold talks on "technical matters" regarding the 
broadcasts, "such as the questions of overlapping frequencies." 
--Prison Conditions.  The spokesman also underscored Beijing's 
alleged progress on the question of prison visits by the 
International Committee of the Red Cross (ICRC).  He said that 
China's talks with the ICRC were proceeding apace and that the 
two sides have "agreed" that the talks "furthered understanding 
and were very positive."  Apparently seeking to polish China's 
image on the question of conditions in PRC prisons, Zhongguo 
Xinwen She on 20 May began a series praising the success of 
China's penal system.  The first installment of the series cited 
Zhang Xiufu, a vice minister of justice, as touting China's 
success in "reforming" its criminals through labor, saying that 
China has "one of the lowest rates of recidivism in the world." 
Other installments have pointed to other alleged virtues of the 
penal system such as the supposedly enlightened treatment of 
"hardened" criminals at Shanghai's No. 147 prison with its "rich" 
sports and culture programs (21 May), the "humanitarian" 
treatment of foreign prisoners in Shanghai City Prison, who 
allegedly receive television sets, books, magazines, and a copy 
of China Daily (22 May), and the successes of China's 
"transformation through labor" policy (May 24). 
   -- Prison Labor.  Beijing has shown particular sensitivity to 
recent charges that China is exporting goods made by prison 
labor--perhaps because resolving the prison labor issue is one of 
the mandatory conditions of President Clinton's executive order. 
For example, China responded quickly and authoritatively to the 
16 May release of a foreign-made film on the No. 2 Prison in 
Xinjiang.  A spokesman for the "Judicial Department," in remarks 
carried by Xinhua the next daY, called the film a "fabrication" 
and denied the film's claims that the prison produces clothes for 
export.  Two days later, a PRC Foreign Ministry spokesman took 
issue with claims by "a number of U.S. Congressmen" that China is 
continuing to export prison labor products to the United States, 
calling these remarks a "sheer fabrication" and saying that 
Beijing has acted in "strict compliance" with the Sino-U.S. 
Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) and the subsequent joint 
statement on implementation (Xinhua, 19 May)   On 2O May, Beijing 
reiterated its earlier denunciations of the film in a statement 
from a "leading official" of the "Judicial Department" (Xinhua, 
2O May). 
   -- Tibet.  Beijing has also taken special pains in recent days to 
address the question of Tibet--another area of U.S. concern 
mentioned in the 1993 executive order--by publicizing an 
interview with a spokesman for the United Front Work Department 
of the party Central Committee.  Clearly meant for foreign 
audiences, the interview was published in the 16-22 May edition 
of Beijing Review, China's English-language weekly current 
affairs journal.  In addition to claiming economic and social 
advances in Tibet, the spokesman laid out Beijing's longstanding 
policies on talks with the Dalai Lama.  The spokesman underscored 
Beijing's willingness to hold talks with the Tibetan religious 
leader, asserting that China has made "genuine efforts" over the 
past ten years to hold talks with the Dalai Lama and insisting 
that such efforts will continue with "full sincerity and 
patience. 
   Warnings on Consequences 
   As the deadline for the MFN decision nears, Beijing has also 
ratcheted up its warnings of the negative consequences that might 
follow from a failure by the Clinton administration to renew 
China's MFN status.  Meeting with former U.S. Secretary of State 
Henry Kissinger on 12 May, PRC President and CPC General 
Secretary Jiang Zemin resurrected a threat used by China during 
past debates over MFN renewal, indicating that the failure to 
renew China's MFN status could have strategic consequences for 
the United States.  According to a 12 May Xinhua account of the 
talks that day, Jiang underscored the "responsibility" borne by 
China and the United States as "two powers having a considerable 
influence on the world" and warned that "confrontation between 
the two countries "will do no one any good."  Better relations, 
he said, will "benefit" the world and are "re9uired for world 
peace and stability."  Not surprisingly, he also suggested that 
bilateral relations will "meet with difficulties or setbacks or 
even regress" if Washington persists in "stressing differences 
over ideology" and tries to impose "sanctions.and pressure." 
   PRC Premier Li Peng delivered a similar message in his meeting 
with former U.S national security adviser Zbigniew Brzezinski on 
16 May.  Bluntly rejecting any linkage between MFN and human 
rights, he stressed that China will "not allow any country to 
impose its ideology or concepts of values" on China and will 
"never allow any other country to attempt to interfere in China's 
internal affairs."  Declaring that "foreign statesmen will surely 
make mistakes" if they base their "understanding" on the words of 
a "tiny number of Chinese," he went on to indicate that the 
failure to renew China's MFN status would have strategic 
consequences as China's "development and growth" are an 
"important factor contributing to world peace." 
   While reemphasizing the alleged risks in the strategic sphere, 
Beijing has also continued to warn of the negative economic 
consequences that could arise if MFN is not renewed.  During his 
visit to the United States in early May, Vice Premier Zou Jiahua, 
according to Xinhua, repeatedly warned of the potential for 
negative economic fallout.  A 3 May Xinhua report, for example, 
said that Zou told U.S. businessmen on the 2d that a "long term 
stable and harmonious environment" is necessary for economic and 
trade cooperation.  He reportedly went on to note that because of 
the annual debate over MFN, the United States-is "not as 
advantageously placed" as the Europeans and the Japanese, warning 
that there will be "serious damage" to the economics and trade of 
both countries if MFN is not granted.  Providing further evidence 
of the potential for negative economic consequences, Chinese 
media continue to routinely quite American corporate executives 
concerning the losses their companies will face if China's MFN 
trading status is not renewed. 
   Complications 
   China's efforts to demonstrate progress on Washington's criteria 
for MFN renewal this year are being undercut by concerns about 
domestic stability that have led the leadership to take a number 
of steps that are at odds with Beijing's attempt to project an 
image of compliance.  Even as China has been releasing some 
prominent jailed dissidents, Western media have been reporting 
that new arrests are being made.  For example, on the same day 
that Xinhua announced the release of Zhang Ruiyu, the French 
press agency AFP reported that Yang Zhou became the fifth 
Shanghai dissident to be arrested in recent weeks (12 May). 
Moreover, the National People's Congress Standing Committee, 
during a 5-12 May session, amended the 1986 "Regulations for 
Controlling and Punishing Public Offenses," which judging by the 
text carried by Xinhua on 13 May, provides new legal 
justifications for detaining China dissidents. 
   Outlook 
   Now that U.S. Secretary of State Warren Christopher has put 
forward his assessment of Beijing's progress in meeting the 
conditions of the 1993 executive order, Beijing will probably 
refrain from any new steps that could negatively influence the 
President's final decision.  However, as pointed out in a 23 May 
editorial carried by the PRC-owned Hong Kong daily Ta Kung Pao, 
China's domestic security concerns will continue to take priority 
over meeting Washington's requirements on MFN renewal.  In an 
unusual public acknowledgement of the link between the 
leadership's preoccupation with social stability and the MFN 
issue, the editorial stressed that, while Beijing desires better 
ties with Washington, China will "not abandon-its sovereignty or 
sacrifice social stability to meet U.S. demands" to gain MFN 
renewal. 
   (AUTHOR:  HEBBEL.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
CHINA ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6097.) 
EAG/HORTON/ta 25/2337z may 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47646 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000029494001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   27 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-26MAY94-JAPAN-U. S. 
<H3> <TI>      Bureaucrats Resist Tokyo's Deregulation Efforts </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Bureaucrats Resist Tokyo's Deregulation Efforts </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                                Opposition from officials in Japan's key economic ministries 
appears to be slowing the Japanese Government's progress in 
drawing up measures to deregulate the Japanese economy and open 
Japanese markets. The ruling coalition is searching for ways to 
undercut this opposition, but so far appears to have had little 
success.  The coalition may ultimately be able to gain some 
leverage against the bureaucrats by drawing on support from those 
in Japan's business community who see the relaxation of some 
regulations as a means to jumpstart the Japanese economy and who 
are increasingly critical of the Japanese bureaucracy for 
resisting deregulation. 
                          END SUMMARY 
   Some elements of the Japanese bureaucracy appear to be trying to 
limit the scope of the measures the Japanese Government is 
attempting to draw up as part of the detailed market opening 
package it has promised to announce by the end of June. 
   -- According to the 12 May Nihon Keizai Shimbun, at a 12 May 
meeting of the Working Group on Import Promotion, Market Access 
Improvement, and Distribution--one of the subpanels under the 
prime minister's Administrative Reform Council charged with 
compiling detailed proposals for deregulation--bureau chiefs from 
ministries and agencies involved in deregulation efforts gave 
briefings in which they stressed that it would be difficult to 
relax many of the regulations under review. 
   -- At another meeting of the same group on 18 May, the directors 
general of the Ministries of Finance, International Trade and 
Industry, and Transport reportedly attempted to defend many of 
the current regulations governing commodity distribution, the 
granting of permits, and import procedures.  The 18 May Nihon 
Keizai Shimbun said that most of the officials at the meeting 
argued that, "under present conditions," they could not abolish 
many of these regulations. 
   -- When the private sector recently submitted a package of 71 
deregulation proposals to the Working Group, the ministries and 
agencies involved reportedly rejected the vast majority of them 
in whole or in part.  According to a report compiled by the 
working group, summarized in the 22 May Yomiuri Shimbun, the 
government offices indicated that they were prepared to fully 
implement only two of the proposals--suggestions for shortening 
the time required to obtain a license to engage in the food 
business and for relaxing regulations governing foreign 
investment in certain telecommunications projects.  The 
ministries said they would "consider" 29 of the remaining 
proposals--including a suggestion for simplifying the procedures 
for obtaining a license to deal in antiques.  They refused to act 
on 25 of the proposals because they argued they were "based on 
misunderstandings."  On the 15 remaining suggestions, they 
asserted that some action had already been taken, making further 
steps unnecessary. 
   -- Some of the private sector proposals that the ministries 
reportedly rejected--such as a plan to lift restrictions on the 
establishment of holding companies--were also reported to be in 
the guidelines the ruling coalition drew up to guide 
intragovernmental discussions of deregulation (Nihon Keizai 
Shimbun, 4 May), suggesting that the bureaucracy is also 
resisting parts of the government guidelines. 
   The resistance from sections of the bureaucracy appears to be 
significantly slowing the government's efforts to draw up 
detailed deregulation proposals in some areas.  In an article in 
the 23 May Nikkei Weekly, Shojiro Makino, a businessman who 
serves on the Working Group on Import Promotion, Market Access 
Improvement, and Distribution, described how a Transport Ministry 
official held up work at a recent working group meeting by 
arguing at length with panel members over the merits of a rather 
minor change that would allow individuals to operate trucking 
businesses.  Whenever panel members tried to support the change 
by citing other areas where individuals were allowed to operate 
businesses, the official countered with a host of reasons why the 
precedents did not apply.  Iwao Nakatani, a professor at 
Hitotsubashi University and member of the working group, wrote in 
the 23 May Yomiuri Shimbun that he thought the working group 
would not be able to "hammer out fundamental deregulation 
measures that can meet expectations both at home and abroad" 
because of the "government offices' posture of defending 
regulations." 
   Government Countermeasures 
   Leaders of the ruling coalition appear to be searching for ways 
to circumvent the bureaucracy, pressuring the ministers in charge 
of the key economic ministries to play a more active role in 
guiding the deliberations on deregulation and overruling 
bureaucrats if necessary.  At a 12 May news conference, Chief 
Cabinet Secretary Hiroshi Kumagai reportedly warned that 
deregulation could not be left in the hands of bureaucrats, who 
would "drag their feet" over the issue, according to the 12 May 
Asahi Shimbun.  He added that "all ministers must make every 
possible effort to achieve deregulation even if this means 
risking their political careers."  Several days later, on 17 May, 
Prime Minister Tsutomu Hata reportedly held a special meeting 
with key economic ministers at which he urged them to take the 
initiative in formulating deregulation measures (Kyodo, 17 May). 
On 19 May, Koshiro Ishida, director general of the Management and 
Coordination Agency, held talks on deregulation with six key 
cabinet members, according to the 20 May Nihon Keizai Shimbun. 
Speaking with Ishida later in the day, Prime Minister Hata 
appeared to allude to the need to overcome bureaucratic 
opposition to deregulation by commenting that Ishida should 
"spread determination to promote deregulation among various 
ministries and agencies." 
   The ruling coalition, however, appears to have made little 
progress so far.  According to a 17 May Kyodo report, Economic 
Planning Agency head Yoshio Terasawa acknowledged to reporters 
after Prime Minister Hata's 17 May meeting with key economic 
ministers that the ministers had not been able to formulate any 
specific plans for handling deregulation. 
   Business Support for Deregulation 
   Although the ruling coalition is politically weak, it may be able 
to draw on support in the Japanese business community--which sees 
deregulation as a way to stimulate the moribund Japanese economy- 
-to gain leverage with the bureaucracy.  Several leading Japanese 
business groups have actively lobbied the government in favor of 
deregulation, particularly in areas where these groups see 
deregulation as benefiting Japanese business.  For example, 
Masaru Hayami, chairman of Japan's second largest business group, 
the Association of Corporate Executives (Keizai Doyukai) met with 
Prime Minister Hata on 1O May to urge him to vigorously promote 
economic reform and deregulation, which Hayami described as 
"vital" to Japan's economic recovery.  On 13 May, Japan's largest 
business organization, the Federation of Economic Organizations 
(Keidanren), reportedly sent a letter supporting deregulation to 
Chief Cabinet Secretary Hiroshi Kumagai (Kyodo, 13 May).  The 
same day, Keidanren presented Prime Minister Hata with a 196- 
point proposal for deregulating such areas as land and housing 
regulations, communications, distribution, and agriculture, and 
Keidanren Vice Chairman Nakauchi met with Hata to discuss his 
views on deregulation (Kyodo, 13 May; Yomiuri Shimbun, 15 May). 
   Business leaders who support deregulation have also been 
increasingly critical of the bureaucracy for resisting reform. 
According to the 12 May Nihon Keizai Shimbun, a group of 
businessmen represented on the Working Group on Import Promotion, 
Market Access Improvement, and Distribution--including Keidanren 
Vice Chairman Nakauchi--sharply criticized senior government 
bureaucrats attending the working group's 12 May meeting for 
failing to vigorously promote deregulation.  Nihon Keizai Shimbun 
quoted one private sector representative as stating that the 
panel--composed of businessmen and scholars--believed that "it is 
time for the ministries and agencies concerned to pool their 
wisdom and announce plans for productive deregulation."  At the 
18 May meeting of the panel, private sector members reportedly 
once again upbraided senior officials briefing the group, 
accusing them of foot-dragging.  According to the 18 May Nihon 
Keizai Shimbun, private sector representatives told the officials 
that they "must change their attitude of arguing that regulations 
are justified by Japan's special circumstances."  The same day, 
Keidanren Vice Chairman Nakauchi reportedly sent a letter to 
various ministries, criticizing them for "trying to protect their 
authority" by resisting deregulation. 
   Business support for some aspects of deregulation appears to have 
had some success in getting the government to consider more 
extensive changes than it originally planned.  For example, the 4 
May Nihon Keizai Shimbun reported that the government originally 
planned to include in its deregulation package some modifications 
of the Large-Scale Retail Stores Law that regulates the operation 
of larger retail outlets.  When influential parts of the business 
community began to call for the abolition of the law, however, 
the government began to examine the possibility of gradually 
phasing it out. 
   Outlook 
   Because of opposition from the bureaucracy, the Japanese 
government will probably be able to draw up only a relatively 
unambitious package of deregulation measures by the June 
deadline.  Although some of the politicians in the ruling 
coalition appear committed to deregulation, most have only a 
general knowledge of the regulations they seek to abolish and are 
heavily dependent on the bureaucracy to supply the details needed 
to draw up and carry out a comprehensive program of deregulation. 
In addition, the coalition is currently preoccupied with a number 
of other concerns, including the volatile political climate in 
Japan and the government's shaky political standing, and may be 
unable to focus sufficient attention on breaking the logjam over 
deregulation.  Business community support for deregulation may 
provide leverage against bureaucratic opposition and secure more 
extensive reforms in some instances.  However, the government 
will probably be able to count on this support only in areas 
where deregulation serves the interests of Japanese business, and 
not in those areas where business sees deregulation as less 
beneficial or even harmful. 
   (AUTHOR:  BOUNDS.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703)-733-6534.) 
EAG/HEBBEL/ta 26/0007z may 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47647 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000029594001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   28 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-27MAY94-Russia 
<H3> <TI>      Military Bows to Pressure On Joint U.S.-Russian Exercises </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Military Bows to Pressure On Joint U.S.-Russian Exercises </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                                      After Russian President Boris Yeltsin's retreat under pressure 
from the legislature, the Defense Ministry finally acceded to 
legislative demands and cancelled joint U.S.-Russian military 
exercises--at least temporarily.  Russian press commentary on the 
issue divided along political lines, with communist and 
nationalist papers opposing the exercises and reformist 
newspapers favoring them.  The usually pro-Yeltsin Izvestiya 
criticized Yeltsin's handling of the issue. 
                                     END SUMMARY 
   The Russian Defense Ministry, bowing to political pressure, 
informed the State Duma on 19 May that it had "postponed" joint 
U.S.-Russian exercises--originally scheduled for July at the 
Totsk training area in the Urals--in line with President 
Yeltsin's 26 April recommendation that it reconsider the 
expediency of holding them.  Moscow radio (19 May) reported that 
the ministry announcement "particularly noted" that Yeltsin 
"agrees" with the Duma position that the exercises needed to be 
"cancelled."  Segodnya reported the same day, however, that the 
ministry planned to hold new talks--set for June--with Pentagon 
officials on possibly rescheduling the exercises for a later 
date. 
   The postponement followed intense political lobbying from 
hardliners and nationalists in the legislature, the press, and 
local organizations near the training range, which began 
gathering steam in March (Sovetskaya Rossiya, 26 March; Interfax, 
18 April; Selskaya Zhizn, 13 May) as publicity about the 
exercises began to surface.  The Duma, which had not been 
consulted before the public announcement of the exercises, 
expressed "doubts" about their desirability (Sovetskaya Rossiya, 
15 April; ITAR-TASS, 20 April) and, on 22 April, sent a 
resolution to Yeltsin asking that he reconsider the decision to 
hold the exercises "with due account for the Russian social- 
political situation" and "the framework of civic peace in Russia" 
(ITAR-TASS, 26 April).  Faced with such an implicit threat to 
social stability on the eve of signing the Civic Accord agreement 
with the Duma, Yeltsin retreated somewhat and referred the matter 
back to the Defense Ministry for further study "with due regard" 
for the "stance" of the parliament and "comments" made "by the 
general public" (ITAR-TASS, 26 April). 
   A Military Counterattack 
   Senior military officials appeared reluctant to take Yeltsin's 
hint and staged a last-ditch effort to salvage the exercises.  In 
a campaign spearheaded by Defense Minister Pavel Grachev, 
military leaders defended the military and political value of the 
exercises, played down their cost and size, and dismissed 
detractors as military incompetents: 
   -- Grachev, who signed a memorandum arranging for joint exercises 
during his U.S. trip in September 1993 (Moscow TV, 9 September 
1993) may have felt his prestige was on the line.  He insisted 
repeatedly at news conferences that the exercises were "vital" 
for the sake of peace and friendship and to erase the "enemy 
image" and "really move" toward U.S.-Russian partnership (Moscow 
radio, 6 and 11 May).  Asking rhetorically what was "wrong" with 
young Americans and Russians having contact and learning about 
each other, he complained bitterly about the "rumpus" and 
"hullabaloo" in the Duma, as well as the "stir" in the government 
and Security Council, noting that when the agreement was signed a 
year ago "everyone remained silent."   He stressed that the 
planned maneuvers were "peacekeeping"--not "war" --exercises, and 
that if Russia really respected those "for whose sake we are 
engaging in peacekeeping activities," then the exercises should 
be held. 
   -- Echoing Grachev, Colonel General Vladimir Semenov, Ground 
Forces Commander-in-Chief, emphasized that the objective of the 
exercises was to practice peacekeeping skills and that, in any 
event, the exercises were extremely limited in scope.  Extolling 
U.S. expertise in such operations, he stressed that the Americans 
would demonstrate such techniques as separating feuding sides and 
dealing with refugee and other humanitarian problems--a clear 
allusion to peacekeeping problems faced by the Russian military 
in former Soviet republics.  Semenov also pointed out that the 
Americans had initially offered to conduct the exercises in the 
United States, but that the Russians had refused on the grounds 
of cost (Obshchaya Gazeta, 6-12 May). 
   -- Russian General Staff chief Mikhail Kolesnikov expressed 
regret at the "heated debate" in the Duma, and complained that 
public opinion is being "deliberately provoked" by people who "do 
not know" or "pretend not to know" what "command and staff" 
exercises are.  Emphasizing the small-scale nature of the 
exercises, he pointed out that "not a single American tank" would 
be on the Totsk training ground (Interfax, 4 May; Segodnya, 6 
May). 
   Splits in the Parliament 
   Yeltsin's waffling stance also sparked further disagreement among 
parliamentary reformers and hardliners with some in each group 
drawing parallels between the exercises and the NATO Partnership 
for Peace plan and, depending upon their political orientation, 
either viewed them as another example of the West trying to take 
advantage of Russia, or as essential for cementing U.S.-Russian 
relations: 
   -- Insisting that the exercises should be continued, Chairman of 
the Duma's defense committee and Russia's Choice member Sergey 
Yushenkov berated Yeltsin for heeding the Duma's objections to 
the exercises.  He called Yeltsin's decision a "return to the 
Cold War" and linked it to Russia's delay in joining the 
Partnership for Peace plan.  He contended that a decision on the 
exercises was "the exclusive prerogative of the executive" and 
that the President's stand "testifies to the weakness of the 
executive power and its poorly-considered actions" (ITAR-TASS, 27 
April). 
   -- In a more measured argument, Federation Council Chairman 
Vladimir Shumeyko observed that politicians should "react calmly" 
to the military's efforts to enhance combat readiness, including 
joint exercises with other countries.  Countering those who were 
"indignant" about "Yankee feet" on Russian soil, he retorted that 
in this case, "an ally, not an aggressor, was stepping on our 
soil" (ITAR-TASS, 28 April). 
   -- One of the deputy chairmen of Yushenkov's committee, Liberal 
Democrat Yevgeniy Loginov, opposed the exercises, insisting that 
they had no "practical value."  He claimed, moreover, that the 
majority of the Duma also opposed planned joint U.S.-Russian 
naval exercises.  Alluding to 1992 U.S. media stories about 
possible Pentagon plans, including one that allegedly posited 
Russia as a likely adversary, Loginov said that it would be 
"nonsense" to hold joint exercises with a state that held such 
views (ITAR-TASS, 27 April). 
   -- Chairman of the Federation Council's defense committee Pyotr 
Shirshov protested that Russia "cannot be made into a training 
ground for the American Army."  He linked his opposition with 
that of his stance on Partnership for Peace, which he termed a 
"danger for Russia," arguing that by participating in that plan 
the Russian Army "becomes transparent to the North Atlantic bloc" 
(ITAR-TASS, 13 May). 
   Media Reaction 
   Media commentary on the U.S.-Russian joint exercises has 
predictably divided along political lines.  The anti-West 
communist and nationalist press strongly condemned the exercises 
as dangerous to Russia's security, while the reformist press, 
including the Defense Ministry newspaper Krasnaya Zvezda, 
supported them: 
   -- In a strident front-page article in the ultranationalist 
Zavtra (the former Den), Major General Viktor Filatov, formerly 
editor of the Military-Historical Journal, called the exercises a 
"fool's dream coming true" in which the "[U.S.] stars-and-stripes 
will be flying over Eurasia without firing a single shot."  He 
further charged that the exercises were part of a conspiracy 
aimed at Beijing and run by an American-dominated "world 
government," using NATO as a battering ram (No.12, March 1994). 
   -- The pro-communist newspaper Pravda ran a series of front-page 
anti-exercise articles starting in March.  Retired General Viktor 
Chudov charged in a long diatribe that the exercises were 
designed to dampen "reunification sentiments" in former Soviet 
republics and to inspire "separatists and nationalists" to 
"vigorous activity."  He berated the Defense Ministry's "top 
brass" for engaging in such exercises instead of carrying out its 
own war games designed to repel potential aggression "by a 
coalition of nuclear powers" (16 March).  A week later, an 
article on peacekeeping costs gave short shrift to a statement by 
Deputy Defense Minister Colonel General Georgiy Kondratyev that 
Russia intended to borrow and learn from U.S. peacekeeping 
experiences, asking sarcastically if the Russian military 
intended to emulate U.S. military operations in Panama, Grenada, 
and the Persian Gulf (23 March). 
   -- The Defense Ministry newspaper Krasnaya Zvezda published a 
long, extremely upbeat interview with Colonel General Eduard 
Vorobyev, first deputy commander-in-chief of the Ground Forces, 
who described the size and scope of the exercises (5 March).  In 
addition, following the Chudov article in Pravda, Krasnaya Zvezda 
published a strongly-worded rebuttal on its front page, charging 
that the Pravda article was filled with a "series of gross 
distortions" and written by an author who "does not have true 
information on the exercises."  The Krasnaya Zvezda article ended 
by claiming that the exercises "should make a real contribution 
to the cause of international cooperation in the settling of 
conflicts in trouble spots" (18 March). 
   -- The usually pro-Yeltsin newspaper Izvestiya, in an article 
titled "The President Will Be Making A Mistake If He Cancels the 
Russian-U.S. Exercise," called holding the exercises "a matter of 
honor" and lambasted the "absurd charges" against them made by 
"politicians of a very clear-cut orientation"--a clear reference 
to Yeltsin's opposition.  Contending that there were situations 
"when compromise becomes spinelessness," the article charged that 
"unpredictable to-ing and fro-ing, whatever the reason,"inflicts 
"very severe blows on the unconsolidated authority of a Russia 
which, appropriately or not, likes to call itself great" (28 
April). 
   Outlook 
   Yeltsin's pressure on the military to accommodate the Duma's 
demands to cancel the joint exercises suggests that he feels a 
need to yield to nationalist forces in Russia on at least some 
agreements with the West in order to try to salvage others.  His 
apparent weakness in yielding to the Duma's pressure is likely to 
embolden his opponents to continue to attack him and his 
supporters over his policy of cooperative relations with the West 
as well.  Moreover, the military's effort to proceed with the 
exercises despite Yeltsin's backtracking suggests that leading 
officers are concerned the yielding on this issue may jupordize 
future military-to-military relations with the West. 
   (AUTOR:  BELLINGER.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL 
CHIEF, ANALYSIS BRANCH, RUSSIA DIVISION, (703) 733-6070.) 
ENEAG/PINKASOVIC/SM 27/2036Z MAY 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47648 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000029694001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   28 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE 
FOLLOWING ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. 
GOVERNMENT CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA 
CONTENT AND BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT 
COORDINATION WITH OTHER U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-27MAY94-IRAQ-YEMEN 
<H3> <TI>      Baghdad Supports Salih Victory in Yemen </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Baghdad Supports Salih Victory in Yemen </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                                 Iraqi leaders and media have vigorously supported Yemeni 
President 'Ali 'Abdallah Salih's use of force to crush the 
forces of Vice President 'Ali Salim al-Bidh, and have blamed 
the fighting in Yemen on a U.S.-Saudi-Kuwaiti conspiracy to 
break up Yemeni unity.  President Saddam Husayn's perception 
of the intra-Yemeni war as a proxy conflict with Saudi 
Arabia, in which his personal prestige and Iraq's strategic 
interests are at stake, is reflected in the strong and 
unprecedented public riposte that his half-brother Barzan 
received for expressing a lone dissenting view on Yemen. 

                           END SUMMARY 

   Baghdad signaled its position on 18 April, ten days before 
the first Yemeni battle on 27-28 April.  The Iraqi News 
Agency (INA) cited a Salih emissary to Saddam as saying that 
Saddam "had a distinguished role in the realization of 
Yemeni unity, and that his excellency is still extremely 
interested in safeguarding this Yemeni Arab achievement" (18 
April). 

   Within days after major fighting erupted on 4 May, and 
within a day of the south's secession on 21 May, Baghdad 
authoritatively expressed its unreserved support for Salih 
against al-Bidh in statements by the ruling Ba'th Party 
National Command and the foreign minister, respectively: 

   -- The Ba'th Party informed "genuinely patriotic and pan- 
Arab" Yemenis that "we support you in confronting this 
danger" and in ending "the sedition and conspiracy against 
unity."  The Ba'th Party also rejected "every reason, act, 
or justification that encroaches on the entity of unity" 
(Baghdad radio, 8 May). 

   -- Foreign Minister Muhammad Said al-Sahhaf said Iraq 
"emphasizes its full support for the territorial and popular 
unity of sisterly Yemen and supports the legitimate and 
constitutional authority in Yemen, led by President 'Ali 
'Abdallah Salih."  He added that "we strongly condemn the 
ugly secessionist action carried out by 'Ali Salim al-Bidh 
and his group," which he also characterized as "the renegade 
and backward forces" (INA, 22 May). 
   Iraqi media blamed the fighting primarily on alleged U.S., 
Saudi, and Kuwaiti efforts to destabilize Yemen.  For 
example: 

   -- An editorial in the Information Ministry's daily Al- 
Jumhuriyah claimed that the killing in Yemen had been 
"arranged" by the United States and its "reactionary" Arab 
"satellites" -- an unmistakable allusion to Saudi Arabia and 
Kuwait (INA, 7 May). 

   -- An article in Babil, the daily of Saddam's son 'Udayy, 
claimed that the United States "provides weapons to, and 
protects, the separatists in southern Sudan, northern Iraq, 
and southern Yemen," thus promoting "the spilling of Arab 
blood"  (INA, 24 May). 

   -- In another Babil article, Information Ministry First 
Under Secretary Nuri Najm al-Marsumi accused "the Saudi and 
Kuwaiti rulers and the U.S. Embassy in Sanaa" of 
"involvement in a multi-chapter conspiracy" against Yemeni 
unity.  He charged the Yemeni socialists with "coordinating" 
with Saudi Arabia and Kuwait and forgetting that they are 
"no more than tools to destroy their homeland and future" 
(INA, 26 May). 

   Barzan's Heretical Analysis 

   In contrast to the officially approved propaganda line in 
Iraqi media, Barzan -- who is an adviser to Saddam as well 
as the Iraqi ambassador to the UN institutions in Geneva -- 
presented a totally different analysis in Al-Jumhuriyah (8 
May).  Without blaming any external forces, Barzan described 
the fighting in Yemen as "the result of a relationship 
between two contradictory regimes, which were placed within 
the framework of unity."  Seeming to question the judgment 
of Saddam, who was the strongest non-Yemeni promoter of this 
framework, Barzan added that "many people all over the Arab 
homeland seeking or opposing the concept of unity voiced 
their doubts" about the project. 

   Barzan's main thesis was that Yemenis have two reasonable 
alternatives, each of which is far superior to the current 
war:  "Either [incomplete] unity that respects everyone and 
guarantees mutual rights, or a return to the state of 
separation and the previous situation."  He argued that the 
Yemenis had made an "impulsive" and "emotional" choice for 
unity "without paying heed" to "the reality of internal 
political divisions" and without sufficiently exploring 
"whether each party is willing to make concessions . . .  in 
order to achieve unity."   Seeming to criticize Salih and 
his supporters, Barzan said the situation developed into "an 
all-out war" because "some people think it is either full 
unity or an all-out war," a view he described as "wrong." 
Apparently showing some understanding for the position of 
al-Bidh and his followers, Barzan said that "no one can 
ignore certain realities in Yemen's unity, namely, that some 
leaders who were addicted to authority found themselves 
after the unity in secondary positions and were stripped of 
their actual authority."  Barzan added that "any belief by 
any party that the unity can be saved by force will deepen 
the wounds and increase the destruction and will make unity 
a dream that will never see the light."  On the other hand, 
"returning to the situation that prevailed in 1989 means 
there will be a relationship based on mutual respect and a 
hope that unity will be achieved one day." 

   Response to Barzan 

   Although Barzan has published unorthodox views in the past, 
this article is the first to elicit a monitored hostile 
response.  Published in Babil just one day after Barzan's 
article, the response was almost certainly approved at the 
highest level since its author, using the pseudonym "'Umar 
al-Kazimi," was evidently given access to Barzan's article 
before its publication and would not have dared to attack 
Barzan without Saddam's backing. 

   Al-Kazimi claimed that it had gradually become clear from 
Barzan's writings that he has acquired ideas "different from 
our way of thinking in Iraq" and has moved "closer to the 
inclinations of persons who live abroad" -- a very serious 
charge in Baghdad's political lexicon. 

   Denying that Yemen has "two conflicting regimes," al-Kazimi 
said that "when Iraq was strong . . . Yemeni unity was a 
model," but that since then "one Yemeni side" succumbed to 
"Saudi intrigues" and started to move "in the direction of 
the sides that were hostile to Iraq" in the Mother of 
Battles.  Al-Kazimi placed this change in the context of a 
decrease of Arab support for Iraq, citing Morocco, Tunisia, 
and Jordan as countries that have become less neutral or 
less pro-Iraqi than they were in August 1990.  In contrast 
to Barzan, Al-Kazimi claimed that "the plan being carried 
out in Yemen today is not just an outcome of the conflict 
between Yemenis, but also a plan drawn up and studied abroad 
to divide Yemen." 

   Indirectly emphasizing the conflict's strategic and 
ideological significance for Iraq, al-Kazimi said that "the 
existence of a strong Yemen south of Saudi Arabia and a 
strong Iraq north of it constitutes a strategic danger to 
the ruling family in the Arabian Peninsula," and added that 
both Iraq and Yemen cherish "pan-Arab aspirations." 

   In contrast to Barzan's opposition to achieving unity by 
armed force, al-Kazimi claimed that "no Arab unity has been 
achieved without the use of armed force" because it is the 
only way to deal with "egotistical Arab individuals who love 
shaykhdoms and being a shaykh."  He commended Salih for 
rejecting mediation, which al-Kazimi claimed would have led 
to Yemen's division.  He called the war in Yemen "a full 
liberation war" and compared it to "the period of treachery 
and treason" in the spring of 1991, which he depicted as an 
attempt to divide Iraq into three states. 

   Taking Barzan's statement that "the dream of unity has . 
become a nightmare, and not just in Yemen" as intended to 
apply to Iraq's invasion of Kuwait and its current domestic 
situation, Al-Kazimi replied, "No.  Never" and claimed that 
unlike the attempted union of Syria and Egypt (1958-61), 
Iraq and Yemen each possess "real unity" and that "the firm 
conviction" of unity will never be shaken.  He added, "we 
totally disagree" with Barzan's thesis. 

   Al-Kazimi seemed to presuppose that Barzan regarded the 
Mother of Battles as an aberration and Iraq's fault.  Thus, 
he took Barzan to task for saying that 20 Arab states have 
managed to coexist without fighting by responding that "half 
of the regimes of the nation turned their armies" against 
Iraq.  He concluded by praising the Yemeni "unionists" and 
claiming that Yemen can be "redeemed" only by "bloodshed" 
and "sacrifices." 
   Background 

   The line that Saudi Arabia and the United States are seeking 
to destabilize Yemen has appeared in Baghdad media since 
1992.  For example: 

   -- In May 1992, the party daily Al-Thawrah claimed that as 
part of an "American plan" to "punish Yemen for its support 
of Iraq," Washington's "main agent [King] Fahd" was working 
"to destroy Yemen politically and economically" (INA, 20 May 
1992). 

   -- In May 1993, an editorial in Babil accused Saudi Arabia 
and the United States of "systematic and comprehensive 
action to remove the Yemeni leadership and undermine Yemeni 
unity so as to enable reactionary forces linked to them to 
seize power" (INA, 2 May 1993). 

   -- In November 1993, an article in Al-Qadisiyah claimed that 
Saudi Arabia had spent large sums "in bribes" for "the 
perpetration of crimes aimed at igniting sedition" in Yemen 
(INA, 11 November 1993). 

   Throughout this period, Baghdad has proclaimed its support 
for Yemen.  For example, member of the Ba'th Party Command 
'Abd-al-Ghani 'Abd-al-Ghafur, speaking to a visiting Yemeni 
politician from Salih's party, "reasserted support for, and 
solidarity with, fraternal Yemen in its confrontation 
against Saudi plots in an effort to safeguard its national 
unity, stability, and sovereignty" (Baghdad radio, 8 June 
1992). 

   Baghdad has also indicated willingness to show its support 
for Yemen in a practical manner.  After a trip to Yemen in 
January 1993, Vice President Taha Yasin Ramadan said he had 
informed his Yemeni interlocutors of "Iraq's constant 
readiness to meet Yemen's needs in terms of the necessary 
technical assistance and consultations in all spheres so 
that Yemen's potential for development and progress may be 
enhanced."  He added that he had discussed "areas in which 
we could enhance bilateral cooperation to foster a unity of 
views and close the doors and loopholes to . . . the 
malicious plots targeting Yemeni unity" (Baghdad radio, 2 
January 1993). 

   Implications 

   Saddam's reported statement to Salih's emissary that he is 
"extremely interested" in safeguarding Yemen's unity -- as 
well as the unprecedented appearance of a quick rebuff to 
Barzan's heretical views on Yemen -- reflects Saddam's 
investment of his prestige in the cause of Yemeni unity and 
his desire to thwart the Saudi ruling family, which he views 
as a strategic and ideological enemy that is at odds with a 
country he regards as a strategic and ideological ally.  The 
Iraqi regime seems to perceive the Yemeni conflict as a 
continuation within the Arab context of the divisions 
manifested in the Mother of Battles and would therefore 
regard a Salih victory as being a victory for Iraq as well. 

   While Barzan's dissent on Yemen cannot be taken as a signal 
of disloyalty to Saddam, the public airing of such 
differences within the regime is bound to be noticed by 
politically astute Iraqis and raise doubts about the 
ultimate survivability of the regime. 
   (AUTHOR: BUDER.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL 
CHIEF, NEAR EAST ANALYSIS BRANCH (703) 733-6094) 
ENEAG/PINKASOVIC/CL 27/2353Z MAY 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47649 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000029794001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   28 May 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-27MAY94-JORDAN-YEMEN 
<H3> <TI>      Amman Signals Support for Sanaa </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Amman Signals Support for Sanaa </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                                  The Jordanian government has withdrawn from its prior role of 
mediator in the Yemeni conflict following the outbreak of civil 
war in Yemen in early May, and has openly indicated its backing 
for a united Yemen under President 'Ali 'Abdallah Salih.  Amman 
media initially reported a few token gestures by the government 
that suggested a policy of evenhandedness toward the warring 
factions, but recent references in Jordanian media confirm the 
government's opposition to Vice President 'Ali Salim al-Bid's 
recent declaration of a secession from northern Yemen. 

                            END SUMMARY 

   Jordan's official broadcast media have recently signaled the 
government's alignment with northern Yemen in the inter-Yemeni 
conflict by replacing merely geographic references to the warring 
sides with value-laden terms (Amman radio, 9 May). Since 18 May, 
three days before al-Bid's announcement of secession from the 
Sanaa government, state-controlled Amman radio and television 
have been observed to refer to the northern forces under Yemeni 
President 'Ali 'Abdallah Salih as the "forces of unity and 
legitimacy," and to the southern army backing Vice President 'Ali 
Salim al-Bid  as the "secessionist forces," phrases identical to 
those used by northern Yemen-controlled Sanaa radio in its 
references to the fighting (Amman radio, 23 May; Amman TV, 25 
May; Sanaa radio, 1 May). 

   Prior to 18 May, official media not only used neutral references 
to the rival armies, but also carried reports that projected a 
balanced stance toward the conflict, conveying Jordan's efforts 
to reconcile both sides. For example: 

   --Amman TV on 10 May took pains to note that "a number of wounded 
from the two opposing sides" were being treated at the al-Husayn 
Medical Center in Amman. 

   --The English-language Jordan Times cited Prime Minister 'Abd al- 
Salam al-Majali as stating that the Jordanian government would 
not "interfere in support of either party to the crisis."  The 
paper also noted that King Husayn had "telephoned both Mr. al-Bid 
and Mr. Salih in a bid to end the fighting" (14 May). 

   Discrimination Against Southern Yemenis Alleged 

   In a report that suggests Jordan's open sympathy for Sanaa may 
have extended to a bias against southern Yemenis, the Saudi-owned 
daily Al-Sharq al-Awsat said that Jordanian authorities had 
turned back "a large number of Yemeni passengers, including many 
women and children," who had arrived in Amman from Yemen, and 
cited Jordanian officials as stating that the decision to deny 
entry to the southern Yemenis was at "the instructions of higher 
authorities."  The paper also cited a "responsible south Yemeni 
source" as charging that Jordanian officials had denied admission 
to a southern Yemeni official seeking medical treatment.  The 
official said that Jordan had recently sent "six planeloads of 
medical aid to Sanaa, thereby indicating alignment with the 
northern leadership in the current conflict in Yemen" (20 May). 

   Implications 

   The Jordanian government, which has always favored a united 
Yemen, has revealed its deep disappointment with the war's 
escalation and subsequently with al-Bid's decision to secede. 
The official media's earlier evenhanded stance probably reflected 
hopes for an early end to the civil strife, and a desire to 
retain at least the appearance of neutrality.  The secession 
development, however, was a particular blow to King Husayn's 
reputation as a pan-Arab peacemaker, especially following the 
extensive and well publicized mediation efforts that culminated 
in the signing of a reconciliation accord in Amman last February. 
Following its failed attempts to reconcile the two leaders, 
Jordan will likely continue to back efforts to reunite Yemen, 
although its evident sympathy toward Salih rules out Amman's 
future role as a neutral player. 
   (AUTHOR:  MURRAY.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
NEAR EAST ANALYSIS BRANCH (703) 733-6094.) 
ENEAG/PINKASOVIC/CL 28/0027Z MAY 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

